"Nevertheless, the film soared in terms of its values and its understanding of the how a disease can bring someone closer to his or her maker."
The payoff is when bank manager Felix Aylmer meets with Hayter about diversifying his investments.
"At this point the story actually resembles part of the plot of the non-Maugham story and film CHINA SEAS (1935), as Max makes a bet that he can tell a real piece of jewelry from a fake (after insisting that a piece of jewelry he spotted is real)."
Crystin Sinclaire of Tobe Hooper's Eaten Alive and Curtis Harrington's Ruby) makes her lively film debut as uninhibited wildcat Crazy Alice.
Kurt Russel did what I though was a remarkable role in showing the emotionless soldier that he was.
"Katie Cassidy did an amazing job with her character, being she had not done a lot of work when this film was made."
"It doesn't matter that Harris doesn't exactly resemble Lennon; his mannerisms, expressions, posture, accent and attitude are pure Lennon."
Frank Kramer is actually the same Gianfranco Parolini who brought the world SARTANA in 1968 and GOD'S GUN the year before this & was a very important director in the Spaghetti Western and action/adventure genre film scene from the 1960's/1970's and by the time of YETI he was probably delighted to get the work.
"I would say that this is his most adventuresome movie ever, or rather the one he took the most chances with, and may have felt more comfortable taking those chances with the film aimed at kids & families."
"He forgot to have fun with the material and let it dictate the outcome using his army of stupid Power Macintosh pod people animators, and with all it's faults + clunkiness, Kramer's YETI is actually closer to the spirit of why we watch movies like this, which is partly to see actors in ape suits tearing apart miniature sets on sound stages, not seamlessly animated vapid hours of nothing other than hard drive space."
"First, any play on ...of the living dead invokes His Holiness Mr. Romero and instantly sets up a high standard to which many movies cannot afford to aspire."
Ricky's keen scientific mind presents an option superior to CPR or 911: injections of his lab's experimental regenerative formula.
Paula Malcomson of Deadwood fame is terrific as his wife as well.
I see a star in the making of Zoe played by the relative unknown Alessandra Torresani & her performance.
Esai Morales is terrific in his desire to see his loved one again & just how wrong to be even considering what he wants more than his moral objections.
Tom Hanks delivers the best performance of his career.
And veteran Paul Newman gives one of his best character performances in a long time.
"Mike Sullivan had no father as a child, so John Rooney took him in."
"It subsequently dollys around to the side of the car, to see Michael(Hoechlin) awakening and peering out his side window."
The point is that A.Puyn casted in that film a very talented body-builder who put all of her energy and body talent to show us the best she can do.
"Count Blackwood offers to bet Alan 100 pounds that he cannot survive this night in Blackwood's castle, a night following Halloween when the dead walk."
"Alan cannot afford the bet, so he bets his life for a 10 pound wager."
Streisand fought hard to make this movie her own.
"We can also sense helplessness in the old man's inability to convince the police of the murder, which parallels the silenced child's inability to tell her own story."
"I completely see what the writer/director was going for, and he hit the target perfectly!"
"Trapero's film was a journey into a man's mind and experiences, not into the places he saw."
The first character (Luis Luque) is a detective that has just found out his wife cheats on him; and has to work on a case.
"But it is bigger than that, and it will unfold a part of the doctor's personality he didn't know."
To a small Arab town on the edge of the Sahara comes a beautiful woman looking for meaning to her life & a handsome Trappist monk fleeing from his crisis of faith.
This causes a battle of wits between the rascally rabbit and his now former employer.
"Thankfully, in cartoons, generally, whatever damage a character suffers is gone within seconds and he's back to normal."
"Mitchell Leisen's fifth feature as director, and he shows his versatility by directing a musical, after his previous movies were heavy dramas."
"Clayton warns Sidney that he'd better impress and charm everyone he can, if he wants to succeed."
"In time, Allison's friendship might be the only thing saving Sydney from his downward spiraling career."
Bing Crosby reportedly hated it when he was used on more than one occasion.
"And then of course you expect Matt to kill the guy who threw battery acid in Mr. Allen's face, blinding him (interesting role by Bruce Dern)."
"Great actor, just coming into his own."
"His 'young boy off the farm' is a great study, made especially poignant because of his bassett-hound eyes."
A psychologist offers to help a patient with his gambling debts and gets caught at the game.
"L L Cool J's character was clearly conflicted, but I honestly didn't know what he would do in the end."
"Morgan Freeman is as always, the wise mentor figure he does so well, and as much as I love Kevin SPacey, he was kind of just there."
"My three favorite actors for this film were Jack Wild, who plays the best Dodger in any film version of the story, Ron Moody, a playful and humorous Fagin (this character is worked out much better than he is in the book), and Shani Wallis, who is the strongest, most distressed version of Nancy."
"Kirk manages to get himself locked up and charged with witchcraft while Spock enjoys some amok time with a sexy cavegirl who was vanquished to the this frozen, awful world by some bad guy."
Spock decides hes happy where hes at and gives McCoy a royal assestment whuppin' when the doc suggests they need to look for a way out.
Spock must have been out of his vulkin' mind to leave behind his greatest hope for love and being human.
Also Jerry throws in his opinion why his show upsets people and justifies his show's existience.
"Pfeiffer stood out as dull and uncomfortable on first viewing, but I've come to realize how she plays out the part of the bored little wife."
This movie allows people to really understand how hard the life was for the prophet and how much tribulation he was faced with.
"Even though Price is a murderer, I actually found myself rooting for him, he is a sympathetic character who is driven mad by the greedy people around him who keep taking advantage of him."
But the rest of the plot also touched on the real life efforts of Ruth Roman also playing herself to get her studio and others to do shows at the Air Force bases for the servicemen and women going to Korea.
"Castle of Blood is outstanding in many departments: Barbara Steele Delivers one of her best performances, the cinematography and locations are beautifully haunting beyond comparison, the atmosphere is incredibly eerie..."
"A famous orchestra conductor, Daniel Dareus, suffers what appears a heart attack as he finished conducting a concert."
"The local pastor, Stig, whose church has a small choir, comes calling to see if he can interest Daniel in helping, but the conductor has no desire to go back to music."
The town's people leave him alone.
"The vicar suddenly begins seeing Daniel in a new light; he is a tormented man who likes to read pornographic magazines before making love to his wife, Siv."
"Daniel, who by now has fallen totally for Lena, has a chance to show for the first time in his life his feelings for her when she starts to gets doubts about their relationship."
"The dragon lord (Jacky Chan) and his buddy, cowboy, totally made the movie fun, meaningful, and just plain silly."
Daniel's starting to catch up on him to!
"This was not only a showcase for up-and-comers like Bill Campbell and Teri Hatcher, but was also the continuation of Data's search for his 'humanity', this time through the concept of comedy."
I remember watching this episode 'first-run' at my friends comic shop back in the day and we all thought she would've been a perfect Jean Grey/Marvel Girl.
"After shooting an attack dog's head off, he strolls into work and ends up taking his marital aggression out on the patients as he plans what to do about his slut of a wife."
SHepherd graciously allows Robert Downey Jr. to carry much of the film and shows a more mature comic flair than he had in his previous films to that point.
"Masterson's natural charm pretty much coasts on its own, either that or she has a way of making her character seem like a breath of fresh air with every word."
Ardolino's next film would be the phoned-in sequel to Three Men and A Baby but his final theatrical release (Sister Act) would finally give him the nine-figure-grossing smash hit he deserved.
"Alan Arkin is terrific as the magician who never was, and his mentoring of Max makes for a funny and touching relationship."
"Opposing them is the fearless Fuzzy Tomato (like the others, FT was introduced in the second film and would be a main character in the cartoon) and his human allies."
"Jonny Kennedy speaks like a kid (because of wasting vocal muscle) and never went through puberty, but he is 36 years old."
"Mankiewicz brings a lot of energy to the piece, even when keeping still with the camera on the subject, and his stars are properly reeled in."
"There isn't much of a story as MIDNIGHT COWBOY is a series of vignettes destined to bring forth not only Joe Buck's plights in the City, but also inter-cut to his past and show us in shock cuts and semi-psychedelic dream sequences snippets of his past: his failed relationship with his girlfriend Annie (Jennifer Salt) who was gang-raped, his abandonment by his mother, and his apparent abuse by his grandmother, who also had a habit of hustling men for money."
I remember that scene when Ronnie stood in front of a painting of Abraham Lincoln (thinking it was a mirror) and said to himself I need a shave.
"A man's wife is almost burned to death in a tragic car wreck, in which he was driving."
"His airbag worked, her's didn't."
"BUT, even in a coma, she keeps dying but brought back by modern technology, and when she does die for a few minutes, her ghost appears as a very vengeful spirit."
"I just loved Rob Schmidt's (Wrong Turn) direction too, he has a great knack for horror."
"Once again you find yourself in awe of Miyazaki's attention to detail, and his ability to conjure up an imaginary world in meticulous, beautiful perfection."
Gigi's dream to become a filmmaker is threatened by rivalry with his brother and his mother's determination to return to Italy.
"SmithaPatel, in this movie acted more like a conscience of the hero whenever he drifted away or lost his composure she was there to remind him."
"At the same time, a dedicated adoption agency owner takes a mini vacation and leaves the orphanage in the charge of his father (Leslie Nielsen)."
Father Harry is in the rental business and he gets the brilliant idea to rent some of the children of the orphanage to couples like Russ and Valerie.
Danny is a down-on-his-luck family man who is on the verge of losing the big business deal that just might turn things around for him.
"Consider one scene where he overtly ogles a high-school girl with the impurest of thoughts and utters the line, All blushy blushy... No sucky fucky."
Also Anthony Quinn is in one of his earliest films as a wolf on the make for Lombard.
The wonderfully urbane Ronald Coleman is show-cased here as in few other of his films.
The fantastic Mr. Coleman is a combination of Sean Connery and Clark Gable as he stays a step ahead of the other characters.
"The quintessential Victorian element of the opening sequences were completely enchanting, helping to create a Christmas scene of which Dickens himself would have been justifiably proud."
"Sigourney Weaver was perfect for The Warden, she was exactly how I imagined her."
"I had to do some research, in order to assure myself she wasn't actually afflicted, as was her character, with (well?"
"Polanski the actor is often overshadowed by Polanski the director, but his performance here truly captures his characters awkwardness and sense of being an outcast."
"The director, Yang Zhang, tells his tale in a simple way, letting the characters characters do the job."
"Even when trying to warn people about something, they just laugh at him."
"Another reason d'tat for her behavior and cold, calculating exterior."
A word should be said about the philosophy of Friedrich Nietzsche whose will to power is stressed in Baby Face by the elderly philosopher who befriends Lilly when she is still turning tricks for her old man.
"Hatred chronicles the sordid adventures of Eric Seaver (played by director Kallio), a formerly abused child now grown up, and starting to listen to his evil side."
"Benkei is even more hampered here by the fact that his dark nature makes him fundamentally at odds with the world, even when not in open conflict he is never at ease."
"The girl of the forest is a wonderful addition and in my opinion makes the picture what it is, as she glides from branch to branch."
"Jackie Chan is considered by many film and martial arts movie fans as one of the greatest action stars ever to grace the silver screen and Police Story cemented his reputation as the likely successor to the late, great Bruce Lee."
"Forget about the Rush Hour trilogy, or any of his US efforts- the one film that really typifies Chan's excellence, not to mention kick starting his status as a high kicking, bone-crushing kung- fu talisman, as well as his movie career was this, Police Story- the first in a series of successful cop films, set in mainland, present day Hong Kong."
"Considering he is known for injuring and breaking every bone in his body and putting himself in harm's way, Jackie's persistence in showing his versatility as a stuntman himself by not relying on one, is somewhat of a testament to his reputation as a kung fu expert."
Especially as he has the bruises to show for it.
The joke among soldiers was that GI meant Get Iturbi (he did a lot of concerts at military bases).
"The point of the whole is to get the main character to change a politician's room so he can be assassinated which is a pretty plausible plan, but won't it have being easier for Jack to just find someone that was computer savvy and have them hack into the hotel's system?"
It's really nice to see Beltrami go from writing the predictable stuff to the great music he's doing now.
"Vincent Cassel is fantastic as the main villain, yes he was OTT, but he was very intense and quite creepy at times, this role was perfect for him."
"But that character was not betrayed, except by history perhaps (as he feels his type is as out of date as the gangster played by Humphrey Bogart)."
The problem of this guy is not that he is an ex-convicted.
No comment for the main actor because he is already given an award and I believe that his play was great.
"Small comment for Hatzisavvas (plays the policeman), he is like a dinosaur, he has played a lot of roles and I'm sure that this role for him was very easy but he plays it so great that you cannot deny him a big bravo."
"I see the same idea used in Dancer in the Dark, where Bjork's character doesn't speak up for herself and ends up being her own destruction."
"The antics of comedian Arthur Askey are not as funny as they once apparently were, but this can be overcome by viewing him as a period piece or a curiosity."
"Or the one where he body surfs the big ones, (I did that too!)"
Cosimo with his line: Your mother's a whore!
"But they all did one good deed: they gave money to Riley, so he can get his wife out of prison."
One of his earlier works is Castle in the Sky.
"Although it's still enjoyable, it's not as good as Spirited Away (though comparing this or any film to his 2002 masterpiece is perhaps unfair)."
"Valentine is the second industrial movie of the director Jamie Blanks, after his Urban Legends."
"An arrow shot from a bow broaches her tummy and stays stuck in, while she was playing hide-and-seek with her blind date, never able to met with."
"Jessica Capshaw is killed last in a confidential and unseen way, then she is calumniated to be as the serial killer."
"Marley Shelton is the unluckiest one with a vicissitude of fortune that she is going to be killed within the most confidential way that we will never know, 'cause the movie is coming to an end before she is getting killed."
denzel washington is a great actor - i honestly can't think of one bad movie he's done - and he's got a great supporting cast.
Mostel is likewise great as an anguished man with his dying wife Fanny.
"After looking everywhere for Belafonte, Mostel looks up to see a falling feather, and he frantically reaches for it as if he's finally willing to believe in angels and miracles."
"One of the college cuties wanders into the woods, witnesses a murder by the sheriff and has her head blown open."
STAR RATING: ***** The Works **** Just Misses the Mark *** That Little Bit In Between ** Lagging Behind * The Pits Mike Atherton (Dudikoff) is peacefully making his way in the Wild West when he spots a group of men mistreating a lady.
"But I have a thing for westerns, being films that just sort of transport me to a different time and place and provide real escapist entertainment and with this Dudikoff has picked one of his better scripts, as his films go anyway."
"THE BEAST pops up, rapes the chick and shoots 400 gallons of spunk all over her."
Mack is not immune as he asks 'Is it possible to pass beyond the bounds of race and (an even harder step) finance?
"Claire and Mack come to realize that even though they could take the easy road and let the state take the baby, their finding it placed the responsibility for her life in their hands."
"Caleb though generally a thoughtful, kind, insightful boy can at times show the latent dark side inherited from his father."
Stratton is a man oblivious to everything except his work.
* The emotional breakdown of Amrita and her uncle (Alok Nath) when she feeds him at Shahid's party in the form of another's daughter-in-law rather than her uncle's beloved niece.
"Mr. Beetle's desires can only be satisfied by the beautiful exotic dancer at the Gay Dragonfly night club, whom he visits whenever he takes a business trip to the city."
"Meanwhile, Mrs. Beetle has, likewise, acquired a friend to add excitement to her life."
"At this point in time, however, we still haven't forgotten the jealous movie cameraman who had been plotting his revenge, and it is no surprise when he turns out to be the projectionist for the film Mr. and Mrs. Beetle are attending."
"A shaken Dixon does his best to cover it up, intending to frame a hated thug, Scalise (Gary Merrill) for the crime."
"Eddie Mueller, a film noir historian, provides the commentary and does a good job, but I find his assertion that audiences wouldn't have caught the significance of the casting of the two leads, since Laura had been made six years earlier."
"Gary Merrill is great as the low-life Scalise, who had a criminal past with Dixon's dad (Your father liked me, he taunts Mark)."
"Most of the prostitutes are amateurs, and it is impossible to recognize the famous Darlene Gloria so different she is after many plastic surgeries."
Jodie Foster plays her character straight out.
Reality comes back hard where she is killed in a automobile accident.
"James I did some things to Farrah Fawcett Orr co-wrote and directed this movie about an ordinary, average guy named Larry Burrows who thinks his life would have been incredibly different if he hit a homerun at a key baseball game when he was 15."
"Not an overly witty rejoinder, but exactly the kind of thing a young kid would come up with on the spot and exactly the type of remark other kids his age would find hilarious."
"There's also no cue the dramatic music moment where Billy ('Worm Boy') realizes what a complete tool he's being to his younger brother Woody, and yet, by the end of the movie, some type of minor transformation has been made."
"My favorite segments: 14th arrondissement: Carol (Margo Martindale), from Denver, comes to Paris to learn French and also to make a sense of her life."
"The most important thing about this movie is the brilliant performance by Daniel Day-Lewis and Hugh O'Conor as Christy Brown, guineas artist and fighter who despite of her physical condition overcame all the odds."
"But Dr. Ford is supposed to be cold and aloof; moreover, her homeliness is in a way essential to the plot (at one point, I believe that an injury to her sexual self-esteem is a key part of her motivation ..."
I was touched with the lives that paulie touched along his way to find his marie the little girl he was separated from.
Richard Chamberlain does his best performance here as the Australian lawyer who defends a group of young Aborigins accused of murder.
"Chris tells him that he is a Mulkurul, which appear to be a race of supernatural beings that lived in Australia thousands of years ago."
"Jorg Buttgereit goes a bit too far with his movies and themes at times, even for my taste but his movies are always something special and hard to classify."
"Gary Graver, the director, was also a talent; probably too talented for the sexploitation genre, and his skill, combined with Monica Gayle's screen presence, makes Sandra, the Making of a Woman, a pleasantly enjoyable experience."
Jane is smart but cheap drama brings her down.
And why on earth is she letting the kiss rapist get away with I blame myself as much as you.
Second time through you realize how horribly the sister's husband is dissed by her friends in the backwoods blues bar.
"Her performance feels like the climax of the story; a blues story with the good guys being people of color in their element in backwoods, SC."
Joan Blondell was at the peak of her career and is a delight.
"There's no point in photographing a scene on a real boat if you make it sound as though it all happened in front of a process screen...At the start of the picnic sequence...in the temporary score, we used a very curious, sexy Latin-American strain...This has been replaced with a corny dramatic sequel--bad stock stuff...This sort of music destroys that quality of strangeness which is exactly what might have saved Lady from Shanghai from being just another whodunit...There is a big musical outburst after Grigsby's line, I want you to kill him."
Robert Downey Jr. and Kathy Moriarty work together flawlessly - until he finds out who she really is... a soap opera turn if there every was one!
Ruby is starting to live on her own and establishing her own identity.
Undoubtedly the director knew exactly what he was doing.
Throughout this third series to the wonderfully written sitcom Blackadder tries everything he can to get rich and powerful.
"In a deeper aspect, what you are seeing is just how Domino sees things through her eyes, think about it."
Priyanka Chopra was good in her small role she had in the movie.
Samson both pays for his father's idealism and suffers due to its influence on his life.
Holm is diminutive when compared to the Samson of the book - a physically impressive man capable of using his size to impose a presence
"Also Japanese is the fact that the lecherous motives that initiated his new passion are made plain but somehow accepted, at least eventually, by family and audience."
"The title role, although not as competent as it sounds, still was able to pull him up and charm the audiences."
Al Pacino was funny and prodigy to himself.
He is on his cellphone arguing with a business partner I would assume.
Della ends up crashing her vehicle into a log pile at a housing development but she is unharmed.
The last one was probably the weakest and it should of been the best considering that this was the main bad guy she was offing.
As we come to understand Lifshitz's manner of storytelling each of his works becomes more treasureable.
"By allowing his tender and sensitive love stories to unfold in the same random fashion found in the minds of confused and insecure youths - time now, time passed, time reflective, time imagined, time alone - Lifshitz makes his tales more personal, involving the viewer with every aspect of the characters' responses."
"Mathieu is terrified of the direction he is taking, rebuffs Cedric's public approaches, but continues to seek him out for consignations."
"We have a profound meditation on the relation of art and life as one actress, Myrtle Gordon (Gena Rowlands), finds herself more in touch with the character she is playing on stage than she would want to."
"The movie ends with a display of genius on behalf of the director as he films a theater scene where he himself and Gena Rowlands improvise a scene, since Myrtle comes too drunk to the opening night to perform her part accurately."
"Between that and focusing on his career, finding love again was not one of Dan's priorities."
Carell is the rare comedian who pushes himself to find character in his roles rather than rely solely on his comedic instincts and established persona.
"Recounting the brutal killing of a Midwest family, author Truman Capote focused on minutia, wrapping himself and the reader up in the subject AND subjects!"
"Michael Caine is a brilliant actor, of course, and plays a character who is very determined and prepared to do anything to get his wife back, but rather hopeless with a gun and action stuff."
"Vance was a long-worded and superior detective genius, and his character being assigned to William Powell probably meant the executives at Warner Brothers were aware of the possibility that in less-engaging hands this detective might alienate viewers."
"Eugene Palette is better than usual playing very straight as an admiring police partner to Vance, with his very professional timing."
"The second portion of the scene involves a leave-taking; someone is confused enough by who has gone where, after Coe parts from his girl friend, Vinson, to murder his nice brother by mistake."
Especially in the scenes involving Ms. Togar with the score grasping the right mood that surrounds her mind set.
"The enthusiastic acting is pretty campy, but that goes down well with the material and there's a certain likability stemming from these characters, but we totally despise Ms. Togar and her hall monitor goons."
"I'm not thinking the bad guy in this movie felt real, the only reason he was there was so Modesty could have someone to tell her story for."
Corbett and his manager (Frawley) despair of getting the money.
I would have liked to have seen more closure with Zack's death and possibly closure with her husband.
"Michel dresses as Elvis and has a spot on a radio show called 'Cinema Lies', where he describes mistakes in films."
"Heck, even King himself didn't fare so bad."
"It's how Kubrick perceives King's universe, how he transforms the page into screen time, that renders THE SHINING both a visual feast and a compacted masterclass in directing."
How I wanted to come to the defense of Dolores when her family is stifling her emotional life.
A film director is fully entitled to use elements from reality and history to create a world of his own.
"Sidney is of course excited and moves to America, there he meets a girl currently writing a book, and hilarity ensues."
"One is the conventional wife and two kids nuclear family the other a huge New Jersey Mafia group, of which he is the boss of both."
Meryl Streep is excellent in her nuanced and stoic performance as the infamous Lindy Chamberlain who was accused and tried for allegedly killing her own baby Azaria Chamberlain and using her alibi of ravenous dingoes as her defense.
Hauser is disgusted by her.
One might find the film somewhat reminiscent of SAW two men trapped in room and pitting against each other but unlike that film it dares to stay with its premise and keep the hero locked in his cell throughout the film.
"Robert Urich was a fine actor, and he makes this TV movie believable."
"Urich try's to figure out what is wrong with his family, and I love the Halloween space suit idea, brilliant."
"As the young Victoria herself laments, she's moved like a chess pawn by a variety of parties as she finds her footing and her voice as one of Britain's most influential rulers."
"Frankly, I too was aggravated by Spike's ridiculous actions, especially the spray can sniffing, but in a desperate situation it's apparent someone of his mentality would choose an temporary escape."
"Plus, an odd bald guy seems to understand all this and he talks about this during one brief scene--like he's some sort of omnipotent being but there's absolutely no explanation of him in the film (like the two guys that fight each other in the clock tower in THE HUDSUCKER PROXY)."
Eddie Murphy Deliriousis his best stand up performance next to Eddie Murphy Raw.
Emory is a Cincinatti steel worker like his father before him and for most of the 20th century the twin pillars of his family's existence have been the steel mill and the union.
"Arriving at the suddenly-reopened plant, the stupefied manager looks around him at the tremendous output that came from a single day's work, realizing that production like this could make the plant profitable again."
"As a finder of lost children, Murphy's character starts off looking for a missing girl, which leads him on the path for which others believe he was chosen - - to protect the Golden Child."
Writer/director Mike Binder drew upon his experience at the same camp as the main source of creating a gentle and understanding yarn that makes sense.
"In fact, as Irene, her rudeness to a bum asking for change caught me off guard at first."
You get the feeling of how trapped Sahibjaan is in among all the amazing jewelery she wears and fountained court yard she casually walks past.
"Eddie, the put-upon nice guy, who just wants to be left alone to be different, Leslie (about as wet as they come), Nuke (the rock burn-out), Eddie's Mom (pathetic), Roger (the geek) and Ozzy as the preacher (surely he exists in America?)."
"The film offers an interesting portrayal of this important American figure and the film is well made, but seems somewhat incomplete without any of the great moments from his presidency or even his debates with Stephen Douglas."
The supporting cast is solid and surprisingly does not include that many of Ford's regular supporting cast (sometimes referred to as his stock company) but we do have Ward Bond one of the most prolific character actors in Hollywood.
"Almost ten years prior to his most well-known musical, Yankee Doodle Dandy."
"Any music-lover will get his kicks out of AWTWB, I can assure you."
One is reminded of Brando's character Johnny from 'The Wild One' who led a leather-clad gang of rebellious bikers in much the same way as this film's 'Johnny' leads his gang.
"Based on Christy Brown's autobiographical novel, this endearing film tells the story of his life, him being affected by cerebral palsy and being considered basically not a person by everyone including his mother."
"If anyone knows the writer/director, please convince him to release again, preferably on DVD these days."
Orson Welles is a film icon and anyone studying film should see everything he has filmed.
The dialog the director provides for his character gives him enough malice to be proved as a strong and even intimidating leader.
Mr. Bhandarkar bites off way more than he can chew or process onto celluloid and turns the film into a free for all bash.
"Also- my favorite parts were the science fair, and all the times with his father."
"The characters were engaging and I like the thought of Ned the main character not being able to literally touch the love of his life, Chuck without the consequences of her dying."
I like how Emerson who is black plays off of the rest of the characters since as an African American; I like the subtle cultural humor that sometimes comes from him.
"This wonderful fun filled and sometimes heartbreaking film shows a young man who never expected, but longed to see, what was outside the confines of his lovely city of Athens, GA. Darius wished to see the ocean."
"Shimizu knows he is not dealing with anything new, so he does what any intelligent person would have done in his place: he forgets logic and concentrates in giving viewers a fun ride."
"Jim McKay gave a talk (Q&A) about the film afterward which presented his ironic situation: how to get distribution for a film which portrays minorities (women, non-whites) working on resolving controversial issues (teen pregnancy, teen motherhood, racial identity, single-mother households), and how to write a faithful script on all of these topics being a mid-thirties white male."
Oh my god Jakes Cahill's commentary of the film was almost as flawless as his acting.
Belle becomes the obsession of Randolph who promises Superintendent McQueen(Steele)that through a surgical procedure he can remove her violent tendencies.
Lavelle receives work in Randolph's office and is the one responsible for relating his dirty antics to Pandora.
Alice Marano (Danes) and her best friend Darlene (Beckinsale) are arrested in Thailand for narcotics smuggling after a tip anonymously phoned in to the Thai authorities.
"Jacqueline Kim turns in a terrific performance as his more kind, magnanimous wife, Yon, who is also an attorney."
"Old men living alone can be sad material in almost anyone else's hands, but Simon's deft wit and unerring feeling for character turns this adaptation of his 1972 stage hit into comedy gold."
Pearl S.Buck was a brilliant author that was a first American lady won Nobel prize in literature in 1938 and received her prize with Enrico Fermi an Italian Physit.
Shara Reiner succeeded in her role as (O-Lane) by this brilliant evidence that she won An Academy Awarded as a best actress in 1937
"McGavin was one great character actor, and this series is worth watching for him alone"
Brian has one famous line that he keeps telling David over and over again.
"As an aspiring folklorist and an individual deeply interested in the structure of storytelling, it is evident that the Elvira persona has certain archetypal elements that help to make the character more than the sum of her corny one-liners and large chest."
Tobey Macquire is cast as a young German farm boy who is derided for his heritage because the Germans were supposed Union sympathizers.
Jeffrey Wright is a freed slave who travels with the bushwhackers because of his loyalty to the young man who bought him his freedom.
"The music fit the tone of the movie great, and you can tell the director knew what he was doing."
Some have said his portrayal too gruff.
"The primary criticism has centered on the fact that very little happens in this film about a dying woman's fretting over a mistake she made one summer in her youth, that famous actors were given very minor roles, that the entire production was over-hyped, etc."
Pacino is over-the-top but to good effect as he's clearly having loads of fun.
The passion to which Artemisia gives to her art is just spectacular to watch.
It's worth the price alone to see Ms. Welles look at herself in the mirror as if she's Aphrodite.
Jordan looks and sounds so much like Elaine Joyce that I thought she might be her separated at birth twin or even Elaine herself.
He reminds me of war damaged teachers I did not understand when I was an irreverent pupil.
"Morgan, along with his fellow conference attendees, is being brainwashed."
"Therefore the Overlook becomes the new home of the Torrance family: Jack, his wife Wendy (Shelley Duvall) and their five-year old son Danny (Danny Lloyd)."
"That is not Jack's case, however, as he gets increasingly paranoid regarding his wife's affections and seeks comfort in the company of what can best be defined as ghosts, triggering a chain of insanity and dread which is very hard to break."
"King criticized the director for changing most of the story, omitting most of the Jack/Danny subplot (merely hinted at in the film) that led to the book's emotionally strong climax, and while his disappointment is valid, the omission was actually necessary: the novel dealt with redemption, albeit in an unconventional way, and redemption is a theme Kubrick, one of the most famous analysts of human decay, never had a soft spot for."
Remember Gabriele Muccino's name because some of his movies may skip by unnoticed if the actor attached to the project isn't quite so high-profile.
"Too bad I figured out Will Smith's scheme early on, I put two and two together when he calls in his own suicide in the first scene and the scene when Rosario Dawson's character is introduced as having an incurable heart-disease."
"One of my friends with whom I saw the movie thought Smith's character could have a divine gift, and I understand why: his performance is almost angelic when in the presence of his seven elected ones, yet at other times he could be harsh and scary, and when he's alone the full weight of his situation got too much for him and he breaks down completely."
An evil magician approaches him and informs him he can give him great wealth that he can use to win the lady's heart IF he agrees to give him anything he wants that's within their room.
Frustrating to watch because of one man's stubbornness to leave his native country for the dream land in Switzerland and what he does to achieve that creates heartache for all those involved.
Along the journey he encounters scumbags who take advantage of other human suffering and desperation
"Omar Epps was the hot shot track star, with a questionable work ethic and a chip on his shoulder."
"He even says right before he kills himself, I didn't mean it, I wanted to be an engineer."
Remy's inability to fit in seemed to justify his anger as well.
"The only deal with this movie is the guy is almost as feminine as the women, he's into the same b.s."
"Being someone who lists Night of the Living Dead at number three in her top five favorite movies of all time, and at the same time loving this student film parody, I feel I must defend this movie against the previously posted scathing reviews."
"Our hero finds himself on the run after failing to settle the matter with the Marquis, and Mary, his wife, suffers a sadistic rape at the hands of Archibald Cunningham, a smarmy Englishman with no soul."
"His Rob Roy is an honourable man struggling to provide for those who depend on him, in the best way he knows how."
"Tim Roth is completely over the top with his portrayal of the evil Archibald, yet somehow, it works."
"The fourth and final story, in which a vain horror actor gets controlled by the vampire-cloak he wears, is slightly weaker then the others when it comes to tension and credibility, but that the overload of subtle humor more or less compensates that."
Dave is tired of it however and has a gorgeous girlfriend who he wants to move in with.
Bela steals gland juice to keep his nasty wife young.
"Ramon Salazar achieved a compelling film in his directorial debut, and proves himself as an efficient actors' director."
"His Scrooge is not merely a cranky old man (as he is so often portrayed), but a man who harbors a profound anger against the world."
"Often portrayed as an affable buffoon, here he is played by Roger Rees with an emotional intensity missing from earlier portrayals."
"When he delivers the famous line, it may well be that in the sight of Heaven you are more worthless and less fit to live than MILLIONS like this poor man's child he is no longer a jolly Santa Claus surrogate, but an avenging angel who gives Scrooge a much needed verbal spanking."
"Esther looks great and if she wanted to, probably could have gone on to do more and better films but according to her autobiography, pretty much gave up working for marriage."
Either way she is so likable and engaging that its fun to see her in a totally different role outside of the 'swimming musical'.
"it jumps in and out of episodes, as the characters, a cat and his brain-dead older sister cat wander in and out of a series of odd images: a boat, a circus, a desert."
Court tries his best to make Dani realize that the difference in their ages would make a love relationship improbable.
"The movie, about a young woman's quest to make her mark in the music world, captures the times perfectly, from the overt sexism, rough economic times, social upheaval, to the shift in pop culture from rough-and-tumble punk to terribly fey and pretentious Futurism/New Romanticism."
"Simon Pegg made an OK appearance, slightly worse than his usual."
Rob Roy puts together a plan to borrow 1000 pounds from the Marquis and purchase some cattle of his own.
He rapes Macgregor's wife and burns him out of his home.
Along with another crony of the Marquis (Brian Cox) Cunningham steals the money and uses it to settle his own debts.
This sets up conflict that will take many lives and challenge the strengths of a man simply fighting to hold on to his dignity.
Cunningham is thought by many to be a sure winner with his speed and grace.
"A year later, the relationship ends in catastrophe: Cedric cheats on Mathieu who, distraught, tries to take his own life."
"Cedric still loves Mathieu he brought him to the hospital during the suicide attempt (none of which we see) and tries desperately to contact him again once he leaves but cannot understand that he has lost him forever, because something that seemed nothing to him (a meaningless affair) is everything to Mathieu."
"Whilst the film is darker than the rather unfortunate Pierre et Gilles poster would suggest, it is not without hope: we get to see Cedric's slow, painful attempts to get back in touch with life, first through a cat he adopts, then through work in a local bar and finally contact with Pierre, who may be his next love."
To see Goldsworthy's sculptures come alive and to see his reaction to each is extremely voyeuristic.
This artist creates because he must - not for money or fame.
He is unaware that the star has taken the form of a girl in the fairy world and that there are others after her too.
"Grab a copy, laugh yourself silly, learn the lines.... Why she didn't win the Best Actress Oscar for this role is beyond me"
Watch Larry when Shemp asks him to look at the camera for a snapshot.
Emil Sitka is at his bewildered goofiest.
"So Freed went to studio head Louis B. Mayer himself and got him to agree, New York said no."
"Gene Kelly received an honorary Academy Award that year for his versatility as an actor, singer, director and dancer, and specifically for his brilliant achievements in the art of choreography on film."
"Thatcher being the height of most political jokes, Bill (Belinda Lang) blames Thatcher for anything she can."
Hollywood would have made her look like a she demon from hell with glowing eyes-fangs-claws etc.
Big D was extremely unhappy with the results that he was not chosen to be the next chairman after paying a handsome figure of bribes to the council members.
"Neither the total disaster the UK critics claimed nor the misunderstood masterpiece its few fanboys insist, Revolver is at the very least an admirable attempt by Guy Ritchie to add a little substance to his conman capers."
"Then I found out due to the current webpage at www.IMDb.com he was born in 1957, in Dayton, Ohio."
"Simon may have played the most pathetic character known to man, but his real life self certainly had their strenghths and weaknesses."
"I think Caroline Munro who was 36 at the time was the only other star that had any dignified acting talent, and unfortunately for Simon's death he made no future films."
"Also future-bound is Ben Alexander, who plays the boy Bobby; he becomes a dependable child actor, and grows up to become a Jack Webb partner on Dragnet."
"Whilst there, the Doctor is forced to make what he considers to be the ultimate sacrifice..."
"It has a grim storyline, a lamb's mother is killed by a wolf--a very emotional scene--and wants to become a wolf, like him."
Olivia Hussey is awesome in everything she's in!
Olivia's my girl and I love her work.
Lubitsch fills his movie out with a crackerjack cast that has boatloads of chemistry.
"The scientist of that time wants to return to a calmer world, the 1890 that he has studied and admired."
"Police Story is arguably one of the best works by the master of action himself.Compared to other action films,Police Story makes Schwarzenegger and Stallone look like beginners.The stunt scenes are well cheorgraphed and the action scenes are superb.If New Line Cinema has any sense,they would release this in theaters"
Ethan Hawke matches him scene for scene and Albert Finney simply chews up the screen.
"Marisa Tomei is, however, criminally underused, but looks amazing for her 42 years."
The hair is Sandler's chief prop to show he's deranged.
"Charlie's in-laws are deeply concerned about him, but also somehow resentful, as we learn later."
Alan has a new patient who is propositioning him.
"Alan wants an escape from his tidy, emasculating life."
"Sandler's mad scenes are a little too theatrical, as are a lot of the plot devices (in fact this movie feels like a play at more than one point), but he has several monologues where he expresses his sorrow in ways that are deeply touching."
"Charlie's not just delusional and sad, but dangerous and violent, and all these efforts to help him start to backfire."
"Michel Serrault, known more for comic roles in the earlier part of his acting career, does a stunning, even worryingly stunning job of impersonating Dr Petiot, a legendary French serial killer."
Another wonderful scene occurred when the doctor encouraged Antwone to search for his family to find answers to his questions about his family that abandoned him.
My favorite scene happened when the young man finally confronted his mother and her reaction towards him.
"He always seems like he is a part of the shadows, and, I think that is what makes him so terrifying."
"This idyllic portrait derives drama from its subject: Archie Grey Owl Belaney, a Scot raised in Hastings (England) by maiden aunts who became so obsessed with the red indian tales of his childhood that he went to Canada, disappeared into the woods, and became a trapper and adopted son of an Ojibway band."
I do understand why many thinks the same but unique expression of Kusturica is still present in his new movie and is something why critics can't touch him.
"When a rich tycoon is killed in a plane crash, his spinster twin sister, Martha Craig (Madge Kennedy), doesn't believe he grabbed the controls in a suicide dive (even though self-snuff runs in the family) but his three beautiful daughters couldn't care less."
"When they first meet, she pulls the equivalent of trying to sit on Norton's lap while he's still standing by coming on to him with the line I graduated summa cum laude from Embrace-able U."
B-Movie rating: 10/10 Marla (and her body English) made marvelous movies!
"Not only could she ruin James's run for office, but she could destroy Gabe's practice."
"Confessions and apologies are sure to follow, as is some startling info on Abby's true identity--it seems she's been doing the same thing to different men in many different places."
"Monique Alexander only got naked once, but she was a relatively minor character."
Chelsea Blue was a scene stealer--she wasn't that bad as the antagonist.
Julia Kruis was her usual self.
"Chelsea Blue looked good in her scenes, too."
Melissa Joan Hard is beautiful and was perfect for the Sabrina with her Perky personality.
As a child they always talk about how he does not want to be an exterminator like his Dad.
She was 18 and too old to be grounded; I would have been insulted if my parents grounded me at 18.
"As the movie opens, Norman is an old man, flyfishing beside a rushing river, trying to understand the course his own life has taken."
Norm has it narrowed down to a boxer or a minister like his dad.
"Norman is stunningly well educated for his day but has little idea what to do with his life, even as his father grills him about what he intends to do."
Father has always taken his boys to reflect by the side of the river and contemplate God's eternal words.
It seems that a great aunt of hers has died and that she needs to be present for the reading of the will.
"Anxious to raise money for a show she wants to open in Las Vegas, she decides to go in hopes of getting lots and lots of money."
"Elvira using her endowments and sexiness as a joke (And don't forget, tomorrow we're showing the head with two things..."
"An act of sacrilege has becalmed the seas, endangering his great expedition to Troy."
Stanwyck stops at nothing in her rise to the top.
"And did he wear socks in one scene...reportedly, the professor never wore socks!"
Clint Eastwood reprises his role as Dirty Harry who this time is on the case of a vigilante (Sondra Locke)who is killing the people that raped her and her sister at a carnival many years ago.
"Eastwood makes the role his and the movie is mainly more action then talk, not that I'm complaining."
Even is she's been in only six
"Because Ligabue is a born storyteller and a film lover, and every frame of his film is made with love and care."
"Even so, does she have an accent?"
"Alexandre's always choreographing himself, worrying about how or where to stand or walk, what to say when, announcing these decisions to who have to care less than he does what he does."
Max Von Sydow provides his great voice as the narrator.
The episode begins when an elderly man murders his wife out of unknown motivations.
"As Lindy rushes to the tent, a dingo dog is just exiting, shaking his head."
"Streep gives her best performance ever as the complex Lindy, whose own strong-willed demeanor works against her every step of the way."
"Lexi's mum becomes aware of her daughter's illness, as she is losing lots of weight."
"This leads to the two falling out, as Lexi's mum tells Jen's mum her suspicions."
"Pickpocket Richard Widmark relieves loose woman Jean Peters of her wallet containing a strip of microfilm; unbeknownst to either of them, it harbors secrets vital to the Cold War."
"Timmy Robinson and his mother Helen both suffer from the pressures of suburban life, until the day that Helen purchases a zombie servant in a desperate attempt to impress the neighbours."
"Story number one, which is probably the least impressive of the four, deals with a writer and his wife who've just moved in the house and plan to stay just for a short time so that he may write one of his horror novels."
"After his wife convinces him to seek psychiatric help, a sub-plot is introduced which frankly, didn't really work for me."
"Natali seems to have this inept ability to take a storyline, and hardly wring it our like a wet towel for all the storyline he can muster."
"Ace comic O'Hanlon has a dual role, playing both McDoakes and himself playing McDoakes!"
"Liotta is just as good but has less of an emotional impact, but then he does later on."
"I think the most scary scene was... on the bus, when the face flashes by on the window, or when Yoko's walking without her chin."
"I know why they didn't, and Ms. Rainier is very good in the film, but they hardly tried to make her look authentic."
", the director brings a slightly warped sexual sensibility to his strange but beautiful tale."
Things are going along quite nicely until Gillian discovers she really cares for this mortal man.
But how will Shep react when he finds out that he was tricked into falling in love with Gillian?
"Kyle is blamed for the sudden mass outbreak of homeless people when he, out of the goodness of his heart, gives a $20 to a homeless man in front of his house."
"Unfortunately, homeless people break into the man's house, and he attempts to take the easy way out by shooting himself."
"An old farmer is attacked by the alien in his hand, and the youths Steve Andrews (Steve McQueen) and his girlfriend Jane Martin (Aneta Corsaut) take him to Dr. T. Hallen (Steven Chase)."
"Polanski himself plays Telkovsky, a young man looking for an apartment in France."
this may sound like a turn-off but in fact the slow pace of the beginning works perfectly as it mimics Trelkovsky's own boring life and how gradually he enters a different realm.
"To do this Tsui decides to become a librarian in order to live a normal and peaceful life, but fate demands that he clean up problems from his past before he can continue to seek peace."
"In addition to the dramatization of historical events, the focus of the film is on the saving of a child from the Holocaust by a German and the result of the child's experience of losing her mother."
"Lena comes from an aristocratic German family and her brother, recently returned from Stalingrad, is a Wehrmacht officer."
Virginia Madsen as the mother does a great job... so good that I'm going to start watching for her movies.
"Steven Spielberg wanted to win an Oscar so bad that he figured that he wouldn't win by directing special effects epics (he was nominated for three of them: Close Encounters of the Third Kind, Raiders of the Lost Ark, and E.T."
"Oprah Winfrey also made her film debut here and gives a great performance as Sofia, one of those friends' of Celie."
first part is Tony's Dream in his coma.
"You will notice what I'm saying at the doctor scene, where tony says he has lost his briefcase which contains his life."
"Smita Patil does not play a main role, but her part is also not distracting from the main plot."
Saying right things in the right places and knowing how to keep himself away from trouble.
The movie not only brings to focus the difficulties faced by a police officer trying to do his duty but also the other side of brutalities in police custody.
"But after McLaglen got his Oscar for The Informer, Lowe seemed to fade into the B picture market."
Laurence Fishburne was superb at playing a career petty criminal.It's a shame that he's only allowed to show his talent in his own movie.
The man in the black suit gives him money to replace the milk.
Was Peter Lorre ill during the making of Silk Stockings--he seems to be very passive in the more active numbers and with less lines?
"Shintaro Katsu, one of my personal favorite actors, is once again brilliant in the role of Hanzo, a role that seems to have been written specifically for him."
Hugh Jackman was the perfect pick for his roll.
"Baloo is pretty much the way he is in The Jungle Book, plus or minus a few degrees of laziness."
The guy playing the DJ did a good job of showing someone spooked out and haunted by his memories.
"Cole Hauser is very very good in this picture, he humanizes a man spiraling downwards."
"But this is common knowledge; I think his main problem is the array of genres that he covers whilst at the same time, failing to develop any sort of certain style that might label him an auteur."
But what's clever here is that there are no jaw dropping war scenes of fighting and death and destruction; just one man and his battle with the system for most of the time.
This is something the existing captain of the squad cannot do thus suggesting he is lacking in both the superego required for the job and the confidence to tell Bozz he is in charge.
And lets not forget that this director was a visual stylist much more gifted than most of his contemporaries.
"Sergio Martino is a great director, who has contributed a lot to Italian genre cinema and, as far as I am considered, his Gialli from the 1970s are the undisputed highlights in his impressive repertoire."
This film follows a single mother Fay Grim trying to raise her son to not grow up to be her father who ran away from the law and went missing.
Soon the CIA contacts Fay in desperate pursuit to find 8 journals of her husband Henry's.
Holly then shows her willingness to leave this lifestyle but her confusion on what is right and wrong.
"Holly is able to escape on her way to another brothel, when she jumps from the truck and runs into a field filled with mines."
"A mine is set off by a cow and the truck driver believes she is dead, so Holly is then left on her own."
During Patrick's journey to find holly he meets a social worker who tries to talk some sense into him and shares the facts with him that haunts the Cambodian region.
"Patrick discovers that the idea of whisking her to safety is quickly put to rest when the social worker tells him that the US will not let him adopt and, although it takes five minutes to 'save' a child, it takes five years to reintegrate her into society."
"Holly is given fresh clothes, if feed and brought to a dance class, but she is forbidden to see Patrick."
"This intense yearning to be in the comfort of Patrick's friendship, she runs away from the safe house and back onto the streets in Cambodia."
This enrages Patrick and he hits the man and runs out of the bar.
Disney has done it again.Shia LaBeouf should be nominated for Best Actor for his performance as Stanley Yelnats.
"Caring for these FORGOTTEN BABIES turns out to be quite a chore, leaving the little nipper with no choice but to come up with some ingenious solutions to the baby-sitting problem... Spanky is in his glory in this hilarious little film, arguably his best."
An angry Derek Jarryd tries to distance himself from Phillip Madras who led the men.
Tony sets out to find the killer against his superior's order.
"Jay Leno is no actor, but he is likable in the role and Pat Morita is good as well."
Freddy is creative in the way he kills people.
"Shin-ae and her son Jun moves to the town of Miryang, which is the birthplace of her deceased husband."
"Secret Sunshine really took its time to get to this point, where things then begin to get slightly more interesting with Shin-ae now taking to embracing religion to deal with and accept her current state, reveling in the comfort that religion, and fellow believers, can offer."
"Watching her transformation, is worth the ticket price, and despite having my personal favourite Korean actor Song Kang-ho in the movie, this is something he just breezed right through"
(Maybe he was at a prescreening that showed more...?)
Tony Fields (Sammi) started his performing career as a dancer on the TV series 'Solid Gold'.
Doug Savant (Tim) is probably best remembered for his pioneering role of homosexual twentysomething Matt Fielding on the popular sitcom 'Melrose Place'.
Steven Biko is gone half way through the film but the resonance of his courage and wisdom is not forgotten.
"Arthur Bach needs to grow up, but that is unfortunately not the only thing he needs to do."
"According to his extremely rich father, Arthur has to marry a certain wealthy Susan Johnson or he's cut off from the family money ($750 million dollars worth)."
"Dudley Moore is great here in this film as Arthur, earning an Oscar nomination and Golden Globe win for his performance."
"Moore is fantastic with the comedic aspects of the film, turning the already funny lines into unforgettable comedic gold, but he is also great in bringing Arthur down to a relatable level and making the character likable."
"Maugham's Mildred supplemented her waitress tips with a bit of old fashioned street-walking, something not clearly brought out here."
"Director John Cromwell wrought excellent performances from his two main stars, one well-established, the other established largely because of this film."
It was Richard Widmark's seventh film and arguably went a long way to establishing him as the fine actor he really was rather than merely a psychotic killer.
"Gadg himself appears in an uncredited small role as a morgue attendant but the film is rich in talent beginning with Jack Palance (still being billed as Walter Jack Palance)as the local Mr 'Big' followed side-kick Zero Mostel, Barbara Bel Geddes, Emile Meyer, Tommy Rettig plus the rock-solid ever reliable Paul Douglas as the cop who comes round to doc Widmark's point of view."
The aging entertainer finds/buys a male child to pass his art to.
Poor Cedric; he apparently didn't know what hit him.
"Hersholt, a very gentle soul off screen, manages brilliantly to depict his character's complete moral corruption."
"In TESS, one beautiful scene in particular stands out in this regard: Pickford is teaching herself to read using a Bible."
"Despite the fact that technically-image-wise some more recent Miyazakis might be more overwhelming, this to me remains his undisputed masterpiece."
The next film from Egypt involves the filmmaker himself talking with a dead soldier about recent events not only about terrorists of 9/11 but bombings in other places.
"However, fate ends up intervening and her plan to have her husband murdered is successful..."
"The story is, as you would expect, extremely strong and the Visconti manages to pull good performances out of his cast."
"Despite a lot of switching things around, twisting the plot several times and following orders that are put across in a way to make them seem that the world will end if they're not carried out; the one thing that seems the most dangerous is any romantic link or connection with Lucy Liu's character and she's trying to help out(!)"
"What was also rather interesting and was a nice added touch was the travel insert shot of certain American states made to resemble computer microchips as our hero flies to and from his stated destinations significant then how the more he acts on his and Foster's own motivation this sequence disappears because he's breaking away from the computerised, repetitive, controlled life that he's being told to live and is branching out."
"Kim Novak is a witch in New York City and for some inexplicable reason, she decides to cast a spell on poor Jimmy to make him fall in love with her."
'One-Round' Jack Sander is called that because he's a carnival boxer who fights any man in the audience.
"One guy mangles the English language everytime he talks and Griffin Dunn plays a clueless D.A., but my favorite role has got to be Joe Piscopo."
"A man finds a parking spot, and sees a lot of odd couples walking by, wondering why he can't find a girl."
"A blind man picks up the phone, and hears from his girlfriend (Portman - truly stunning) that she breaks up with him."
An American tells in her French class about her trip to Paris.
Lili Taylor has the most to do while the others mostly react to her.
Holly is a 12 yr old Vietnamese girl who is sold into prostitution by her own family and living in a brothel in Cambodia.
Patrick (an American) comes into Holly's life and decides he wants to help her.
Cindy Lou Who (played by adorable new actress Taylor Momsem) meets the Grinch as finds the kind part of him straight away.
"Mrs. Drusse is just about to leave the hospital as her work is done, but fate want's it otherwise."
"This is because the American conglomerate, Tamerlane, that is putting the country back together will not stand for Shariff, an oil man from a neighboring state, laying down his own pipeline through war-torn Turquistan."
"But, Brand is aghast to realize that Natalie's pretty face and sharp mind instantly and unconsciously compels him to lose focus on his mission."
"The most moving scene, was Willie finding out about Zak's death, and then Tom telling him about his deceased family who died of scarlatina."
"This budget movie brings in elements from The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari with Dr. Niemann using the power of suggestion to make a somnambulist carry out his orders, from Frankenstein by using the human blood to help create life in the laboratory, and Dracula since the murders are believed by everyone except the inspector and his girl to be the work of a bloodsucker."
"I haven't yet read Kurt Vonnegut's Mother Night (though I've read other books of his, all outstanding pieces of satire and game-changing novel pieces)."
"Keith Gordon is not someone I usually think of as a director of really strong material (more-so I think back to him as an actor, oddly enough featured briefly with Vonnegut himself in Back to School), but this is a revelation."
"He takes the story of Campbell as a story of a fractured life: a German propaganda master (the only American left in Berlin), who is actually a spy for the Americans but can never have his identity revealed, and was before a playwright who really belonged to a nation of two, himself and his wife (Sheryl Lee)."
"The 'something' of this man's life is staggering, but it's ultimately of his own choosing."
"It's also a gorgeously shot film, with brilliant lighting and shots that reflect the state of mind of the character, or just the starkness or sickening colors of the time (watch the scene where an old Campbell watches a film of his younger self spouting out a rant, the juxtaposition of faces is great)."
The director is none other than Dave Starsky himself (Paul Michael Glaser).
"First of all, Harold Faltermeyer's score (remember him?)"
Until Willaim's Mum (Annabelle Apsion) wants him back.
"Carla works for a property developer's where she excels in being unattractive, unappreciated and desperate."
"The colleague quickly realises that she's behind the robbery, but when he confronts her, Paul's readiness to punch people in the face comes in handy too - but this thuggery comes at a price."
Vincent Cassel plays Paul as a cornered dog who only really seems at home when he's receiving a beating or concocting the rip-off that is likely to get him killed.
Winters is so delightfully demented that it was impossible for me not to enjoy her performance.
"Walter Matthau gives a superb performance as the irascible semi-retired comedian as only he can, the intonation in the voice and the exaggerated dramatics coupled with his general misunderstanding of what is going on form a great characterization."
"The latter infuses the film with a great deal of style which is not so common with this type of film and, frankly, it makes one regret the fact that he wished to distance himself from the genre (though more so as not to be typecast rather than because he felt it was beneath him)."
"Needless to say, we had no idea then that she had once created such a delicate - and delicious - portrayal in sheer evil, mainly by virtue of her peculiar look and a devilish smile!!"
"which takes in some wonderful digs at exploitation cinema and, at one point, Christopher Lee himself!"
Either that or he was given lousy roles or had been pushed by the director really hard for this short.
Especially memorable is the jewelry that one boxer gives the girl just before she marries the other boxer.
"The cameos are wonderful, but as always, the main event is MJ himself."
Early in the film her father gives the bird to a pawnbroker and the subsequent scenes tell the story of Paulie's constant struggle over many years to be re-united with his mistress.
One of the many memorable scenes is when he falls into bad company and is encouraged to spy on people using the automatic teller machines.
Tim Robbins is wonderfully endearing as Ed and Meg Ryan plays a step above her normal rom-com level.
"Harry Callahan is still at odds with the higher-ups in the department, still mean, still tough, but now he's older and wearier."
"I have only watched 5 of his animated films so far: Coonskin, Wizards, Fritz the Cat and Lord of the Rings and finally Fire and Ice."
I would much rather have seen one of the two aforementioned actors in his role.
Elliott's performance is superb as the tormented writer and he also helps to elevate the story.
Mr. Lee gives one his perfect ice cold performances here.
Christopher Lee's presence is truly electrifying in every scene he's in.
Chloe Franks deserves special recognition for her massively underrated performance as the little girl who is easily the creepiest character in the whole movie.
"Hartley's film retains the dialog and character focus that are his trademarks, along with a singular cinematographic style."
"Fans of Parker Posey will see her in full bloom here, still with us and more ripe and gorgeous than before"
Seems it's taken years to find her.
"While Cheech Marin's character is making money from him,he's not mean to him."
Ironically Marlon Brandos character soon finds love of his own in a woman of Japanese descent.
"At one point Jorgen (who owns the chicken farm) attends a seminar in laughing, where he's the worst student."
Robert Mulligan has seldom disappointed those of us who have admired his work.
"Carlyle is very good as is O'Toole, I would however liked to have got more information on the relationships with others in party Because Hitler did not do anything on his own."
Sumitra Bhave has always made sensible cinema and this is my favourite film by her.
Sadashiv Amrapurkar played a very important character in this movie and he is not even credited on these pages.
Gauri sends home the money she earns and their conditions improve.
Gauri gives her life for that of her family's.
Gauri goes off to Mumbai but what she does there is never told the subtle dialogues tell us what there is to know.
"He uncovers the traitor, fires him, then unbeknown to him a new leak is planted in the form a dazzling temptress."
"The cast gives some good performance (Elizabeth Berkley as a Barbie girl, Ele Keats as a girl without mother and Justin Whalin, a guy eternally lessened by his bother), but the direction is extremely boring and the story is NOT so interesting and original."
"An airplane flying low over the City distracted Jules, and he pointed the camera up, seconds before the plane crashed into Tower One."
Jules asked the captain to follow him into the Towers.
"The lead pairing is, in fact, one of the movie's few weaknesses: the gray-haired Stewart seems a bit old for the role, and while it is easy to see why he falls hard for Novak, it's a little harder to understand what she finds attractive about him, as they seem mismatched in temperment and outlook."
"Just as engrossing was the relationship between the teenage Victoria and her mother, which was fury at times, as with her mother and King William (whom also disliked her mother)."
Alan Arkin is fantastic in one of his best roles in decades.
"This statement defines his cinema perfectly, a very unique body of work that includes classic stage adaptations, adventure and war films, westerns and of course, his famous melodramas."
`The angles are the director's thoughts; the lighting is his philosophy'.
"As tragedy progresses from luminous daylight to shadowy night, Sirk's photography becomes an extension of the inner state of his characters, and so are the colours of the clothes they wear."
Some say that this is his best film.
"Super clean dentist Doctor Feinstone lives perfect life in his great white house, he has beautiful blond wife and great place to work as a dentist."
"Dark clouds are coming to his horizon in the form of nasty IRS guy (Terminator's Earl Boen), dirty pool cleaner cleaning his wife and suddenly everyone's teeth seems to have gone through dark filter."
"The king in particular appears a real dunce though, and I wonder if he is supposed to be."
"What matters is how Polanksi shapes this thing, both in the way he inhabits the eye that only makes edges and in inhabiting the body that only consists of confused flesh."
"We know that the narrator will leave us in a perpetual horror, on that edge that he imputes but never shows us and lets us imagine."
I remember one episode where as a king Red introduced his queen by referring to her as your fatness.
"The Director and writer McKay explains on the DVD how each of scenes got into his head, by just observing young people of that age that lived in those types of neighborhoods."
"Fragile Carne, just before his great period."
"Living a rather aimless life, he is profoundly shaken by the lovers' pact, and becomes fatalistic, realising the folly of trying to cheat death."
"Like all those major actors, Jouvet's brilliance lies in what he conceals."
"Although his theatricality lacks the fluidity and clear-eyed beauty of Sierck's contemporary German melodramas (check out the masterpieces ZU NEUEN UFERN and LA HABENERA), Carne's style truly fits his theme - that of entrapment, paralysis, resignation."
Laurence Fishburne was not at his best but certainly not bad.
"Cassio's slaying, for instance, was a bit clouded by too much happening to far apart, causing the spectator to twist his head to grasp it all."
Bishop makes the most of his juicy secondary role as lethal and laconic ace assassin Nick.
"Pecker becomes larger than his town can handle, and he is separated from his loved-ones (including a sexy Ricci) by his man-loving art manager."
The exiled lover comes back to Tel Aviv to die and kill a few people to avenge his sister.
Ashraf has moved back to the middle of the street and he detonates his bomb when Noam reaches him in the street.
The movie starts because some french documentalists got interested in this character so they interview him prior to his death.
"For the main part in the history we are guided by a semi slow phase to go look inside Aro's mind, mainly in order to decode why he did what he has done."
"As a fan of Glenne Healdy's, I was surprised of her british accent."
Kriemhild visits Hagen in his cell and demands that he reveal where he has hidden the horde.
He refuses and she herself decapitates her brother.
"Etzel, who is much weaker in the poem than he is here, says something silly like: Ah me!"
Takashi Miike's incursion into kiddie territory won me over almost immediately because he demonstrates nerve and bravery in dealing with fantasy elements.
Carol's father Robert (Ben Temple) is a fighter pilot who has sided with the Republicans against Franco and is rarely with his family.
"Director Imanol Uribe understands the fine line separating pathos from bathos, and in electing to concentrate the story on the children involved, he makes an even stronger statement about the futility and cruelty of war."
"Convicted after a trial, he is awaiting his death sentence."
The problem with the story really is Curtis's personality - he gives in too easily when found guilty of the crime he did not commit.
Gomez turns out to be more perceptive than the villain expects in double checking his alibi again.
"But even Jerry doesn't win this time, because he is expelled by her too"
"Christopher Walken makes his job pretty well, as a reality show producer."
"What hasn't convinced me so much is the role of the psychiatrist (Lucy Liu, sober as never in her acting career)."
Rogers wears one of the great dresses in movie history.... a shimmering sequined number that swirls around her legs as she dances (weighted hem) and is also slightly see through.
Randolph Scott seems an odd choice as Astaire's pal but he also appeared in their Roberta with Irene Dunne.
"Asano really doesn't move like a sword wielding demon, his acting is great but he would be an extra in a traditional chambara fight scene."
"Simple and uneducated, yet very sweet; we can see why Lincoln wanted to help her."
"On that note, DeNiro's performance is spot-on... it's not the excessive lisp that most actors use to portray gay people, but a surprisingly effective one from someone used to being seen as a rough-and-gruff typecast character (thus the ongoing joke surrounding his character matching DeNiro's own opening up into alternate forms of acting)."
"DeNiro hasn't been so unique to his own image since Brazil, and that's saying something."
"And yet, at the end of the day, as an artist Kurosawa didn't stop delivering what he's infamous for with his dramas: the strengths of the human spirit in the face of adversity."
"The character who starts off in the picture, oddly enough (though thankfully as there's not much room for him to grow), is Rokkuchan, a brain damaged man-child who goes around all day making train sounds (the 'clickety-clack' of the title), only sometimes stopping to pray for his mother."
"Glover uses the strange images of snails, death, and the disabled in part because he wants his audience to feel discomfort at either the sheer oddness of the imagery or the visceral reaction one has to the dying screams of an anthropomorphized snail."
"remind me of the work of the painter Francis Bacon he of the infamous popes, yes, and the odd distortions of the human figure that inevitably make viewers cringe and want to look away."
"is likely to exceed your expectations and be well-worth the effort of catching it in the theatre, along with The Big Slide Show and Glover himself."
"With her waves of pre-Raph locks I kept expecting to see Julia Sawahla, whose more intense face would have suited the confrontations better to my mind."
"After Sinatra joined the band, my dad practiced with him for hours on end."
"I have seen just about every Sinatra movie more times than I wish to say, and his movies never get old ."
A potter wakes up and waters his plant.
Kevin Bacon proves again that he can handle any role that comes his way.
---SPOILERS--- Dr. Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) and his team have discovered the secret to making someone invisible.
Betty Grable's costumes were so ravishing that I wanted to grow up to be her and dress like that.
"Fassbinder has illustrated this abstract scheme, that transcends classical logic, in his play The City, the Garbage and the Death (1975) which was filmed by Daniel Schmid under the title Shadow of Angels (1976)."
Erick Stifler goes off to college with his buddy Cooze.
And there is also emotion in the inner-workings of Mathieu's family dealing w/ his mother's problems--and how that comes to bear on their relationship.
"Second half of the movie belongs to him completely where instead of his dialogs, expression matters more."
"For the little acting Ilene Woods did in her lifetime, she was a wonderful voice for Cinderella; very appealing; very believable."
"Gwyneth Paltrow shines in this early showcase for her British accent, and the cast assembled around her all lap up the dialogue."
"Director Paul Verhoeven's American vehicles are of varied quality, but most of the films he made in his native country are indisputable masterworks."
"In the meantime, the writer is plagued with strange visions - at first they look like hallucinations triggered by alcohol abuse, but he soon begins to realize that he is actually experiencing some kind of premonitions."
"Kim Novak's a witch on the prowl for a mortal lover, and James Stewart's her choice."
"It does drag at points, and the central story shifts from Boyer completing his mission to Boyer avenging Wanda Hendrix's death, but Graham Greene is an author who is really hard to spoil."
"Coulouris here is a typical Col. Blimp type - always impeccable in his native English diction, he is sharp in showing his dislike for foreigners in general."
"It was Bacall's second film, and (sad to say) almost sank her long career."
"Boyer's mission never succeeds, as he has too many hidden foes all over the place."
"What is true is that Dorothy's father disowned her after her marriage, and left her $1 of his massive estate."
"Scott's directorial choices are simply astonishing, and he pulls a great performance out of Denzel Washington."
It seems Alison's troubled past makes her a prime candidate by the Vatican to become the next sentinel.
Another big difference is the fact Zechs loses a lot soldiers under his command hence the other nickname he's given in the early episodes: Killer of his own men.
"Thorn gasps in amazement at having ice in his whisky , puffs on a cigarette and delivers the classic line If I could afford it I`d smoke two , maybe three of these a day ."
Tyra Banks make her film debut and proves supermodels can act.
Buttgereit gives us his version of the oldest of tales.
"CBS chief William Paley canceled Rawhide's production after watching the 1st show of season 8, in September, 1965, because he disliked the series without Eric Fleming as Gil Favor, who had departed after season 7."
But the hair in strange places part gets a wee bit out of control when a trip to Transylvania with his father (YES!
"In fact he possesses a craggy, angular dark charm that, in my mind, is quite in keeping with the mysterious, very masculine Mr R. And he takes on Rochester's sad, tortured persona so poignantly."
"Even later on when she gave as well as she got, she would always be sure to remember that her station was well below that of her employer."
"Nevertheless, if you read the book - to which this production stays amazingly close - you can clearly see the small struggles Zelah-as-Jane endures as she subdues her emotions in order to remain mild and even-tempered."
Sidney Stratton is having trouble maintaining jobs at various textile mills mainly because of his experimentation in the textile laboratories.
"While Ms. Peterson has taken on various supporting roles in motion pictures, covering a wide variety in genres, it was her TV-character Elvira that brought her the most fame."
You want Shin-ae to go through her grief and find some measure of happiness.
Peter Ustinov was a genius with a wonderful sense of humor and this is one of his most memorable performances.
"Survival... Love... At the end they've decided to pool their resources, (she finally does), so they will survive."
"there's so many twists and turns that you can't really decide who your favourite character is, one minute its him then he does something so he's coolest then shes about to do something so shes the coolest then suspense builds up and just as you are about to burst the episode ends and your like noooooooooooooooooooo!!!!!"
Everyone needs to stop being so critical of his acting ability because he is just starting out in movies.
"In most of Tsui Harks's movies he combines drama,fantasy,martial arts and humor."
"Right in the beginning of the 1930s Griffith did it in his Abraham Lincoln and the same year as Ford's film, MGM released John Cromwell's one called Abe Lincoln in Illinois."
"Pam Ferris deserves special mention for her role as Gilbert's indulgent mother, as does the actress who played his sister Rose, and Simon Carter who is the uncharitable vicar with a taste for the Good Things in Life."
Carrie-Anne Moss was great in a true departure from her days as Trinity.
Christine McIntyre's beautiful operatic voice is given full rein--she actually was a trained opera singer--and it's wonderful.
"Personally, I love Askey, perhaps it's because I go into his world, rather than unreasonably expecting him to come into mine, which is a mistake too many people make."
Frustrated she goes home and plans to get a divorce.
"There is redemption of a sort, in the end, when Puro has to make a hard choice between a man who has ruined her life, but also truly loved her, and her family which has disowned her, then later come looking for her."
"Greatly enjoyed this 1945 mystery thriller film about a young woman, Nina Foch,(Julia Ross) who is out of work and has fallen behind in her rent and is desperate to find work."
Peter O'Toole is a treat to watch in roles where the lines he speaks are good and offer a chance for him to swagger in drunken stupor.
"An excellent example of cowboy noir, as it's been called, in which unemployed Michael (Nicolas Cage) loses out on a job because he insists on being honest (he's got a bum leg)."
"With really nothing else he can do, he decides that for once he's going to lie."
It is truly a blessing for the poor kid to have that one someone he can turn to.
"I was very concerned by the fact that this child was so burdened with guilt that he felt it necessary to hitchhike several hundred miles to apologize to that piggy Andy's wife, for something he should not blame himself for."
"The effortless motion of Goldsworthy, as he molds natures beauty into his own work is captivating."
"What an amazing performance from a child...and what an uncanny resemblance he has to Ullman, whose son he plays!"
Melissa Joan Hart actually really surprised me with her role as an evil manipulator and she carries the movie well by using her friends and Nick so she can literally get away with murder.
"I'm not a big Tom Hanks fan, but he does step out of character to play hit-man Sullivan convincingly, giving a subtle and laconic performance."
"Newman does well as the old Irish gangster Rooney, showing a hard edge in his face and manner, his eyes haunted by Connor's misdeeds."
Colman loves her dearly as well and wants her back.
Unfortunately Shelley Winters as a poor waitress who a depressed Colman picks up gets in the way of his madness and she winds up like poor Desdemona in the play.
"The subplot with the dental hygienist is also nice, and I found myself going back and forth about whether I disliked the main character for his relationship with her or if I felt bad for him."
It is another sign that Victoria has a strong will and deep love for her country.
"Sooner than not, the young queen should select her future mate, as it will bring stability to her life and to those of the kingdom, for an heir must appear in the coming years."
"Hardly the stuff dreams are made of is this pursuit of the brass ring by a naive hustler (JON VOIGT) and his lame con-man sidekick (DUSTIN Hoffman), soon to forge a friendship based on basic survival skills."
I liked the characters in the film and think that leaving parts of Archie's life a mystery captured his humanity.
Harry Callahan himself is dirtier than ever.
"And eventually as the series progresses further and further, and we learn more about our valiant captain and his crew, will the song actually become meaningful."
"In the first movie, the hero discovered his abilities and he accepted them in the second one."
"To set things right, Connery ventures to the scene of the crime, where he must contend not only with the passage of time, but a meddling sheriff (Laurence Fishbourne)."
"Queen Victoria in many lights was one of our all time greatest Monarchs, and this film paints a picture of her real personality and what her life was like."
"This was what inspired Victoria to be a fantastic Queen, which she was!"
"By 1940, director Ernst Lubitsch had long ago taken Hollywood by storm, and his famed Lubitsch touch had become a sparkling commercial trademark."
"When store-owner Hugo Matuschek (Frank Morgan) begins to suspect his oldest employee of having an affair with his wife, we witness the breakdown of two families, both at home and at work."
"It carefully uses Delon's tough guy persona, belonging to the gallery of bad-ass thugs that he made in his youth."
"Patrick is a great dramatic actor who can easily portray passion, loss and despair, the rugged silent good man, anger and strength; In King Solomon's Minds his character actually smiles a few times."
So much of the amusement is in seeing the title character's endless laments about her appearance and hair color contradicted by what is appearing on the screen.
"Vertigo co-stars Stewart (in his last turn as a romantic lead) and Novak elevate this, Stewart's other Christmas movie, movie to above mid-level entertainment."
"Director Schlessinger has a deft hand with his production, but this film has a grungy underbelly that leaves a bad taste in the mouth of the viewer."
"Today it's slightly less incriminating by standards and such, though the unrated version has some of the most hot content of any of De Palma's films, at least in his quasi-auteur period of the 70s and early 80s, where he seemed to repeat themes over and over, ideas taken right off the film-reels of Hitchcock classics and given a tawdry uplift."
"Victoria Rowell is also good, but I noticed that every series her hairstyle changes."
But will the innocent man's life be saved before he is executed?
Will Herbert Marshall protect her to safeguard his infatuation?
"Professor Noodle (Lucien Littlefield) is nearing the completion of his rejuvenation formula, with the ability to reverse ageing, after twenty years."
"Ollie goes to the roof to help with the other end of the brush at the top of the chimney, but Stan in the living room ends up pushing the him back in the attic."
"Stan asks if he was hurt, and Ollie only answers with I have nothing to say."
"I waas impressed with Russell Crowe's talent in developing his relationship with Lillie, such a typical Aussie blend of softly softly approach, a bit self depreciating and very persistent."
The actor who played Ricky (I forgot his name) did a VERY good job.
Director Chang Cheh creates what is considered by many to be his masterpiece.
Especially when she quickly drops the rental price from $500.00 a month to $400.00.
Alison's mental health and physical well-being soon start to deteriorate and she is plagued by splitting headaches and fainting spells.
The story rings true and clear and represents a tale about human frailty that would honor the greatest filmmakers and even the Bard himself.
Albert Finney plays the father of the wayward sons with a kind of steely intensity that belies his age.
"Perhaps Lumet was not satisfied with what was filmed and time ran out, and he just said, Leave it like that."
"An aging master dispatches his last disciple Yan Tieh to stop his five former pupils who's styles represents five venomous animals centipede,snake, scorpion, lizard and the toad."
"Yan Tieh told by his teacher that he's no match for the five former pupil, must find one he can form an alliance with to defeat the other four."
12 year old Arnald Hillerman accidentally kills his older brother Eugene.
Meanwhile Abbey's hateful spirit comes back for revenge and kills someone in Cliff's surrounding whenever she has a near fatal experience with the medical devices.
"The film is excellent, the acting by both Denzel and Dakota (she will go sky high, trust me on that)are just fabulous, and the plot is mind blowing."
"Patten it would seem is not the friendliest sort and seems to resent the extra work that Fanshawe's visit will entail, the large empty house providing an endless amount of cooking, cleaning and maintenance for him."
"Fanshawe is a fussy sort, very neat and precise with everything having its place, whether they be his clothes or his books and papers and he is rather disgusted by the dirt in his room."
"Fanshawe doesn't have too much time to think about this conundrum as he darkness falls he feels he is being watched, he feels a presence, he begins to see moving shadows in the woods, startled he runs home."
"Director Luke Watson being new to the series might have worried fans of the older films, but he returns to the period setting abandoned by the later films which immediately sets the tone for a great Ghost story, his direction is assured as he stays true to the mood of the masters works and gradually builds up the fear factor to a terrifying climax, all the while keeping what the viewer sees to a minimum, thus upping the tension and mystery."
"This time, Blackadder's prospects are much poorer--as instead of royalty, he's a servant to the very, very thick George IV (the price regent)."
"Orphan Oliver Twist (Mark Lester) lives a miserable existence in a workhouse, his mother having died moments after giving birth to him."
"However a gold god, Don del Oro is stirring up the Indians and stealing the gold for himself."
Its Zorro and his band of men to the rescue.
While having sex with a soccer player while speeding about in a car going at 110 miles/hour (don't ask) she goes off the road and ends up in the Thames.
She's also playing mind games with a man and might be getting him implicated in murders.
"Telling Chris this, weighs the Shrink, will certainly restore him to 'normal.'"
"Margaret is the critical one here, because, though married, she has half fallen in love with Chris again."
"The buoyant war victim's head sinks, his shoulders slump, he looks away."
"Amanda Tapping, as Carter, has perfected the balance between depicting her character's femininity without comprising the fact she is a strong, intelligent military scientist."
"It's a concept visited by filmmaker Cameron Crowe in his highly imaginative and consciousness-altering film, `Vanilla Sky,' starring Tom Cruise and Penelope Cruz."
"`Jerry Maguire' earned him an Oscar nomination, and this one should, also-- as well as the admiration and acclaim of his peers."
"Cruise is not just good in this movie, he is remarkable."
"Bakshi is not afraid to slow down the pace for a moment, and his mastery is clearly shown by the incredible tension is able to build."
"We will never be able to see Bakshi's interpretation of Gondor, of Shelob, of Faramir, of the Cracks of Doom, of Eowyn's battle with the Witch King or Gandalf's confrontation with him."
The distinctive Ronald Coleman is at his best in this piece of Noir about an actor who loses himself in his roles.
The acclaimed Anthony John(Colman)has driven his wife Brita(Signe Hasso)away with his highly fueled temper and erratic behavior.
"A liberal,though good-hearted Harvard law professor Paul Armstrong is convoked to the Flordia Everglades by unjustly convicted black guy Bobby Earl.Confessing that sadistic,cold-hearted cops vilifyied and beat him to a pulp to get the confession of a gruesome murder of an eleven year old girl."
Bobby Earl gets a re-trial.Is unfettered from prison and eludes his horrific punishment.
"Since I like Richard Burgi as a character actor, I wanted to see how he would pull it off."
"Jeniffer Aniston was great, she will finally have a hit movie under her belt."
"The whole movie is one night in a dark and foggy Ireland, and a cast of characters that are memorable but all along, the whole world of Gypo is closing in on him, both psychologically."
"Shelly Winters looked so sweet, vulnerable and gorgeous at the same time and added her talent to the movie."
The only character on screen who is alive is the mother of the title yet she feels dead inside until a rough handyman shows her some affection and awakens her to the joys of sex.
As the eponymous mother Anne Reid betrays her wasted life in every gesture.
"There is not a false note in her extraordinarily lived-in performance, and that very fine actor Daniel Craig displays shadings to his character than even Kureishi hasn't tapped into."
"Emy decides to do away with custom, and she gives herself to her Western man."
"Her pilot, George, is a good guy, and promises to marry Emy, so that she doesn't lose her respectability and place in her rigid society."
"Leslie Cheung proves that he is not only a gifted actor, but also a talented singer and a charming physical comedian."
"Elsa, or 'Rosalie' as Michael likes to call her, plays the innocent, helpless doll very well, ensnaring O'Hara in her web."
"As the lovers conduct a not-so-secret affair at sea, Arthur Bannister's partner in his law firm, George Grisby (Glenn Anders)comes aboard."
"Hayworth is beautifully photographed here, and she is a far-cry from her famous 'Gilda' role."
Her then-husband Orson Welles cut off her trademark auburn locks for a dyed blonde crop (angering Columbia boss Harry Cohn).
"It was a terrific marketing ploy, and he change suits her changed attitude wonderfully."
"As Welles voice-over proves to use, O'Hara indeed does not use his brain very much 'expect to be thinking of her (Elsa)'."
"There is definitely something to that theory, with a lot of implications toward Elsa's behaviour before she met her husband (was she some sort of prostitute?"
"Welles provides us with many of his usual brilliant cinematic touches, including the justifiably famous 'hall of mirrors' climax."
"Hayworth proves her acting capabilities in this one, and proves that SHE is the ultimate femme fatale of 'noir'."
I feel privileged to own this original 1932 8mm black and white silent film of Shirley before she became popular or well known.
"Clint Eastwood plays Harry as he plays all his men of action, slow, deliberate, and without fear."
Charlotte Gaionsbourg's performance is top notch and she's by far the reason to watch the movie.
"He is advised by the DA (Sullivan) that Rudi is small change, that to wipe out the organized crime, one has to find the top man."
"Walter Pidgeon does an excellent job -- his handsome, elegant demeanor and declamatory voice show us a successful, confident man but also a deeply caring one."
"A fellow miner in need will receive the help of his comrades, even at threat of great loss, including life."
"The sad part is where she is actually getting help with her self-esteem issues, and Capano actually had her psychologist killed."
Moto is a like a Whirling Dervish of activity as he goes after his prey.
"What Provo want's more then freedom is to even the score with the man who captured him and in the process, during a wild shootout, killed his Navajo wife: The former Pima County sheriff Sam Burgade, Charlton Heston."
"The man who escaped with Provo are really not interest in his personal affairs but have no choice, in that he knows the territory like the back of his hand, but to go along with him."
"Jackie being hot is just another reason to watch the show; she started out being really good looking but damn, somewhere around season 5-6 she just got Really hot."
Suarez is the ultimate toady and will do anything for Frank; it is like he does not have a mind of his own.
Tony's rise is meteoric and is only matched in speed and intensity by his quick crash and burn.
It's sort of like someone said let's just follow Cary around and watch as he gets perturbed at all the little problems that come up when you are having a house rehabbed.
"While returning from a Christmas Eve shopping trip, an abused suburban housewife (Basinger) finds herself in a fight for survival after a disagreement with a group of delinquent youths takes a violent turn."
Kim Basinger gives her best performance in some time as the downtrodden wife of an abusive husband (Craig Sheffer).
"Lukas Haas I initially thought was miscast, as he (along with the other three youths) just did not seem much of a threat."
Towards the end of this movie it was obvious she would not have been able to continue much longer as she had not eaten in ten days and only had water to drink and was very sick and tired from her perils.
Such a dramatic movie and so heartwarming to see her father's face when he sees his daughter is actually still alive after all this time in the Amazon!
I always liked Sabrina because she was smart.
The last episode made me feel a lot better though (SPOILER)having Sabrina end up with Harvey on her wedding day to dullard Aaron was great!
"Stellar performances by her (Doggie), the old man (the king of masks), and Liang (the Living Boddhisatva)."
"Wang Lung is a humble farmer grateful for the basics of life: to survive off of his land and to be newly wed to Olan, a servant to a rich and powerful family in the village area."
"I fell in love with Emily Watson in Breaking the Waves, then grew even more fascinated by her range and adeptness in Hilary and Jackie."
"Even the worst hypocrite of them all, the archbishop, leaves us with the thought that Of course, she was innocent."
"Preminger was true to the myths surrounding her death, and I appreciated the preview on the tape that showed the flames reaching up and burning her."
"The only little 'pick' I have about this film is that we are not shown why the priest who has been so adamantly urging her burning becomes so suddenly so contrite, even to the point of madness."
"And, whether Graham Greene does this deliberately or not, St. Joan is such a self-assured little upstart, you almost but not quite, are glad she meets her come-uppance."
"And, when she turned down life in prison, for some reason I thought of Anne Sexton, the poet who accused Sylvia Plath of 'stealing her death' when she committed suicide ...knowing such an action guarantees immortality."
St. Joan should have turned Buddhist and quieted the 'voices in her mind'
The other most important story is from Mira Nair (India) where a mother is struggling to get respect for her Dead Son whose name is falsely trapped in WTC massacre!
"Yes, the film was pretty computer illiterate, but it did show Pendelton 'studying computers' at his flat, and I believe the implication was supposed to be that his gifts allowed him to simply engulf the whole subject, practically overnight."
"Toshi is bright, exuberant and hyper, serving as a sort of comic relief with his antics."
"Cleveland is more than just a business owner, he's the town boss which he runs from a wheelchair."
Cleveland is full of all kinds of tricks and he even sends for a western Mata Hari in the person of Barbara Britton to worm her way into the confidence of his rivals.
"Randolph Scott's original home studio was Paramount, it was where his first studio contract was with."
A certain Democrat from a wheelchair had made hash of them for four straight presidential elections and he was gone.
"They had high hopes of winning the White House that year too, but things went awry and they had to settle for an ersatz boss getting his comeuppance in Albuquerque."
Witherspoon already begins to show the Oscar-winning talent she would develop in this early role and London makes a charming leading man.
"Like Saturday Night Fever, this macho film features extremely improbable scenes of beautiful women falling for Travolta and almost begging him to have sex with them"
"Walt Disney & his 9 Old Men put their own 1950 spin on the classic fairy tale of Cinderella, which I guess you could say helps form an unofficial fairy tale princess trilogy from the classic Disney years."
"Finally pushed beyond her breaking point, Cinderella runs out into the courtyard and cries in despair."
"Cindy arrives at the ball, the Prince falls hard for her, but that pesky midnight rule gets in the way, forcing her to flee, but leaving behind a glass slipper."
"The ending cranks the stakes higher when shadow falls into a pit in a trainyard and having hurt his leg, finds it hard to get out and gives up, exhausted, followed by Chance climbing in with him to persuade him to climb out, telling him how important he is to him and how he's pushed them this far so he shouldn't throw it all away so easily."
"Chance's conclusion at the end speaks of the comradeship that has developed between he and his fellows on the journey, and the realisation to what home really is from his long journey to get there, leaves a fine epilogue to demonstrate how much his character has grown, but also how the other two have as well."
"Classy, elegant Adele (marvelously played with dignified resolve by Debbie Reynolds) and batty, frumpy Helen (the magnificent Shelley Winters going full-tilt wacko with her customary histrionic panache) are the mothers of two killers."
"Patrick Stettner's direction was moody and dark, and he allowed the angles and lighting to help create those so-sought-after feelings of tension and release rather than the messy, fast-paced camera-work and quick cuts we're so often subjected to today."
"So, his friends (among them Paul Rudd, Romany Mancoy, Seth Rogen, all very good comic foils) try and devise different strategies and tips to finally break the sort of curse over Andy's head to pop his cherry, so to speak."
"Keanu wants to forget all that Matrix rubbish and get down to doing what he does best, Ted Theodore Logan in Bill and Ted: The Return"
"In WWII-devastated 1980s Rostov (located at the mouth of the Don river near the Black Sea), nothing suppressed Andrei Chikatilo's urge for `limbic domination' from overpowering his layers of civilization."
Rostov's serial killer roamed free for almost 7 years AFTER the police arrested and let him go.
"Rea's Russian accent is impenetrable; and his Burakov is humourless and sullen, at odds with everyone."
"Sutherland's Col.Fetisov, Burakov's boss, and at first his only supporter, is an overly restrained, patient Militiaman whose dignified carriage bears testimony to decades of bureaucratic machinations."
"Fetisov advises his newly promoted forensics chief, now `Colonel' Burakov, of all these changes in an avalanche of confession that becomes the movie's powerhouse watershed scene."
"Convicted, he was executed in 1992 in the manner of all Soviet Union death sentences: one shot, in the back of the head."
"Preminger has reunited two of his stars from the hit 'Laura' - Gene Tierney and Dana Andrews, for an entirely different sort of crime film."
"The character development is well timed, and as we've follows this character and his motivations throughout the film; everything makes sense by the end."
Elizabeth (Dench) spends the whole film trying to reunite the Blonde Bombshells to play at her granddaughter's school dance.
"Of course, the fact that the beautiful Barbara Steele appears in the film doesn't harm matters - and the good news continues as, in this film, she gets to flex her acting muscles more than she did in the films that made her famous."
"We follow Alan Foster, a writer who accepts a bet from Poe himself and Lord Blackwood that he can't spend an entire night in the latter's creepy old castle."
"Noll's comfortable way of rolling out blunt comments, often with expletives, to describe things that he is more knowledgeable about than most is quite refreshing."
Gunga-Din gives his answer with sacrifice of himself.
"`House of Games' is the quintessential Mamet; he's written and directed a number of high-caliber plays and films since, and will no doubt grace us with more in the future."
"I know he's a superb actor, but sometimes I feel his roles unfairly opaque the rest, Luis Luque's role in this case."
"I'm not very fond of Argentine television, so I haven't seen much work from Luque, but it's pretty obvious that he's an excellent performer."
"His physical role, his stares, his content attitude in this movie made me fall in love with his performance."
"I've never been much of a Heath Ledger fan, having only seen him in teen type movies, however he is quite compelling in this role."
"Even Kirk, usually steady as a captain should be, doesn't know what to make of his first officer's illogical conduct."
"Kilmer has been mediocre in a string of movies, so here was finally a role quite suitable for him."
"Bosworth is cute so it's irrelevant how she acts (she's solid), and McDermott, who is otherwise quite annoying, is rather good, to a large extent because he is wearing so much facial hair that I didn't recognize him at first."
(I wish they did that to Cruise in every movie so I wouldn't have to watch his dumb face.)
"Kudrow is charming as ever, a bit unusual to see her in a dramatic role."
"Most of this is summed up during the oral part of his finals when he is asked to translate and comment on an excerpt from Antigone, which contrasts the traditional authority of the gods with the notion of secularity and free will."
"A critic described her as sultry, but that's probably not the word he was searching for."
"The young man who plays Andrea is fine too, which is a necessary thing, because the film depends almost entirely on him and Giullia."
"If you check the message board, you'll see an apology from the director for this cut down version, 79 minutes., and he says he had nothing to do with this R-rated trimmed down edit with a completely new screwed up ending."
"Christian really doesn't need to distant himself that much, because the basic gore elements still stand up, even though highly trimmed down."
"Christian Viel definitely has the skill and vision to deliver the goods, and hopefully his next project will be better produced."
Peter Outerbridge looks amazingly like a young Peter O'Toole and Russell Crowe is absolutely charming and as Australian as he can be.
Glenn Close is at her sublimely evil best as Cruella (`call me Ella') De Ville.
But it wouldn't be a Dalmatian' movie without the subterfuge and machinations of Cruella and you know that something will change her behaviour modification.
They have to prevent the uncool daughter of the senator (the always cute Amber Tamblyn from the TV series Joan of Arcadia) to embarrass her during spring break.
"And like HAL, they tried to disconnect his mind, but not the mechanical parts of him, and as with HAL, it led to disaster."
It is done with style and class showing Modesty's early days as a refugee and the start of her rise to power in the criminal world.
Shelley Winters seems miscast here and the purpose of her role is rather obscure.
"Loads of fantastic actors in this show and i was particularly impressed with Sam Lee's impossibly believable insane behavior and Edison's portrayal of a killer machine, which totally reversed his normal idol image."
"When I read that novel I was sometimes quite doubtful whether the protagonist really deserved to be considered the heroine of the story: for honestly, she is so terribly self-righteous and scheming that one is tempted to dislike her seriously."
"Kate Beckinsale's interpretation, however, saves Emma from herself so to speak: she is portrayed with all the innocence and generosity of her character in full view, and one can't help but give in and like (not to say love) her in spite of her less amiable qualities."
"Paulie's worldly, but he is also naive in his way."
Which is dashed when he falls in with a petty thief (played by Mohr as well).
"Sara Haden proved she could play someone other than Aunt Millie in the Andy Hardy series, was Mrs. Barry"
"Dudley Moore turns in the performance of his career as Loveable,drunken Arthur Bach."
I read Schneebaum's book (same title as this film) when it was first published and was deeply moved by his ability to see through the many ways of otherness (his own and the people of the Amazon with whom he lived and loved) to a way of living a decent life.
"Even so, Schneebaum himself has moved into a kind of higher innocence that suggests the possibility of saving humanity from its own destructiveness"
Then I looked it up on the internet and found that an ultra-fan was trying to get both series released 'on his own'.
"This one is a cross between his VERY funny side, and his serious side."
"Rob Roy may be heroic and brave, but he is far from perfect."
Callarn is so cunning in his cowardace that he is almost comical.
Cunningham is a compelling character in that he seems to have been raised to do whatever he can to obtain status and the affection of the Marquis.
"Rob wins because he has more to live for, and his honor is more powerful than 10 Cunningham's."
The mother takes care of her growing girls the best she can after the father (a University professor) is arrested for anti-war sympathies.
The actor who plays the student is phenomenal as well: his name is Tadanobu Asano.
"The ghosts were genuinely scary, the music and sound effects were chilling (particularly the noise being made when KaDee Strickland's character answered the phone in her apartment), the ending was cool too."
"I think Carol Reed did an excellent job of Nancy's sticky ending, keeping it a G rated movie by disguising her beating, but giving enough away to show the violence of Bill towards her."
"It appears even the director doesn't like this film,but for me I think he's being a bit harsh on himself."
"Govinda is a gem like always and this is probably his best work to date, he shines as the side kick nd delivers the best comedy scenes available in Indian cinema."
Blonde loving Adelaide (Vivian Blaine) wants to marry him IF he gives up craps.
Also Brando is really quite good here--it might seem strange to think of him singing and dancing but he pulls it off.
Joan Crawford had just begun her working girl makes good phase with the dynamic Paid (1930).
Rodney also surprises her with the news that he also has a job.
"Rodney witnesses a mass shooting and goes to pieces, spilling the beans to the first person he sees drinking at the bar - which happens to be Bert."
William Bakewell had a huge career (he had started as a teenager in a Douglas Fairbanks film in the mid 20s).
Deanna herself never did.
This movie captures the absurd essence of an overbearing American patriot actor -- one that believes his work (and politics) are as crucial to the American people as the opinions of the President himself.
That Pickford is usually thoroughly the center of attention through most of her movies but the people still couldn't get enough of her is a testament to her fine acting ability
The practice of having Swedish actors speaking English is something that Mats-Helge has perfected in his later works.
Bourne's motive has always been to stay clear of the government and live his life in peace.
"Joan Allen reprises her role with the same amount of dedication to her job, but also a bit more disenchantment for what is going on around her after how Brian Cox's character, from the first two films, took matters into his own hands."
"With as much trying to cover up any connections to his bosses of the Blackbriar program as he is trying to do his duty to his country, you can never quite gauge what he will be capable of doing."
"Unfortunately, Mr. Connolly's Domestication Collar is damaged by an old lady's walker, and he eats her; then, new and hungry zombies infest the town."
"Writer/director Andrew Fleming seems to realize the idea of a teenage girl regularly breaking up crime rings in a small town is ridiculous, so he doesn't treat the idea religiously."
"He pokes fun at Nancy Drew's ability to do anything, such as ace every class in school, know which baked treat is perfect for converting any enemy to her side, make a bird house with twelve flying buttresses, and even perform an emergency tracheotomy at a party."
"Nancy'd always be in perfect style, if she were living in the wholesome 1950's instead of present day L.A. And she carries around a sleuth kit complete with fingerprinting dust, flashlight, compass, and magnifying glass."
"And if the perky pipsqueak private eye is a little younger than her literary counterpart, it's just more comedic exaggeration on the movie's part."
"Crawford plays a Bonnie Jordan, a wealthy young woman whose life consists of parties, booze, and stripping off her clothes to jump from a yacht and go swimming."
Bonnie gets a job on a newspaper using the name Mary Smith; her brother goes to work for bootleggers.
"Later, of course, he would turn into a romantic hero, but in the early '30s, MGM used him as a bad guy."
Amitabh comes to the city to make a decent living and his dialogue delivery and mannerisms are hilarious.
I had seen Marion Davies in a couple of movies and really couldn't understand her appeal.
"Marion, a top mimic, also did a funny rabbit imitation whenever she wanted to be seen as grand, that was Gloria Swanson spot on!!!"
Peggy thinks she is going to be a great dramatic actress but the studio think she is a fantastic comic.
Peggy and Billy get a call from High Art Studio but only Peggy is wanted and suddenly she is on her way.
"It is a hilarious scene as the director tries everything to get her to cry and when he succeeds, she can't stop!!!"
"Sammy Davis Jr. makes light of himself, Jonathan Winters plays a semi-retired American businessman with something else going on, and Raul Julia, Sonia Braga, and above all Richard Dreyfuss are exceptional."
"Everybody had begged Cesar Luis Menotti to play the boy genius, but the manager thought that he was not yet ready."
Every spectator waited for Mr Al-Sharif of Syria to blow for the foul (he didn't).
Burruchaga stroked the ball to Maradona who was ambling around on the right hand side of his own half.
"Coozeman is as irritating as he was in the first, I'm still baffled to as how he ever got a part."
Saying that the film does entertain and Coozeman's fear that his girl is not exactly a girl is brilliantly funny.
"A teenager, embarrassed by his fear of dogs, runs away from home."
"PARDON MY PUPS is an enjoyable little film, with Shirley Temple stealing all her scenes as the hero's lively kid sister."
Kenneth Branagh shows off his excellent skill in both acting and writing in this deep and thought provoking interpretation of Shakespeare's most classic and well-written tragedy.
Bette Davis always gives a strong performance in all her films as she does in this early period of her very successful career.
Towards the end of the film the young doctor meets his true love in a busy street.
"Indeed, when Daria stops by a small village in the outskirts of the desert, the environment is just as suffocating, and the people just as lost cases, best exemplified by an old boxing champion, now reduced to a shadow of himself, sitting around drinking and smoking and talking nonsense."
"SPOILER WARNING: one reviewer below incorrectly read the falling of the towers as being a happy moment for the character; my read is rather that the falling of the towers is what, because light floods his room, keys him into the loss in his life that he refused to recognize."
"again this is a sort of impressionistic piece, for we know that if the towers were really blocking the light to this man's flat, then there would have been nothing but smoke and ash, not light, flooding through his window"
It takes a little while to get used to Nick Nolte's Nebraskan locutions before we can easily accept him as a famous intercontinental playwright.
Nolte has no politics but thinks it's a challenge to write a role that's almost impossible and then play it himself.
Nolte plunges ahead and his vicious broadcasts are wildly popular in Germany.
"His adored wife, Sheryl Lee, knows nothing of what's going on, nor does she care."
"Nolte can talk with, but not see, the occupant of the cell above his in jail."
Nolte refers to the war-time relationship between him and his wife as a nation of two.
Waters has gone back to his grittier side.
"Director John Ford, for all his capability, was a filmmaker who appears to have put in effort in proportion to how interested he was in the material."
"Luckily the Informer, with its depiction of community, honour, working class life and most importantly Irish setting, was everything Ford loved, and the result is one of his finest works."
Lead man Victor McLaglen fits perfectly within this character and this manner of filming him.
Whatever happened to the old Burton who read The Dark Knight Returns by Frank Miller as research for his preparation to direct Batman back in 1988-89?
"Simon Yam is his usually glorious self and the film also benefits from heavyweight HK actors like Louis Koo, Tony Leung Ka Fai, and the under-appreciated Suet Lam."
John Thaw's performance is so touching and it is a shame he is no longer with us.
Sherryl Lee is haunting in her detachment from reality as Cambell's young lover.
This Pinnocioesque story of Cambell trying to be his own ideal hero and unwittingly becoming his ideal tragic villian is a mature and vivid look into what we are as people.
"Well-shot with realistic performances especially a very good one from Depardieu as a cad and bad boy with realistic locations mood and art-house connotations all over, it fails because the director takes no position, stand or critical commentary on the topic he stipulates."
Isabelle Hupert who plays the philanderer with nonchalant distinction offers opprobrium answers like I don't know; I like his arms; I like the way he makes love to her inquiring husband who tries to kick her out of the house but palliates and reconsiders because...
"Jon Bon Jovi was a drawback initially, but he proved to be a half-way decent Slayer."
"Mandy's acting abilities had little to do with her impression of a psychotic 'Mommy's Girl', with the obvious erotic lesbian overtones."
Mandy's Uber-Nordic facial features coupled with her Uber-Voluptuous body could either be a blessing or a curse.
"Such as the Virus between Max and Logan, and Ames White along with his ancient, super cult."
(Disappointing though that Pat Boone's religious/moral views prohibited him from ever kissing the girl!
"Elmer Fudd is laughing while lounging in his easy chair and reading his comic book, his dog comfortably nearby sleeping in front of the fireplace."
The drawings of his huge teeth chomping right next to the fleeing flea are clever and the dog's dialog made me laugh out loud a few times.
"The poor pooch, under a threat of having to take a bath, as to NOT react when the stupid flea causes him pain."
"But somehow, 'An American In Paris' manages to come through it all as a polished, first-rate musical--largely on the basis of Gene Kelly's incredible dancing talent and choreography, and the truckloads of charm he seems to be importing into each scene with Caron."
"De Niro's role isn't huge, yet amusing as one of two friends who first try to prevent another friends marriage only to later chase him down to force him into it."
"Christopher Walken is very catlike, and doesn't need stupid make-up, or a cat costume for the viewer to believe he's a cat transformed to a human."
"Trelkovsky, played by Polanski himself is not only in every scene, he is in virtually every shot."
This is a rare chance to see Polanski himself in a major role.
Bertrand Blier is indeed l'enfant terrible of French cinema and in the seventies he always could shock the public.
"Filmed with his fave duo (Depardieu and Dewaere) and the usual dose of sex (Miou-Miou plays her typical role, at least the one from the seventies as little could we know that a decade later she would be the best French actress ever)."
"One of the tigers in the group got an order to finally capture the baby, who was hardly saved by his mother when the tigers attacked her community."
At the end the group of tigers tried to capture the baby but the mammoth helped incredibly by his tiger colleague was able to overcome this attack and to give the baby back to his father and the community to which he belongs
The great and underrated Marion Davies shows her stuff in this late (1928) silent comedy that also showcases the wonderful William Haines.
"She paves the way for McIntire and his goons to come up, too."
"The simple story of an Italian immigrant struggling to keep his family alive in New York, is very moving."
Oberon gives her role the right light touch.
"If his promiscuous angel-faced sister Laurie is at home, she comes along, then Red stops yelling and kindly talks to her, making Eric feel left out of the family."
"And when we get to see them, it becomes obvious Eric and his redhead tomboy girlfriend, next-door neighbor and childhood friend Donna Pinciotti are the sanest people around."
"Cusack's done a similar kind of role before in Grosse Pointe Blank, but his comic disposition in the movie is simply superb."
"The kid's growing, but yes, so is her talent!"
"She makes you laugh, and she makes you cry to cut the long story short ('cause I could go on raving about her for ever) she's BRILLIANT!"
"Then, with a little over an hour remaining, the film begins, with a lot of claymation (some of it really creepy) spotting our hero and chasing him looking for an autograph."
"Obviously, this leaves our as of yet mute (discounting songs) lead somewhat worried, and he manages to temporarily lose them."
"He uses this cunning disguise to try and sneak past them, but, for reasons I can't recall right now, they see through it (oh no!)"
"A final moment I shall mention is when MJ, surrounded by Mr Big and his private army."
"This is the third of four transformations he makes, almost always when backed into a corner and/or on the run."
"Soll is what makes the move, his funny ramblings give us insights in to the way The South was back then."
"Christopher Reeve is awkward in his role, while Dyan Cannon somehow manages to make the only possibly likable character detestable with a frankly irritating performance."
"Given how short her career has been so far, one might think it is a little too soon for Megan Fox to take on a role which mercilessly lampoons the sort of actress she might be thought to become: however, she does it sweetly, with some skill, and extremely sexily."
Kwon Sang Woo also plays his role very believable.
Macy is brilliant in a part that almost seems written for him as a self tortured sole struggling to break the reins of his father and his business.
"The films alternate audio track is well worth it to hear the director explain how he picked the cast, locations, and filmed the movie."
Any film buff or observer of human nature will enjoy this one especially if he's a fan of contradiction
"Amitabh, by now, had to have some typical comedy scenes in each of his movies."
"In New York, the family man dentist Alan Johnson (Don Cheadle) meets his former roommate and friend Charlie Fineman (Adam Sandler) by chance on the street."
Alan reties his friendship with Charlie and they become close to each other.
"Liv Tyler is quite impossible to be recognized, I do not know whether she is using excessive make-up to look older, but her face is weird."
Griffith's story-telling seems a lot less heavy-handed than in his earlier historical epics and his tableaux work is fully integrated into the action.
WES CRAVEN is at his best ever.
He brings us an amazing end of summer thriller I was so desperately craving.
General Pepper has decided that he will let some lucky movie studio executive hire his daughter as an actress.
Peggy grimaces and mentions that she doesn't care for her.
Bruce Willis escapes his macho image and portrays a true loony who happens to be right about all that will happen.
"He is actually sane, but the people of the future (or present if you will) distort this guy's head so bad through time travel, no wonder he unravels."
"The brooding city of Philadelphia is a dark and gothic backdrop for Willis' plight to complete his mission which is, against all usual Hollywood stereotype, NOT to save the world."
"Knox even starts toning down his own temperamental outbursts and profane language, as much to appease the angels as for the kids' sake, resulting in a funny bit when he starts dressing down an umpire in his usual way but starts editing himself as he goes along."
:-) Baby-faced Brody has a couple of good lines (I especially like his exchange with Glover about the emotional impact of the National Anthem at a ballgame) as well as a cute bit where a pretty blonde angel massages his shoulders before he goes up to bat.
"Brody isn't the only future star in AitO's lineup: his teammates include Matthew McConaughey and Neal McDonough, and of course, young Gordon-Levitt went on to co-star in TV's 3rd ROCK FROM THE SUN as well as such films as 10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU."
Carter Wong plays a noble hero on a quest for a book of healing which leads him seeking ultimate vengeance!
Wealthy psychiatrist Lindsay Crouse has just published her first novel and is feeling down about her profession feeling that it's hopeless to help her patients.
A young gambling junkie client asks her to help him pay off his debts if he truly wants to help him get better.
"As the man of the house, Fiona has stood steadfast for years against settling her father's will which would therefore allow a Donald Trump type named Charles Barclay to get the family home."
Erendira is constantly daydreaming and accidentally burns down her grandma's house.
"Because of this, the story feels surprisingly remote: you often need to know a character's background to really care for him or her."
"Egon IS 'the' dull intellectual, while Axel IS his exact opposite."
"The adaptation excels in its beautiful cinematography, humour and acting: Fedja van Huet (Egon) is one of the few Dutch actors who can make you forget he IS acting (which is, in my opinion, the highest an actor can achieve)."
"Indeed, Krabbe himself."
The Human Tornado is a campy 70's Blaxploitation movie starring nightclub comedian Rudy Ray Moore in perhaps his most endearing role to date.
"However, it seems that a rival nightclub owner with Mob connections is trying to muscle in on her racket, so Dolemite takes matters into his own hands."
"Rudy Ray Moore showcases many diverse talents in this landmark film, including strong dramatic skills, a mastery of Kung Fu, an impressive singing voice (he provides two of the songs on the soundtrack), a touching, compassionate side with the ladies, and an overall compelling charisma and keen sense of comic timing."
The cop Wai is a loose cannon who is worried about his father who is also a cop who was shot and is in a coma.
Wai's chief is his dad's friend and is worried about Wai's erratic behavior.
"The whole movie only works because of Ben as we try to figure him out and I didn't see any clues (what clues you talking about, Willis?)."
"A French novelist, disgusted by his wife's society friends, goes to North Africa for a respite."
Baker makes us care about what's happening to poor Alwina during her transformation & introduction to European mores.
"After the War, Baker's fortunes began to slide and she faced many financial & personal difficulties."
"Josephine Baker was on the verge of a comeback when she died of a stroke in 1975, at the age of 68."
Little Edie seems to be the most off as she acts with the mindset of a ten year old even though she is actually 53.
"Initially striking the audience as filthy, crude and generally unappealing, his Oscar Madison eventually manages to worm his way into our hearts, culminating in a hilariously overplayed confession of emotions that Matthau rasps out in a voice not entirely his own."
Richard Dean Anderson steps way outside the shadow of Macgyver and gives the best performance of his career to date.
Jane Leeves is great her role as an ambassador's assistant in a role that proves she can be a fine dramatic actor.
"Johnny Weismuller returns as the titular vine-swinging, animal dueling wild super-hero, and Maureen O'Sullivan reprises her role as his entirely fantastic lady love Jane (who sports a two-piece outfit for the first and last time here)."
"In many ways this is one of the most accurate of the series historically, the prince regent did take control of the throne during his fathers bout of madness and some of the characters lampooned tell a lot about the times."
"Emotional performance by Busy Philipps was astonishing, its such a shame we wont see Oscar in her hands, which she deserves"
"All of the acting is first rate - David Niven is at his most charming, and he has excellent support from veteran Roger Livesey and relative newcomer Kim Hunter."
Judd Hirsch plays against his usual good guy image as a father who triangulated his sons and now is left with the one he always rejected.
"For example, there's a telling moment when one of the secondary characters, openly gay, is visited in the hospital by his boyfriend who brings him flowers and tries to kiss him in front of his visiting family, and suddenly we see a wave of awkward discomfort wash through the room."
Celie has a younger sister Nettie with whom she is inseparable.
"But seriously - this is a sometimes beautiful (the scene that shows different angles of that huge bridge is particularly effective - especially if you understand the significance of the scene, and that the names shown are of people that actually committed suicide from jumping from the bridge...), sometimes confusing, sometimes silly (the SHE WOLF OF THE SS rip-off is pretty amusing), sometimes harrowing (I found the scene of the guy talking to the girl in the park about his wife particularly effective) film that is more of an experience then just entertainment, as many of these art films are meant to be."
"A lovely old - fashioned thriller coming on like a cross between Alfred Hitchcock and David Lynch,Red Rock West follows the misadventures of injured veteran unemployed oil worker Mr N.Cage as his luck turns from bad to worse after he ends up with an empty gas tank and barely enough money for a cup of coffee in a one ute town in the back of beyond."
"It has been established right from the start that Mr Cage might be down but he is not out,and he might be broke but he will not steal,not even in his present dire circumstances.Consequently when he is mistaken by Mr J.T."
Sean Connery was very good in his role as always.
"Blair Underwood was a pleasant surprise, I didn't really expect anything great from him, but he pulled off a great performance."
"His son, Norman, is now grown up and living on his own."
"A true hero of modern times , Chuck Norris has left TV Walker , Rexas Ranger , and is looking new steps for his artistic career."
Sir Thomas Blackwood seemed to get his kicks out of adding to the deaths caused by his family.
With however some reservations and they're the ones I previously enumerated which fuel the bickering between De Palma's rabid fans and his detractors.
And the filmmaker ends his film on a sequence that echoes to the opening one.
Perhaps De Palma wanted to stretch his film beyond one hour and a half when at this time the viewer knows (and even before) who the killer is.
And the filmmaker isn't afraid to film his main actress and wife Nancy Allen in her underwear.
Mitch wants nothing to do with her.
"The director had a gift for this type of movie, and though he had many imitators, he never had an equal"
Sudden Impact tends to be treated as Eastwood's artistic failure at a point in his career when he had established a good reputation as a director.
Or have a look at the brilliantly made scene where Sondra Locke's character visits her mentally ill sister in hospital.
Lamberto Bava may not have as keen an eye as his father Mario did; but he takes time in building up a foreboding atmosphere that really compliments the film well.
"However, given the above interpretation of religion as shown in the movie, I think the director was trying to balance the act whereby he might not be called an Evangelist basher!"
Jasbir (the sister) grows up in an affluent environment but this is not enough to lead her to reject her life and ultimately join a hippie movement that eventually leads her to drugs.
The story marks Prashant making efforts to save his little sister (who is perpetually in a trance) from a hostile hippie environment.
"Aside from the hit-man family aspect which provides a touch of surrealism, Macy's character grapples with his marriage, and his father's control."
"Macy shows a repressed sadness, and his bedtime talks with his young son are amazing."
Constance is working to emotional exhaustion trying to keep up her roll as perfect mother and wife.
"Claire Danes plays the 1950's Ann, and she does it in a style that clearly shows an intelligent woman of those times who is conflicted by what she is supposed to do as opposed to what she wants to do."
"Collette is perfect for a part such as this, but I have never seen her give a bad or unbelievable performance no matter what part she plays."
Director Lajos Koltai states in the DVD extras that he sought out Glenn Close to play the relatively small part of Lila's mother because he felt she was the only actress he could think of to play one scene in the film.
"Donald Trump is perfect as the boss, even though his ego is bigger than the whole universe times infinity."
"This looked to be Gene Simmon's season, but after he made a complete fool of himself during the Kodak task , another man emerged from the shadows: Piers Morgan."
Never has anyone dominated a season like he did.
Writer / director William Sachs deserves credit for coming up with this ingenious idea; his ultra-slimy character is a memorable one indeed.
We soon see why this child wets his bed.
My favorite part of this film was the old man's attempt to cure his neighbor's ills by putting the strong medicine in his bath.
But... the best scene in the movie is when Wayland Flowers and Madame did his/their gay routine that he used to do in gay bars and nightclubs.
"An Indian would sell his soul to own one... Winchester 73 is the first collaboration between director Anthony Mann and actor James Stewart, a duo that would go on to create a run of superior Westerns that added a new, psychological depth to the genre."
She finds and makes friends with a girl about her age and is able to help the girl's family in many ways.
"They take their belongings to the beach, and while they are walking, a voice-over from Simon talks about his confusion about what real love is."
"Ms Paltrow is aloof, as her character requires, but the required distance from the other characters is accompanied by a much less appropriate detachment from her own actions."
"Acting honours go to Toni Collette who manages to radiate warmth, and Jeremy Northam who pitches his character at just the right level"
Playback} Never have I seen a director take so much flack for his style before.
"I guess that is a clever film technique, because now Tony Scott is free to use as much flashy MTV/Reality Show editing footage as he likes."
"Basically, it tells how an old master story teller needs to find a (male) heir to carry on his craft, but ends up not getting what he expected in his very male-dominated world."
The characters must then deal with their situation and the old master must grapple with the conflict between his desire for a companion and heir and his and society's traditional notions.
"The film expertly conveys the old man's emotions and his desire to find an heir, and compellingly shows how he and the kid handle the situation."
"The movie is magnificently directed by Hollywood classic director Michael Curtiz.He directs utilizing modern techniques as the image of dead through a lock-door,a split image while are speaking for phone and curtain-image.The tale is remade as ""Calling Philo Vance""(1940).The film is a good production Warner Bros, by Vitagraph Corp"
"Everyone loves the new dog,but there is something strange about him."
"It isn't long until the father Mike Barry(Richard Crenna,First Blood)starts to notice.His wife Betty(Yvette Mimieux,Where The Boys Are,Jackson County Jail,Snowbeast)is different and his kids Charlie and Bonnie(Ike Eisenman,Witch Mountain and Fantastic Vourage and Kim Richards,Witch Mountain,Nanny and the Professor,Hello Larry,Tuff-Turf)also have changed."
The only other problem with that is that Stella herself is a lesbian.
Nicole Kidman is a wonderful actress and here she's great.
Morgan Freeman plays a character very like Freeman himself--a successful actor pushing 70.
The scientists are sincerely impressed with his work and invite Rukh and his lovely wife Diane along for an expedition in the heart of Africa.
"Although the erstwhile Archibald Belaney was not a Canadian Indian by birth, there is no doubt that he had a deep knowledge of Ojibway culture and lore and that he spoke their language fluently."
"According to the film, Grey Owl's wife Gertrude was herself of Indian descent, but came from a family which had been assimilated into white Canadian culture."
"The original Bond, Sean Connery, also seems to have deliberately opted for contrasting roles when he appeared in films like The Hill or The Molly Maguires."
"The story was a TRUE story about a black slave who's love affair with a white commander led to her leadership and candid, whimsical way of living."
Many would argue that she sold herself out - but she was trying to secure her future and that of her future children.
Probably most enjoyable was the way the main character grew a little bit in his Romantic relationship realizing a greater depth to sexual feelings.
"Basically Nathan Detroit (Frank Sinatra) is having trouble doing what he does best, setting up a high stakes crap dice game, because he needs $1000 to get the place."
"Mainly because he simply doesn't understand things, like why his father is hardly ever there for him."
"The Wendigo is ultimately what his young, innocent mind fabricates to explain all of this."
"Not because that's what the Wendigo actually is, but because that is how he understands it."
"With excellent fight choreography and a supporting role from the Hammer Horror scream queen herself Stephanie Beacham, this really is fantastic stuff."
"In an effort to stimulate the show business economy and his own personal economy, out of work theater director James Cagney comes up with a brilliant idea."
"Feinstone starts to perceive everybody around him as decayed in one way or another, and he goes on a murder spree as police detective Gibbs (the always welcome Ken Foree) picks up his trail."
"Head case and popular novelist Catherine Tramell (Sharon Stone) is now over in London writing a novel, but death and destruction follow her around like flies follow a horse during a spot of hot weather."
However is this just a personality disorder (some form of b/s risk addiction) or further evidence of her guilt?
Strangely she doesn't think Stone is quite as dangerous as everyone else - or else she doesn't think the script is good enough or her cheque large enough to do any proper acting.
Saura always emphasized the staginess of his collaborations with choreographer Antonio Gades and other artists.
"In his 1995 Flamenco he dropped any pretense of a story and simply has singers, musicians, and dancers move on and off a big sound stage with nice lighting and screens, flats, and mirrors arranged by cinematographer Vittorio Storaro, another of the Spanish filmmaker's important collaborators."
"Because Saura has truly made magic, and perhaps best so when he dropped any sort of conventional story."
"Russell is Sergeant Todd, the best of the best, and we glimpse his career as he discharges his duties in an exemplary manner in campaign after campaign; he is what he was born to be, a soldier."
"What follows is the story of a man who must fight for his life, while struggling to discover his own sense of humanity and individuality, traits new to a soldier who has known only two things his entire life: Fear and discipline."
"He has few lines in this movie, but Russell speaks volumes with his eyes."
Elmer Fudd tells his dog that if he scratches himself just once more that he will be given a dreaded bath.
"Most notably, there's the dirty jokes including a huge shot of the dog's behind which causes the flea to wolf-whistle and a hysterical sequence in which the dog attempts to scratch himself by dragging his backside along the floor."
"He momentarily breaks off to address the audience: Hey, I better cut this out."
"Under Ethier's auspices, she quickly blooms into an essentially heartless character determined that nothing shall stand in her path to success; the symbolic depiction of her rise in stature at the New York firm she's eventually employed with is reminiscent of a similarly sardonic one relating to an ambitious statesman's lust for power in Sergei Eisenstein's October (1927)!"
Very good martial arts film and Jet Li is the best since the master himself Bruce Lee .Li is excellent as the low key librarian/cop who saves all time and time again .
But by 1959 Hoover was already beginning to worry about being forced out and had already started to collect dossiers on powerful people to make sure and protect his little kingdom.
Every time I saw a character (except for the Lizard) I guessed which Venom he was.
Otto Preminger made this type of movie just about his own.
Kimberly Elise also starred in this movie and it is always a pleasure to see her on the big screen.
Sinatra looks and acts much younger than his actual age of 29 30 while shooting.
Chan not only plays a believable risk taking cop but shows the powerful changes that his character goes through as he falls into escalating desperation.
"Nora and her fellow photographers on the prowl, night after night, day after day for the exclusives."
Grace is recently widowed and realizes her late husband left her with a lot of debts.
"Guiness makes the whole enterprise worthwhile, and watching him blow up a factory research lab over and over again is quite a blast!"
First let me say the director has some wonderful use of titles in his establishing shots.
"Pat O'Brien plays pretty much the same character he played in MANY other films (you know, the tough-talking, hard-driven but swell guy)."
"The cast is also outstanding, especially Krabbe's performance as mentally disturbed writer that opened the doors for his international film career (The Living Daylights, The Fugitive)."
"Kidman's injured harm hampered his offense, but he continued to battle hard."
"RVD landed painfully on his back, then had to suffer from having his spine cracked against the steel ring steps."
"Before he could speak, Eric Bishoff stopped The Game to apologize for getting involved in his personal business."
Stephanie McMahon stepped out to issue her own pitch.
HBK said the last thing he wanted to do was cause any trouble.
"HBK told his friend to imagine the two back together again, making Bischoff's life a living hell."
"Rock rebounded, grabbed Taker by the throat and chokeslammed him!"
The Rock picked himself up just in time to break up a pin attempt on Kurt Angle.
"Harris plays Willie a bit like Peter O'Toole, in his more debauched state."
Gary Cooper plays Wild Bill and Jean Arthur plays Calamity Jane and Charles Bickford plays the bad guy who sells weapons to the Indians and you can hardly recognize him.
Gary Cooper is good as usual and i usually don't like Jean Arthur but i liked her here
Akosua Busia deserved an Oscar nomination for her short but powerful portrayal of Nettie.
"It shows the struggles of both an Indian person wanting to break outside her cultural barriers and women wanting to break outside the gender restrictions found in sports, especially in England at the time."
See Willie's joy at what is probably his first ever birthday party thrown by Tom.
"Rather than stand by and do nothing, she takes her own role in helping the poor by being the Night Watchman."
An amalgamation of the above would be a suitable way of describing visionary french director Christian Volckman's bleak and atmospheric take on the future in his feature film debut.
"The director seemed very keen in using height in his shots and loved using mirror reflections, I believe he should have paid more attention to the pace in the second half of this piece."
"Obviously love prevails when the two lovers announce that they would die for each other, June even offers to take his place!"
"Miller's restraint, especially early on, is breathtaking, and his exquisite handling of the consequently-pivotal interior mise-en-scene makes for captivating viewing."
How the heck he accomplished this is beyond my understanding.
"Moreover, in the complete version, the film begins in the New Jersey countryside with Mary, where she reads and fantasizes about her ideal lover."
"Davis' Mildred, on the other hand, displays her emotions immediately and without censure."
Davis' Mildred was **never** vulnerable until she actually had to go to the doctor and beg for assistance.
"It delivered, in a captivating way, a good introduction to the character and her background."
"So begins Kabei's struggle to hold down jobs to feed her family, and the frequent, difficult meetings with her husband behind bars."
"Help comes from relatives, especially on Shigeru's side, since Kabei's own dad had adopted an I told you so attitude with her choice of spouse."
"As the movie opens, police detective Dana Andrews is on the carpet for his brutal ways, particularly his vendetta towards crime boss Gary Merrill (whom we learn was set up in business by Andrews' ne'er-do-well father)."
"When an out-of-towner is stabbed to death at a floating crap game operated by Merrill, the hair-trigger Andrews roughs up a witness, causing him a fatal crack to the skull (exacerbated by a steel plate installed in the veteran's head)."
"I think this movie comes off as a truly good movie (without being a masterpiece), because it sticks to itself, and gives the viewer a chance to watch and analyze it, instead of wanting to bombard him with effect and emotion to blot out his intelligence."
"Matthew Fox once again shows us what a great actor he is, Josh Holloway is so great, Jorge Garcia is Hilarious, I could go on and on."
J.J. Abrahms has once again proved what an excellent writer and producer he is.
"Umecki-chan had a helluva debut here and while I think she earned her statue, she didn't really stretch."
"Kyle's best friend, Mitch, has always gotten him out of difficulty."
Kyle sleeps with a gun under his pillow.
"Panic is a captivating, blurred-genre film about a brooding and conflicted middle aged hitman's reconciliation of infatuation with a younger uninhibited hairstylist, his love of wife and son, his duty to his employer/father with his own identity."
This movie is Damian Szifron's second immersion in movies after his excellent character study in El Fondo del Mar.
Darren McGavin begged to get out of his contract to end the show.
Gretchen Mol is probably best known for being tauted as The Next-It-Girl a few years ago when no one knew who she was despite an infamous cover story by Vanity Fair among other media dubbings but despite a few co-starring roles here and there her predicted stardom seemed to twinkle less brightly until now.
Mol is perfect and uncannily resembles her portrait's subject down to her knowing-teasing smile.
The real Bettie Page was reportedly not involved with the project but apparently gave her blessing and continues to live a somewhat secluded life that is alluded to in the final moments as to having found Jesus and shirking her 'notorious' image once and for all.
It's the story of a young beautiful woman moving to New York and making her way to the top of the business by using her body as a tool to get there.
Lily moves to New York and makes her way up the business place by sleeping with all the men.
Lily Powers is a woman who doesn't have love on her mind just power and money.
"I like to think that my favorite director Paul Thomas Anderson was the first to see the childish, pent-up anger in his stupid comedies as something to use dramatically."
"Always on edge and ready to snap at any moment when something is mentioned to spark the memory of his perished family, he goes through life with his iPod and headphones, shutting out everything so as not to be tempted remember."
Cheadle's character wants to revert back to the college days of hanging out and Sandler's doesn't mind because all that was before he met his wife.
"Liv Tyler is a bit out of her element as a psychiatrist, but the movie calls her on this fact and makes the miscasting, perfect casting."
"The women's director has a sure touch on the many documentary-like sequences of Air Corps training, and he invests it with more unhackneyed humanity than the genre generally allowed, particularly in wartime."
"It's scaled and paced modestly, and Linden's expectant-dad panic stays with you for days -- this sort of part was often played for laughs, but he's a terrified young kid in trouble, and very persuasive"
"Of course, Columbo gets him in the end."
"Diana is true to herself while still falling prey to love, and she and Adrian have a more realistic, complicated relationship rather than just something that magically works out."
Shadow as the older dog who's preparing Chance to take over for him when he's gone is really moving when you think about it.
"While I've never heard a fan cite DIRTY WORK as his or her favorite Laurel & Hardy comedy, it's nonetheless one that everybody seems to like."
"In any event, the professor is obsessed with creating a rejuvenating serum that can make people younger, while his sarcastic butler, Jessup, expresses the viewer's skepticism with rolled eyes and the occasional dry quip."
"Now that I'm grown up and have a kid of my own, I wanted to introduce him to this classic movie."
"During Abu's fight with the giant spider, my son's hand crept over and took hold of mine - he was genuinely scared."
"The willingness of Abu to put himself in jeopardy (repeatedly) for the clueless, love-struck deposed king is equally improbable."
Witchy poo was scary - I wouldn't want to cross her path
"Now if they would work, they must return together another time for do one of his best old sketch for a comedy story TV show."
"In this depiction of life towards the end of French colonialist Cameroon, she explores the relationships between men and women, black and white."
This is where we first see him remembering his childhood baseball strike-out.
"This small film also has a great heart - it is not just for bike fans, as it bases around the character's relationships with each other including dreams and regrets, such as Gary Stretch's Fred longing for the family he left behind."
"The main character is not wavering at all: he has made a choice to redeem his weakness by following the path of faith to friendship and love, or is he not?"
"Essentially, it is about a black woman's trials and tribulations as she is growing up from a girl to a woman."
Whoopi Goldberg gives her best performance ever in this movie.
Danny Glover should have also gotten at least nominated for his role in this film.
A clip of his horrible low budget movie Kung Fu U will have you rolling.
"Victor McLaglen isn't as famous today as he was back then, and he should be better remembered."
"This director also could bring out a lot in his actors, even without such tricks."
"Mostly, though, McLaglen is firmly in control, especially when his character is almost totally blotto (which is difficult for an actor to do believably), and he also plays Gypo Nolan with a depth and emotional power that is surprising for someone who has only seen McLaglen later in his career, in The Quiet Man."
"Victor McLaglen was big and bully, in the old-fashioned sense of the word, but he was a good actor, too, and capable of wide range and fine nuances of performance that we just wouldn't expect of a such a man today."
Until the viewing of `Kiss Me Kate' it may have been necessary non-opera enthusiasts to watch any of her films with remote control in hand.
The answer is revealed as the soloist's jacket opens and she sees what's strapped across his chest -- just before the explosive climax...
"But Gary Browning who plays an police officer is so damn bad, he becomes good."
Dwivedi knows what he can extract from MAST Urmila.
It's up to Aaron's decent do-gooder brother Ben (amiably played by Jan-Michael Vincent) to put a stop to him before things get too out of hand.
"The opening scene is the sort that really draws a viewer into the fantasy aspects of the story--and Niven's tense talk with radio operator Hunter while his plane is crashing toward earth, unexpectedly leads to a memorable romantic encounter."
He finds a companion who comes with her own issues.
"Sharon Stone is awesome in this role, just like she was in the first one."
"Let's get some things straight first: Zombies don't exist so the filmmaker can have them WALK, RUN, hell even FLY if he wants to."
"Some idiots think that zombies should only growl like a typical Romero movie, once again zombies don't exist so a filmmaker can make zombies whistle if he wants."
"The viewer has an opportunity to develop the character herself, though her predictions are rarely validated."
Alec Baldwin is the one actor whose age is appropriate to the character he plays: Col. William Travis.
"Miike's goals are met, though just met, in his low-scale ambitions: a gangster picture with some added levels of harsh familial trouble (the main tension between the brothers comes out of profession and duty to parents), notes on the crueler aspects of underworld crime, and what the realm of unrepentant sex, with both sexes, brings out psychologically in the characters."
"The lead character, played by Edison Chen (who is really very good), becomes infinitely more complex by the end of the film than I ever thought he would be after watching the first thirty minutes."
"Lin McAdam wins the Winchester in a shooting contest, but has it taken from him not long afterward by outlaw Dutch Henry Brown (Stephen McNally) and his henchmen."
"Skip McCoy is a three time loser pick pocket, unable to curb his instincts back on the street, he picks the purse of Candy on a subway train."
Another episode I liked was the one where Zorak makes a bully stand and then some new guy took over his stand.
The film shows how politics may haver helped the killer to continue his rampage for over 12 years.
I sought this film out because I'm a new Frain fan and wanted to see more of his work.
"Ollie's nerves finally snap, and he goes on a rampage."
", says Hall, who realizes what a stupid comment he just made); and Cramer's mistreatment of his two hostage slaves."
The hole movie takes place inside his mind -or does it?
"Ashely is so radiant and touching here, that it's hard to think of her subsequent career without wincing."
"Anyone seeing Ashley here in Ruby In Paradise would assume this elegant, natural beauty went on to all kinds of interesting art films and serious acting -- instead she has become the go to girl for dumb action films and slasher movies!"
"Very disappointing, but at least we have this lovely performance preserved to showcase her early promise."
"The director (Victor Nunez, Ulees Gold, another excellent character study) treats this ordinary young woman's life with deep respect, allowing her story to build slowly and with a lot of detail."
"In that way, I think this is one of the most moving and respectful coming-of-age stories about young women that I can recall -- it's not about Ruby's sexual awakening or how she lost her virginity, but about her life choices and her growing maturity."
This is probably one of Brian De Palma's best known movies but it isn't his best.
"Davis's performance here is credited with changing the course of screen acting, much as Brando's would do nearly 20 years later when he screamed out Stella!!"
Rosemary LaPlanche does her usual imitation of someone in a coma that passes for her acting style.
Our protagonist introduces himself to us.
"Ironically, Kiki's love sickness isn't love for another woman, but her illicit, incestuous love for her brother."
Seeing Frank Sinatra when he was very young and extremely thin with sunken in cheeks and a wonderful voice which sang some great old songs.
My roommate had bought this documentary and invited me to watch it with her.
"Normally, I'm not a fan of completely fabricated fictional tales about actual people, now deceased and not able to defend themselves, but I think the late Einstein might himself have gotten a chuckle out of this one."
"Uncle Albert must make Ed appear suitably smart, so concocts a charade portraying him as a physicist...naturally with amusing results."
"Walter Matthau is his usual hilarious self, and pulls off the character of Einstein quite effectively."
I was a fan of Emily Blunt's portrayal of Victoria and how she kept her spirit even though she was forced into a virtual exile while in her youth.
"Something goes inexplicably wrong, and he literally dreams to life a swamp creature inhabiting the dark folk tales of his youth."
"What follows is the story of a guy during he's midlife-crisis, facing the regular problems: falling in love with a pretty young girl and everything that goes with that."
"The bathhouse regular who sings O sole mio in the bathhouse as the water showers down upon him, much to the delight of Er Ming, finds that he can't sing in public because of stage fright."
See this especially for the comedic performance by Wu Jiang whose warm effervescence overcomes any handicap his character may have
This time around a generally hated financier is found dead - shot in the head - in his locked and bolted bedroom on the upper floor.
Cohen's dialogue is hilarious and I was continually intrigued by how perfectly he captured the real pace of today's conversations.
"Passing out on the Long Island Railroad lands Caine in Montauk, instead of his residence in East Hampton."
"Supposedly Drablow lived a reclusive life, and locals kept pretty quiet about her."
Mat is unlikely to have a quiet evening in before his big day.
"Having missed his cousin George (Damien Robertson) on arrival in the city, Mat encounters further trouble when a young biker takes him for a ride in more ways than one."
Also loved hearing her sing.
"I would not have cast Travolta in the role he plays, but he does a fine job ... ditto Debra Winger."
He stays overnight with a beautiful woman Christine (Renee Soutendijk) and has sex with her (by imagining she's a boy).
It's beautifully shot by Jan de Bont (now a director himself) and there's so much symbolism and obvious hidden layers in the dialogue that you're never bored.
Which makes me think... MAYBE she was one of the teachers at the academy.
"Jess loves to play pick up soccer games, the kind forbidden by her traditionalist mother."
"There is humor thrown throughout the movie, especially when Jules' mother thinks she's a lesbian."
Director Joe Johnston has always been a famous name for his movies such as Jumanji & Jurassic Park 3 & October Sky surely stands above all of his other films.
"Without any doubts, October Sky is his best effort & obviously his best film."
"Jake Gyllenhaal was around 19, when this movie was released & he gives a beautiful & natural performance."
"Chris Cooper as his father, also gives a very fine performance."
"It told the story of a young girl(Marie) and her best friend Paulie the parrot, who unbelievably could talk and quite frequently held conversations with her."
"We follow Paulie's adventures (and misadventures) as he attempts to reunite with his beloved owner, meeting many memorable characters along the way."
"The character Arthur is hilarious, with his drunken comments."
One must ask what led him into those other tacky films?
It was was one of the best performances in the early cinema history and I think this movie wouldn't be that nice if she was not in the leading role
"Grave Lionel Atwill gives another one of his typically fine performances, this time as a doctor doing scientific research in an old castle."
Beautiful Fay Wray plays his assistant in a role which requires her to do little more than look lovely & alarmed.
A brilliant chess player attends a tournament and falls in love with a woman he meets there.
There is the fact that the chess player is also completely alienated from the world because of his brilliance at the game and the fact there is some history haunting the player.
Angelina Jolie is cast in the supporting role of clare-the gangsters moll.She puts in a solid performance.
Timothy Hutton playing Blossom is superb and immersed himself deeply into his character.
Duchovny himself isn't as bad as many people would think and in the end i would rate his performance his credible.His familiar monotonous tone and straight face is present but dosen't detract too much from the fil
"Mark Lester comes across as an innocent waif, which was what Dickens intended when he wrote the book!"
"Benicio Del Toro should be given full honors for this, I never doubted him as Che throughout the film... not once."
Ferrell is his usual quality self in a brilliant side role.
Tim Meadows plays an idiot surprisingly well and has written himself some of the funniest lines you'll find in any comedy out there.
"Borzage never forgets his social concerns: in the heavenly train going up,the Rich cannot stand to be mixed up with the riffraff but as chief magistrate tells :here there's no more difference ."
We get to see in the film Pride of the Marines Al battle himself far harder then he did the Japanese troops on Guadalcanal in just coming to terms with his disability.
A courage Al thought he lost back in that God-forsaken island hell in the South Pacific.
"Marlene Gorris could perhaps have examined the psyche of Luzhin, rather than depicting him as a tortured innocent victim torn apart by the cruel motives of others."
"I felt that I was put through Luzhin's torment and eventual tragic end, without being given the pleasure of having his unusual and complex personality unravelled."
Andy Hanson (Philip Seymour Hoffman) and his younger brother Hank (Ethan Hawke) couldn't be more different.
Clare Danes was also super as his trainee/replacement.
"Roeg's films tend to have little to do with one another, and expecting this one to be like one of his you liked is probably off the mark."
"Ash is really great in this movie, and I like his friendship with Sam."
"The only thing I didn't like was Suicune's appearance, he just suddenly pops up, helps Ash & co a bit and leaves."
"As with all of Angelopoulos' films, The Suspended Step of the Stork implicitly demands a close and intimate participation on the part of the viewer, a fact that has certainly contributed to the limited popularity of his work."
"As in a novel, where the drama rests entirely on the author's writing to provide a template where the reader's imagination and/or past experience flourish, Angelopoulos' drama rests within his images: his uses of the long shots, the long takes, the leisurely pacing, the sparing dialogues that have become his trademark, inviting the viewer to experience the film from his or her personal perspective."
"Angelopoulos uses silence to capture moments of high intensity, reverting to the non-verbal language of gestures, gazes, sounds, and music, when he believes that words can only take us so far."
"Angelopoulos considers himself a historian of twentieth century Greece, and he likes to bring lessons from the Hellenic myths into his discussions."
"This political man, a brilliant orator, unexpectedly and inexplicably left the comfort of his bourgeois existence, his wife, and his brilliant career, to live anonymously in a refugee camp with the lowest of the low."
Angelopoulos draws on Odysseus's travels only as structuring and thematic elements for his film.
"And Alexander/Telemachus is suspended between returning to his home and his career, or embarking on a voyage to somewhere else."
"Angelopoulos does not give us any clues, and the wife's statement, It's not him, is far from convincing and left ambiguous enough."
"Spirit is a wild stallion who repeatedly gets captured, either by the cavalry or by Indians, both of which try to break him."
"Callan plays a fashion photographer who experiences dreams of murdering his models, at a time when he is reunited with his psychologically volatile brother (who happens to be missing an arm and a leg)."
"When the models Callan dreams about killing actually turn up dead, the photographer begins to doubt his own sanity... but there is more to the picture than he is seeing."
"For example, while we hope the heroic Rob Roy prevails, we realize his predicaments are products of his own pride and sense of honor."
"Tim Roth plays one of the most hateful bad guys in the history of cinema, yet there are moments when we can understand how the events of his life have shaped him into becoming what he is."
"The helpful ronin for example is a nobly inscrutable revolutionary character, upsetting the established order without being painted as a truly likable or heroic figure, Zatoichi himself makes one or two mistakes and causes harm by his actions, whilst the ruling system fuels the exploitation of the poor."
"The action or scenes of Zatoichi using his ingenious skills are well handled by director Satsuo Yamamoto, though some of the gambling is less interesting and the film builds up in a workmanlike rather than really inspired way, without the lively characters or strong verve of some other installments."
"Years later I still laugh out loud when I watch it, but after many viewings I've come to see the beauty in the strange, twisted relationship between the inseparable Big Edith Bouvier Beale and her daughter Little Edith Bouvier Beale."
"How far would you go to help the man that you love, and on the other hand - observing Stanwyck's behaviors towards the stranger - does she really love her husband?"
Like a good short story this movie leaves the viewer to himself with questions he can only answer himself
"The context/setting with the old mariner himself is fine, clear, and without pretense."
The story takes a twist as the three singletons meet Mia--wittily played by Amanda Peet-and all fall for her.
"Clapton, by his own admission, said he had to stretch himself for this concert because there were no keyboards, synthesizers etc so we get to see him at his best."
"Ginger Baker demonstrates why so many drummers today, speak of him as some sort of drumming guru."
"Leonora ends up homeless and travels to Paris, where she becomes a famous opera singer and develops the reputation for being a loose woman."
"Ricardo Cortez reminds one a lot of Valentino in looks in this part, and he was groomed to be a Valentino clone by MGM, though he never thought he could be in reality and he was right."
Henry Czerny plays a suspicious policeman with honed instincts and little squeamishness as if it's his everyday persona.
"A fine actor: I wish that he had played the title role in Braveheart, with Gibson directing."
It's annoying to have to watch the stereotypical wallflower librarian have to take off her glasses and become pretty and stupid to win a man.
OSSESSIONE as his debut once censored and once cherished as nearly a realistic masterpiece is still loved by some people and strongly criticized by others.
"Massimo Girotti once said in an interview that working in this movie had been one of the most difficult jobs he had ever done; yet, consequently, what comes out is a flawless acting."
"However, August's stunning portion was mostly overlooked; he didn't receive the Oscar nomination he rightly deserved."
And now I understand why my mother felt the way she did in those closing moments.
"Turns out, the Judge made the arrangements for the hit-man, because she was divorcing the judge, and threatening to take all his money."
But then a mysterious admirer sets her eyes on Jim.
"Based on a supposedly actual case, Jim's wife Kris suffered from multiple personality disorder and that was what ruined her marriage."
"The scene when his character Cosimo dies in the movie, is so hilarious that it made me choke and almost die with him!"
"Counting the minor flaws in the movie: Ellen Barkin's make-up gave her face has a washed out look; there were a couple of gimme cameos by Joey Bishop and Richard Pryor that served no purpose, and Michael J. Pollard's screen time was too short."
Who has ever seen a movie that has a dentist (Spoiler) pull out all his cheating wife's teeth and cut out her tongue with no anesthetic?
"The Williams character is not at all sympathetic, and he's not even a decent op."
Guy Kibbee is one of the best at what he does.
"As a candidate dragged out of his sleep at a political convention and nominated to be governor in order to prevent a rival candidate from being nominated, so this whole mess is borne of internecine political warfare in a party called the Progressive Party."
"This film makes a great companion piece to Eight Men Out since the story starts with Ruth's arrival in New York in 1920, one year after the Black Sox Scandal and when his home run exploits literally saved baseball from ruin."
Plus Starsky gave his kids the AIDS!!!!
"I am a little disappointed that Jeff Goldblum's part is so small, but I'm happy he is a part of this short run."
"Yankovic is not for all tastes, but his humor is harmless and imaginative enough that even non-fans will at least be lightly amused."
"Hank is insecure, cowardly, and very much under the influence of his big brother."
Albert Finney plays a father common to his generation.
"12 Angry Men was his first film made fifty years prior to Before the Devil Knows You're Dead, but he hasn't lost any bit of his magic touch in showing us characters that will be long remembered."
"Farrah Fawcett is superb in this powerful 1986 drama, where she plays Marjorie, a woman who manages to escape the clutches of a would-be rapist."
"Naturally, this tough loner decides to enter the phony shutterbug's life by posing as his prey, intending to bring him to justice."
"They meet, they make love, then the next thing she knows, she is over his lap, getting spanked."
"Morgan acknowledges a new reality, where he does not know who can be trusted."
"The Lovers on the Bridge was the first of his full length features I've seen, a virtuoso romantic film that uses image and music to communicate an exuberant young love that overflows into the poetic."
"Even the rich old, bell of the ball has a brother she misses."
It skips much of the scientific detail that Attenborough covers in his 'Planet Earth' series.
"Surprisingly, I was again able to watch her toes in wide screen (like in the beginning of Kill Bill)."
"Luke Wilson however played very well the idiot everyday guy who meets the big woman, I could really get into his situation."
The cast is excellent with Kenneth Branagh himself as the tormented prince giving a strong and memorable performance.
She is the best Ophelia I have seen and lent such depth to the character and was simply wonderful.
McNally makes the perfect villain and DAN DURYEA is equally treacherous in the kind of villainous role he played throughout the '40s as a low-life gunslinger.
"Also starring Sandra Oh and Rory Culkin, this Suspense Drama plays pretty much like a news report, until William's character gets close to achieving his goal."
"Although, some attack Brando's accent, he is at his near best in nuance and characterization."
"As a lifelong fan of Dickens, I have invariably been disappointed by adaptations of his novels."
Mark Lester mimes his wonderfully.
"The scenes with the fictional character are genuinely creepy, the mystery surrounding him is really effective and there's always a classic creep-out moment."
"This is a bizzare look at Al's life, back when he still a hyper 20-something."
"The director of research is seated at his desk in a tiny office cluttered with debris, a bandage on his head."
"Vested interests, comments another worker, as Thorstein Veblen nods in his grave."
"As Spitfire Stevens, Maureen O'Hara is at her athletic best, running her foes through in defiance of the social norms of the period."
"Vera Miles didn't just marry Stewart, she in fact married the FBI as the film demonstrates."
A truthful and honest district attorney (played by Yves Montand) does not believe that the murder was planned and executed by the single man Daslow (=Oswald) and though all other officials want to close the case he continuous to investigate with his team.
"Buzz-saw's grisly end will chill any viewer to the core (as a foot note, why does his death stand out as particularly disturbing in what is ostensibly an upbeat actioner with a bitter sense of humour?)"
The colonel has been expecting for his pension of fighter in a war against Catholic church for almost twenty-seven years.
"The debts of the colonel in the story were made to pay for a graveyard for his son, otherwise he would be buried as an indigent."
"Rohmer returns to his historical dramas in the real story of Grace Elliot, an Englishwoman who stayed in France during the apex of the French Revolution."
Sean has not endeared himself to his superior because he discovered the involvement with a criminal in his area who controlled the drug business.
"Even his superior McCree wants him out of his jurisdiction, but the case is complicated because Cooper comes from a long line of Irish men serving in the police force."
"Sean is killed because his homosexual condition, and for knowing too much on his peers' involvement in taking dirty money."
Tom Petit wrote this honest portrayal of the life of a police officer in the closet and his secret love with another fellow cop.
"Emily Blunt(The Devil Wears Prada) is the star of the film, bringing Victoria to life and with this movie she shows that she is a great actress and maybe picking a first Oscar nomination for her performance."
Rupert Friend is almost bland as Prince Albert but he has great chemistry with Emily Blunt.
Excellent Warner Bros effort starring Errol Flynn in one of his best screen performances.
"Walsh directs the ring scenes beautifully, as he does with the lighter moments and that poignant, great final scene between Ward Bord and Flynn."
Director Gert de Graaff approaches his subject with an impish sense of humor and dazzles the viewer with a series of astounding visual tricks that confront the nature and validity of our perception.
Bakshi is well known for his heavy use of rotoscope (the technique of tracing a live action sequence) and this film is no exception.
Tourneur is struggling to remember who hit him as he was ending a deer's sufferings on the road.
"A narrator recites various epigrams about art and painting, and then engages in a dialogue with The Collector, who describes the paintings to us, shows them to us, tells us a little bit about the painter and the scandal that brought him down, and then tells us he's going to show us something.... As he walks through a doorway, we enter another world, or worlds, or perhaps to stretch to the limits, other possible worlds."
"An indicator might be found in two of the most amusing and inexplicable scenes are those in which The Collector poses some sexless plastic figurines -- in the second of them, he also looks at photos taken of the figurines that mirror the poses in the paintings -- then he strides through his collection, which is now partially composed of life-size versions of the figures."
"Anupam Kher is wonderful as Jess' worried father, and Jonathan Rhys-Meyers, who was so amazingly evil in 'Ride with the Devil,' comes across so well as the nice guy for once, making full use of his gorgeous Irish accent!"
Such discovery strikes an innocent soul and it caused numerous events that changed his life forever.
"Page has been an inspiration to every burlesque artist since, not just because she had a figure to die for, but because she invested every picture with an innocent sense of fun that was uniquely sexy and simple at the same time."
"One famous story, told by director Harold J. Kennedy, has Ginger Rogers insisting that her then husband, William Marshall, who was not an actor, costar with her."
"Kim Novak is a good fit for Gillian, giving the character a detachment befitting a witch, showing emotion when it becomes appropriate, and with that voice, fabulous face, and magnificent wardrobe, she certainly is magical."
A priest who has abandoned his ministry meets a young man who has just been ordained.
"The entire story is more amazing than the film, as the Director admitted in his comments."
AND he was the first amputee diver to ever be certified or recertified as a U.S. Navy diver.
"The early, pivotal scene where the helicopter hits the radio mast and sinks into the sea: They'd never have had the time to suit up a full Mark V diver, even if he were the legendary Master Chief Billy Sunday, in time to be only ... a couple of minutes late saving the pilot."
Jamie Kennedy was able to hold his own well.
"When we first meet Early in the beginning of the film, we see that he is obviously one disturbed individual."
Ruby Keeler is so endearing as she earnestly stomps out her taps with her arms flying that you want to help her along.
"As a bloke about his vintage, I should look so good!"
"(I'd been a borderline Elvis fan most of my life, but it wasn't until I saw this mind-blowingly moving movie that I looked BEYOND the image at the man himself."
"American playwright Howard W. Campbell, Jr. (played with a musty obsolescence by Nick Nolte) lives happily in Germany with his actress wife, Helga Noth (Sheryl Lee) before the beginning of World War II."
"Gordon applies a certain icy sheen to the images of the film's first half, which complement his portrait of the Nazi bourgeoisie and captures Vonnegut's dramatic side."
Paulie goes through so much to find his way back to Marie.
"Great reason to feel sympathy for her lying in bed and dying, but hey, remember, there are no mistakes, except, maybe, seeing this film."
"One of them, maybe the only one worth redemption enlists the aid of the company pilot to help her keep the rest of the family at bay."
No...the kid is too good to have his life totally trashed.
It proves that his famous friend & writer/director John Casavettes was right in casting Falk in many of his ground breaking films of the 60s & 70s
Elliott's performance in this piece is truly exceptional and his character is given a surprising air of believability.
Pertwee's character is disgusted with the amateurish production and props of the film and so he purchases his own vampire cloak from a strange shop of mysteries.
"Harry Dean Stanton gets third billing, but that's a joke: he's only in the final few minutes of the movie!"
Eddie's life takes a turn for the worse when his rock star idol Sammi Curr (an impressively whacked-out portrayal by Tony Fields) perishes in a hotel fire.
Rohmer strays from his usual portraits of french middle class to tell this costume drama about the difficulties of an aristocrat lady during the french revolution.
Segment 2 shows a montage of Michael Jackson's start from the Jackson five to his solo career.
but i didn't feel this Video should be in this Movie because it's a kids Movie and i don't think kid's will understand what he's singing about.
"There were a lot of great quips in this episode, also, and I think Vito 'Pole-Smoker' Spadafore may meet his demise if he keeps being a greedy S.O.B."
"Despite being made in 1928, with the makeup he doesn't look much younger than he did in many of his later films"
God takes up the challenge and asks Carrey if he can do better.
"On the more thoughtful level, the film tempts us to speculate about Carrey's own career - stuck in his 'comedy' typecasting he has largely failed to make an impression as a serious actor even after winning two Golden Globes."
"Michael Winner is probably best known for his revenge-themed films, such as Death Wish and Chato's Land, but he is equally gifted as a director of occult Horror cinema, as The Sentinel of 1977 proves."
"Traumatized by events in her her past and not yet willing to marry her lawyer boyfriend (Chris Sarandon), Allison is in search for an apartment, and finds a big, incredibly nice one, which is also affordable, in an old mansion in Brooklyn."
"Beautiful Christina Raines is great in her role of Allison Parker, lovable and yet on the cusp to losing her mind."
Even Dylan McDermott was surprisingly capable in his role of drug dealing biker.
"Tamilyn Tomita acted with such skill and conviction, she made the ending heartfelt and memorable."
"Kenji Kawai - who also composed the superlative soundtrack - appears as a ravenous burger fanatic, while renowned Studio Ghibli producer Toshio Suzuki spends his screen time being murdered in bizarre fashion."
"The director uses the advancements in technology by combining the film shot on the set and scripted dialog, some music, and jokes to make a funny movie, designed as a comedy, where he takes us on a journey from the opening credits to the end with an entirely full movie in between."
"She was also in Paulie, that movie about the parrot who tries to find his way home."
Christina Raines plays a lovely model in New York who seeks out a new apartment and begins to meet strange neighbors and reveal a secret about the building and herself slowly building up to quite a climax by film's end.
"An excellent series, masterfully acted and directed, but unloved (I am told) by Mr Deighton and withdrawn by him after a single presentation."
In 1824 the President of the newly formed Republic of Mexico Benito Juarez (Carleton Young) is trying to put his new country on a solid financial footing.
Canutt performs his signature stunt jumping on a team of runaway horses and then falling beneath the coach which he repeated in other films including John Ford's Stagecoach the same year.
"Big Jim Pierce by the way, may be best remembered for playing Tarzan in 1927's Tarzan and the Golden Liom (1927) and for his marriage to Joan Burroughs the daughter of Tarzan creator Edgar Rice Burroughs."
I have a six month old baby at home and time to time she fights sleep really bad.
"DeNiro provides a perfect performance of the character of Megs, who we are not really sure if we should like or if he really is as nuts as Martha thinks he is."
"This is not a man who is living his life the way he wants, whether people actually leave him alone or not, he is a man trying to forget that he's alive, to detach himself from the world of the living as much as possible."
"I remember as soon as I left the theater, I called my best friend and sobbed to her how much I loved her."
"Jackie plays Chan Ka-Kui, a police who gets to protect an important witness (Brigitte Lin) who would soon testify against a powerful gangster boss and his ring of criminal activity."
Toni Collette probably gives her best dramatic performance too as the ultimately sociopathic caretaker.
Yet funny it is--listen to Margaret Sullivan's harsh dismissal of Jimmy Stewart and watch his pained expression as he replies that her comments were a remarkable blend of poetry and meanness.
"The cues Nicholson provides the audience as an actor merely hint at the potential for madness, which is only reinforced when we learn that the head of the family has struggled with alcoholism and is emotionally distant from his wife and son."
"Antonietta is an housewife: married with a fanatic Fascist, she has six children but her husband wants to have another child to get a prize for the huge families."
"There are some comments about how Bugs in these cartoons is basic, meaning, I guess, that he is as yet not fully developed."
Then the admiral kicks his a$$ but good.
"But his acting overcomes this and Zelah Clark, pretty as she is, is also a complete and believable Jane Eyre."
"Each person has been able to choose the time and place in the past where he or she would like to live at a 'library,' run by an elderly man named Mr. Atoz."
"From here, the main focus is on Spock and his relationship with a woman exiled to this time by a tyrant as punishment."
Von Trier brilliantly paints his vision on screen.
Ronald Colman plays a famous Broadway actor who has begun to lose his mind and sense of identity.
"Ultimately, it leads him to the depths of insanity and murder."
"Instead, it's a wonderful portrait of an actor losing his mind and mixing his stage role with reality."
"Jim Carry plays Bruce Nolan, a TV reporter usually stuck on the lighter side of the news, desperate to prove himself (more or less TO himself) that he can be taken seriously and do a good job in an anchor job."
"As you probably know from hearing about this movie in the first place, Carrey's pitch-perfect acting stays in character (which, luckily enough, is him), and controls and gives atmosphere to the movie scene by scene."
"Russ drives me nuts, although his attitude has improved a thousand times from the argumentative cynic he was in LWR."
"Yet Bakshi goes for broke in combining forms; animated characters stand behind and move along with live-action backgrounds; when violence and gunshots and fights occurs it's as bloody as it can get for 1975; when a dirty cop is at a bar and is drugged and put in black-face and a dress, he trips in a manner of which not even Disney could reach with Dumbo; a boxing match with Brother Bear and an opponent as the climax is filmed in wild slow-motion; archive footage comes on from time to time of old movies, some and some from the 20s that are just tasteless."
"Gus might not be that smart, but he's humorous."
"The King is hilarious, but I think that what makes him so funny is his short temper."
Lucifer has the right name for him because he's such a devilish and mean cat.
"A mature look on the father-son relationship, a father's unconditional love towards his son and a son's responsibility towards his family."
Ishwar's pampering has only spoil him all the more.
Priyanka is gorgeous and performs her part well.
Akshay is especially expressive in the scene where his doting father intentionally berates him to make him aware of his responsibilities.
"Margaret Avery is wonderful as Shug Avery, even when she's at her most arrogant, and shows us that sinners, indeed, have souls too."
Bette Davis as his girlfriend also shines in an under-written role.
The director plays with your attention and confusion but you are satisfied eventually by finding the thread that he wants you to find.
(Certainly this is more alive than Destino which was directly based on his work).
"Selma Blair is a truly talented comedian, and the worst thing about this film is that she goes underused."
"Fear to keep him pumped up to a hyper alert state where the smallest detail will not pass him by, keeping him ready to react on a knife edge."
"Russell quickly picks up the mantle of Mace's responsibility to his wife and child - desperately in need of a mission, even one with such a high likelihood of his death."
Fay lives a quiet life until she comes home one day to find a CIA agent in her kitchen.
Fay battles multiple spy rings to gather Henry's notebooks and to seek him out.
The second half is on his turf as an ex-con and her wrenching adaptation to that milieu.
"Bruno Coulais provides a fantastic score, almost as good as the one he did for Coraline, which I consider the very best of the year"
"Not this film--it was absolutely spot on in portraying typical Irish parental roles & behaviors (see, e.g., see typical Irish families in McGoldrick's Ethnicity & Family Therapy) as well Christy Brown's uneven emotional maturation--some immature personality reactions that were even further amplified by his picking up traits of his father."
"Their son, Timmy, befriends the zombie, naming him Fido."
"One day Fido's collar malfunctions and he kills their next door neighbor, who turns into a zombie."
Old Virginny didn't want to waste the occasion so as the precious liquid was seeping into the dirt he decided to christen the town Virginia Town.
"In truth, to ride from the Ponderosa (all of Northern Lake Tahoe), one would have to ride his horse about 3,000 feet (1,000 meters) down the Spooner Summit to the high desert (3,000-4,000 feet) of the Carson Valley then another 30-40 miles to Virginia city."
"This is truly a well-made documentary and brings this rather shadowed director into the light, and celebrated his contributions to horror cinema."
"Here the moment when that happened was when one of the cast admitted his affection for Barrie, which she was long aware of."
"But as the film dealt with the identity of a criminal mastermind, it became obvious that this person was made so slightly noble as to merit being the mysterious mastermind (i.e., the script disguised him as the least likely suspect)."
Barrie is after the proof that her father (who died in prison) was framed by the real criminals in a robbery gang.
"His mother, played by Christine Haber, is the constant support beam, that without, he would crumble upon himself."
"Though it moves as slow as Straight's John Deere, when he meets the kind strangers along his pilgrimage we learn much about the isolation of aging, the painful regrets and secrets, and ultimately the power of family and reconciliation."
"Richard Farnsworth caps his career with the year's most genuine performance, sad and poetic, flinty and caring."
Christina Ricci has once again expanded her abilities in this film.
The point is the banter between the couple and the interference of the ex-Mrs. B. Jean Arthur is quite glamorous in her role and very funny.
"Jabba does not accept the negotiation,since he is using Han Solo as a piece of his palace's decoration."
"When the same Hunter tries to save Han solo and makes him stay in human form again, we see that is actually princess Leia in a disguise."
Luke comes as a Jedi knight to rescue his friends.
"Luke stays worried about killing his own dad, and says that he feels that his father still has kindness."
Bette Davis shines brilliantly as the great actress and beauty she was.
"The director must have had some idea what it is all about, but he certainly leaves room for your own impressions and interpretations, while leaving little left to the imagination."
"Why he has not made more films like this, I have no idea."
"Walken is at his finest in this picture delivering memorable lines such as, let's go sit..........out on the deck."
"Frank and Marlon are absolutely believable as the proprietor of the oldest established permanent floating crap game in New York, and the most notorious gambler who bets on even the most minute things-- such as his fever going up to 104 if he doesn't take penicillin."
"And last but certainly not least (on my list anyway) is Miss Vivian Blaine, reprising her Broadway role as Miss Adelaide-- the Hot Box lead singer and dancer who would like to finally end her 14 year engagement to Nathan with marriage, and rid herself of the psychosomatic cold he's given her."
Especially enjoyable is hearing him say Daddy...
"Simmons is charming and pleasant in a role well suited to her looks, voice and the way she carries herself."
"Either way, she does fantastic with those as well as Take Back Your Mink."
The film Cross Eyed by Adam Jones propels the viewer on a ride of redemption as the main character takes back control of the wheel and sets his life in order.
"Yes, little Ruby Keeler is a terrible singer and actress, and her tapping is so-so, but Busby's magical By A Waterfall whisks her, and what seems to be a hundred other chorus girls, into a dizzying water wonderland."
The interest of Saura on the bridge between classical and contemporary music and dance is one more ingredient in turning this movie maybe the most aesthetically exciting among his other works.
"In the mean time, May is being drawn into a putative relationship with a decent but older (of her own generation) member of Paula's writing group."
"So May finds herself superfluous to both of her children's needs, and finally does return home (but later leaves on a jet plane for pastures new)."
"The ending is perhaps under-written, as we don't know where May is going or for how long - perhaps she's Shirley Valentine with a pension, she's certainly no Picasso."
Even Disney's very early Mickey Mouse had loads of barnyard humor before Uncle Walt cleaned him up just before he went Technicolor.
Its up to his old friend Dr Ted Nelson (Burr DeBenning) to find him and try and help him.
"Personally I think the worst bit of the film is near the start when the fat nurse runs down a hospital corridor in slow motion, her screams are also portrayed in slow motion too, it looks and sounds totally ridiculous!"
Hawn is excellent as usual even though Protocol isn't as funny as her best film Private Benjamin.
"Wayne eventually wins his meeting with the Shogun after bring a cholera epidemic, introduced by an American ship, under control."
Altogether a rather enjoyable movie and besides how often do you get to see the Duke lose a fight to a guy half his size
"And incidentally, the similarities between this crippling level of food extraction is strikingly similar to Mao Tse-tung's vicious forcing of food from his own people during the Great Leap Forward The fun and excitement begins when Flik, the main character, sets off on a quest to find a gang of appropriate warrior bugs to come back and help defend the colony against the grasshoppers."
"Michael Jackson plays a magical 'gangster' that, when he sees a shooting star, he transforms into a piece of machinery."
"A child is kidnapped, Michael tries to save her, is tortured and beaten, and suddenly turns into a giant robot that blows up all the bad guys."
"Human has instincts that can be and are stronger than his will and that is why those instincts can be as dangerous and powerful as the instincts of some other animal, a beast, be it a lust for blood, revenge or sex and carnal pleasure."
The mansion makes the protagonist girl's sexuality wake as she saws the horses coupling and acting like she obviously has never thought of.
"Borowczyk has managed to paint his images so beautiful and sensitive that his message is almost impossible to be misunderstood, but nothing seems to be impossible for our cultures and minds that criticize art."
Took account of her emotions and actually has made a commitment to re-up for another 6 years.
"Dixon is close to achieving his goal when he becomes involved with the dead man's wife, the beautiful Morgan Taylor."
It's about a cop who finds himself slowly becoming a criminal.
"This is a film that on the surface would seem to be all about J.Edgar Hoover giving himself a a big pat on the back for fighting Klansmen,going after Indian killers, hunting the famous gangsters of the 1930's, fighting Nazi's in the US and South America during world war 2 and Commies in New York during the early 1950's."
Vera Miles as his devoted wife is also good.
Jimmy Stewart was one of the greatest film stars of all time and none of his films should be forgotten.
"These critics want to take a look at some of the stuff he's doing these days, and maybe soften their stance in retrospect... The Golden Child is not highbrow entertainment, but thanks to some of the cast it breaths new life into old cliches, and gives Murphy one of his best roles."
"It's not quick-paced, it doesn't have rapid cuts, the plots aren't in the least bit convoluted, it has no explosions, such dramatic tension as exists is mild, there aren't any A-list actors, there are no rapid-fire quips just to show off how clever the scriptwriters are (other than, perhaps, Kimberley Williams' killer line about how her fiance shouldn't overwind his toys."
For me the memorable scenes were all at the end of the film: the confrontation with the jailer and the milder talk with the Bolivian official where that official questions Che about the failure of the peasants to support his revolution.
It's not without some irony that Streisand's most commercially successful film would also remain her most controversial.
"Kris Kristofferson may not get much respect now for his laid-back characterization, however, he's always interesting watch and displays a magnetic charisma here that he seldom displayed elsewhere in his career."
"Halloween has a very dark atmosphere, creepy music and talented young actors, such as Jamie Lee Curtis in her first role."
"Anyone who's never seen it, horror fan or not, should do his cinematic homework right now."
Gustad Noble is anything but that; he is a middle-aged Parsi bank employee in Bombay in the 1970s.
"One of the unsung gems of the 1980's, Scenes... features razor-sharp satire and outstanding performances from Arnetia Walker (how did she not get a ton of roles after this?"
"'Earth' is basically comprised of a selection of dramatic episodes, whether it be the struggles of a female polar bear to lead her young cubs to the Arctic ice, or the tramp of an elephant herd towards the life-saving seasonal floodwaters of the Okavango Delta."
"The inspectors at Scotland Yard, Higgins(IJoachim Fuchsberger)and his superior Sir John(Siegfried Schurenberg)certainly have their hands full with this case."
Two prisoners are commissioned by a mystery man to use the newly created toxic gas created by a scientist murdered at the beginning of the film during what was supposed to be a monetary exchange for his creation.
"Taken blindfolded to the secret room of the mastermind, he gives them orders on who to kill and how."
"Determined to die, but his plan is thwarted by falling in love - what a 2nd act complication."
"Sam Lee's character, for instance, is on the edge from the very start and slowly and surely, amidst various encounters with Chang's character, it is revealed why he is."
"Without spoiling this part of the story too much, it involves the morally ambiguous nature of his father."
"Chang's character, on the other hand, has his most primal instincts honed to, if not perfection, brutal efficiency."
"The group's leader believes that buffaloes are too numerous for the hunting to have any impact, but the more experienced hunter has seen how quickly the population can collapse, and he isn't so sure."
The grandfather (and moral compass) is an alcoholic buffalo skinner; Charlie's wife is an Indian woman whose companions he killed after they stole his horses.
"Romy's debut, WENN DER WEISSE FLIEDER WIEDER BLUHN (1953) was her performance with her mother, too."
It was interesting to see the same actor play both the writer and his brother in London
William Haines is absolutely delightful - he is certainly a star that deserves to be re-discovered.
"Granted, Woody the performer is slowing down a touch or two, but Woody the writer/director is in fine form - and found a credible way to integrate his 70-year old self into the story."
How was 'Craig' created and what happened to him?
"Experience has left her emotionally fragile, wondering what her life has been for and, indeed, if she can even continue living."
It seems almost sadistic when Myrtle's director prevents people from helping her when she arrives hopelessly drunk for her first performance.
"But Sanjay himself overacts terribly, especially during obvious ad-libs."
"The directorial style of writer/director Krishna Wamsi is sloppy, rampant with rough transitions and abrupt cuts, although his camera movement is good."
"Amy Heckerling has a flair for directing comedy (Fast Times at Ridgemont High, Look Who's Talking) but here it looks like she told the actors to go out and have fun."
"I have since re-read the book numerous times, each time finding some new element to Desmond and his desire to complete the Whale Music."
"We need to understand Mahatma's spiritual standing, he is a true spiritual leader."
A man with such caliber leads his family and followers by example.
"When things went wrong with Harilall, Mahatma could remain calm and accepted that his son is a big tragedy."
"One of the three credited directors is Michael Powell, a filmmaker who has been rightfully heralded by the critics but is often overlooked by audiences for his remarkable films, including A Matter of Life and Death (aka Stairway to Heaven) and The Red Shoes."
"), and then there's 'Kung Fu Panda' where not only is he in a purely vocal role but his character barely has any dialogue... to say that Jackie Chan has seen better days is a colossal understatement."
"There is also comedy, much of which involves Kar-kui inadvertently upsetting May (Maggie Cheung), his eternally suffering and apparently ever forgiving girlfriend."
Lucy Walker has given Erik Weihenmayer a voice when he would have not normally been heard.
"Von Trier's follow-ups like Breaking the Waves have gotten more acclaim, but this is really his best work."
"The Grinch liking Martha May, Cindy Lou(who's very annoying; her sweet innocence) who tries to get the Grinch in the Christmas spirit, the childhood of the Grinch (very funny!"
"The fact the one man kills the other might be of monumental significance, overall-- the regular guy struggling through his inner problems to success while the medal-wearing soldier slips into an accidental death with a silver plate in his head."
"Bogart is beginning his active duty, Dixon, and the man Dixon has killed, are all through."
"The man overcomes his adversaries and transforms his inner self, and the moviegoer, then and now, understands just how beautiful that must feel"
"It wasn't one of Jim Carrey's best performances, but he was still OK. Morgan Freeman was just right as God."
"A director who knows comedy, can get the talent he gets, and can tell a meaningful and intelligent story with it is hard to find."
His character Tony Montana was not such a great guy to begin with but his thirst for power just bring his sickness of greed to another level; an inhumane level.
Michelle Pfeiffer was not really at her best but she certainly fit the role she played.
Robert Loggia I have always enjoyed watching in just seeing him yell.
Whenever an actor is able to become larger than life with his performance some credit should be given to the director and I will certainly give De Palma that.
"People should realize that the character of Tony Montana is no hero, he is a monster."
It might have been influenced by cabinet of doctor Caligary (director Kinugasa claimed he never saw the German film).
"In another sequence involving the same patient engaged in another frenzied dance, she is being watched by other inmates."
"The killing is accidental, the victim worthless, yet it is a crime that he knows can break him or send him to jail..."
Cheadle is struggling with difficulties in both his marriage and in his professional life as a dentist.
Inspector Dirty Harry Callahan once again angers his superiors with his maverick approach to police work.
The problem is that this killer isn't all that mysterious as she is characterized as much as Harry is.
"Director Hank Rogerson and his crew follow the troupe as roles are self-selected, interpreted, rehearsed and ultimately performed."
"Samuel Fuller brings his customary playful and stylish direction to this seedy, pulpy story and manages to create one of the undiscovered gems of 1950s cinema."
"In fact, this movie is prettier than those directed by Akira Kurasawa himself."
Richard Gere as you may have guessed from my previous comments is brilliant as a social worker of sorts Erroll Babbage who has kind of created his own style and laws when it comes to keeping track of his Flock who are registered violent sex offenders.
Gere is so intense and looks drained from this job and he's become violent and angry at watching these monsters loose on the street.
Claire Danes is also terrific as Babbage's new partner and his replacement who he has to train to do his job.
Danes' character is far more typical social worker and is a little taken aback by Babbage's style and methods but slowly realizes what he is trying to accomplish and go up against.
Russell Sams has a small role as Strickland's new boyfriend and he would have been better probably given a bigger role.
"There's no attempt made to question Reed's motivations, as one with do with Marlowe or Spade, nor is there any attempt to bring a humans side to Blackie, which would make him even more contemptuous if the human trafficking was actually played out."
"Kelly Lynch, you gotta love her."
I was pleasantly surprised that newcomer kwan sang woo did his job with excellency.
There is something so British about him that I'm actually surprised he found such an appeal to American tastes.
"He may sound a little too old for his age, but Duo's English voice easily out ranks his irritatingly nasal Japanese one."
Quatre Rebarba Winner is voiced by Brad Swaile who has no trouble brining out the caring nature of the character and the shattering of his innocence as he experiences horrors of war and death first hand.
The scenes where he reveals his super powers to his friends or absent mindedly forgets to be meek are my favortites.
The five minutes containing the story of Gabriella's song including her performance is one of my movie-highlights ever!
"I think this is one of Keira Knightley's better films, and I think she's a brilliant actress, and was excellent for the role."
"The costumes of the magician and his men rising and falling like the wings of black birds, attacking suddenly in the night to inflict destruction and create terror..."
Ben returns to Wall without incident and continues his life.
Tristain is the first to find Yvaine but is so blinded by his devotion to Victoria he doesn't recognize the growing bond between he and Yvaine.
"Though his role is small in length, DeNiro is extraordinary!"
"Did Sandra (yes, she must have) know we would still be here for her some nine years later?"
"Goldsworthy himself provides the narration, speaking slowly but thoughtfully about the themes in his work."
A brief interval in which we are introduced to Andy's family and hometown is all that breaks the long succession of his artworks.
"When you consider how many ideas the movie-maker developed within the brief span of 69 minutes, you begin to appreciate his artistry."
Madhavi (Konkan Sharma) is a journalist and enjoys her work.
"Charu Mohanty's 2 words speaks volumes and he is very successful in uttering those two words with such ingenuity, it leaves an impact."
The meeting between Thapar and his daughter doesn't call for acting.
It is a mediocre romantic comedy based on Toby Young's book on his experiences working as a journalist covering celebrities.
"Jeff Bridges was again building The Dude bridges with his enigmatic supporting work as Clayton Harding, the magazine's suave prez."
One soldier complains that he was supposed to be on leave so he could take care of his family's cattle in the countryside.
"However, the soldiers' constant reminder that the chief is on his way lends a sense of menace, since we don't know what sort of punishment the women will face."
"Anna Friel is a refreshing delight as the resourceful Flora and Miranda Richardson nearly walks away with the movie as her wise and worldly, been there and seen-it-all Aunt Susan."
Rob Stewart is a wonderful actor I don't know why people keep giving him a bad rap.
"Irons made this so believable, I sympathized with the character despite his brutality."
"A successful dentist, Alan Johnson(Don Cheadle), is torn in a life crisis of balancing his career with his family."
NOTE: I have never been a Sandler fan; but I found him outstanding in this role.
"Hirarala arrives in South Africa to help his dad who is a barrister, since gandhi was involved in the freedom struggle, he wanted his wife and children to join in too as a service to the society and as a result hirarlal does not get a chance to complete his education and fails his exams, he gets married to his love gulab (bhoomika Chawla) against his father's wishes."
"Hiralal struggles to make ends meet and lands up on the streets through failed business attempts and in huge debt, he loses his wife and children."
"I lived in Saratoga, California, where her sister, Olivia DeHavilland, grew up and went to a convent school."
"Ruby in Paradise is a beautiful, coming-of-age story about a young woman, Ruby Lee Gissing, escaping her stifling roots to become herself."
This movie is highly recommended for any young person trying to find his/her way.
"Leslie Nielsen was vocally a bit weak for his role, at that time, but Walter Pigeon, Marvin Miller, Anne Francis, Richard Anderson, Earl Holliman and especially Warren Stevens all acquitted themselves very well."
"An embittered policeman, Andrews as Mark, can't get over the fact that his father was a hoodlum who died in a police shootout while trying to break out of jail."
"Sinatra gets to show his versatility and why the girls swooned over him, with those big blue eyes and boyish face."
"Simon Pegg was superb as Ray, but he is superb in everything he is in."
"Suddenly the dark clad masked swordsman appears to sword fight and after carving the trademark 'Z' on the face of the bad guy, he dispatches him to the hereafter."
"The chief Doctor is a bitter man, as Paulie, who can speak and fully comprehend language and learn, embarasses the Doctor, who later banishses him to the lower levels of the building, where Mikail (Tony S.) finds him."
"Halloween night 1963, little Michael Meyers murders his older sister."
It is a very dark tale about the way a record company manipulates a singer to do things their way and to make as much money out of her as possible.
"In Citizen Kane Charles Foster Kane is feared and admired by his colleagues and his underlings, much like Whoopi Goldberg in this movie."
"Even if he was not yet using the ideas and motifs of suspenseful thrillers, he was at least developing the tools with which to create suspense."
"In spite of his talent I was at first a bit confused as to why he got the role, as to be honest he looks more like a ballet dancer than a pugilist!"
"Ron Liebman might hate it, but he is nearly perfect, and unforgettable."
This is a psychological drama about the rookie and his mentor that just happens to be about killing people.
Then he encounters actor George O'Hanlon (who's also McDoakes) who speaks in his more normal voice that's not too far from his later Geroge Jetson and gets to the set where he automatically upsets the director.
Gilliam delights in wrong-footing his audience.
Hunt jumps on the desk with him.
"Spirit is a wild mustang in the Old West, whose entire world is brought crumbling down around him when he discovers the humans slowly taking over his homeland."
"The distressed daughter, Hannah (Maria Schrader) then learns for the first time from an older cousin that during WWII, in Berlin, her mother, then 8 years old, had been taken in and protected by an Aryan woman."
"Vincent Price's follow-up to HOUSE OF WAX (1953), the film which cemented his reputation as a horror icon, similarly revolves around a bitter albeit resourceful showman."
"An interesting sideline here is the latter's adoption of a novel detection technique, fingerprinting, which is crucial in bringing about Price's downfall (in a predictable but rather awkward fiery climax)though the persistent snooping of his amateur crime novelist landlady has at least as much to do with it in the long run!"
And what a tribute it is to such a gifted actor; to be able to take such a well known figure and make it so uniquely his own is quite miraculous.
"It is truly a joy to see an actor ply his trade so well, to be able to make a character so real, from every word he utters down to the finest expression of his face, and to make it all ring so true."
"The new guy did okay, but just as I was starting to get used to Matt Valencia, they replaced him."
"Interestingly, Ann Walton's (Mala Powers) main problem following the assault is not how others might see her, but how she sees herself."
"Small wonder she runs away rather than face these anxieties at home and at work, even though family and friends are generally supportive."
"In this one Cash and his police Lt. buddy unravel a sticky plot involving a Nazi criminal, a philanthropic witch, and a family of screw-ups and their wierdo helpers."
Jim McKay is the writer/director of this film project but he acknowledges all who have shouted suggestions at him.
Lanisha hangs with her dad at his security job - it's the only way she gets to spend time with him.
A man hears his wife sing for the first time.
"Albert Finney eats ice cream out of bucket and, in another scene, has a lovely waking moment regarding his absent wife."
Alfre Woodard adds another colorful character to her acting wardrobe.
I stopped short of giving Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House 10/10 due to an aspect that makes us in the 21st century cringe a little bit: the fact that a black person is the faithful servant (somewhat reminiscent of Stepin Fetchit).
"Grant is his usual flippant self, while Loy does quite well as merely a wife."
"The biggest danger with Miike's access to bigger special effects and computer wizardry, which he flirts with, is overkill on this end."
"As a result, the character is still in a transition period--he is not drawn as elongated as he later was and his voice isn't quite right."
Elmer is some poor sap who buys Bugs from a pet shop--there is no gun or desire on his part to blast the bunny to smithereens!
The early Bugs was definitely more sassy and cruel than his later incarnations.
"The acting is O.K., but it can definitely be better, the characters are funny, especially Danny Spooner, Taj's friend , his stupidity is what makes him funny."
"Taj's younger brother Omar, and his older sister Missy is funny too."
"also, kudos to his brilliant use of makeup, such as the supremely convincing burn marks a gang member suffers in his showdown with an indoor barbecue!"
"Rowlands is obviously well directed with love by her gifted husband, actor/director John Cassavettes, who has a role in the film as well."
"Joan Blondell's character is never fully developed, and I never could figure out why she was in the film, except to placate Myrtle."
"I just loved every word she has ever done- freaks and geeks, Dawson's creek, white chicks, the smokers."
"Kurt Russell is at his best as the man who lives off his past glories, Reno Hightower."
"Shades of the old wit occur rarely, such as when he, as Sid, the Great Splendini magician, responds about his background: I was born into the Hebrew persuasion, but when I got older I converted to narcissism."
"Even the director of the Berlinale, obviously a hardened viewer of cinema, confessed to having been caught unawares and found himself crying three quarter's way into this unashamedly sentimental experience."
"Set in pre-war Japan, the story of Kabei revolves around one writer's family, and their fate therein, after he is held in jail for what was described as thought crimes against the Imperial will."
"Spillane is often criticised for alleged misogyny etc, but his 'dames' are way above their male counterparts in terms of cunning and intelligence."
When the penny finally drops his face is a picture.
"When American author Edgar Allan Poe visits London, he is approached by British journalist Alan Foster, who becomes the target of a peculiar wager."
"While Danes and Pfeiffer are classic beauties, there's also stunning faces of Sienna Miller, Olivia Grant (as Girl Bernard), and Kate Magowan especially when we first meet her."
Newcomer Charlie Cox is fine as the lead Tristan and he looked so much like his father Dunstan as a young man that I thought that was him in early scenes with Magowan (actually Ben Barnes).
"In the year 2090, a machine, BI-66ER was put of trial for murder, after killing his owners who wanted to deactivate him."
Fisher can't seem to avoid launching his own assaults at minimal provocation from his fellow enlisted men.
"Fisher reluctantly engages with the doctor by asking long simmering questions but soon realizes he must seek the answers, however painful, in order to grow and move away from conflict-seeking destructive behavior."
Films about patient-therapist interaction follow a certain predictability (all that transference and counter-transference stuff) but the earnestness of Fisher and his doctor/mentor is realistically gripping.
Richard Grieco was hysterical (his hair alone is worth the trip).
In one scene where the lead female evil scientist goes to visit our heroine in her bedroom for one of the badly dubbed: That is fantastical.
"Explain to me again how this is... exposition scenes that litter this movie, there is a sudden hand held cutaway of the girl's thighs as she gets out of bed for no apparent reason at all other than to cover a cut in the bad scientist's Mwahaha!"
"Favourite shot: The lover, discovering his girlfriend slain, dropping the candle in a cartoon-like demonstration of surprise."
Billy decides to play along by saying that he eats worms all the time.
"Soon the situation reverts when Silberman himself finds out his wife is cheating on him, and ends up being comforted by the very person he was supposed to help, a person he did not trust at all in the beginning."
"This is a definite bonus for the film, however, as while it can get a little too confusing at times; there's always enough to hold the audience's interest and Miraglia's storytelling has improved since his earlier movie."
"Even though he only made two Giallo's, Miraglia does have his own set of tributes."
"He likes castles, Gothic atmospheres and stylish murders too - which is fine by me!"
"Miraglia may be no Argento when it comes to spilling blood, but he certainly knows how to drop an over the top murder into his film; and here we have delights involving a Volkswagen Beetle, and a death on an iron fence that is one of my all time favourite Giallo death scenes."
"There had never been a female singer quite like her ever before, and there never would be again (sorry, Celine - only in your dreams!"
"), but never again would Streisand sing with the vibrancy, energy, and, above all, the ENTHUSIASM and VULNERABILITY with which she performs here - by the time she gets to that Central Park concert only 2 or 3 years later, she'd been filming FUNNY GIRL in Hollywood and her performing style has become less spontaneous and more reserved, more rehearsed (and, let's face it: more angry) - there's a wall between her and the audience."
"(The Back to Broadway sequel wasn't nearly as good, as Streisand seems to feel it necessary to improve on other composers' work: if he were alive at the time, would Richard Rodgers have even recognized his own Some Enchanted Evening?"
"Just imagine - SHE told the CBS brass how her first TV special would be done - no guests, just HER."
Treat yourself to this brilliant musical phenomenon BEFORE she was a legend - you'll be absolutely amazed at the difference!
"When it was over I said to the friend I was watching it with, She has NEVER, EVER, done anything better!"
"Pacino is astounding, as always, and well, this movie marked the period where Madonna was her absolute sexiest."
"Tom Hulce was amazing, with out words could convey his feelings/thoughts."
"Lynch's focus on small town America and its inhabitants is still as prevalent as in his previous efforts such as Blue Velvet or Twin Peaks, but the most notable difference is that the weirdness is curbed down."
Lynch is struggling within the mold of a G-Rated story that isn't his own.
"Brundage claims, with his protagonist Alvin Straight quoting lines directly from Confucious."
"The narrative is slow and thoughtful, which gives you a real sense of the protagonist's thoughts as he travels to his destination."
"Consider the following scenes: Bud sees Sissy - they are split up - he amicably honks and waves, she flips him the bird - he returns half the peace sign honking his horn to add impact then tears off."
"This is the moving tale of Scotland's legendary hero, Rob Roy, and his battles with the feudal landowners."
"Rob Roy then wishes to improve the living conditions of his people so arranges to borrow one thousand Scottish pounds from a local noble, the Marquis of Montrose, in order to buy cattle to herd to market."
"Personally, I feel that this is Neeson's best performance, his brogue (albeit Irish) adding authenticity for the average viewer."
"Tim Roth masterfully portrays his major adversary and surely one of the most heinous and sadistic cinematic villains, Archibald Cunningham, an egotistical, ruthless strutting peacock."
"The pathetic Cunningham himself constantly refers to the fact that he is a bastard unaware of his own father's identity, though this hardly justifies his horrendous misdeeds of murder, rape, and thievery."
"Also, he mercilessly casts aside the young servant girl, Betty, after she becomes pregnant with his child, resulting in her suicide."
"Lacking make up, she has the pretty but natural look of a sturdy peasant wife and mother."
The ending worked perfectly because it still preserved Brock's undefeated streak while giving RVD his just desserts in his home state.
Hogan comes out like usual to a huge pop but his variety of moves lacks that intensity and energy.
"And now, if you'll allow me, I must temporarily take my leave because this German Count must flirt with an old Teutonic heiress who doesn't look her age."
"At least several scenes were totally new, such as Ogilvy the astronomer's confrontation with a farmer, and the unnamed writer/narrator awkwardly having tea with his cousin."
"The story serves only for De Mille to hang some marvelous action sequences on, like the big Indian attack.Scenes like that are extremely well done.If you don't mind the somewhat over-the-top performances of the cast this is an very entertaining western.Look out for a very young Anthony Quinn essaying the role of an Indian brave who participated at the battle of Little Big Horn.This part got him at least noticed in Hollywood"
During MacArthur's last years he and Hoover had penthouse suites at the Waldorf Astoria in New York City.
I've always felt that FDR would have dealt with the whole matter in a far better way had he still been president then.
"I hated Mr K in the novel, but found him wonderfully human and humane in the film."
"The morale of this movie is: look out for the friend, he may sell you out for a dime"
Arthur falls in love with Liza Minnelli's character who is perfect in this film besides her performance in her Oscar winning role in Cabaret.
"Lindsey is embarrassed, and her parents don't know what to think."
"Walsh is a true master of the cinematic form, his film have been sometimes in my opinion, overlooked."
Tony Danza does a very realistic job in his role - but this is NOT a Taxi reunion.
"Danny Glover is actually good and even seems to be very human in his emotions as well as showing some real acting talent for a change, a pleasant change."
"The cashier's life is mired in a harsh and frustrating real world, while the actor is so enmeshed in his fantasy existence that he can't do simple tasks like remember phone numbers."
And the mother's slow awakening to what's happening in the world and under her own roof is believable and startling.
"Having met the director at a film festival late last year, I was curious to check out his work."
"Unable to accept the patriarchal rule of the convent (explicitly stated in a scene where the Bishop arrives flanked by soldiers and monks) Flavia begins to explicitly question the society in which she finds herself and, through butting up against a whole system of subjugation, repression and violence, inevitably brings a tragic end not only to herself but all those around her."
"The movie has a distinct (albeit brutish and rough) humanity for all its borderline depravity - the zippy/lyrical score points up the comic side of their misadventures, and even when they're at their most thuggish (like terrorizing the woman on the train), a semi-pitiful vulnerability lurks never far away (Dewaere sucks on her breasts like a baby)."
"When Alan and Charlie meet for the first time in years, the latter doesn't even recognise an old friend, having completely abandoned any memories prior to his life-crippling experience."
"But, for me Ms. Davis' very poor attempt at an accent, and her stiff acting really makes an otherwise compelling movie very hard to watch."
"When his direction was combined with better screenplays several years later, the man could mostly do no wrong."
Richard Widmark was always a watchable leading man and does what he can with an underwritten character.
"Zero Mostel, known primarily for his comic roles, is effectively slimy as one of cinema's ultimate toady characters."
"In fact, Phil Daniels' lovable rogue reminds you of Danny the dealer in Withnail and I, with his scholarly approach and scientific commitment to drugs."
"Instead of archetypal ticks and quirks, Sondra's nerdishness comes directly from the family history which she shares early on."
"Sid is a declining, itinerant magician playing to small audiences, but the fact that he is from another era is placed front and center for our enjoyment."
"I still remember one of the opening lines....Tutazema was his name, and he was an Orphan."
At the end the other Indian boys in the village attach the feathers to Tutazema and he becomes an eagle himself.
"There is a conflict of old ways and new ways, and these are represented by the two viewpoints of Rea's superior (played by Donald Sutherland), and Rea himself ."
Basil Rathbone in one of the few times he played comedy does it very well.
This was the first film made by its young director Celine Sciamma (only 27 at the time); on this basis she must be regarded as a highly promising newcomer.
"Nekron, Lord of the realm of Ice and his mother Queen Juliana, has set their sights on conquest of the known world."
"And also the painter Thomas Kinkade, noted for his artwork for figurines, music-boxes for The Bradford Exchange Company besides paintings."
"Mel Brooks gives a great performance as the lead character, I think somewhat different from his usual persona in his movies."
I am so proud of fellow Minnesotan Prince Rogers Nelson and would love to tell him personally.
"He walked right in front of me during the above mentioned concert and said, Hi, to my nephew but not me."
Fallon surprisingly rises to his character's gradual emotional maturity.
"The most authentic sounding Boston sounds come from most of his summer family of other season ticket holders, who kindly kibitz the basics of Sox lore to neophyte Barrymore (and any such audience members)."
"A new way to enjoy Goldsworthy's work, Rivers and Tides allows fans to see his work in motion."
"Watching Goldsworthy build his pieces, one develops an appreciation for every stone, leaf, and thorn that he uses."
"Goldsworthy describes how the flow of life, the rivers, and the tides inspires and affects his work."
"If the details of Bettie's life were all the film was concerned about, then why end it before her most tragic period was about to begin."
A regular family gets six figures and a rich guy gets to experience Christmas like he imagined.
Drew Latham (Ben Affleck) was incredibly difficult to deal with and it was just a riot to see the family reluctantly comply with his absurd demands.
Man's Castle is set in one of those jerry built settlements on vacant land and parks that during these times were called 'Hoovervilles' named after our unfortunate 31st president who got stuck with The Great Depression occurring in his administration.
Spence takes Loretta Young in who's facing those kind of problems and makes no demands on her in his castle.
Hohl brings the plot of Man's Castle to its climax through his scheming.
This is a definitive Kubrick classic and this is the third of his films I have given 10/10.
Since I think this is his directorial debut it might prove even more interesting.
"Margaret Sullavan makes a marvellous saleswoman, and she and James Stewart always brought out the best in each other."
"This movie sports what I think is Frank Morgan's most winning performance, and with The Wizard of Oz and Tortilla Flat under his belt, that is saying a lot."
"Director Ernst Lubitsch might have thought Trouble In Paradise his favorite, but this one he must surely consider a triumph."
"But writer/director Mazurszky reveals his ignorance of local conditions when he paints Parador/Paraguay as a typical Latin American tyranny, with huge disparities in wealth and an active guerrilla insurgency."
"Kinnear holds his own opposite Brosnan's performance, and injects Danny White with his effortless everyman charm."
"As Silvio blossoms under his boss's tutelage, both brothers get involved with the owner's sexy and manipulative mistress, Gracia."
La Maman et la putain tells us the failure of a character to be what he truly is.
"They see reality in art and are not aware of the transformations that necessarily exist between the life of an artist and his work, between reality and art."
"It may jar some, only familiar with Richard Widmark's many movie villains, to see him playing a frail and somewhat silly Dauphin, but the performance - oddly top billed - is professional, even if arguably miscast."
Nana Patekar was excellent as her father-in-law.
Deepti Naval as the mother-in-law was excellent especially in her final scene.
"Sanjay Kapoor was all right, but he didn't have much to do."
Shahrukh Khan was wasted in his bad boyish type role.
"A Chinese fantasy picture may not be easy to present to an audience, the director attempted to bring back the classic fantasy tales of Zu Mountain and this is what he displayed."
"This was one of the amazing things that was portrayed to me in the film as the minister and his two sons, Norman and Pauly carried out the ritual."
Stanwyck is a tough lady once again as she runs into an escaped convict while seeking help for her trapped husband in the Mexican desert.
"The two guys couldn't be more different and this film is the story of how Chamberlain accidentally stumbles from his humdrum lawyerly existence into the inexplicable, almost unspeakable, mysteries of Charlie's world."
"Also, Longoria's role seemed unable to shake off her sexy-mama Gabrielle, and here, has her in fairly low cut blouses (Sutherland actually tells her to cover up) and tight pants (ogle-fest for fellow agents)."
Kurt russel is my favorite actor so I think that he is a good actor in any role he plays.
"(As a West Coast liberal, I find his politics fairly funny, too!)"
"Clark Gable is the jerk, and he is perfect in the role, rather a sad note to his fans."
"Jean Harlow comes across as a more slender Mae West, even sounding like La West in some of her cynical throwaway lines."
"A ruthless fellow indeed, he kills both the doctor and his wife, before hunting for the formula."
Mann's use of environment is what sets him apart from other filmmakers of westerns.
"(I would be remiss in not recognizing cinematographer William H. Daniels's contribution, particularly his superlative day-for-night, open-range photography.)"
"Nor does he care to spell out the plot in dialogue, relying on the actors' eyes or a well-chosen image to convey the stakes."
"But when half an hour was over (by the way, thank you, NBC, for running a commercial-free show), I was left with the feeling of instant love, love at first glance, the true love that one feels in his guts."
"Preston Waters, a 11 years old boy,has problems with his parents and brothers specially because of money issues."
"All that money gives Preston things that he always wished for, like a mansion with pool,lots of toys, and even a limousine!"
"One night, after being beaten, Connie contacts Tim and he gives her the keys and deed to his beach house."
Ezra remains calm and Tim decides he is worthy.
"Will Smith pulls in a good performance, but not his best, just most of the film required him crying in every scene, but the last one with him is a doozy."
"If you haven't seem EMMA, I'll only say that self-sufficient Emma does get her comeuppance."
"but is disappointed at the teaching methods - kinda like Mr Miyagi's style in Karate Kid, but instead of painting fences, he gets to erect scaffoldings all around the temple."
"Agamemnon's quarters resembles a barn, he dresses, as do the others, in utilitarian, hand-woven, simple garb."
"In consenting to the sacrifice, the King comes closer to his moral undoing, but in refusing, loses his power over the masses (his army), who are brainwashed by religion."
"The King must go along with the charade whether he honestly believes in the Gods or not, until he realizes, too late, that he has ensnared himself into committing a despicable filicide."
Sammo Hung proves here that he's probably the best fight choreographer in the business.
McGavin always packed a lot of energy and enthusiasm into his roles and this was one of his best.
"Their stories cross at certain points, and the multiplicity of story lines reminded me very much of the great Robert Altman and his exquisite films."
Suffolk Co. was all over them at one point for living in filth and old Jackie herself came by to set things right.
"For some reason, the Janitor is still there, but he tells them to go ahead and have fun because they give him a beer."
"Hrr friend has just been killed, and she decides to take a bath!?"
"Anyways, the bathtub doesn't seem to really work....and she dies a horrible death this is an 80s movie."
"The locations were ideal for the ganster plot, and the director shows his talent by taking on many roles for his project."
"Dennis Quaid does a masterful job with his role, and I was touched by his performance."
"When you think that the kid has a small banjo, which he could of probably made by hand, compared to Drew's nice expensive guitar, you really figure out just how out of their territory the four men are."
Jon Voight does probably the hardest thing of all in this film and that is making his transformation from family man to warrior very believable.
"After moving in, the writer suddenly feels haunted by a maniac of his own creation..."
"Christopher Lee is, as always, superb in his role."
"In the fourth segment, Horror-actor Paul Henderson (Jon Pertwee) moves into the house with his sexy mistress/co-star Carla (Ingrid Pitt)."
"This is a fine movie that tells about Tetsuro's quest to avenge his mother's death, but also grows up in the process."
Gandolfini gives his typical A performance.
Snafu incorrectly adds two and two to something he hears and comes up with five.
With Theodore Geisel (his real name) you know the rhymes will be clever.
"I was never much of a fan of Elisabeth Shue, but she's great here as the one *real* person surrounded by a bevy of cartoon characters on the set of The Sun Also Sets -- that rumbling you feel beneath you is Hemingway rolling over in his grave."
"Either that, or he's laughing really hard."
"Fever Pitch has many of the cliches we have come to identify with Hollywood romantic comedies: a relationship between two people with little in common, the secret he's been hiding that she discovers, the inevitable breakup, and the very public well, I won't go any further but you get the picture."
The opening scenes of the film take us to a checkpoint on a road to Nablus where we also find Noam doing his reserve duty.
Without a permit to live in Israel and despite the initial hesitation from Noam's flatmates he stays.
"Tim Roth plays one of the most evil, despicable, characters in film history (he was nominated for an Oscar)."
"Rob Roy is a self made man, who will not solve his problems with Montrose if it violates his sense of honor."
"Montrose, who, inherited his title, has no sense of honor."
Henry Winkler is funny and sometimes sad to watch as nobody else can understand what a genius he is creatively.
The movie even cops to this in a conversation between Jenny and Matt Saunders (Luke Wilson) following his rescue by G-Girl from the Statue of Liberty.
With all Uma Thurman's talent she is unable to accomplish this convincingly.
Despite a relatively slow start (the producer took his time on presenting the characters) things gain momentum quickly and soon after mid-series the action gets so intense that glues you to your seat.
"Shiro is the only survivor of the fire that started during the last battle and enveloped a large portion of the city.He unwillingly witnesses a fight between two Servants that triggers his Reiju (Holy mark) to summon one of the most powerful Servants of the battlefield, Saber."
He falls in love with a girl parrot and loses her.
Jay Mohr plays the voice of the Parrot AND one of the seedy characters he comes across.
"It is a witty, clever, epic animal-adventure story and ultimately a great love story about a Bird and his little girl."
"My 2 year old likes the Doodlebops show, it seems to keep his attention for awhile."
Zadora's over-acting combined with the cliched scenarios she finds herself in make for an hilarious parody of the Hollywood machine.
I also think it is a movie for these fans whether they agree or not what is mentioned.You may ask yourself was A.C. Doyle a strong person or did he put himself in question.
"Now cybersix is actually a women, she is just disguised as a man in the day."
"A guy by the name of Von reichter is the one who created cybersix, and once he finds put she is alive he uses everything he can to capture her."
"Miss Walters is only slightly better, but she too lacks the acting talent to make her role believable."
"Of course, each of the actors is the star of his or her own production, only dimly aware of their diminished roles in their fellow actor's personal films."
"Israel is Bouzaglo, the impotent fictional playwright cannibalizing his own life for his play."
"They are all Israel because they are all helpless, caught in inaction or aimless action, as the bomber scans the landscape for his best target."
Bhoomika too has acted really well in the movie and should do really well if she continue in the same fashion in the future
"If Mr. Hoover's type of vigilance had been observed, we might have been spared 9/11, the surge in crimes against children and many of the venal politicians we've had to put up with since his passing"
The way that Goldie's character holds herself from the beginning of the movie to the end is untraditional even today.
Bill Pullman is also great and demonstrates his histrionic qualities.
"Being a huge Jim Carrey fan, I easily saw how he could morph himself into Seuss' Grinch and make the character his own."
Carrey is a master at his trade and no one could have played this role to perfection as he did.
Since Michael is a respected man within the organization he tries to win some friends who can help him including mob boss Frank Nitti (Stanley Tucci).
Eva leaves her husband's house and lives with her father and tries to explain her situation.
"Nic Cage plays an ex-marine, injured in Lebanon, who is down to his last 5 dollars after being refused a job on an oilfield because of his bad knee."
Cage just wants to get the hell out of town with his free money and leave the sparring lovers be.
"Through every scene we can see his passion, motivation and stubbornness to achieve his dream."
Why was that colonel always in his tower?
I mean if this film is chronicling this man's life wouldn't his wedding be an important event?
The story - which almost everyone is surely familiar with by now - revolves around a little orphan boy named Oliver and his life growing up in London.
"Denis is in no hurry to move the action along, and we must patiently build our understanding of Louis from his daily activities and the few people he deals with along the frontier including a son, Sidney (Gregoire Colin, almost unrecognizable with long hair and a wisp of a mustache) who rejects him as a lunatic:, shown as a dedicated father of two."
"The controlling metaphor is Louis's heart transplant for which he goes to Korea and then to Tahiti to search for another son, not found, and where Louis's new heart rejects him just as Sidney rejected the old."
I actually gained some respect for Reese to know who she was so early on.
"While taking a vacation to California, our heroine is drawn into the mystery of a Hollywood actress who was the victim of foul play; suddenly she is visited by her ghost and this sets off a series of events that might solve the mystery or result in something dreadful for herself."
"It was Reconstruction that occupied his attention, not the west (except for the problems of Maximillian and his French controlled forces in Mexico against Juarez)."
But not as a textbook on Lincoln's political ideas or his quotable legacy
"Derek Jacobi is terrific as the wily Claudius, whose deception and treachery sets all these things in motion; his unique voice is perfect for the role."
"Director Robert Mulligan magically re-creates screenwriter Jenny Wingfield's autobiography of her childhood with gorgeous cinematography and a haunting, lyrical musical score."
"Per Moberg does his part as Gabriella's husband almost too well, he is awful too see."
One only wish the at he would be casted to play a nice guy one day so we can see if he masters that character as well.
"It is filled with Super-surfer Greg Noll's home movies, and a boatload of amateur video from others who align themselves with his 50-year passion."
I suspect Alexander the Great would not be celebrated for his surfing technique.
Wang Bianlian is an old street performer who is known as a 'King of masks' for his mastery of Sichuan change art.
"Seeing The Flash, Cyborg, Green Arrow, and Aquaman (even though all he did was swim) made my eyes widen."
Laurence Fishburne has been in a various splendid roles during his career.
"Girlfight follows a project dwelling New York high school girl from a sense of futility into the world of amateur boxing where she finds self esteem, purpose, and much more."
Cordell is a recent widow and it is unclear how his wife died.
Cordell is a loving father but his love for his daughter seems to be a little more than just parental.
"I guess that is a credit to the writers, the director and to Cassevetes himself."
"Tim seems to think that his dreams have something to do with the murders because every time a murder takes place, he has another dream."
Previous to going to see this movie I wasn't that over the top about him but now I'm banging on the doors of Chris Rock's website begging him to take me on as his protege.
"Whenever she was on screen, I became transfixed."
Documentary about the infamous Edward D. Wood Jr. covering his life and movies.
After his parents split up Tadashi moves with his mom to live his his grandfather.
Little does he suspect that soon he will have to actually step into role of hero as the forces of darkness join up with the rage of things discarded in a plot to destroy mankind and the spiritual world.
"Things often happen out of happenstance or through miscommunication, one character gets sucked into events simply because his foot falls asleep."
"One of the main characters is a Yokai which I think is best described as a hamster in a tunic and is often played by a stuffed animal, it looks dumb and yet you will be cheering the little bugger and loving every moment he rides on Tadashi's head."
And Puro's triumph -- while possibly not immediately evident to those around her -- is no less than inspirational.
"a bit slow and boring, the tale of an old man and his wife living a delapidated building and interacting with a fixed cast of characters like the mailman, the brothers sitting on the porch, the wealthy cigar smoking man."
"Alvin tells her a story about his own kids, long ago."
It's a journey in which Alvin shares his life with everyone he meets--to their benefit and ours.
"Made when she was just 27, this lesser-known version of Crawford will probably be unrecognizable to those more familiar with her later work."
"When Philo Vance (Edmund Lowe) is standing precariously on the edge of a balcony high above the city, apparently hypnotized and just about to step to his death,it immediately reminded me of a nearly identical scene in another film made nine years later, The Woman in Green in which Sherlock Holmes (Basil Rathbone)is similarly about to hurl himself into space while being hypnotized."
Domino is being interrogated about what she knows about a theft of 10 million dollars.
"Garbo appears more relaxed and natural under Jacques Feyder's direction than under Clarence Brown's, and her silent movie mannerisms have all but disappeared, which made her transition to sound complete."
"Feyder's direction was more assured than Clarence Brown's, and his use of the camera and editing techniques did not seem as constrained by the new sound process as did those of Brown."
Even William Daniels cinematography seems improved over his filming of the Brown version.
"Parminder Nagra is so sweet and lovable, you can't help but root for her."
"This is one of the few movies where he is the big shot and main star kind of like in SLC Punk, another great Lillard film."
The woman in the movie is a newcomer and she isn't too bad although you know they hired her mainly for her accent and the nude scene =) It's a game of jack vs jill vs bob as each want to reap the rewards but share with no one.
Matt shows his true prowess as the scheming JAck who initially starts the whole scheme.
If only the director Sogo Ishii would have been wise enough not to overuse his bag of tricks.
An old woman finds a baby in her cabbage patch and raises him as her own son.
"Toto is optimistic, though, and won't let anything get him down."
Anna (Charlotte Burke) develops a strange fever that causes her to pass out and drift off into a world of her own creation.
This makes Lily's mouth water as now she'll have reached the pedestal of success seducing a man of wealth and prestige bring riches her way.
He needs money Lily now has in her possession or he'll have absolutely nothing.
"Robert Deniro plays Captain Shakespeare - tough on the inside, and shall we say in touch with his feminine side."
"The local priest (Peter Cushing in an unusual role, away from the Hammer horrors) explains that when Johnny was younger he had rescued some people from a burning building and had been hailed a hero."
"My father is a fanatic of facts and figures, and always wanted things to be seen as they were so I would like to believe he had something to do with that."
"A journalist [Duchovny] travels across country to California to document America's most famous murderers, unaware that one of his white trailer trash travelling companions [Pitt] is a serial killer himself."
Emy's descent into vice after she falsely assumes that George has abandoned her is bleak and upsetting; ditto the remarkably sad and heartbreaking surprise bummer ending.
"Edith had been well off, born a Bouvier, married well, had several wonderful relationships and became a singer when she was in her forties."
"The viewer gets the impression that Edith likes to go nude, but she doesn't in the movie."
Edie too was a beauty in her day and quite attractive at 56.
"When the cat is urinating behind Edith's portait she states, at least someone is doing what they want"
"And in this one Lahr plays his cowardly lion, evoking warm memories of that Technicolor film of 1939."
"A fringe benefit is hearing a young Frank, with that wonderful voice and skinny vulnerability that he abandoned for his wise-guy persona later on."
"In addition, the great drummer, Buddy Rich, has a wonderful time displaying his virtuosity."
"Watch particularly for his unique duet with Dorsey's trumpet man, Ziggy Elman."
Powell shows again that she is the greatest film dancer ever
"If you want a true man, a true entertainer then watch this movie and many more of Jackie Chan's, hes pure in everyway."
"Through out the game Jack uses weapons from M4 Carbines to his dog Shadow to kill endless streams of people in 15 levels.The game play is basically kill 30 people,find switch to open door.kill 50 people,find switch to open door over and over until the level is done.There are fun mini games too like playing as a stripper to distract bouncers at a Night Club so Jack can get to another area in the club,or bomb disarming."
Even so Artemisia could paint her boyfriend and her art teacher completely naked.
"Artemisia fell in love with him, but if she says that she will suffer a lot, because in the trial in which Artemisia, her father and the Art teacher were, somebody was hurting her artistic hands to say the truth."
"Valentina Cervi is great as Artemisia, she acts very well, I also like her performance in The portrait of a lady as Pansy Osmond."
I doubt the audience was aghast at the nudity or the drawings' content as much as feeling uneasy at seeing a woman in her 60s rapturously enjoying sex.
"In the film's most devastating moment, May drops to her knees before Darren, willing to do anything for him, only asking him to be kind."
"We sympathize with May, but she, too, causes her daughter's suffering."
"His point, I believe, was to unmask a family that's already cracking when something emotionally cataclysmic happens."
Gerard's wish to honor his family and medium of film that he has loved all of his life.
Gerard is actually an architect and engineer (and passionate film lover) but his dream was to make this movie.
Jeff Webster(Stewart) gives off the impression he cares only for himself but it is clear he cannot desert Brennan.
"Gypo a good, really the best, friend of the fugitive McPhillip is down on his luck not having a job with his girlfriend Katie, Margot Grahame, forced to turn tricks in the Dublin red-light district in order to pay her rent."
"After an outraged Gypo worked over a potential John who want's to spend a few hours with Katie, for a shilling or two, an angry Katie tells the not so bright Gyro that he's preventing her for supporting herself with the only bankable asset she has , her body."
Gypo going to a local Dublin flop house and soup kitchen to get a free meal is startled to run into his friend Frankie McPhillip.
All Gypo can see in Frankie's face is the 20 pound sterling reward for him being turned into the police!
You can see in the police chief's face and actions that he has nothing but utter contempt for Gypo's betrayal of his friend Frankie McPhillip.
Even though he was wanted for murder and an enemy of the British Empire.
Gypo turns out to be his own worst enemy after his betrayal of Frankie as his conscience takes control of his mind.
"Gypo sees and hears everyone, including his unsuspecting girlfriend Katie, pointing a finger and implicating him in Frankie's betrayal and death at the hands of the British authorities."
"Whatever good feelings, if that's possible, that you had for the weak minded and strong shouldered Gypo was completely demolished when in an act of total desperation, in order to keep from getting shot, he falsely implicate an innocent man Mulligan, Donald Meek, in his crime of informing on his friend Frankie McPhillip."
Which is quickly exposed as a total fabrication by non other then the guilt-ridden Gypo himself.
I think that the fact that this film was in her local dialect really helped her.
"Either way, she was absolutely wonderful and the story was so moving."
"I thought to myself, 'Awe, look at her!'"
"Producer-director George Stevens was a natural when it came to this sort of thing, himself having cut his teeth at the Hal Roach studios, and almost exclusively having directed comedy up to this point."
"Douglas Fairbanks, Jr. is not quite up to the standard of his heavyweight companions, but he is by no means bad."
Zizek is a phenomenon and pop icon unto himself
"A lot of musicians as well think their music should mean whatever the listener wants it to mean without the musician showing the exact lyrics, I guess I'm just the kind of person that believes that I'd like to know what the artist was trying to accomplish with his or her artwork."
Frank R. Strayer was never confused with being James Whale but he was a pretty competent director who ended up directing most of the Blondie films in that series and with this film he uses the same sets from The Old Dark House which was also filmed at Universal.
Toker's search for the baby's parents takes him on a journey that will have a profound impact on his life.
"Particularly Adelle adapts herself perfectly to the new environment, as she falls in love with a local millionaire, but poor old Helen continues to sink in a downwards spiral of insanity and paranoia."
"Michael Myers has escaped from a nearby insane aslyum...having slaughtered his sister fifteen years earlier, he is now back in Haddonfield, the sleepy Illinois town where his murder took place."
Beautiful cinematography and lighting really make this moody horror flick scary... with the long gloomy shots it constantly feels as if you're being stalked by the maniacal serial killer himself.
Russell was very good as this trained psychopath rediscovering his humanity.
Barb heads for the big city for better things.She uses her female attributes to sleep her way to the top.
"Picking up right after the Moscow-showdown of Supremacy, this is Bourne's greatest adventure and his final climax."
Director Greengrass has surpassed himself with this compelling thriller and this is probably as exciting as cinema thrillers get; a true pay-off to Bourne fans and a new breed of spy-thriller standard
"It's completely worth watching and after seeing it, I'm positive the viewer will appreciate his or her family much more"
Can you really imagine (by today's standards) that Walt Whitman's books were banned because he acknowledged women as having feelings and emotional responses as great as a mans?
The sensitivity of this movie still gets me and I give credit to the director for capturing this through his eyes
Peter O'Donnell wrote his stories to focus more on psychological suspense rather than action thrillers.
"After 2 dismal earlier efforts, although not nearly as well known to the public, this is really a reboot of the Modesty character, and it is really sad that probably no more films about her will be made"
The cat is named Sassy and she lives up to her name.
The film uses flashback to show the young Modesty and the events that shaped her into the woman that she became.
"But, when the threatening phone calls begin again, Winters responds by flipping out--behaving like she's nearing a psychotic break and she retreats further and further into religion--listening on the radio to 'Sister Alma' almost constantly."
"Winters is great as a fragile and demented lady and Reynolds plays one of the sexiest 39 year-olds I've ever seen--plus she can really, really dance."
"Bill Paxton did a great job directing those kids, and his acting is awesome."
A woman with a strange hat is on the stool next to his and he politely invites her to join him at the musical review.
"The head police officer, Gomez, turns him over to the DA."
The hot-tempered Latina has left because the show closed and she's uncooperative and ignorant of the source of the hat anyway.
"Elisha Cook, Jr., is strangled by the real murderer but not before he is featured in a scene in which he pounds the drums in an improvised jazz group."
Even when he faints he's decorous.
"It's really your basic murder mystery by Cornell Woolrich, not as good as some of his others."
"Judge James Hardy, and his wife Emmily, are facing a domestic crisis that must be dealt with."
Married daughter Joan comes home after she has committed a social blunder and her husband holds her responsible.
"At the same time, another daughter, Marion, brings home a beau, who is clear will clash with her father."
"Needless to say, Judge Hardy will prove why he knows best as he puts a plan into action to get everyone together again."
"Mickey Rooney has a small part in this film, but he is as always, fun to watch."
"Someone has got to release this before someone does a remake or their own version of his life, which i feel would not only tarnish the king but also ruin the magic that this one has."
Polanski himself plays a timid man who rents a Parisian apartment where the previous tenant committed suicide.
"But as for the preoccupation....unless I'm reading too much into the film, I have to believe that this was Polanksi's reaction to the feelings of persecution he felt at being labeled a sexual pervert and exiled from America."
One French misfit (a mercenary) is left to die by his own compatriots but manages to escape and is kept prisoner by an all-naked native tribe.
Mini-mogul Darren Stien seems to be reaching for a deeper understanding of his triumphs and misgivings as the patriarch of strict kid's world.
Co-writer von Trotta uses the actual Rosenstrasse incident in the context of a young woman's search for information about her mother's never disclosed life as a child in the German capital during World War II.
"The husband of Ruth Weinstein (Jutta Lampe) has died and in a surprising reversion to an orthodox Jewish lifestyle apparently hitherto in long abeyance, Ruth not only sits shivah (the Jews' week-long mourning ritual) but she insists on following the strict proscriptions of her faith."
"A domestic crisis might well erupt as Ruth warns that she'll disown Hannah if she doesn't give up doting, handsome Luis."
Hannah is intrigued - she queries her mom who resolutely refuses to discuss that part of her life.
The young Lena tries to locate her husband.
The older Ruth is catalytically forced to confront demons long suppressed in her happy New York life.
Hannah is very believable as a young woman whose father's death triggers a need to discover her family's past.
Can you imagine playfully ripping off the towel that covers your sister's naked body and then stare at her unshaven genitals for several whole minutes?
"As the sequel to his extraordinary Henry Fool, Hal Hartley creates a surprising blend of film noir and hardboiled spy thriller that starts with a knowing smile and large dose of laughter and turns as poignant and warm as any film I've seen this year."
Aiken's understated style is remarkably old soul for someone his age.
The other thought was to be awestruck with the way that Goldsworthy has managed to integrate his passion and his work so thoroughly into his life.
"Andy Goldsworthy has managed to create an amalgam of all of these aspects of his life that looks like it works very well, and is nourishing for him and those around him."
In the theory of parallel worlds the man can meet himself.
"The main character Raina has her head in the clouds & and a flair for the dramatic, and Helena Bonham Carter's acting does a good job here."
"Robert Mitchum slopes into wide open town looking for his wife and news of their daughter, and stays for a time as town-tamer."
"What's fascinating about this film is Mitchum's cynically intense portrayal in going about cleaning the town of baddies, and the townsfolk's acceptance that his violent methods were the only ones."
Oliver Reed does a great job portraying Bill Sykes to where you can't help but hope he comes to a terrible end....which he does.
When a student reporter (Johansson) finds out a new scoop from a deceased reporter (McShane) when she enters the materializer of a lame magician (Allen).
"Its based around a series of interviews conducted in 1971, and covers every thing from his early life and Nazi collaboration to the final moments of his life."
"Brian Gibson, the director, previously helmed a biography of Tina Turner, and is quite successful in his style."
Bill Nighy is perfect in his role as the band's frontman.
"Ratso, with his painful limp and hacking cough, is always assuring himself that, if only he could travel to the warmth of Miami, somehow everything would be all right."
"Hoffman, in particular, is exceptional in his role (I'm walkin' here!"
"Hope Davis has a small, but subtly effective supporting role as Kinnear's wife (what's with her name Bean?)"
"Only Donald Sutherland is willing to help, but his help must be under the counter."
"It is the first time in Russian history that a shrink is used to build a profile of a serial killer still on the loose, and he has everything to lose if his involvement is made public."
"Simon Yam, all too often a variable actor but always at his best under To's direction, has possibly never been better in the lead, not least because Tony Leung's much more extrovert performance makes his stillness more the powerful"
One of Cary Grant's most enduring comedies is Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House.
Still Cary was making a good living in the advertising field even though he was having a devil of a time trying to come up with a slogan for ham with the brand name of Wham.
Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House still works well as comedy because the situations are universal.
"Rochester's imperiousness, his humor, his rage, his vulnerability: Dalton conveys all, sometimes seconds apart."
"And here's the key thing -- the actor performing Rochester has to convey that he has spent over a decade of his life in utter despair, lonely, living with an ugly, life-destroying secret."
Some described her a cold or boring.
"The book's Jane is someone you have to watch slowly, carefully, patiently, observantly, if you want to truly plumb her depths."
"Due to the bizarre circumstances, the insurance company puts their best investigator Peter Lynch on the case and he follows her to Greece."
The charismatic and hunky George Hilton is reliable as always in his role of insurance investigator and duh ladies' man deluxe.
"Matt is very good (as is his no good cousin), and the police woman and the blonde biker woman provide some welcome eye candy."
"Al Pacino turns in a stunning performance as Tony Montana, a Cuban refugee than becomes a powerful player in the drug world as he ruthlessly runs his self made kingdom of crime in Florida."
Pacino proves to be one of the greatest of his generation.
My friend was a most charming person when you got to know him.
Unlike my friend Moore has John Gielgud to clean up after him.
"Mel Torme and Victor Borge, in their younger years, serve to make this film interesting - and especially viewing a young Sinatra, on the sunny side of 30, and definitely conveying that this was his yes, I'm a popular singer, but hardly an actor yet stage."
Jean Arthur is one of the best actresses of this era and she shines here
Frances Lee McCain is superb in the role of career photographer and I have spent the next 30 odd years searching for her in equally challenging roles to no avail.
Darren McGavin gives an energetic performance that pulls the audience along with him.
Randolph Scott is heading into Albuquerque to take a job with his uncle.
"The movie, co-written and directed by American Psycho's Mary Harron, fleshes out the key parts of her life well enough."
"The actress Gretchen Moll portrays her, and gets down the spirit of this woman about as well as she could, which is really a lot of the success of the film."
"Apparently, the filmmakers leave out the later years of Page's life and leave off with her in a kind of redemptive period, leaving behind the photo shoots for Jesus."
Ahmad falls in love with her and visits her in her garden.
"Jaffar then asks for the Princess's hand, and he gives the gift of a mechanical flying horse to the Sultan of Basra."
"The blind Ahmad then tells his tale in the marketplace, accompanied by Abu as his dog."
Abu finds a genie or djinn who wants to kill him now that he is free after many centuries spent imprisoned in a bottle.
"Ahmad tries to fight his way to the Princess, but Jaffar smashes the 'eye'."
"Abu finds himself in the Land of Legend, where the old men who rule want to make him their king."
"The thief arrives in time to save the young king from the executioner, using his bow from the flying carpet, to the wonder of the throng who had come to watch the execution."
"Jaffar tries to flee on the mechanical flying horse, but another shot from the bow finishes him."
"I've always enjoyed Kenneth Branagh's versions of the Shakespeare classics, as he always does a very good job, but in this movie, the one who lifts the whole movie, is none other than the-always-great-actor Laurence Fishburne."
Amanda Bynes is such an excellent actress and I grew up watching her show: 'The Amanda Show.'
I especially loved 'Lauren'; she's the best!
"Is it better for John (Ken Howard) to leave Ellen (Barbara Babcock), his sick wife, and start a new happy life with Julia (Donna Bullock), a woman he falls in love with?"
"Consider, for instance, the moment she appears at school and badly wants to teach again."
"The scene where he's sitting outside the compound shows this, albeit the decision for two slow-mo replays detracts from the moment."
Muni is not always appreciative of how supportive she is in that male dominated culture.
Still Muni is not a bad man and it's a tribute to the film and his acting and Buck's writing that you don't hate him and the culture gap is bridged.
He was such a scene stealer that I have searched to find other movies he is in.
"It seems unlikely that the kid would travel from Montana to Nevada by himself, but I guess it's possible."
"It takes guts to make a movie on Gandhi in India ,in which he is not shown as a man who could do no wrong.This movie shows how a Mahatma failed to be a decent father(at least in the eyes of his son)."
"Widmark and Douglas were great, and I was quite taken with a very early look at Jack Palance playing what would become his typical heavy role."
"Anna Neagle appears a little matronly beside him, and a little too old for the part she plays but by the end of the 1940's their film partnership was well established with the cinema going public."
The plot about a young music student trying to unravel what really happened when he discovers he was adopted had lots of twists and turns but Barriers was a surprisingly 'adult' children's drama.
The show would have been dead if JJ would't have been there to save it with his always Kool Aid attitude.
Drinking KOOL AID was like his favorite thing on the show.
It was one of the 1st movies i saw of her.
"I found myself wondering why the mother didn't breastfeed her child, and avoid the complications with the dirty formula, but oh well, even the early Dream Factory was pushing political correct behaviour for women in 1915!"
"Maybe Mamet evolved after this film and loosened up, but if not, then maybe he should let others direct his words."
"If you want a fun con movie, then here she is."
Karen goes upstairs after hearing noises when she encounters a frightening ghost.
"Writer/Director Peter Weir manages to take these elements to the next level to produce a truly effective and thought-provoking film with the same eerie atmosphere he gave to 'Picnic At Hanging Rock' two years earlier, that you will continue to remember years later."
Richard Chamberlain manages to convey the bafflement the audience would doubtless feel as he tries to unravel the mystery.
I like every one of Day Lewis's performances (I have mixed feelings about his performance in GONY) but I believe that his greatest role was Christy Brown in My Left Foot
Taylor is blinded by his hatred of Indians and his naivete that the buffalo herds will never disappear.
"Under this ruthless exterior lies an insecure person who is reduced to begging his comrades (Stewart Granger, Lloyd Nolan, and Russ Tamblyn) not to leave him."
Henry Jones as a cagey lawyer is on hand mostly for exposition (and to supply us with his penchant for folksy charm) and Irene Worth is all quirks and comic relief as a psychic-cum-sleuth who acts as the nominal detective.
"It is based on the concept of a high school girl, Susan (Elisha Cuthbert) discovering that the elevator in her upper class apartment building becomes a time machine when a key on a key chain she got from a blind scientist is turned in the elevator lock."
"Billy Curtis played an unforgettable part with Clint Eastwood in High Plains Drifter, was one of the friends met by the star in Incredible Shrinking Man, he had a part in a movie I just luckily grabbed at a flea market titled My Gal Sal with Rita Hayworth, Wizard of Oz and plenty of other parts - great actor."
"But in spite of Jone's incredible presence both physically and vocally, the character he played just seemed too passive to illicit from me a complete emotional purgation in the Aristotelian sense."
"Thus, I felt sympathy for Jone's Moor but not the horror over his corruption by an evil man."
A gifted black actor should play the moor because his experience in a white dominated culture is vital to understanding what Shakespeare's genius recognized: the pain of being marginalized because of race.
His wife (Whoopi Goldberg) is told to get involved so she does what all the other women in her neighborhood do.
This film is noted now for its homoerotic relationship between Haines and Pickford and for being John Wayne's film debut as a Yale football player (but I never spotted him).
"Michael Myers is such a scary villain because he is realistic, you could imagine a crazed guy like him going around killing people."
I also agree with Semprinni that the recordings Pete Best plays on say the last word on the subject of why he was fired.
"It is an oddly comedic scene with some quirky courtroom methods, including Sloane cross-examining himself."
Thank Welles himself for saving the film entirely with a tour-de-force ending that will always be treasured.
"The idea was to convey basic concepts with humor and vivid imagery, using the character of Snafu as a perfect negative example: he was the dope, the little twerp who would do everything you're NOT supposed to do."
"A soldier shoots his mouth off, cannon-style, and before you know it actual baloney is flying in every direction."
Tony Randall works for the IRS and he investigates a very nice farmer who never realized he needed to file an income tax return.
"For that, we have music video-turned-film director Mary Lambert to thank, (she also directed SIESTA, not exactly a horror movie, but another freaky-as-hell must-see you should put on your list), working from a screenplay by the 'Man-ster' Himself, and probably one of his better ones."
Dr. Louis Creed (Dale Midkiff) has moved his family out to the perfect house in the country.
"Certain scenes that are so familiar from the book are brought to shivery, scream-inducing life here: Rachel Creed's (STAR TREK'S Denise Crosby) horrific memory of her terminally ill, crippled sister; Louis's encounters with the mortally injured jogger Victor Pascow (Brad Greenquist), both before and after his death; the trip into the other cemetery beyond the pet cemetery."
"Knowing that it would be damn near impossible to get the kind of performance needed from a kid that age to seal the deal on this, Lambert and crew still did the best they could, and unfortunately, Hughes at the time was just too damn CUTE to sell his intended role as an evil, demon-possessed zombie."
Lanza himself thought he was the reincarnation of Caruso.
Jay Leno was showing his age last night on The Tonight Show!
"Patrick Warburton was a riot, although at first i thought that I wouldn't be able to stand his character."
"The show gets it rolling from the very first episode, a retired Jack O'Neill has to go through the gate once more to meet with his old companion, Dr. Daniel Jackson."
Mr. Torn as always is a great presence and just his breathing has great feeling.
"Val Kilmer took what he learned of Jim Morrison, from the Doors, enhanced the performance for the Salton Sea, and then further enhanced that to bring us the deterioration of John Holmes through cocaine."
You finally get some sort of comprehension of the things the prophet had to fight through and the persecutions he and his people faced.
"Sean Connery is a liberal law professor, married to a former Assistant District Attorney, Kate Capshaw and he's a crusader against capital punishment."
Blair Underwood's grandmother Ruby Dee buttonholes Connery at a conference and persuades him to handle her grandson's appeal.
"Later on after Connery gets the verdict set aside with evidence he's uncovered, he's feeling pretty good about himself."
"Mr. D'Arc, who some years ago did his doctoral dissertation on the film, has provided one of the most in depth commentary tracks ever done for a DVD."
"Yvone Minton is a sensual-voiced, dramatic and exciting Kundry, delving into her tormented state perfectly."
The persona of Robby is quite charming and in some ways he seems more human than some of the other characters.
"It still gives me goose bumps when Commander Adams pushes Dr. Morbius down before the Krell machine that endowed him with superior intellect, which opened the flood gates of his subconscious to the power of the Krell machine: Here."
"Shelley Duvall outdid herself with this unique, imaginative take on nearly all of the popular fairy tales of childhood."
"The story opens with young Michael Sullivan Jr. facing out to the sea, contemplating the duality of his father's legacy -- one of the best men to ever live, one of the most evil."
"Rooney is tied by blood to his own son, but tied by love and loyalty to Michael."
"Not only has 75-year-old Hall given us perhaps the best cinematic product of his career, but 77-year-old Paul Newman offers one of his best performances ever."
Harry Mitchell is told at one point that he has his tit in the wringer.
"Roy Scheider doesn't convince as an adulterer either, you don't feel any annoyance with him at all, his character is Teflon-coated."
Mol herself with the Bettie Page black wig and brown contact lenses is Bettie Page.
Brad Pitt will never be able to out act the performance he gave in this movie.
and Vartan holds his own.
"(PS: I am 33, Male, from the UK and a hopeless romantic still searching for his Princess..."
Most episodes - especially from the first 3 seasons were really character studies of Favor and his men.
"Was I glad DiCaprio did not win an oscar for that film, I mean who does he think he is, Anthony Hopkins or Denzel Washington?"
"If he had retired after this movie (a true masterpiece in my eyes), no one could have blamed him."
This movie is a journey through the mind of a screenwriter caught in his own paradoxical philosophy.
He examines the ever illusive question of 'who am I' and 'what is I?'
"Joel is in love with Anna, his married lover, played by Helen Hunt, who shows early signs of her later Academy-Award winning work."
"I think Forsythe's two best scenes are when he becomes frustrated and angry at the square dancers, and, later, when he feels empathy for a young Korean man who has been shot in a liquor store hold up."
"They absolutely hate the man, and they will have no part in giving him any credit in Titanic."
"Everyone has, and is entitled to, his/her own taste."
I'm not sure whether an experience with death and destiny early in life makes me a fan of Brian Fuller but I certainly enjoy his productions.
But it is the Megastar who overshadows everyone with his towering presence.
"As the character himself states at one point, he is a professional liar, unable to recall the truth."
Will Garard be the 4th man she kills?
"Even when one of the two victims is at his most deteriorated, the camera keeps going."
"When the interview takes a violent turn, the journalist finds that she may have gotten in over her head..."
"We find that the treating doctor in question is actually a Taylor-Erikkson alumni, and his rehabilitation methods are far from the norm..."
"When the healer unwittingly helps one of his clients and actually expels a force which had been possessing her, the demon is now free to roam and looking for a new host..."
"The plot begins with ad man Jim Blandings, his wife Muriel and their two daughters cramped into a two bedroom-one bath Manhattan apartment."
Watch her deftly maneuver the overly agreeable house painter with her absurdly idiosyncratic color palette.
"Mordrid is the sworn protector of humanity, using his magical powers to keep his brother and rival, Kabal, chained up so that he may not enslave the human race."
"A prophesy comes true and Kabal breaks free, and begins collecting elements (including platinum and uranium) for his alchemy experiments."
"With the help of a police woman named Sam, can Mordrid defeat his evil brother?"
Richard Band provides the music (which doesn't differ much from all his other scores) and Brian Thompson plays the evil Kabal.
"Combs has never been a strong actor, so he fits right in with the cheese."
Jeremy Earl was in top form long since seen since his stint on the Joan Cusack Show.
"So it was with great irritation that I popped in my 1998 taped version and remembered that the film opens with She Loves You, instead of My Bonnie."
"This movie also stars the great Sid Caesar, but sadly he doesn't have any interaction with Gwynne and Lewis."
"Films such as Chocolat, Beau Travail, and others have propelled French director Claire Denis into the top echelon of the world's most unique and accomplished filmmakers and her 2004 film The Intruder (L'Intrus) adds to the depth of her portfolio."
Sidney lives nearby with his wife Antoinette (Florence Loiret-Caille) and their two children.
"Steve Boyum totally surprised me with this one, as I have never been one to subscribe to his vision."
"Toby McGuire gave as fine a acting job as ever depicted, when he had to amputate his best friend's arm, knowing he would die without the procedure."
Eva Longoria (first time I've seen her on screen) brings some satisfactory support.
"Of course jet Li's Mask looks like Bruce Lee's Kato - he's supposed to, it's a joke."
"One of the more moving shots is when Anita, who makes the same walk every day, widens her walk and restricted life from the relative calm of her street to the busy main road: How the restriction of space is visually translated is well done."
"well, i said it all in the summary, i simpley adore the movie and the cast...i would give each actor an Oscar...great, great movie...i'm 25 now and i watched it 4 times in different periods and i always think i won't cry and i always do, about 2 or 3 times...;) meryl s. was absolutely brilliant, jeremy irons also..just brilliant...i wish the movie received more awards... i really don't know anybody who watched it and didn't loved it... also, glenn close was fantastic... the story was beautiful and sad at the same time... i loved the fact that despite everything clara and esteban loved each other so much, and how blanca was close to her parents.."
"This scheme goes disastrously wrong, however, as Elton has no interest in Harriet, but has fallen in love with Emma herself."
The speed with which Emma rejects his proposal makes one wonder just why she was so keen to match her friend with a man she regards (with good reason) as an unsuitable marriage partner for herself.
"Emma always insists that she will not marry without affection, and when she does find a partner, the handsome Mr Knightley, we feel that this will indeed be an affectionate marriage."
"Much more of a father-figure, in fact, than her actual father, a querulous and selfish old hypochondriac who seems more like her grandfather."
"Sophisticated romantic comedy, combined with a keen eye for analysing human character, was more in her line."
Billy Zane was a wuss at first just like Cpl Upham from Saving Private Ryan but then he got a little more aggresive in the end!
Did not know what to expect from from Van Damme's partner & friend /trainer/and his fight choreographer for most of his films.
In this one Qissi is the action director and lead bad guy and he's good.
She brings the score down a point every time even when overall the movie is enjoyable to me.
Dennis Quaid does a fairly decent job in his role... but something is clearly missing from several key scenes.
In this one the wife/mother leaves her family to get in touch with herself - or pursue her libido.
The Anorexic Twins became popular.Bob Saget started making a paycheck (Instead of his REALLY funny stand-up).
"Ellen goes up on the roof, Robert joins her."
"Ellen confesses that she needs to experience more men, men other than Robert."
"When he compliments the old man on his hat, and the old man responds, you don't know nothing', the tone is set."
"Burt Reynolds proved himself as an actor way back in 1972 in this film, completely giving himself in to this wonderful role."
The story of an ordinary guy who makes a poor decision and then finds that the repercussions propel him into an uncontrollable sequence of events from which he is unable to extricate himself is pure film noir.
"Michael Williams (Nicolas Cage), an injured war veteran without money or a job, stops off at a bar in Red Rock, Wyoming and is mistaken by the proprietor Wayne Brown (J T Walsh) for a hit man that he's arranged to employ to murder his wife Suzanne (Lara Flynn Boyle)."
"Michael, a naturally reticent person, does nothing to disabuse Wayne of his misapprehension, especially as he could use a job and at first doesn't realise what he'd be expected to do."
Michael decides to take the money he'd received from both parties and leave town.
"At the hospital, things get more complicated when it emerges that the patient is Suzanne's lover and he has two bullets in his stomach."
"Nicolas Cage's expressions are extremely natural and convincing as he reacts to a variety of situations with anxiety, surprise or uncertainty and J T Walsh is also particularly good as a deceptive character who's always concealing more than he's actually saying."
Dennis Hopper is intensely threatening as the vicious contract killer (a role he plays with great gusto) and Lara Flynn Boyle looks suitably cold and calculating as the femme fatale.
Dwight Yoakam also provides some good support and moments of humour in his cameo role as a no nonsense truck driver.
The actor playing Ben should have given us more of a glimpse into his intense beliefs.
"Eric Stoltz gives a stellar performance as Daniel Greystone, a man so haunted by his family tragedy that he jumps at the first chance of getting out of his grief and doesn't let go."
"Whether or not he'll be featured any more than he was in this film, who knows?"
"Polly Walker plays 'Sister Clarice', and she's chilling and odd in every scene she's in."
"She was nothing like her character in Rome, something I always find impressive in actors."
"Maria Blom controls everything from the beginning, and if you didn't know, you would never guess that this is her first time writing AND directing a feature length film."
"Additionally, that year, Russian filmmaker Yevgeni Bauer made two of his best pictures, 'After Death' and 'Daydreams'."
The Corrigan character should have been foreshadowed more; his brief introduction campaigning for another politician seems inadequate for his later centrality to the Italian's revenge.
"Told he would never walk without crutches by doctors, Chief Trumpet pulls some strings and a Navy flight surgeon helps in restoring the lad's crippled leg."
Little by little she starts putting pieces of a murder mystery puzzle together.
Somehow she is able to breathe life into a film about a condemned man who is not interesting in the slightest.
"Madigan, while under the influence of his spiked drink, is then maneuvered into a sexual liaison with a stereotypically effeminate gay man, and then shoved into clothes that women were representative of the racist archetype, adorned in something racist, and finally shoved out the back of the club where he discovers that Ruby and Bobby are dead."
Shelby's great (if a little uptight) and it's cool she got the ship.
"Commodore Ian's nice (like Fred Flintstone), but lacks the gritty edge of a commanding officer and does seem too pleased with himself."
"When the ladies receive an invitation to the King's ball to find a lady for his son, the prince, a.k.a."
The next day the prince is on a hunt to find this girl who fits the slipper and is making a stop at Cinderella's house where her step mother has found out about her night and locks her in her room.
"He reminds me of so many men from my youth and the portrayal is divine, but you will likely find him hard to like in this movie."
A horseback rider get chopped in two and his waist and legs keep riding the horse.
"The story is very simple, Fong and his Shaolin brothers are captured by a crazed maniac general and imprisoned in the Red Lotus temple which seems to be more of a torture chamber then a temple."
The General has a similarity to Kurtz in Apocalypse Now as he spouts warped philosophy and makes frightening paintings with human blood.
"Belushi gets the chance to live part of his life differently, but ends up realizing that what he had was going to be just as good or maybe even better."
"They finally brought Daniel Jackson's search for his wife to an end and finally most of the Go,ould System Lords were killed by rival Lords, SG-1 or others."
The character offers little growth for any actor and actor Richard Dean Anderson chose to play him straight raising emotional barriers to protect himself.
"Teal'c is a wise warrior, much of which he learned was from his teacher Master Bra'tac."
"In the end, as of season 10, the Jackson character has matured to the point that he has become a self sacrificing hero."
"Though a man of peace, he has matured to the point that using his weapons may be the only way to solve a disagreement."
Definitely different from her soldier like character Arin Soon
Sir John Gielgud was the heart of the film and deserved his Oscar.
"i remind all of Steven Hawking's most recent address, upon his latest 'Medal of Honor'---'Humanity must leave Earth, or die.'"
"LOL, and you'll love the boat scene where the English guy and his wife are talking about all the stars and it's midday and sunny."
"One is that many of his themes are very near the knuckle or even taboo, despite the accusation sometimes used against him that he chooses relatively easy targets for his satire."
"Still, there's nothing wrong with a director giving us his subjective interpretation of Vonnegut, and Mother Night is an excellent example of how, as another reviewer put it, a good director can add a visual poetry to a source like this."
"Well, according to IMDb, his singing was dubbed by a girl and this would definitely account for his voice"
"Richard Farnsworth puts on a compelling performance as the gentle and gentlemanly Alvin Straight, in this true story of Alvin's journey on a riding mower across three states to see his estranged brother who has had a stroke."
"Farnsworth is perfect in this role, as he travels his long and winding road, making friends of strangers and doling out lots of grandfatherly type advice about family along the way."
"Sam is also responsible for the stunning choreography, and of course Tom Barman himself took care of the ultra cool Sound Track."
Only James Whale remained but his prestigious horror films were behind him.
Initially she had been definitely a supporting player but her potential was so vivid that the script was rewritten to make her the star.
All is not too well on the home front - their father is planning to remarry a younger woman (Binnie Barnes) so the three girls with the help of their trusty nurse (Lucille Watson) decide to go to New York and reunite him with their mother.
Lucille Watson is best remembered for her role as Robert Taylor's stern mother in Waterloo Bridge (1941).
They arrange to meet at a nightclub but due to a mix-up Lord Michael Stuart (Ray Milland) is mistaken for the count and Donna falls for him (she thinks he owns half of Australia!!!)
The plan backfires as he falls for Kay and Donna wants to hasten her marriage to Judson.
Penny decides to take matters into her own hands and runs away.
Everything ends happily with their mother (Nella Walker) sailing over to patch things up with their dad and in the meantime Donna makes the acquaintance of the phoney count (Mischa Auer) and sails off to Australia with him.
"As she watched I watched her, and by the end she was nearly as engrossed as I had been."
"I found myself thinking my daughter's teacher might want to show them to her class, not only as a 50 year old artifact, but also as fun and easy to understand lessons in history."
And the evil Kato and his off sider who definitely needed a hug.
"Frances Drake looks as beautiful as she did in Mad Love and plays a strong woman, something seldom seen in classic horror films."
"SWING HIGH, SWING LOW was supposed to be one of his best."
"Their first scene together has a nice Leisin touch in it: MacMurray is talking to Lombard, she on the deck of the boat and he on the edge of the wall of the lock."
"Rarely noticed in films, small part actor Carl Judels is effective as a fair weather fan/friend of MacMurray, who drops him as he goes under (though he gives him a hand-out)."
"Director Brian Yuzna has had an uneven career in the horror genre, creating masterpieces such as Return of the Living Dead 3 or Bride of Re-Animator, but at the same time he has done awful movies such as Faust: Love for the Damned or the mediocre Progeny."
"What makes this movie different from most slashers is that we are not in the victim's perspective, we follow Feinstone because he is the main character."
"While this is not among Yuzna's most well-known films, I would say that it is one of his best."
Dick Van Dyke carries the show as he stars as Dr.Mark Sloan a Doctor at Community General Hospital in L.A who is also a Police consultant for the L.A.P.D.
"This was a family show For the Van Dyke's because as well as Dick's Son Barry, you also had Dick's Daughter And all his Grandchildren making an appearance in various episodes."
"As the series went on it got a bit silly, one episode I remember Dick van Dike plays his entire family, which was a bit out of the ordinary, but on the Whole 'Diagnosis Murder' was a really good TV show which had numerous good Guest Stars."
"Dick who's now in his mid 80's doesn't seem to change a great deal, and looks as if he'll be working till the bitter end."
Leslie Cheung is such the antithesis of a hero that he's too dense to be seduced by a gorgeous vampire...
"At its simplest, it is the haunting story of a street performer who bonds with a young child while trying to pass along his creative art (masks) to the next generation."
"The blue, bunny-like mini-dragon steels the show and has easily some of the funniest moments of the movie, he is already an instant classic, much as Scrat from Ice Age."
"The film covers this quickly but thoroughly in the beginning, and from there we spend most of our time in the company of Norma as she tries to convince us that her novel is more than fiction."
Some have said he was pretty unaffected by the ordeal.
"This individual's reasoning seemed based on personal bias, rather than an objective viewpoint, and his vote was obviously a non-correlating attempt to lower the rating"
Stuck talking to himself and doing little puppet shows with old cheeseburgers - until one late night when a weird guy comes through the drive through and suddenly his life is not the same.
Funny how her mother is played by Elizabeth the 1st and William IV is played by Prince Albert!
"But it is the truth, the government would do anything possible to destroy a man's life for trying to get home to his wife."
"In the movie Bart plays a scriptwriter writing the script of the film Bart's struggle with the text becomes a narrative theme, as does the environment of the flat where he works and takes care of his little girl."
"Where you and I choose to vent our frustration by reasonable means, Chikatilo took his anger out on the most innocent and vulnerable of us, our children."
"I think the director meant to show us that he has always been a little off, mentality fragile by that scene w/ the dead bird."
"As a gifted Ladies Man, he lays waste to the wives of countless saps who've banded together in order to hunt him down."
"The filmmakers literally stumbled into the story, being there to make a documentary about Chavez himself."
"Liv Tyler could never have matched Mol's shining intensity of characterization in a million years, and I, for one, am grateful she left the project."
"The robbery is horribly botched when Nanette, filing in for the regular clerk, shoots the robber and is herself shot in the mess."
She complements Day-Lewis' performance as the warm-hearted mother and shares many poignant moments with him.
"In this fourth installment of pokemon, Ash and friends must stop the bad jerk from making Celebei the ultimate evil weapon with his dark ball."
"Even more so, even though he was in excruciating and unbearable pain he still opened up his own charity."
"(DEBRA)Jonny is one of the only people that deserves true respect and admiration, he is the definition of a role model, what a true and undeniable hero he was"
"They are to continue toward Mrs. Muller's home in Washington, D.C., where her mother, Fanny Farrelly, is a minor celebrity hostess."
Little does he know that he is coming to his mother-in-law's house that is housing one of the worst exponents of that philosophy.
"Mr. Lukas does a great job portraying Kurt Muller, repeating the role that made him a stage luminary on Broadway."
"One day, Cheech wants to get his freak on so he tries to get Chong out of the house."
"Another problem arises as well, Cheech's brother Red (Cheech is another role) is in town and wants to hang with him."
Will Cheech get his freak on?
"Rob replies in a noble tone, it's not the fault of the child, and then states what he thinks the name should be, girl or boy."
Though Rob wins the day by grabbing Roth's weapon (more symbolism) and striking him dead with a powerful slashing cut.
"Johny To makes here one of his best style exercises, making a strong film with a good Yakuza's story."
"Bud Tingwell gives a touching performance as Will, a widower struggling to cope with his wife's death."
"Will is confronted by the harsh reality of loneliness and helplessness as he proceeds to take care of Ruth's pet cow, Tulip."
"Ulysses doesn't appear until the first hour, the start being centered on his son looking after him."
"Really good looking and totally convincing, it seems the role was really made for him."
"Yes, this superheroine is one effective female as she kicks and fights the evil teachers with totally cheesy soundtrack playing on the background."
"Also, one character says in the end that he will return, if Japan Films allows to make the sequel."
What's even more alarming is that Spielberg himself wasn't even nominated for Best Director.
The film spans several years and focuses mainly on Celie's relationships with the women around her.
"Hyde tries to be cool all the time, he has his moments too."
William Shakespeare would be very proud of this particular version of his play.
That film featured a local attorney trying to protect his family and likewise ended with Mitchum terrorising folks on a boat.
"Altman goes on and on, reversing everything just a little slightly, pulling at the edges and doing his own thing."
"Altman's too bound to the conventions of the thriller format to do much damage, his style is too lethargic to generate tension and the film is simply not radical enough to counterpoint other canonical films in the genre."
"That pretty well describes both THE SPIRIT and his creator, Mr. Will Eisner, the true creative genius in the comics."
"Director Eric Valette makes a great use of atmosphere, mood and his cast to give life to the plot."
Valette is definitely a talent to follow as this modest (albeit complex) tale of the supernatural is prove enough of his abilities.
"Streisand's singing ability is monumental, and if she has a big ego - fine!"
"The director was supposed to be in Montreal for the Canadian premiere, but due to health reasons, he's still in Japan...oh lord I hope he gets better and makes plenty of other movies."
"You never have to yell :NO IZUMO, IT'S A TRAP The guy already knows it he has that common sense."
"Meanwhile, Carfax has a little orphan girl Anne Marie held captive because of her amazing ability to talk to all species of animals, which helps predict races."
At the time of this movie Peter Falk had really made the Columbo character his own and the character at this was already fully developed.
"True, he did kill, and executed, and felt justified all the way."
"And as always, Del-Toro is at the top of his game, in every scene, every beat knowing this guy so well- for better and for worse- that he comes about as close to embodiment as possible."
"Shadow is a wonderful character, old, wise and brave, and watching him trying to save Sassy in the river was a very powerfully moving moment."
" Arriving by boxcar in New York City, the shrewd young woman with the BABY FACE begins to methodically canoodle her way to the top floors of power in a great bank."
"A wonderful actress, Stanwyck has full opportunity here to display her ample talents."
"Nathan walks her across the stage through the physical and emotional steps of surprise, hesitancy, anger, disgust, self-loathing, etc; she then begins walking through those emotions in her personal life."
"This is a true feat when you realize she is playing a woman, dying in bed."
"Even when she is crying and her heart is breaking, she is incredibly regal and charming."
Hugh Dancy spirals Buddy out of control without sending his acting down the drain.
"Carlin is a great comedian, but in these movies he's wasted."
Love the scene when Hunt travels to Japan with his sales pitch.
Carl Brisson is also on hand to lend his strong voice to Cocktails for Two.
"The only good thing about Oakie's role is his weak running gag with cult icon, Toby Wing."
"The kid is this story, Dickie Jordan (David Mendenhall) is just celebrating his own 12th birthday and is a smart kid, so is calm, even eager to take the test that he has seen friends pass easily and knows he will excel at based on his school grades."
"Charity is curious about the sights and sounds she records of 1985 and they each enjoy each other's company, especially Peter, who has promoted grades in school enough to always have felt isolated from other students, even at the college he's been staying in one place at."
After the really fascinating sequences set in the studio we see them on a location shoot where he discovers a country girl (Doris Kenyon) and convinces her to come to New Jersey for a screen test which goes very poorly.
Seen as we have watched her on Sabrina now for now 5 years and so to give the viewers a taste of her much unused talent would be a plus.
Melissa plays her role so well in this wanting her parents done away with so she can be with the guy she loves.
The scene with him and telling his mom that he was a superhero almost brought tears to my eyes.
Will Smith delivers yet again in a film about a man with the weight of the world on his shoulders and his crusade to right his wrongs in a way that will touch even the most hardened of hearts!!!
I have the Highest Respects for Will Smith as he is not only a brilliant Actor but one can tell he has a genuine love for people and life which no doubt made him perfect for the character (IRS Agent Ben Thomas) he played in this film.
The art is good and you see glimpses of Frazetta at his best.
"Brodie could never turn down a dare and loved attention, leading up to a jump off the Brooklyn Bridge (it is still debated whether he actually jumped or used a dummy)."
"Cooper is as tough as either of them, though he gets a chance to turn on the tears."
"The film contains a love story, a moral message, and a man tortured by his past."
"As played by Rychard Cramer, this criminal is both amusing and chilling, making him a fine foil for the Boys' comedic characters."
"Laurie Strode (Jamie Lee Curtis) is babysitting some kids on Halloween night, while a madman is on the loose after escaping from a mental institution after brutally murdering his older sister 15 years ago."
"Of course, the madman, later known as Michael Myers, begins killing the local teenage population, and eventually he comes after Laurie."
Cage excels at what he does best- it's not to be an action hero but to be an everyman caught in the snares of life
"Nathan Detroit (Frank Sinatra) is the manager of the New York's longest- established floating craps game, and he needs $1000 to secure a new location."
"Seeing the circumstances she grew up under was fascinating; in fact I found myself wishing I'd seen more of the story, and I imagine we may see a sequel at some point."
"Sally Field is heading the field of truly outstanding actors and does a good, if not perfect, job with her daytime tv-diva."
Sadly Elisabeth Shue never seems to be quite comfortable in her part.
"I normally like Ms Shue, but here she acts as a fish out of water and sometimes seems to be in a different movie."
Adolf Hitler's maniacal desire to impose his will on the rest of the world is the subject of this second in a seven part series of films produced by the U.S. War Department as an instructional tool for new soldiers entering the Armed Forces during World War II.
"Grade school children sang his praises, and young German boys received training and indoctrination in military camps."
"Prime Minister Neville Chamberlain felt he procured a great victory for his country by accepting a treaty with Germany, his infamous declaration stating 'Peace in Our Time'."
"But September Morn herself never had a better figure than these charmers, who are made up to please the eye, especially the eye of the tired businessman."
Note the swipe taken at Busby Berkeley and his overhead shots.
"ML: Apparently they did because they're reviving all of his pictures and none of mine, but personally I don't like it"
"Scorsese is never particularly vocal at all about his social and political ideologies, but when we see this intense and admittedly obsessive history lesson on the birth and growth of American cinema in both ideological realms, we see that there is really no particular virtue in either elitism or populism."
"The primary reason to see Before Sunrise, is to watch a young Julie Delpy deliver her lines."
"The always-wonderful Julie Waters is terrific here, and anyone who has not yet scene her in 1983's Educating Rita should rent it immediately (marvelous film)."
"The simple but effective storyline takes two very different people on a trip from Germany to Italy after Eva, an unemployed mother of two, discovers that her artist husband is having an affair with the wife of a wealthy lawyer."
"Walsh does a nice job, not his best role, but, still....a nice job."
"We all knew the party girl, the one they whispered about, with tales of not only her sad home life but of her notorious exploits."
"And we all knew the mother figure, the one a little more real, a little more grounded, a little more sad because she knew what would happen."
"(Having seen her only in Memento and The Matrix, I had no idea that Ms. Moss had such fine comedienne chops.)"
"Add to that his looks: Tall, old as the ancient oak, beard long as his body, sharp eyes, wizardy hook nose and of course, the classical wizard hat."
In this Bakshi version Gandalf scores couple of bloody orc kills with his sword(as he did in the books).
Patrick Stewart in his live performances and filmed play has pretty much taken over the part of Scrooge.
"There are some memorable and beautifully shot sequences, including the famous chainsaw scene, the Rebenga hit, the first meeting with Sosa and Tony's visit to his mother's."
"Then there's Lara, the damsel of this particular tale, and she's quite likable."
"Thank God there wasn't a cameo from Will Ferrell(love him, but saw him too much this summer)."
Plot is so complex that I still don't know whether the victim knew that his life was about to be lost.
Rukh impresses his guests who invite him to accompany them on an expedition to Africa to find the mysterious element.
Rukh goes off on his own and discovers the place where the meteorite landed and the element which he names Radium X.
"Due to Rukh's long absences, his comely young wife Diana (Frances Drake) becomes attracted to Drake and the two fall in love."
"Unfortuneatly, the deadly element also affects Rukh's brain, slowly turning him into a vindictive murderer."
Lugosi has a straight role for once and does what he can with the limited part.
"Well... Until that happen on 25th April 1974, our freedom was limited, we didn't had liberty of speech, but when we got it at the revolution, it seems that Portuguese People lost his opinion, we don't use our liberty of speech!"
Lets see where her character venture to....
"Joe Don Baker is one of a handful of actors who is often better than his material, and almost always under appreciated."
"Baker can delivery material that would sound ridiculous coming out of another actor, and that's what's so great about him."
"Also, I didn't think some things were explained so well and I had to ask my friend to explain them to me (she had already seen it, as well as the sequel which apparently reveals more of the story)."
Michael Curtiz at his best.
William Powell looks wonderfully relaxed and at his debonair best.
"His second movie, Cypher (2002), was all about its story, but it wasn't so good as Cube but here are the characters being tested like rats again."
"Quite appropriate to the monk theme, the master-mind villain uses booby-trapped bibles here to deal some of the death blows, and also maintains a reptile-replete dungeon to amuse his captive audiences."
It is truly a classic drama that has fantastic performances from the whole cast but especially Whoopi Goldberg in her debut role.
"Dario Argento may be the 'king' of Giallo, but with the five films that he made - Sergio Martino surely isn't too far behind."
"Hilton has a great screen presence, and every time I see him in an Italian thriller; it becomes obvious why he is repeatedly cast."
"Sidney Lumet's direction keeps the film alive, which is especially difficult since the picture offered him no real challenge."
"William H Macy is one of my favorite actors, and his performance was just amazing."
"He makes you care for his character, even when he is clearly doing the wrong thing, and Neve Campbell gives a performance that is with out a doubt the best performance I have seen by an actress this year."
Mat travels to the city and is to be picked up by his cousin George (Damien Robertson).
I had an uncle who committed suicide after serving in Vietnam because of mental problems he experienced after coming back.
The great and underrated Marion Davies shows her comedic stuff in this late (1928) silent comedy that also showcases the wonderful William Haines.
"Director Kazan certainly shows his aptitude for helming a studio (Fox) product, no matter how he may have felt about the commercial aspect."
"Tony Soprano exemplifies the beleaguered working stiff, torn between familial duty and a need to keep his business on an even keel."
And the fact the Jack Lemmon plays his character so straight forward with tragic overtones only adds to the hilariousness in my opinion.
Having never seen a man she is unashamedly forward to the crew.
"The pain inside Charlie's soul is subtly evident from first introduction and grows as we learn more about his character brilliantly revealed by Sandler, as layers of an onion one layer at a time with lightness and weight combined."
"Always watchable, the ease that's apparent when Cheadle's on screen speaks to his consummate acting skills."
Alan stands beside Charlie throughout this exacting process at the risk of lousing up his own perfect home-life - run with admirable grace and efficiency by wife Janeane.
The theme is much like The Fisher King; another story of a man who isolates himself to the point of madness from sorrow and loss.
"It's hard to portray a woman's heart, her desire, her fear, especially in a short."
"Gainey makes a believably nasty Rosco P. Coltrane, the way he always should have been."
"Thank the Lord for Martin Scorsese, and his love of the movies."
"The main setting was also very neat; Anton's apartment is very roomy, and he has some cool devices, especially the monitoring system he uses to keep track of the world's occurrences."
William H. Macy is at his most sympathetic and compelling here as a hit-man and loving father who wants to step out of the family business without angering his overbearing parents.
"Treads much of the same territory as TV's The Sopranos in terms of the mid-life crisis of a criminal theme (here too he visits a shrink) but is still worth watching thanks to some taut direction from Brommel (I look forward to what this guy directs next), an excellent script, and all around great performances."
Donald Sutherland is at his creepy best as the domineering father.
"Stanwyck's glory years were behind her, and yet she could still carry a film, as she proves here."
"As the escaped convict who is the only person around who can save Sullivan's life (he is trapped under a pier, and the tide is rising), Ralph Meeker is more energetic than usual."
Meeker is indeed a more exciting character than Sullivan; and in her scenes with him Stanwyck is livelier than she is with her husband and son.
"On the next morning, Gerard sees the picture of Christine's boyfriend Herman (Thom Hoffman) and he recognizes him as the man he saw in the train station."
Masterful direction and casting make the journey of rocket boy Homer and his pals seem fresh and new.
"Shue is clearly the weakest link here, but she only draws attention to herself because she is surrounded by Field, Kline, et al."
"Later, during the avalanche sequence, one of the terrorists/thieves appears to be actually falling as the wall of snow carries him down the mountain."
"In Cliffhanger, the hero almost freezes to death, and his clothes start to show big tears as he barely escapes one dangerous situation after another."
Even after that she couldn't escape her feelings.
"Wealth and power-- that was Montana's dream, and he would get it by doing what he did best, beginning with a favor for a man living in Miami by the name of Frank Lopez (Robert Loggia)."
"This is definitely not a character that is sympathetic in any way, nor is there anything about Montana that you can readily relate to on a personal level; but Pacino's screen presence is so strong that it makes him a thoroughly engrossing character, even though it's hard to become emotionally involved with him."
Vanessa's singing talent shows beautifully with all the songs she performs as Rose and her acting skills never cease to amaze me!
"Tessie O'Shea played her last role in this film, she graced many a film in the United Kingdom as one of their best loved music hall performers."
"Seidl's tactic of making the mechanisms of everyday society the subject of his film puts him in close proximity with Fassbinder; like this German ally, he has a sort of political vision of society that he feels it is his responsibility to put forward in his films."
This is a very light headed comedy about a wonderful family that has a son called Pecker because he use to Peck at his Food.
"First than anything, I'm not going to praise Inarritu's short film, even I'm Mexican and proud of his success in mainstream Hollywood."
"Well, the Ken Loach (very know because his anti-capitalism ideology) is much more clearly and shameless in going straight to the point: You are angry because your country has been attacked by evil forces, but we (The Others = Latin Americans) suffered at a similar date something worst, and nobody remembers our grief as the whole world has done to you."
But of course for Salman's fan this was something a surprise gift from him.
"Cassini is an actor's actor, and the role really shows off his talents."
Orson Welles manages to knock me on my ass with every picture of his I see.
Almost any scene from this film can hold up with any other scene he directed.
"If you absolutely insist on knowing, the 'plot' is the one about the guy well into his forties and more than content to be single."
It is then that an increasingly forlorn Fire Chief Pfeiffer realises that his task is desperate and probably hopeless - and this is before WTC2 collapses.
Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House may be the best Frank Capra/Preston Sturges movie neither man ever made!
Grant is at the absolute top of his form playing the city mouse venturing into the life of a country squire.
Loy is adorable as his pre-NOW wife.
"Ling Choi Sin played by Leslie Cheung is a young man down on his luck who goes in search of a monastery for lodging, deep in the woods, a place the villagers seem very afraid to go near."
"In the end they must fight a tree witch with a deadly tongue, and go with Yin deep into the heart of hell to fight a thousand year old evil to save their souls, and bring Ling's ashes back to her home for a proper burial so she may have a chance at reincarnation."
The troubled man reclaims himself with his own tangled impression of rectitude.
"This reflection of a specific phase in the development of the genre is an engrossing, feral and shady film noir that is set in the double-dealing climate of the underworld, where the hero is so estranged that he is always swelling with rage, and even though he loses his rational resistance, occupational principle, and ethical limits, he's still a good cop."
"This guy's whole family died in 9/11, and he shuts the world out of his life."
"In the book, Jane (the narrator) describes him as about 35 and not young, but not yet middle aged."
Evident in two scenes where first he's interviewing an offender and slaps him around and second when a woman tries to pick him up and all he can think of are his standard questions from his questionnaire.
The world we live in is a pretty sick place and the further one can distance himself from the worst the happier that person is.
"Busby Berkeley does the choreography here and while the film doesn't have the soaring imaginary stuff that his earlier work with Warner Brothers has, the numbers are well staged."
Benny Goodman gets to show why he was named the King Of Swing when the band with drummer Gene Krupa and xylophonist Lionel Hampton as part of his ensemble.
Ronald Reagan always credited Dick Powell and Pat O'Brien as being the two guys on Warner Brothers who were the most helpful to an eager young player looking to make his mark.
"But the opening premise is extremely clever: Sidney Bruhl (Michael Caine) is the famous author of mystery plays, but these days he seems to have lost his touch."
"After a particularly brutal opening night, an old student named Clifford Anderson (Christopher Reeve) sends him a script for a play he has written."
A lawyer is drawn into a deadly game of cat and mouse when he becomes involved with a femme fatale in this adaptation of a Grisham novel.
"Duvall has a small role, which does not allow him to do much with his weird character."
Curly Sue is one of his earlier films -- his weight is a giveaway (ain't that true for most of us?)
The guy she used to do the dirty deed came out looking like a seriously nice guy who just got his head twisted around by a devious girl; I have to question how true to life that portrayal is.
Emma must show that she accepts this now.
"Morgan, painfully realizing, She just didn't want to grow old with me, and the supporting characters are what keeps this film from getting old."
"At the same time, Katsu's portrayal of Okada's ravenous hunger for respect, and his later pathetic attempts at redemption, seem so human that you can't help but feel empathy/sympathy."
I would think this role playing boxer Jim Corbett is more like his real personality than the swashbucklers he was typecast as.
Elvira herself is always fun and engaging.
"Most women can definitely relate to everything-from Witherspoon's words, her subtle glances, and her not so subtle emotions (raging like the typical teenage girl)."
"Meg Ryan does a very good job as the genius niece of Albert Einstein, though she does believe in her own skills."
Tim Robbins does an equally good job as the mechanic who falls in love with her when she comes into his shop with her fiance after her car stuffs up.
"Despite Ann's rejection of Harris, she continues to hold deep feelings for him on her deathbed."
Especially when that person eventually succumbed to a split personality disorder in her latter years as if to demonstrate her own point.
You allow the character to drift back and forth between the healing forgiveness of the power of God and the church and the seductive illusion of control and dominance afforded to Page during her years as a pinup model.
"Harron is a sensitive, considerate director who does not throw Page's numerous and devastating blows of abuse in the face of her viewer."
"We finally got a look inside Doyle head, how he created Holmes and why he had to 'kill' Holmes."
Bacall does well here - especially considering this is only her 2nd film.
Boyer just doesn't fit the romantic leading man role for me - so he and Bacall together was a little strange.
Wanda Bendrix also does quite well in portraying the child Else - especially considering this was her first picture and she was only 16 at the time (though she appears much younger).
"It is the best performance I have ever seen from Hilary, and I have seen most of her films."
"Her character, Yonica Babyyeah is described as 'The Britney Spears of Eastern Europe' and this is seen in some of her mannerisms and the song, 'I want to blow you... ... ... up'."
"Joan Cusack had me laughing throughout the whole film with her sometimes slapstick humour, but also her facial expressions and so on."
"Leonora sends a note to Rafael, urging him to remember his promise and come with her."
"Rafael has turned out just as his mother wished - he is running for office and is courting a safe young girl, Remedios (Gertrude Olmstead) who is a hog heiress."
"Leonora decides to visit her old home, and I agree - why hasn't she helped her mother out."
Leonora's house is in the path of the raging river but when Rafael attempts to rescue her he finds she is quite safe.
Rafael meets Leonora just before she is about to tour America.
"Eager to use her talent in arranging things for the people around her, she decides to match the vicar, Mr. Elton (Alan Cummings) with her pretty young friend, Harriet (Toni Collette)."
"Gwyneth Paltrow is at her best, portraying this maiden of a restrained, polite society with wit and ease."
"Even tho he didn't say those words, I still think he would!"
Ranma 1/2 is about a boy named Ranma Saotome and his dad Genma Saotome.
"Rooney is a great dancer, who cares if he is gay."
"Whacky Canadians.....Jazmine is rhyming too much, she must be Dutch."
"Some fans think that A Bird in the Hand is the last great Curly short, but his coarse voice and slow movement are just too difficult to watch"
Chris Sarandon was good as her caring but ultimately self-centered boyfriend.
"The gaunt elderly John Carradine, with his arthritis-twisted hands, is excellent as the dying sentinel who must be replaced."
The devil is played to charming perfection by Burgess Meredith; he's so sweet and yet so evil.
"Time and again, she's yanked back and forth through reality and fantasy, through dreams and waking nightmares, all the while lacking the means to cope."
"In truth, the devil is trying to drive her insane enough to kill herself before becoming the next sentinel."
"Always having time for another thankless task and does it better than most despite a serious disability, she has the desk on the way to the restroom that becomes the repository of half-finished cups of coffee begging to be spilled."
But Paul sees a grander opportunity with Carla's skill in lip reading and draws her even further into a world of intrigue.
"Carla grows more powerful, professionally as well as personally, as the story progresses and her disability gives her clear advantages over the rest of us."
"In the opening scenes, we follow Joe's bus trip to New York City, where he plans on using one of his few genuine talents - the ability to pleasure women - and earn his fortune as a hustler."
"Well, who would have thunk it..Tony is in fact bitten and his life would be forever changed."
Kenneth Mars had me rolling in the floor as a homosexual football coach(..and later in the 80's as the Principal)who likes to pat his players on the behind..his scene where Tony's unloading the truth to the sex-ed class is classic.
"Hanna Schygulla was magnificent as the cold, calculating Maria Bruan, who lost her husband to the War, found him after she took an American soldier as a lover, lost him again after he went to jail for her, and found him agin at the end."
Erroll works for The Department of Public Safety and his job is to check up on sex offenders.
"Anyone familiar with his later work will almost certainly enjoy this earlier work, and again, this film is a master at the top of his form hitting on every cylinder."
Lugosi gives his wife injections from dead brides (why them?
"It all cumulates in a totally far-fetched plan to have a fake wedding to capture the mad scientist, but it seems that the scientist has x-ray vision, as he foils her plans, Oh no!"
"Lugosi is great here, his hangers-on are all very very strange, the story is actually quite nasty in some places which makes it all most watchable."
"Lisa is in the huge mess, because whatever she choose, she will kill."
"Sometimes it reminds a Scream, but he definitely better, than both Screams sequels together."
A mother has twins one is very sick the other is good but he has downs.
"Told completely without dialogue, it is a visual treat about a young boy who buys a gold fish, lovingly places him in a bowl then goes off to school, leaving the gold fish unprotected and a window carelessly open."
"The cat catches the fish, drops him back in the bowl and exits through the window he came in just as the boy, not knowing what has happened, gets back."
"It has title character Posey forced by CIA agent Goldblum to track down the notebooks that were the precious possessions of her missing fugitive husband, the predecessor's titular anti-hero."
"Everything was great in her life, until she decides to live alone for some time and rents a beautiful and old apartment."
Suddenly Alison starts to have health problems and faints with frequency; She also remembers some painful facts about her past that makes her have nightmares or illusions.
When we discover that Alison's house is only occupied by the priest and herself my blood froze!
"Superbly supported by an equally tremendous performance by his co-star (young Nick Robinson in his first role), and an unobtrusive cast, this adaptation of Michelle Magorian's charming novel is a fitting memorial to his art."
Space Cobra himself is witty and likable.
Peter Egan is fascinating to watch because his face changes with every camera angle.
"Egan has trouble being convincing only when the text becomes melodramatic and he needs to be upset emotionally, ie cry."
"Even if the end is tragic, The Man in the Moon has some funny moments, especially in the first characterization of Dani, with her innocent and pure love affair with Court."
Make no mistake this is her picture.Mr Gazzara concedes it to her most self - effacingly in all their scenes together.
"Mr Bogdanovich's triumph is in the way his camera seems to love his actors,from Targets onwards.There is a glow about every one of his films that only special artists can coax from an inanimate piece of optical equipment.Miss Hepburn in particular benefits from this love."
"However, we learn that Wang's family tradition allows him only to pass his secrets to a son."
Kiefer Sutherland had already done very well in 24 and the preview didn't seem to offer anything challenging to him or the audience.
"Unfortunately, the president is much of a non entity to even care about his fate."
"Sutherland rehashes his 24 tough guy approach with enough power to make it big enough for the big screen, and Eva does a passable job, as the newcomer."
The real humor in this movie was watching the trouble that this behavior gets him into with the black community
The master did it great even before his thirties
Rene Russo plays her role wonderfully feminine.
"This movie is the best horror movie, bar-none.I love how Stanley just dumps the women into the lake.I have been a fan of Judd Nelson's work for many years, and he blew me away."
"That look in his eyes, I will never forget."
Its hard to imagine her really carrying out anything as gruesome as an autopsy.
"Having grown up in the relative security of his house, the young and beautiful Xica da Silva finds her world threatened when he decides to sell her to a whorehouse in town, refusing to recognize that a black slave girl could be his daughter."
"Xica and the other slaves, however, are sold at auction, and Xica ends up in the home of the Sergeant Major, an old man who bought her solely to slake his lust."
"This is a very well-made film, meticulously directed and with some excellent character acting that at times is deeply moving - for example the scene with the loyal but unsophisticated sidekick cop and his wife."
Writer/Director Jones wastes no time in siding the viewer with his protagonist.
"We can feel irony but also veracity in characters like ANISIO (brilliantly played by Paulo Miklos), which does blackmail to the guys who paid him without any scruples, and even flirts with the daughter of the guy he killed!"
"Alexis Smith is quite ravishing as the upper class woman with whom he has a love/hate relationship (and we all know it is, of course, love that will win that match in the end)."
"The lead slave-trader, Suleiman, is every bit the stage Arab, with his flowery and sometimes humorous rhetoric, and gestures to match - which would not be out of place on Carry On Follow that Camel but are not up the standard this film deserves."
"Peter Ustinov of course had more than enough skills to address some of the shortcomings of the script, and he rescued what could otherwise have been a woeful one-dimensional character."
Anansa on her part - and despite the scepticism of the boy - manages to engineer the demise of Suleiman's two other employees.
Barman's screen debut will not make as heavy an impact as his music debut.
But that's also thanks to a very well written script which keeps the viewer (me anyway) on the edge of his seat
This also helps explain the later scene where the werewolf beds down with a woman he spots getting naked before bedtime while peeping through her window.
"In the uncut version, it would seem Ilona's affections have made the werewolf horny and in need of release, so he rapes the first woman he can after escaping."
"Coming immediately on the heels of Match Point (2005), a fine if somewhat self-repetitive piece of serious Woody, Scoop gives new hope to Allen's small but die-hard band of followers (among whom I number myself) that the master has once again found his form."
"A string of disappointing efforts, culminating in the dreary Melinda and Melinda (2004) and the embarrassing Anything Else (2003) raised serious doubts that another first rate Woody comedy, with or without his own participation as an actor, was in the cards."
"Even more encouraging, Woody's self-casting - sadly one of the weakest elements of his films in recent years - is here an inspired bit of self-parody as well as a humble recognition at last that he can no longer play romantic leads with women young enough to be his daughters or granddaughters."
Sondra enthusiastically seizes the journalistic opportunity and drags the reluctant Waterman into the investigation to play the role of her millionaire father.
"And, then, of course, there is Waterman's hilarious exit in a Smart Car he can't remember to drive on the left side of the road."
"To a question about his religion, Waterman answers: I was born in the Hebrew persuasion, but later I converted to narcissism."
I can't wait to track down some of the DVD's to share with my little guy and see the same sparkle in his eyes.
Chris Meloni gives a such a convincing performance as Barry Singer that he should have won an oscar.
"Matsumoto takes us from seeing a character who is very one dimensional in the beginning, to two dimensional when we see he's a dancer, to a three dimensional character when we see him start to fall for his master as a man, not as a dog."
It made me mad to think that our government would set up an average citizen in the manner she was set up.
Jim Carrey was very funny as The Grinch-particularly when he interacted with Cindy.
Taylor Momsen's unspoken expressions(one of the secrets to a good acting performance) are very strong-she really becomes Cindy Lou Who.
Little Taylor Momsen completely holds her own with Jim Carrey in this spot.
The girl who plays Holly does a fantastic job with her character.
At the end of the story there is great tension since due to some bureaucratic ruling it seems that the child is going to lose someone who has developed a loving relationship with him
"In a way, it's a cornerstone of the film in that it's Carl's memory of his father that helps carry him through hard times."
An event has occurred at her school; a shooting.
Deanna seems naive and with plain thoughts; no complexity inside of her mind.
I am also against violence but the character loses credibility when he stays unmoved despite all the attacks.
"Iris discovers that Stanley is unable to read, and after he loses his job, she gives him reading lessons at home in her kitchen."
I admit that the scenes of Janeway and her older self having conversations was bizarre and so easily could have crossed the line into camp.
Ben is killed and Jeff is severely wounded but that doesn't save Judge Gannon from his just due.
Christian-Jaque directs the movie with gusto and he knows only one tempo :accelerated.
Francesca Annis is one of the most striking 50-ish women imaginable; her acting rivals her beauty.
"The most interesting relationship in this film is not Arthur's romance at all, but his unusual rapport with this witty and of course perpetually disapproving servant."
"Natasha's screen presence is so warm and her smile so electric, to say nothing of her beauty, that anything she is in goes on my favorite list."
"The magic of Star Wars, IMHO lies mainly in the continuing spiritual heritage from a master to his apprentice, from a father to his son, albeit the difficulties."
"By 1909, D.W. Griffith had been directing films for the Biograph Company for about a year, and working at a rate of two or three per week was rapidly beginning to develop his skills as a filmmaker."
"However, unbeknownst to the king, his wife has fallen in love with the royal minstrel (Henry B. Walthall)."
"During one romantic liaison inside the specially-built room, the wife and the minstrel are discovered, and the heartbroken king conceives a means of getting his retribution on the ignorant couple."
Richard Brooks received Oscar nominations for both his script and his direction.
"The writer writes something and it happens, or something happens and he writes about it."
"Gracia is the glue that holds this tale together as she is the paramour of Victor, Silvio, and Don Pascual and the consequences of this bizarre menage a trois has deadly results."
I sincerely recommend searching for Trent's name on the web and then buying the film from his site.
"Vipul Shaw made his indelible mark with Ankhen, one of the best Comedy Hindi movies."
In Bollywood when a movie is put together the first thing a Bollywood Director is prone to do is sign up a music director and this guy (mediocre Malik in this instance)is obligated to drum up six songs to fulfill his contract.
A good director surrounds himself with good actors and he is willing to wait till a good story comes along as in this super movie.
The love and friendship between the proprietor and his retarded son is deep and moving.
"They made the weak miserable creature (Kermit) marry his daily nightmare, the most vexatious female ever (Miss Piggy) !"
"Legendary director Sidney Lumet gives us one of his finest films in his historic career in this very tense, and ultimately shocking story about a family that includes dysfunctional as one of the children."
Bette Davis is his very understanding and long-suffering wife who has managed to educate and raise the children without him from time to time.
Arthur Bach is decidedly unhappy in his life as a multi-millionaire and is attracted to people 'below him' in social standing - he pays for a hooker in the opening scenes and then is enormously attracted to a shoplifter.
"True, Benicio Del Toro is utterly convincing in the lead role so much so that it is difficult to remember that you are watching an actor and not the man himself."
"Lanisha's confession of her acceptance of a death by random violence is the most shocking, one of the deepest scars of the ghetto."
"Only one of the girls, Joy, feels hope for, feels she has control over the future, while the other two to varying degrees have already accepted despair."
Gypo Nolan made a bad mistake when he decided to become an informer for his best friend in order to take a trip with his gal to America and a new way of living.
Gypo Nolan becomes haunted by his betrayal of his friend and begins to feel just like a Judas.
"The premise for this movie is simple and so is the script: an elderly Muslim gets his teenage son to drive him in his similarly elderly station wagon from France to the haj in Mecca, Saudi Arabia, so that he can fulfill his holy Muslim obligation before he dies."
In Bulgaria another man they ask directions of confirms he can speak French but then provides an extensive commentary in Bulgarian.
"At the same time though, he blatantly takes life too seriously and after being invited to a poker game as a necessary fifth member, Andy's friends discover his secret."
Carell is not alone however in his performance.
"The virgin doesn't need sex to make his life complete, he just needs confidence and true love."
Jenny Garth may be new to comedy but she plays really well.
Gary is a natural talent and makes you laugh each time he shows up.
Lauren character is so funny and she is a natural talent.
"The story goes that, after the girls' mom dies, Danny's best friend Joey and his brother-in-law, Jesse move in to help raise the kids."
The storyline is not complex and shows us a life of found boy- orphan and particularly his connection into the community of poor people who together built themselves a hood of simple metal plate houses.
Our character gets a wonder dove from his dead mother.
"Alison Lohman is absolutely outstanding, and one marvels at her ability to convey the anguish of a girl suffering from this compulsive disorder."
"Mare Winningham is the perfect choice to play her mother, and does so with immense sympathy and a range of emotions just as finely tuned as Lohman's."
Bulimia is an extreme version of how a tormented soul can destroy her own body in a frenzy of despair.
"Richard Widmark and his wife Barbara Bel Geddes can be excused because as a Navy doctor he could be assigned there, but for those that are natives it doesn't work."
The dead guy came off a ship from Europe and he had underworld connections.
Palance got rave reviews in the first film where he received notice.
This happened right before Mostel was blacklisted and around that time he made a specialty of playing would be tough guys who are really toadies.
Teenager Eddie spends his life being bullied and humiliated due to his obsession with heavy metal music.
"One day he finds out his hero Sammi Curr has died, supposedly burned by the establishment which wanted to put a stop to his music."
"Sammi himself is an original horror movie villain, plays on the 'evils of rock music' obsessions of the 80's."
"Sheryl Lee is luscious throughout, but her handling of the treacherous Resi and her tragic crescendo almost makes you forget her beauty."
"Michael Caine is AMAZING here, he is amazing in the acting department, creepy, is very likable, was mysterious, and really just did an amazing job overall i Loved him!"
"Keith Gordon is very good as the kid, he had excellent chemistry with Nancy Allen, and was very likable!."
2.Billy is suppose to get 30 dollars after he's eaten all the worms.
"Enter into this sordid mess Lucy Moore (Lauren Bacall), a slim, attractive young woman who falls under Kyle's charms after he picks up a phone and flies her across the countryside one evening."
"Mitch loves her too, but Kyle wins her."
"They go to stop the World Gobbler, they reach him almost immediately, they defeat him."
"If you enjoy this performance, I definitely recommend watching Mind of Mencia, his show on Comedy Central"
"Soderbergh does not include the in-between time of those two instances in Che's life when he commanded the despicable La Cabana Fortress Prison in Cuba, where he mass murdered many Cubans who opposed Communism."
And that Demian Bichir was a haunting dead-ringer as Fidel Castro in his meticulous performance.
"We have had too much of Che already, even posthumously with those ridiculous t-shirts, so why give us too much more of him?"
This was Veidt's career role until Casablanca where he played the Luftwaffe major Stroesser.
Sabu captures all the innocence and mischievousness of youth as he fulfills the Arabian Nights fantasy of the boy who topples a tyrant.
"The writer director not only tackled the challenge of directing his own work, but gives a hilarious performance as an evil roommate."
"My favourite episodes are; the one where she turns Libby into a geek, the first episode, the true love episode and most of the rest from the first series."
"I never liked Morgan or Roxy, they just weren't as good as her other friends"
I was rooting for the homeless to make it out alive with Potente's character getting her just desserts.
"Ingred works at a diamond mine where she helps herself to the goods, while Bo (masterfully played by the dynamic Robert Ginty) drives around the desert in his denim outfits."
"Bo is a real fan of ethical grey areas, and he is overjoyed with his new love."
"Since B-movie extraordinaire Larry Cohen had not made a straight comedy before this, one gets the sense that he was making up for lost time by including any joke he or his collaborators could think of."
"While much of Wood's work was quirky low-budget entries into various genre-film traditions, his first released feature GLEN OR GLENDA was a truly visionary attempt to express the inexpressible through primitive avant-garde techniques."
"Wood's probably also laughing that, just like he always seemed to get the bad breaks in life, the film made in tribute to him after his death is held up in lawsuits and sits unreleased in the country of its making"
"The energetic young producer of theatrical prologues (those staged performances, usually musical, that often proceeded the movie in the larger cinemas in bygone days) must deal with crooked competition, fraudulent partners, unfaithful lovers & amateur talent to realize his dream of making his mark on the FOOTLIGHT PARADE."
Herman Bing is hilarious in his one tiny scene as a music arranger.
Akshay Kumar has once again proved his is one of the best super stars of Hindi cinema who can do comedy.
"Denholm Elliott is her guardian (and more than that, as it turns out)."
It's as if the author were venting his spleen on everything he hated in the world he knew.
Ms. Curtis is such a good Laurie Strode because she is so likable and vulnerable.
"This is film that was actually recommended to me by my dentist, and am I glad he did!"
Why the rich man died and the awful truth he could not live with I really should NOT discuss--it could ruin the film for you.
Nevertheless Sloane takes an apparent liking to Welles and hires him to skipper his yacht.
Welles for whatever reason decided that his wife would be a blond in this film.
"Stage actor Glenn Anders plays Sloane's partner Grisby who is one slimy dude, he winds up a corpse."
"Hermine Gingold is very good in this movie, almost as good in support here as she was in The Music Man."
"Oh yeah, I almost forgot, the kid who cooks most of the worms likes to present his masterpieces with a french accent."
"This film is one of the last Stooge comedies to feature new footage of Shemp, and it was released six weeks after his death."
"I am looking forward to seeing Duets, where she is suppose to sing."
despite Brigham Young's great oratory in defense of Joseph Smith he was convicted anyway.
One is about the middle-aged woman who finds the lover of her life in a foot fetischist.
Another is about the girl with drug problems who's lover leaves her.
Blaine Novak has a few girls he is chasing (including Joyce Hyser and Elizabeth Pena).
Bing has one of his patented upbeat philosophical numbers with If You Stub Your Toe On The Moon.
"Michael Jackson is not very popular in USA anymore, however in Europe (especially Germany) he has still got lots of fans."
FANCY ROMFORD'S HOUNDS is a title of one of his novels).
"Dickens was determined to show he was more than a funny man (and don't forget, his first book, SKETCHES BY BOZ, was also a funny book)."
"But P.G.Wodehouse saw himself as an entertainer, poking fun at the upper reaches of the British social system."
His Psmith is always prepared to counterattack when he is supposed to be submissive to an unfair superior.
For every VILE BODIES there was some failure late in his career like THE ORDEAL OF GILBERT PINFOLD.
"However, they misunderstood the point: to humanize the evil Hitler is not sympathize with him."
"While were are repulsed by Hitler's depravity and virulent ant-Semitism, Carlyle gives him a certain magnetism and power the real Adolf Hitler must have possesed."
"While Modine's performance is a little stilted in part 1, by part 2 he seems to have settled in, the character gives us a real-life hero in a film full of villains."
"And in part 2, sections detailing Hitler's relationship's with his niece, and his mistress Eva Braun, are less successful than the central plot, but do serve to give us further insight into his mental and emotional state."
"Hoffman may have begged for change on the streets, but some of the users point-out that Jon Voight was not a major star for the filming of Midnight Cowboy - his actual salary would surprise you."
Burns is just great tossing off one-liners with ease and even Matthau was good matching him.
Markham's constancy may then be seen as her reward for her faith and unyielding moral character.
He perfectly described my own feeling for this film so more eloquently than I ever could.
Kazan as always gets fine performances from his actors but also shows a visual flair for claustrophobic suspense with a combination of tight compositions and stunning single shot chase scenes.
With riveting intensity Palance dominates every scene he is in not only with ample threat but disturbing charm as well.
It's ambient on locale setting lends a sense of heightened reality that allows Kazan the flexibility to display his visual style beyond the movie stage and with Panic he succeeds with aplomb
"Again, muck like The Element of Crime, the film ends with our hero unable to wake up from his nightmare state, left in this terrible place, with only the continuing narration of von Sydow to seal his fate."
"Breathtaking above is meant both as a complimentary adjective and a description of the physical sensation: for more than an hour from the first frame, the viewer seemingly holds his breath, pushed back against the chair by the force of relentless, globe-trotting, utterly suspenseful action."
"And they will have to ride with the very Devil himself, against seemingly insurmountable odds."
"As with all of his films, director Ang Lee approaches his story through an incisive, yet subtle examination of the traditions, cultural aspects and moral attitudes of the people and times he is depicting."
"At first it seems there may have been some racist aspects of the case, however it later turns out the main officer on the case was black himself and it seems he did some rather bad things to coerce a confession out of the boy."
"One forgets how beautiful she was, and she handles this role very well."
"The standout performance belongs to the wonderful Thelma Ritter,who plays Moe the stoolie saving up her dough to pay for her own funeral."
"Ritter received a well deserved Oscar nomination for her performance, but lost out to the boring but popular performance of Donna Reed as the B girl (read prostitute) in From Here To Eternity."
"The cast are a who's who of talent, Leslie Caron, the incomparable jazzist Cleo Laine with her amazing high notes, a last performance from Joan Sims, brava Joan, a cute as a button flirtatious Ian Holm having a ball, and Olympia Dukakis as a money-grabbing divorcee living in the highlands of Scotland with her ghillie and her whiskey, The closing scene is standard Hollywoodland fare, the judgmental children of the star converted to fun-loving supporters, the old lovers reunited, the youngsters swept up in the old timers' music."
The camera slowly moves out of the room and up towards him.
"Here, we are immersed in the world of a family torn apart by the mother's inability to commit to a settled life and her struggles to redeem herself despite being fully convinced that it's too late to change for the better."
"Konkana Sen did a good job in the movie, although i think someone with more glamour or enthusiasm would have been better, but she did do a great job."
"Outside the rock on one side live inventor-scientist Doc and his dog Sprocket (who later befriends Gobo Fraggle), on the other side a family of Gorgs-supposed rulers of the Universe."
Paxton is at his best in this role.
"Somehow, this time the story turns the other way round: Mike fights to save his life and his only remaining son, because the rest of his family was killed due to dirty game of his own boss."
"Richard Attenborough, who directed A Bridge Too Far and Gandhi, wanted to bring the story of Steve Biko to life, and the journey and trouble that journalist Donald Woods went through in order to get his story told."
"After publishing a negative story about black activist Steve Biko (Denzel Washington), Woods goes to meet with him."
"This encourages Woods to speak out against what's happening around him, and makes him desperate to bring Steve Biko's story out of the clutches of the white man's South Africa and to the world."
The real Donald Woods and his wife acted as consultants to this film.
"But he was amazing as Steve Biko, and captured his personality from what I've read really well and his accent sounded perfect."
"Universal immediately signed Durbin, rushed her into Three Smart Girls and rewrote the screenplay to pump up her part."
(which is unique among Allen's work) along with what seems to be his new muse Scarlett Johanson.
The film begins with the aging father (Peter Falk)is trying to figure out why his wife (Olympia Dukakis) has left him.
Dennis Quaid is moving and convincing in the part of a man who gave up his dream of being a baseball pitcher when his arm gave out on him.
"Charlotte Buerke puts in a good performance as Anna, the spoilt brat and it is a shame she seems to have gone from the acting scene."
"Cross is also very good, carrying the stature of his character very well within the context of the picture."
His stories and his style have a spell that cross the screen.
"This documentary on schlockmeister William Castle takes a few cheap shots at the naive '50s-'60s environment in which he did his most characteristic work--look at the funny, silly people with the ghost-glasses--but it's also affectionate and lively, with particularly bright commentary from John Waters, who was absolutely the target audience for such things at the time, and from Castle's daughter, who adored her dad and also is pretty perceptive about how he plied his craft."
"One of my favorite scenes is 'The Dinner table' scene, in which Rose's family and friends meet Jack after he saves her."
"The film predictably concludes with the marriage and the groom, on the wedding night, tells his new bride who suffers from burn injuries: Come let me do your dressing V I V A H - showcases a lot of good things - beauty of arranged marriage, beauty of Indian culture, beauty of Indian woman, last but not least a nice IDEALISM of the about-to-be-couple waiting to get married .... playing by the rules !"
"Sooraj sir has got another nice family film to his credit after Maine Pyar Kiya, HAHK & Hum Saath Saath Hain."
"By 1945, and after a string of solid WWII propaganda pieces, Errol Flynn's hold over U.S. box office had started to decline so, in spite of the increased burden of waning looks, he embarked on a series of films pertaining to that genre which had earlier made his name: the swashbuckler."
Adrienne Barbeau is giving a rock solid performance-- so she must believe the script has something to say.
Sharon Stone is great in her role of Catherine Trammell as is Morrissey as Dr glass.
"are depleted by our heroic trio alone, much to the king's amazement who, as portrayed by Marcel Herrand best-known for his role of leader of the Parisian underworld in Marcel Carne''s CHILDREN OF PARADISE (1945) is himself something of a lecher."
Suddenly Evelyn grabs a dagger lying nearby and stabs Kitty's doll and then cuts her (the doll's) head.
"One night, for jealousy reasons, the black lady entered the red lady's room and stabbed her seven times."
"Once every hundred years, the events repeat themselves in this castle and a red lady kills six innocent victims before killing the black lady herself."
"Things aren't made easier for our dentist when he's chased by an annoying tax-controller, a curious cop and a suspicious staff member of his."
Russell's performance here is one of the best he's ever given.
"I am hardly an expert of Shirley Temple's films, but it's not hard to see how she became The Most Famous Child Star of All Time"
"But that is what this movie is about anyway right, a showcase of Jet Li doing what he does best, and that is spectacular showmanship of his skills, which to say the least are top notch."
"So, most of the movie consists of mild comic relief as the women try to ask the men serious questions about why women are banned from the stadium, and one woman even comes up with her own scheme to defy the men."
"The real tragedy is that the CIA's 1953 overthrow of the prime minister and subsequent backing of the brutal shah gave Ayatollah Khomeini an excuse to use his narrow interpretation of the Koran to establish a chauvinistic society, and that George W. Bush's current policy towards Iran gives Mahmoud Ahmadinejad an excuse to act the cowboy and tighten censorship."
"Never change a winning team is exactly what writer Crane Wilbur must have thought when he penned down Price's character Don Gallico, another tormented soul besieged by fate and out for vengeance against those who wronged him."
Don Gallico is about to perform his very first own illusionist show as Gallico the Great and plans to exhibit the greatest magic trick in history; entitled The Girl and the Buzz Saw.
"Gallico's promising solo career is abruptly ruined before it even begins when his previous employer Ross Ormond appears on stage and shoves a contract under his nose, stating that all of Gallico's inventions are the rightful property of the company."
It was his funniest role that I know of.
"Some may think the chase is superfluous but actually the chase is essential because it aids in clearing the mind of the Jean Simmons character by getting her out of the oppressive household, plus it helps bring out the real killer - who is suddenly put into such a position that they have to finish the job."
The killer rightly believed that once the Simmons character was arrested she would be put away.
Recap: The morning after his bachelor party Paul is woken by his mother-in-law-to-be and discovers that there is a woman sleeping beside him.
"Unfortunately its a waitress from the bar, and not his fiancee."
"DePalma has a bum rap in Hollywood, as most people claim that he rips off Alfred Hitchcock."
Hitchcock could only dream of what DePalma shows in his thrillers.
Keith Gordon is wonderful as the genius and i loved all those inventions of his.
DePalma is one of our best directors who has never received the recognition he deserved.
"If they were to actually open their eyes for once, they would see that DePalma has staked his career in thrillers and is actually the best craftsman."
The plot revolves around a female lawyer trying to clear her lover who is accused of murdering his wife.
In the opening scenes of this movie a man shot arrows through his hotel room into another man's bathroom and blew out all the lights.
"However, Bette Davis(Daisey Appleby),The Whales of August,'87 was very young and attractive and performed one of her best roles in a long career in Hollywood."
"Daisey never stopped teasing or being very sexy with her nightgowns and so called swim suit on her yacht with George Brent(Johnny Jones),The Spiral Staircase,'46."
Ned Beatty's performance in this movie showed he was never again to be type cast as a one dimensional victim in the wilderness.
It is quite likely that this relationship was the true reason for Victoria's distaste for both her mother and Conroy.
"Grace relation with the Duc had ended, but she remains a true friend to the great man that is in danger, himself, of losing his own head."
Grace moves through all the horrors around her without being able of an escape.
"Lucy Russell, as Grace Elliott, does a fine job to portray this woman who saw a lot during her lifetime."
"Her French seems to be excellent, as it appears she is fluent in it."
Von Trier once explained how he created such strong involvement from the viewer with his movies by placing his movie world in about the middle of the real world and the imagined world.
Renuka Daftardar simply amazes as she speaks volumes through her eyes.
"Gandhi is called great for actually not being a Great but being more human, for I always believe bringing out the humanity in us is where the greatness of being human lies.Gandhi was a human with humanity and one who strived for humanity ready to sacrifice himself in the battle for humanity but not his enemies."
"Superficially, there's a mystery here regarding Candy's motives and Skip spends much of the film determining her motives."
Basically what the film-makers have done here is create a very striking male fatale in Widmark's character and his performance.
"Widmark is handsome, and there's also a charm in his boyish insouciance but the first two times he meets our leading lady, he robs her and then punches her in the face."
Thelma Ritter's character work deserves special mention she has created a truly indelible character here.
"Fuller isn't afraid to give her plenty of business in the form of physical objects that she uses to draw the audience into her world, particularly her used ties."
It certainly has the same rough house humor that Ford laces his films with.
Cary Grant got to play his real cockney self here instead of the urbane Cary we're used to seeing.
"Safely set within a historical context, FLAVIA charts the growing rebellion of an early 15th century Italian nun (Florinda Bolkan's career performance, even surpassing her sterling work in Lucio Fulci's devastating DON'T TORTURE A DUCKLING), locked away in convent by her not so nobleman father in a desperate attempt to curb the girl's budding sensuous nature."
"Joining the oppressors and perhaps unwittingly manipulating them to do her bidding, Flavia truly becomes the outcast she already felt herself to be, with expected tragic results."
"Bridget is shallow, self-centered, not very bright and a tad slutty in his look."
"After an aortic dissection cost Ritter his life in 2003 (September 11th), the show was on hiatus for a while."
Sad he wasn't brought in earlier.
"The Attitude Grandpa: Jim Egan (James Garner): a surprisingly welcome addition to the series, he was cannon fodder for endless 'old' jokes, mainly by..."
McBain then asks his good ol' Vietnam buddies to help him.
"There is also a lot of other references to The Exterminator, among other things, the most notable one being that McBain himself wears a welders-mask when Christina sees him for the first time, when he is working on a welding-job on top of a bridge!"
The opening sequence is Dragon(Jackie Chan) hanging around his house and pretending to be training and reciting whenever his father is around.
"In this one, a man walking his dog in Central Park comes across an abandoned car and discovers a dead woman inside."
"Example is the poor fellow whom is disemboweled from his anus, and the scene lasts for about 5 minutes."
"The first episode tells us how the Hitler came to power, and how he was able to build up one of the strongest armies in the world."
"Ling Choi Sin played by Leslie Cheung is a young man down on his luck who goes in search of a monastery for lodging, deep in the woods, a place the villagers seem very afraid to go near."
"In the end they must fight a tree witch with a deadly tongue, and go with Yin deep into the heart of hell to fight a thousand year old evil to save their souls, and bring Ling's ashes back to her home for a proper burial so she may have a chance at reincarnation."
"The essentials are a bodyguard's search and destroy mission as his charge, young Dakota Fanning, is kidnapped from school, which is exactly what Washington was hired to prevent."
"Washington and Fanning have a great chemistry between them and after a troublesome beginning, the bodyguard and his charge become the best of friends."
"Devos is a recurring feature of Audiard in the same way that KArin Viard pops up for Jean-Pierre Jeunet: unconventionally beautiful (she's referred to by everyone as unattractive in this film), versatile and capable of a subordinate profile."
Voight is just OK in the lead--he's been better.
Beatty is also just OK--but it is his debut film and he has guts for taking such a risky role.
And Reynolds is just superb--one of his best acting jobs EVER!
"When a typical Hollywood cop-heroe loses family, friends and pets to murder he is usually given his minute of grief."
Boogie Nights is also roughly based on his life.
"Giardello's mayoral candidacy seems particularly contrived, and I felt his shooting could've been dealt with within the parameters of his regular position, as Leiutenant."
The actor plays him as a little puppy or a homicidal maniac.
As for Michael Caine he's.....well he's Michael Caine.
Wizards of the Lost Kingdom is a movie about a young prince (Simon) who is banished from his kingdom due to his father (the king) being killed by the cliche evil adviser.
"Kenneth Branagh, sentenced through community service to take part in caring for her, complements Helena's charm with woeful melancholy, creating a sentimental, compelling love story in which two people try to help each other find the road to happiness, before time runs out"
Korea was a far off place but the possibility of convicting a Communist and hanging him hit very close to home in the 1950's.
But it opened with a good scene and the killer murdered two victims immediately and flashed forward twenty years later where his son who had witnessed him kill the two people(including his mother) and he even witnessed his fathers suicide is going to a secluded cabin in the woods with his friends and his girlfriend where he attempts to face his fears until a wooden statue comes to life with his fathers spirit.
"Even Dustin Hoffman hams it up, and he barely says an audible word"
"Like the Inspector, his personality was exaggerated."
"McNally does not, since he had to be a dirty thief and steal it."
"Duryea does not, because he is just a chuckling maniac, and we all know that chuckling maniacs do not deserve guns."
Sharon Small's Trudi is the homemaker one (allegedly widowed after September 11th) who gets a little preachy and annoying with her friends (who tend to be a little looser and more creative in their endeavors).
"Orla Brady's character (Siobhan, a lawyer) is perhaps the most damaged but still very sympathetic of the women, as she wrestles with her kind but self-absorbed husband Hari (Jaffrey, formerly of Spooks) in his driven desire to have a child with her, regardless of her needs."
You just wish that women like her really existed.
"Whether or not she is approachable as a lovable character in the immediate sense, we are naturally prone to sympathize with her situation."
"Whether or not her performance is as immediately gratifying as Sophie's Choice, The Devil Wears Prada, Angels In America or other such work, it is a triumph."
"The character is supposed to be about 6 or 7, as she is urged to think about going to school."
"And whenever Fisher, the narrator, gets off track, the hypnotist does chastize him and tells him to get back on with the story."
Can u recommend me some of his older movies where he gives a memorable performance
"If this had been an western family, the locusts would have won at the end, punishing the farmer for his pride, lust, and gluttony."
Red Buttons received an Oscar for his touching performance of another GI who falls in love in Japan (though the Japanese women who plays opposite him also did a remarkable job).
If you are not a person that enjoyed the Waltons or Little House...U will not understand nor enjoy these movies... Now about Loves Abiding Joy...I knew HE was bad news from the start of the movie....I wish it would have shown more of the end instead of letting you just think it.
"Even after he reluctantly takes her back, he's not too upset when she's kidnapped."
"Some flaws they had though like changing the Joker he now has no red lips and looks like more blackish hair and black pupils, hes still voiced by Mark Hamill which is a plus I guess."
"Jacques Audiard the director must be making quite a name for himself in France, and rightly so."
You really get the impression of the total timidity and bewilderment of the Bolvian peasant to Che's revolutionary ideas or of the difficulties that his men faced with hunger and the terrain.
"Once there, the writer wanders around the dusty rooms and corridors, until music and a glimpse of a waltzing couple lead him into an empty room."
Annie Galipeau is lovely in her first large role.
"The lovely Danish actress Sonja Richter steals this film from under the noses of everyone, no small feat considering the terrific performances surrounding her."
"SPOILER ALERT Walentin refuses to respond to anyone --until he confronts the gifted Anna, whose whimsical and mischievous manner brings the poor old battered devil back from a self-imposed death sentence."
"Gary Cooper overtops them all, looming large, - but when did he ever loom small"
And an American production would have demanded he say he liked only movies that were popular favorites.
She also said that Robert Blake portrayed a person with anger and impulse control who had a conscience but couldn't control himself superbly.
Antwone Fisher is so innocent and yet he was abused such just because he was not white.
"Antwone Fisher has been married to the same women for ten years and he never fooled around with women, coke, cigars, weed, alcohol, or any of those things that are very popular in the places he was growing up."
However the driver tells that he had only six passengers when he parked the bus.
Jim Carrey's illustriousness will be at such a supreme level that he will announce his presidential candidacy for the 2004 White House playoffs.
"Carrey plays Bruce Nolan, a televison reporter who is so utterly obsessed in being the main anchor that he holds God to total culpability for his own contretemps."
Carrey is back in his habitual almighty comedic form in `Bruce Almighty'.
Since we have Indian blood he connects to this movie.
"In bed that night, she begins fantasizing about the Beast and his rape-turned-consensual tryst with the former lady of the house."
And at the end; when the creature bites the doctor's neck to take a piece of his veins.
"Martin Sheen, Michelle Phillips, Stuart Margolin and the late Vic Morrow are the human stars of this movie about a young man looking for answers about his brother's death."
"The killer is portrayed by Sondra Locke, and she makes the character of Jennifer Spencer an interesting mix of compassion and cold-bloodedness."
"Locke's cold eyes and frosty voice, when either trying to comfort her hospitalized sister or dispensing vengeance toward the rapists, are very effective in painting a portrait of a woman wronged whose years of suffering and rage are now beginning to bear deadly fruit."
"You can take or leave the idea that some wrongs deserve to be punished by any means necessary, but as the mystery behind the slayings becomes clear to Harry (a realization that, wisely, is not spelled out with dialogue), he is presented with a choice -- what to do about a killer whose motivations he can sympathize with but whose conduct he is bound by law to not tolerate."
Lubitsch's last production but not his least interesting film.
Somehow largely ignored by critics as he couldn't finish it himself and as the movie wasn't co-signed by Preminger who he did most of the staging... A very strange mix of musical (a remembrance of The Merry Widow ?
"First, we would get checked out by a doctor and he would prescribe some much needed rest and perhaps staying by the sea."
After listening to Alvin speak about family she reconsiders.
Later Alvin's lawn mower loses its brakes and nearly kills him.
The night before Alvin leaves the man's yard he takes his hat off to him.
One becomes as taken with him as the man who offers him his back yard to stay in.
"If there's justice in the afterlife then Alvin Straight, his brother, and Richard Farnsworth are together sitting at a bar."
"Mark Hamill flexes his acting chops once again as Luke Skywalker in these scenes, and watching him as a fully matured Jedi Knight makes for an unforgettable performance."
"AK's always been good at comedy, but he takes it to a different level here."
Rajpal Yadav is his typical annoying self(sick of his over-the-top act in every movie).
"It involves the kidnapping and, eventually, the rape of Heston's daughter (Hershey) by him and his gang."
"McLaglen is able to handle the bloody story with significant panache, and Heston's performance as an aging lawman was probably the best one he ever gave in any of his 1970s films."
Regal and Taylor then grab London and suplex him face-first into the ladder!
"Unfortunately, they went 0 for 3 with her."
"Yet Kusturica brilliantly examines this theme through his own unique, stylistic singularity."
"A big opera star stuck on himself faces his fears, finds humility and love along the way, and belts out a lot of hit numbers, too."
The photography by Sol Polito is arguably his finest achievement - gorgeous compositions and lighting with delicate shadowing.
Max Steiner contributes one of his most complex and beautiful scores - the epitome of his classical leit motif method.
"I am from the country, therefore boys with an accent have no appeal to me, but for him I would definitely make an exception."
"Callahan, looking fragile sometimes and out of place, his demeanor still was unwavering."
The well known director made an excellent job here and it is a shame to tell that he was out of the game all this time
Also the people he sits with at the baseball games are just as obsessed as he is.
"Moon is great, check out the ongoing conversation with the drum tech, and see him playing side saddle whilst having a bass drum head replaced!"
Unfortunately the Abbot finds out that he went outside the wall and there is hell to pay.
"Hyde's character is a bit harder to enjoy because he is more realistic and do we really need to see the orphan story for the umpteenth time, although I will say that the writers came up with a brilliant story arc for him in the last seasons."
"Jackie, played by Family Guy voice artist Mila Kunis is hilarious and she has a nails on a chalkboard type voice, which actually fits her character."
"A somewhat goofy guy, who always wears the same suit, you cannot help but love him."
There are three specials that I have not watched yet....I'm saving them to spring on my best friend next time he visits.
"He'll watch them, even if I have to chain him up and paint him with Excrement!"
"Neil Simon has quite a body of work, but it is the Odd Couple that carried him to fame."
"Jimmy Stewart was the imperfect element in my judgment; he did well with the comedic portions of his part, but he was never convincing as a New York book publisher, and a bit too-old for the part of Henderson anyhow."
"The film has sprightly dialogue, charm, and a little magic of its own in the fey charm of the witches and the torments Gillian must undergo in her battle with herself, and to win the man she loves."
How the heck could a guy like that kid get a hot police babe and his dad let him go free.
"Of course I was content that at the end the Dalmatians were saved again, but I would have liked to know what was going to happen to Cruella after she had lost her whole property."
"Jim Morris got one, followed his heart and got a chance to live his dream."
Stewart Granger loses his British safari hunter stereotype to play a haggard retired buffalo hunter who is revered in the West as one of the best.
"Much as been written of Mr Farnsworth's presentation of Alvin Straight, though I'm not sure there are words to express the exquisite balance of bemused sadness and wise innocence he conjured for us."
"Given the realities of production economics, I'm not sure full credit has been given Mr Lynch for the courage he showed in allowing the story to develop so slowly."
Noni Hazlehurst's tour-de-force performance (which won her an AFI award) is at least on par with her effort in FRAN three years later.
"While the best of Shaw has always been his ideas and his dialogue rather than his bare plots, in ARMS AND THE MAN, the plot sparkles as well and the master manages happy endings for all concerned."
"The early (1932) motion picture version (from Shaw's own screenplay) of this most traditional and traditionally funny of Shaw's stage satires, and one of his first to make a real hit on this side of the Atlantic, has long been among the missing."
"Helena Bonham Carter went on, after cutting her teeth on televised roles like this, to a major film career that will bring many viewers to this early role."
"They should not be disappointed, for Ms. Carter gives a performance in line with the layered innocence audiences have come to expect from her, but under James Cellan Jones' somewhat pedestrian direction (and despite the BBC's uniformly beautiful and well observed physical production), the role's mischievous fire (and her outrage at being underestimated in the last act) is banked at only about 80% of it's potential."
"It's a fine, appealing performance, but doesn't go for the physical comedy implicit in the early scene where the young soldier can barely stay awake despite his mortal peril."
Proves again what an excellent actress she is.
"Now, someone recently told me he had grave misgivings about DE VIERDE MAN."
His 'Stairway to Paradise' and his duet with Le Gene on 'S Wonderful' is 's marvelous'.
"I truly enjoyed the movie, however, I did not realize that Little Richard had so many things going on in his life."
"The author of Forbidden Love, Norma, was revealed as a fraud in the media but this move really does give her ample opportunity to clear her name."
"In between the rapid cuts away and back to the board it is not hard to spot that after Luzhin's combination culminating in a queen sacrifice, his rook on d1 is still pinned by black's rook at c1 against his king in the corner at h1."
"I realize that everyone refers to j.j. as the artist in the family but, there was a real family that has the real artist, and he hasn't gotten any credit in this sight yet."
So if you don't mind if someone can tell the name of the real artist I would also like to tell him job well done.
"It seems to me that the reality of the car crash, the way that it is filmed (no explosion, for example) is a likely 'splice' point, and that any particular sequence containing an existential/dream/coma/non-reality feel to it -- whether it's shown onscreen before or after the crash -- is actually a part of Aames' personal journey toward self-realization inside of his own mind."
Frank sings it accompanying himself on the piano at an empty Hollywood Bowl.
The acting was very good although I thought that the actress playing Julie could have had more emotion behind her lines.
"The situation is unusually intriguing: the farmers in the province have two champions, a benevolent boss (for once) and a philosopher-samurai who starts a sort of Grange; both run afoul of the usual local gangsters, who want the crops to fail because it increases their gambling revenues and their chances to snap up some land; their chief or powerful ally is a seeming puritan who is death on drinking and gambling but secretly indulges his own perverse appetites."
"Even though her comedic-timing is different than Lucy's, she is still believable."
"Daniel Pino is thinner and less charismatic than the real Desi was, but he does have his own charm and does a mostly decent job with Desi's accent, especially in the opening scene."
"May embarks on an uninhibited sexual affair with Darren whose character is sympathetic to her at first, but his flawed nature is quickly revealed through the pressures of the women who surround him."
Donald Sutherland's Russian accent is suspect but he plays the only character in this film that has some warmth.
Without giving away too muchChandu is an Occidental sorcerer who goes also by this Eastern name and who also loves and protects his niece against a sect of killers.
"One thing I liked about this movie is that unlike other post-apocalyptic movies, the movie didn't prefer to give any boring social commentary and instead focused on this one guy and his longing for a regular life."
Bruce willis surprised me here as he didn't act the regular tough guy here but he gave a good performance of a confused man who is in love.
"EVer since I saw this movie, I have become so obsessed with her."
"Where is the Wonder is very cool and elegant, and her People number, surrounded by an orchestra who tap for her at the song's close, is stunning."
"Act II is set in New York City's Bergdof Goodman, with Streisand acting kooky in high fashion get-ups (when she playfully stomps on the mink, the audience watching the tape actually gasps)."
"Candy's wallet contains a roll of microfilm invaluable to the Communist movement, and it's her last job for ex-boyfriend Richard Kiley to make the delivery."
Peters gets her best role as the moll-with-a-heart-of-gold Candy.
"Candy is not innocent, yet she's very vulnerable, constantly being passed between and slapped around by men."
"Widmark knocks her cold on first meeting and wakes her by pouring beer over her face, yet by the final act he's a lot more tender to her (after she cops one hell of a going-over from Kiley)."
"Thelma Ritter is brilliant as stoolie Moe, well-deserving of her Oscar nomination."
"One of the redeeming features though, is Scrat :) Very very funny character, even if he serves no purpose :"
"Carter's depiction of an ALS victim is strong, perhaps even overdone at times (sometimes her dialog dissolves into undistinguishable mutterings)."
"The Genie offers three wishes to Abu at their first of three encounters; three times does the Genie laugh loud in the mountain gorges, and three are his considerations about human frailty, before he departs."
"Three are the instruments of justice: the magical eye that shows Abu the future, the magical carpet that transports him just in time to save Ahmad and the Princess, and the bow-and-arrow to execute Jaffar."
Also Molly Ringwald is in this having the time of her life playing a bitchy faded actress.
"This is one of his most recent productions, but I was amazed to see that Waters still has that trailer-park touch."
Even as he could not swim he was a waterman.
Billy Zane playing Miller does what he can with a role that doesn't afford him any glory until the crucial end.
"The head of the country's biggest oil company appoints himself as the new president, with US backing, and these young Irish film makers have it all on camera."
"Old Edie is almost fully bedridden, a pile of papers, clothes and dirty dishes growing around her."
This is the first of her work I have seen and I am definitely inclined to see her other roles.
"Every now and again she drops little amusing lines, just to make this film one of the best I've ever seen!!"
"When a drought sweeps the land and there is a threat of famine, David suspects that the Lord is punishing him and his people for his sin..."
"Von Trier has a very stylized way to tell a story, at least he did have with Europa."
"What was far more shocking then even Bone's death is that his killer Tito Zapatti was given probation by the well respected NY State Judge Walter Stern, Martin Landau."
"they decide to give Jake the ultimate freedom: from his innermost fears, from what he believes to be himself."
"A man named Jack Torrance (played brilliantly by Jack Nicholson)and his family move into a large, secluded hotel to watch over it for the off-season."
The kicker is that the previous caretaker of the hotel savagely murdered his wife and two girls.
"Jenny immediately falls in love for him, they have sex and she discloses her true identity to him, telling that she is the powerful superhero G-Girl."
"Jenny turns Matt's life into hell, while he has a romance with Hannah."
"They were OK matches, but DiBiase deserved better in his final pay per view match."
"Even Peter Lorre, (Contreras) had a role in this film and had a bad misfortune in his bathroom that caused him to faint."
Redford is part of the famdamily as he is always around.
"The same applies to Neal Burns, who uses worms as bait, he also needed help but would not accept the fact that he needed help."
Redford himself does a superb job as a narrator.
"The story itself is engaging: one man, James Cole (played by Bruce Willis in a heart-warming performance) travels several decades to the past to retrieve information about a virus that's wiped out mankind and left only a few survivors alive living underground: with the information he'll collect, scientists hope to find a cure so everyone in the future can return to the surface."
"Brad Pitt still steals all the scenes he's in, playing Jeffrey Goines almost a prelude to his Tyler Durden character in Fight Club a rich kid with some anarchist/non-conformist ideas who's also crazy and, according to Cole, perhaps responsible for the virus."
"Surprising was also Bruce Willis' performance: his I didn't remember very well, but it's beautiful and full of sensibility; he plays a man who spent almost all his life underground, and when he comes to the past you'll share his childish fascination with something as simple as breathing the fresh air of the morning or watching the sun go up."
"Cole is a rather ambiguous character, Peoples' tried to imbue some darkness in him, and he does other disturbing things to other people and to himself: the scene where he removes his own teeth reveals how far his dementia has gone unchecked."
"Ironically Cole didn't start as a crazy character, but when he starts warning everyone about the end of the world, he's considered mad and convinced it's all in his mind, until he arrives at a point when he can't distinguish past from future, reality from fiction."
"One of the fun twists in the narrative is when Cole's shrink, Dr. Kathryn Railly, finds undeniable proof he's really from the future and now has to convince him again of his mission to save the world."
"Madeleine Stowe is very good playing Dr. Railly, she drew many different emotions from me in her performance."
"Railly's character shares that fatalism, the more she tries to help Cole first dealing with his 'madness' then helping him in his mission the more they're sucked into tragedy."
Flashbacks show a 15 year old horribly ashamed of causing his High School Baseball Team's Championship defeat.
"Belushi goes on with his pitiful life, seemingly happy, but always wondering what if... For what seems to be several days, Belushi experiences a different life, one of enormous success, admired and hated by others in equal measure."
Loren proves here that she is an actress of caliber when well directed.
"Claire Denis has produced a movie that has some of the grand underpinnings of Indochine, the complex and unspoken relationship between France and her colonial subjects."
"I was struck with the dignity of Potee, with his struggle to maintain his dignity among his peers and with his white bosses."
"Director Tay Garnett gets the most out of his lavish budget, using all the resources at his command to present every fabulous scene as effectively as possible."
"The dog star,Charlie B. Barkin, is murdered by his formal business partner, Carface, (who is absolutely diabolical by the way)."
Tess Nanavati is a relatively new directer and writer so I think she deserves a lot of kudos for making this film.
Almost immediately she is drugged and shipped off to the family's estate in Cornwall.
Domini Enfilren (Marlene Dietrich) has spent most of her life caring for her father.
Dietrich is always dressed to the 9s (even in the middle of the desert) and strikes hysterical poses to show off the clothes and her body.
"Of particular fascination to him is Scarlet, an embittered worker from Spain and relegated to the express line where she is the unsung model of efficiency."
"A lonely six year old whose imagination kicks into high gear when he is crestfallen to learn his quarrelling parents Peter (Sean Bridgers, late of DEADWOOD) and Jules (Brooke Bloom, CBS: Miami) suddenly decide to divorce, leaving him to his own devices and unleashing a new tenant a zombie in his closet."
Jake actually gets this seed planted while playing with neighborhood friend Dillon (Matthew Josten) who provides him with a print out off the internet of FAQ re: zombies.
"Indie newcomer Shelli Ryan who wrote and directed blends domestic drama with underlings of horror but the former (smartly) outweighs the latter, with a decent story buoyed by fine acting(De Marco is the rare breed of child actor where he is a CHILD and not 'acting' - all his nuances are very evident of the awkward, shy, introverted child that many can relate too (I certainly can)."
"the upside down shot of Peter carrying his son in the same position while having some fun in the backyard), and the editing is relatively flawless."
"The metaphor of a monster acting as surrogate to domestic abuse may be a bit heavy-handed but again, the child's fear of a thing under his bed is universal"
"I remember the Oscar broadcast that year, with Travolta looking absolutely devastated when he didn't win."
Our story takes place in jolly old England where a boy named Oliver manages to work his way out of the orphanage.
"Directed, produced, and stars Warren Beatty as the ace crime fighter going up against Al Pacino's evil Big Boy Caprice and his mob of thugs."
Allot of the shows are different as you'd imagine and he has even more funny jokes.
"and of course, she says, I don't want to be watered on by Fini!"
"Disappointed, she returns home and divorces him."
Soon after she experiences a strong mutual attraction to a young virile man she meets whilst out horse riding.
But the train stops in time and the apparently ill driver is taken to recuperate at a nearby hotel where he later commits suicide by shooting himself.
"Jared tries to smooth talk Maya, but she still has the upper hand decides to invite him to her place."
Marcus Patrick is very brilliant the man who saves Maya and coaches her into a new world.
A famous conductor decides after a heart attack to go back to the village where he was born to live a quiet life.
Beautiful Frida Hallgren is enchanting with her pretty smile and her subtle acting.
"The story is easy to comprehend and many turning points are gripping, the actors and actresses do fairly good jobs, especially Jake Gyllenhaal and Chris Cooper, the hero finally gets what he wants, and it!|s a true story."
"!SSBut I don!|t regret it,!"" his father told Kobayashi, !SSat least I tried.!"" It is his father!|s confession that encourages him to resign his job and apply for astronautships despite the fact that he hurts his legs and needs to move around on a wheelchair."
"In this 1943 film, Judy Garland is deemed not to be ready for the big-time yet by the man who loves her-Van Heflin."
"Wasn't Spring Byington too old to be the widowed mother of 5 children, with four of them appearing to look like her grandchildren?"
The goal of any James Bond game is to make the player feel like he is fulfilling an ultimate fantasy: step into the shoes of Agent 007.
"Bond screenwriter Bruce Feirstein worked on the script, and he's done a good job of making the game the same but different to the movie."
"Sean Connery's Bond relied mostly on his raw wit and talent, so you only have a few gadgets, but they're good ones."
"Also, you can only play Bond villains rather than Bond himself or the other heroes of the game."
You can do the math--18 segments in 120 minutes means each director had seven minutes to tell her or his story.
"But Washington's character, though he's killing for a reason, does not particularly enjoy doing what he does."
As usual Lorre is his charming self as the debonair Mr. Moto.
"Stepin Fetchit is on board, and while he speaks in a stereotypical manner his lines are funny, not demeaning to his intelligence, and he actually saves the day in his brief time on screen"
"Lassalle is an unraveling mystery, opening up for us to slowly understand his ulterior motives and what lies within his possibly sinister brain."
"One of the group gets his limbs twisted while suspended in the air, while a grisly opening act displays the carnage left in the wake of one man's desire."
"The titular student, starving in an empty garret, makes a deal with the Devil-- the Devil gives him a bottomless sack of gold, in exchange for anything in this room."
The Devil chooses the student's reflection in his mirror.
Mike Binder's Indian Summer knows this and explores this like he was twelve years old.
its up to the local police chief and some other characters to try and stop him.
Flair wins by DQ after Edge slams him with his MITB briefcase.
Carlito turns his back on Masters & gets a roll-up on him to eliminate him.
"Vince McMahon states that his night is not over yet, & says that Edge cashes in his Money In The Bank opportunity to challenge Cena for the title."
Edge nails another Spear & covers for the shocking three count as he has beat Cena & has won the WWE Championship for the first time in his career.
The EC match was also good & the shocking of Edge cashing in his MITB opportunity is definitely the most shockingest on the PPV show.
"When it comes to creating a universe George Lucas is the undisputed master and his final Star Wars film is very, very good (and more appropriately rated in comparison to the two previous films in the original saga)."
Carrie Fisher was never really a good actress but she does a decent job and is certainly passable.
Ian McDiarmid appears in this film and having seen Episode III I can safely say that he is one of the most accomplished villains ever.
Palance was great--very scary and very physically adept in his own stunts.
Mostel played a heavy typical of his early work--a greasy and cowardly sort of evil.
"Poor Ivy: Though to the manner born, she had the bad luck to marry a charming wastrel (Richard Ney)."
Richard Gere gives his best-ever performance as the soft-spoken agent worn-out by the task.
Claire Danes for once has the opportunity to get into a solid role (instead of the junk she normally gets stuck in) and she makes the most of playing the novice.
"Richard Gere is a Liberal, but he gives his best in his performance here."
"In typical children's fashion the bad guy meets his demise too easily either by tripping, falling, getting electricuted or doing something dumb that works against them."
"Delmer Daves is uncompromising in his depiction on these men who are brave, as it were, almost by coincidence."
"Garfield is in angry denial of his blindness and the film makes no excuses, There's no free candy for anyone in this world, as his buddy tells him."
"Cristina Raines has her wooden moments, but came though in a big way for the most part."
"This was Alice Brady's last film, as she died months after its release"
The only drawbacks that didn't seem to fit with the theme were some of the parts that got a bit more 'adult' in nature such as 'Chandler's rather sexual remarks about the serpent lady that was presented to him as a silhouette.
"Sid comes out of his cave yawning, and saw that his family abandoned him."
"Meanwhile, nearby a human tribe, Soto (voiced by Goran Visnjic), an evil saber toothed tiger, wants revenge against the tribe's leader for wiping out half of his pack just by stealing his infant son, Roshan, away from him."
"For instance, Manny talks through his trunk saying, I'M NOT GOING!"
"Jennifer then responds to him, What do you say if you go jump into the TAR PIT!?"
Louise Brooks is not a name that most average movie buffs may readily know but as soon as you see her you will be mesmerised and you'll want to know more.
"Polanski is a good actor, too; I don't agree with the occasional disparaging remarks made about his performance here."
"Suddenly, people begin to get murdered... Director Miraglia had already proved his incredible talent for style, atmosphere and colorful creepiness with The Night Evelyn Came Out of the Grave and he makes use of these elements even far more effectively in this gem."
"The ravishing Barbara Bouchet (one of my favorite actresses) must be one of the most stunningly beautiful ladies ever to appear on screen, and she is a great actress too."
"Bouchet's presence has graded up many Italian flicks, among other appearances she starred in three of the greatest Cult-masterpieces of Italian 70s cinema within one year (1972): Fernando Di Leo's Milano Calibro 9, Lucio Fulci's Giallo-highlight Don't Torture a Duckling and this unforgettable gem."
Ceasar Romero is her producer who takes a chance on her after the original leading lady leaves because he thinks she's dating the millionaire whose car I just mentioned.
And Vera-Ellen does pretty well with her lines since she's not really an actress.
However the Overlook hotel has a murky past with a previous caretaker murdering his entire family before committing suicide & Danny has the ability to 'shine' which means he has psychic powers that let him see & hear things 'ordinary' people can't.
"In keeping with Miike's working practice of taking any work that comes his way and then grafting his own sensibilities onto the script, this is at heart a fairly basic yakuza thriller, with a morally ambiguous cop chasing a gang which his lawyer brother has fallen in with."
This couple only knew each other for two days and they decided to get married by a Justice of the Peace (Judge) and it is pouring rain when they pull up to the Judge's home and find out he is not home and will not return until the next day.
"This Columbo episode is probably noted more for the director, Steven Spielberg, as one of his early films."
"After all, Columbo meets his match in Jack Cassidy's character."
Falk's familiarity as Columbo makes him watchable after viewing this episode repeatedly over the years.
"It's not about who does it, how and why, it the familiarness of Columbo and his likability which scores high with viewers like myself"
And one of the most courageous was when he stood up to his abusive foster mother and sister.
I recommend this film to anyone who ever fell for another person and the other side tried to take advantage of him or her.
The doctor (James Finlayson--in his last film with the team) recommends an ocean voyage.
Wes Craven did an excellent job and I hope that he makes more films like this one
"Later on, McQueen would say he hated this film and that he was the blob."
"Just as Wally Koz's surprisingly decent 555 was seemingly put together with help from various members of his family, Mirage seems to have been a joint production from relatives of the director."
Chris (Jennifer McAllister) and her boyfriend Greg (Kenny Johnson) meet up with amusing new age hippies Trip (Kevin McParland) and Mary (Nicole Anton) at a make shift camp site in the midst of the dune-like wilderness.
Before long an unseen someone driving a truck with tinted windows joins the gathering with a unique set of tricks up his sleeve.
"One guy gets buried up to his neck in sand before coming face to face with a grenade, while another ends up literally legless after loosing a battle with a chain and a pick up truck!"
The scaffolding scenes are brilliant and you can really empathise with this guy because he is treated as an outcast.
Kurt Russell is good and unlike other comments I do not feel this will have a negative impact on his career (unlike maybe Escape from LA - sequels are such fickle creatures!).
Sean Pertwee has really done his late father proud by continuing the families noble Sci-Fi lineage.
"Since recently watching Gillian Armstrong's later film, Charlotte Gray, I was acutely aware of the sort of actress which impresses her."
"In conclusion, I would like to praise screenwriter Laura Jones for her stunning dialogue, director Gillian Armstrong for her understanding of actors, and the great Russell Boyd for his brilliant, understated cinematography (please see his work in Tender Mercies)"
A handsome but fake actor (Andre Telefair) shows her the ropes of how to be the typical pretentious Hollywood star.
"Davies abandons her slapstick friend and father for the good life, but of course learns that is not who she really is."
"Marion Davies is wonderful throughout, as she - outrageously - runs the gamut of emotions required of a serious actress."
"William Haines is his usual wonderful comedic self, and there are cameos by Charles Chaplin, John Gilbert, and other famous stars of the day, including the director of the film, King Vidor."
"His beautiful balancing of images, striking use of colors, sweeping choreographic movements, all are the work of a genuine artist, using the screen as his canvas."
"As its narrative unfolded, it became obvious that this work is not about story per se, but rather an artist's impressionistic rendering of fleeting images of his subject."
Northam is superb and the subtlety in his performance is excellent.
The only character representation I was bothered by was Sam's; he was made to look unbecomingly silly.
Santiago has been instructed to save it for his next bout.
"As talented a boxer as Rodrigues is, as she approaches the zenith of the game, she will eventually lose to a male."
"Rodrigues is finally matched against her boy friend, Douglas."
"Michelle Rodriguez can look pretty mean, what with her muscular bulk and her eyes glowing under her lowered brow, but once you get used to the idea that this is a girl who can beat you to a pulp anytime she wants, and once you hear the feminine contours of her supersegmentals, she ain't bad."
"The director, Karyn Kusama, has chosen her talent carefully."
"The story of a drifter, his sheep ranch boss, and the boss's daughter is not for all tastes, but it's still very intriguing."
Terence Cooper takes a turn as the ranch owner who pays a little too much of the wrong sort of attention to his daughter (Regan).
"When the lawyer saves the life of a small girl (none of the locals will help the endangered tot -- you find out why later on in the film), he inadvertently incurs the wrath of a malevolent spirit, the woman in black."
"The viewer only sees her a few times, but you feel her malevolent presence in every frame."
"As the camera creeps up on the lawyer while he's reading through legal papers, you expect to see the woman in black at any moment."
"When the lawyer goes out to the generator shed to turn on the electricity for the creepy old house, the camera snakes in on him and you think she'll pop up there, too."
Terry Gilliam traveled again to the future (he had already done it in Brazil) to tell this story about a virus that's destroying the human race.
"Sniffing an opportunity, Presidential aides get her installed in the protocol department for the U.S. government."
"Sunny learns her way around the jungle of the U.S. government very, very well."
"Tony's henchman - Paulie, his nephew Christopher, his Uncle Junior (the titular head of the mob), his good friend Pussy - are all fully fleshed-out characters."
"Let the Pope live with him, is the response."
"Patsy Kelly is the only ugly femme in the 30's movies that actually turns me on (something tells me she was a spitfire in real life); and the musical numbers have a real professional production (Busby Berkley'ish) quality, that blew me away from what I am used to in this genre."
Garciadiego has accomplished a perfect adaptation from the novel: even the grand maestro Garcia Marquez should be proud of her superb work.
"And hats off to Arturo Ripstein who has so ably concerted the whole effort into a gem, a ruby, and so refined, so elegant, so sensitive, so touchingly..... El Coronel - Fernando Lujan - is waiting to get his pension, while he continues to live in his ramshackle timber dwelling deep in the Colombian jungle (however, filmed elsewhere, NOT in Colombia) with his fighting cock and his wife (in that order?)."
Soon the inmates find a diary of a previous inmate behind a brick which deals with his obsession of occult and black magic themes leading to his escape from the cell.
"carmen is a pretty good character, its really funny to see how stupid and overemotional she can be sometimes."
"i feel bad for the guy who plays max, he looks much younger then he actually is!"
"and yeah, angie is a little stereotypical, but she has her funny moments."
"Fiennes illustrates a feature-long lecture by iek, and does so in two ways: by providing exemplary film clips and putting iek on real (or reconstructed) locations from the movies he speaks about."
"It's always nice to watch neatly captioned scenes from great movies (although Revenge of the Sith got here as well), but the main attraction of A Pervert's Guide is iek himself."
"The film has all the virtues of a splendid two-and-a-half hours lecture: lots of ground are covered, many perspectives employed, even some first-rate wisecracks made (when iek travels on a Melanie Daniels' boat from The Birds [63] and tries to think as she did, he comes up with: I want to f**k Mitch!)."
I dare you all: who will have enough guts to approach iek and defy him?
Virginia begins to question just what is growing inside of her...
The atmosphere is good & there's a fair bit of tension as what Virginia has inside of her & Dr. Meyerling's sinister plans aren't fully revealed until the last possible moment.
"Northam very much looks the part of the quiet and disheartened man at the centre of the tale, and does well with his role."
"Lucy Lui is an actress that has a resume that doesn't quite fit her talent, but she has a look about her that just fits this movie."
"Welles himself is always dependable as an actor- even if his accent isn't anything special- and Hayworth herself makes a scene a little more lush, despite her path in the story."
"Patrick Bergin plays the con artist, and though he falls a long distance from handsome, he picks on plain Janes and has enough screen presence to make one believe the women could swallow his line."
"Alvin Sanders has plenty of FBI eyes watching him and winds up getting hit by a brick in the jaw, and David Morse,(Edgar Clenteen), Hack '02 TV Series, decides to zero in on poor Alvin and use him as a so called Fish Hook to attract the criminals."
"In this critically acclaimed psychological thriller based on true events, Gabriel (Robin Williams), a celebrated writer and late-night talk show host, becomes captivated by the harrowing story of a young listener and his adoptive mother (Toni Collette)."
The How did he lose his leg?
"ending, with Ms. Collette planning her new life, should be chopped off, and sent to deleted scenes land."
"And, director Patrick Stettner definitely evokes Hitchcock - he even makes getting a sandwich from a vending machine suspenseful."
"The mother is played by Mitzi Kapture,(Jill Dunne) who suddenly walks in on her daughter and Zack making out and then all kinds of problems seem to surface."
"Since the lead character is seen in present day, the audience knows she will remain alive."
"To me, what Chocolat is really about is how a mother's actions affect her daughter."
"Had France not been affected at all by her mother's actions, the flashback aspect would be irrelevant."
In the book Gallagher is a harder and meaner man than Foster has him here.
"Even as McLaglen is spending his money on a drunken spree, the IRA is constantly in the shadows watching him and counting every farthing."
"Dan is an expert at giving advice for everyday life, yet he comes to realize that things aren't so picture perfect in his own."
"If you've seen Steve Carell in The Office or Little Miss Sunshine, you'd know that he is incomparable with comedic timing and a tremendously dynamic actor as well."
He was extremely good at this too although I have never seen him deliver a comic line before.
I did not know what to expect from Jewel's performance but I think she did rather well.
"Denzel Washington breaks his rule of not making any action movies with this movie and luckily, for him he gets to play a great character."
"Soldiers are able to retrieve the case, but the terrorist makes his way to a hotel where he attempts to hide out."
"This time around, Blackadder is no longer royal(or even particularly close to being any such thing)... instead, rather a butler to the Prince Regent, portrayed by Hugh Laurie(who replaces Tim McInnerny, who presence is sorely missed, and that hole is never filled... his character had an innocent charm... while he was a bumbling and complete moron, we can't help but care for him, which isn't at all true of his replacement) as being intolerably daft(which he apparently was, according to the Trivia page), not to mention loud-mouthed and utterly non-threatening."
"Edmund can now do just about what he pleases, and does so."
"Baldrick doesn't change from last season... he's still rather pathetic and stupid, leading to silly humor."
But then he winds up dead outside Harlow's apartment and that platinum blond hair makes her easy to identify.
"Gable is well cast as the con man who develops a conscience, a part he'd play often, most notably in my favorite Gable film, Honky Tonk."
"Though I really didn't feel anything for Lance's character, and felt his wife could have done much better with anyone else."
"Freeman has fun with his character, as he appears an outsider in lower class world that Vega's character, Scarlett, inhabits."
"While Freeman's presence gives this film credibility from the get-go, he shows a certain amount of charm and fun not usually seen from him."
"Towards the end of the film, she successfully conveys the growth of her character."
Yet there's certainly an artist at work here and am anxious to see if he'll take this road again
"Once a successful playwright, his last several plays on Broadway have flopped."
"Caine gives his usual excellent performance, and he does exhibit a knack for playing cultured, refined, and intellectual men."
"D.W. Griffith could have made any film he wanted to after the enormous financial success of 'The Birth of a Nation'; he chose to make the most technically ambitious film to that date, 'Intolerance.'"
"An explosion ripped through the building, to begin with, and she and Hermann had to sign the papers on a pile of rubble on the street."
"Trouble arises, as happens in Rainer Werner Fassbinder's melodramas, and as its one of his best and most provocative, we see as Maria (uncommonly gorgeous Hanna Schygulla in this role) will do a two-face: she'll stand by her man, even if it means working at a bar for American GI's and, even still after she hears from a fellow soldier that Hermann has died will still stand by him as she sleeps with a black GI and comes close to bearing his child (that is, naturally, until he reappears and a murder occurs and he takes the rap so she can be safe), or working for a German businessman (effectively sympathetic Ivan Desny) and becoming his sometimes mistress and rising star in the company."
"Maria will do whatever it takes to be successful, but she'll always be married."
"Most telling are the opposing costumes one sees in one scene when she finally is with her husband, where she stars in one of those super-lustful black lingerie pieces and high heels, and then moves on to a dress without even thinking about it."
Just like he must have cared more for animals at one point.
Bruce Davison is convincing but all he can really play is a nice guy.
There are other examples of how a clever director can elevate his film to the level of a very enjoyable thriller.
"Who was one essential officer of the CIA up to 1980, when he became vice president?"
I was looking forward to seeing it on DVD as I had never seen it before and being a great admirer of Bette Davis wanted to see her in a role considered one of her early great ones.
Well she looked fine but I'm sorry to say her London cockney accent just made me laugh.
"Bette Davis was one of the greatest film actors, make no mistake, but here she did make one."
That means everything from breaking out of a Nazi dungeon to thwarting Hitler's war machine and even the Fuhrer himself.
As one character says he once sat on the edge overlooking the Grand Canyon and came to realize how infinitely small he was.
"Newcombe isn't pretending but numerically there are maybe still insufficient people to appreciate him in his own lifetime, and DiG!"
"Artemisia, unfortunately couldn't go as far as she could have because of the prejudice against women in the arts."
"Michel Serrault plays Orazio, her father."
"Grant and Loy are perfect for their roles, of course (Grant is particularly funny as he watches the house's costs zoom out of control)."
"Managing to steal every scene he's in, Douglas is understatedly hilarious while he watches the Blandings lurch from crisis to crisis."
Buddhism) and wondering if some other path could take him to salvation.
"At first I saw the name vs. driver's license problem as Tony having led sort of a double life, what with the killing people and sleeping around that he kept secret from most people."
"He figures out that he CAN fool some people with KF's cards, like hotel receptionists, but it won't get him out of Purgatory."
"Partially, but even without her, I'd still see it."
"Seems sweet, honest, nice...just like she is in real life."
But she doesn't do things the normal teenager would do.
Raj tells her the situation and bribes her with money and she agrees.
Raj tells Priya that he has found a girl.
"Mr. Blandings, a New York ad executive, decides to move his family to the Connecticut suburbs and build himself a nice house there."
Neil Simon had a knack for dialog and nowhere is this more evident than the lines he gives WALTER MATTHAU and JACK LEMMON as opposite types in THE ODD COUPLE--a mixture of comedy and sadness that depends entirely on the believability of two such mismatched friends sharing an apartment.
"Lemmon is neatnik Felix Ungar, bent on suicide after the divorce from his wife and reluctantly agreeing to share an apartment with Oscar Madison (Matthau) with somewhat disastrous results."
"If you're a Neil Simon fan and have enjoyed other screen treatments of his work, this one is not to be missed."
Carter's star turn here as a disabled young women seeking to complete herself was as good a performance as I have seen from a female lead in a long time.
"This Boss is a posturing, convincingly deluded figure, unable to realise the small-fry nature of his kingdom..."
"The character is not explored, or frankly explained or exploited, except for one scene which I shall not spoil, and her relationship with the Boss isn't explored; but then this was the 1930s, and there was such a thing as widespread institutional censorship back then."
"Massey himself helps things a lot, playing his parts with a mixture of restraint and sombre gusto, contrasting well with a largely diffident cast, save for Richardson, and Scott and Chapman, slightly."
Lily leaves for the big city ( New York) deciding to use her sex to get to the top.
"One dumps his fiancee and kills his near father-in-law, also Lily's sugar-daddy, then commits suicide!"
Contrasting the mine shaft's lugubrious load are the images of Homer and his friend's rocket launches.
"And Finney, as mentioned, is spot-on all the way through, making his turn in Big Fish look like child's play (the final scenes with him are terrifyingly tragic, his face recoiling in a horror that has built up all through the second half)."
"Alok Nath is such a terrific actor, so open with the emotions of the characters he portrays, he almost steals the show from the young stars."
"What follows is a fascinating insight into a pathological personality, someone who's behaviour on one had makes no sense unless what she is saying is true, yet who is seemingly incapable of saying anything that is not astonishingly dramatic but unproven at best and most often, verifiably false."
"The film also shows the photographer working on a tall structure to do a still of the array of these people outside the factory, and talking with his crew as he does so."
"The reasons for watching it are two: to see glimpses of Burtynsky's work and the raw materials, the spaces he visits and chronicles so beautifully; and to observe scenes from the vast, awesome, daunting, and rather horrifying industrialization of modern China."
"In A nos amours, the teenage girl's sexual experimentation leads to violent confrontations with her family."
You may be thinking why has an English viewer watched a series that has never been shown or hardly heard of in his country.
The pilot releases a flash device in order to photograph the hidden surface below him.
"So now we have a clear picture of the real Tassi as a multiple sex offender, what do we make of the film Artemisia's portrayal of him as a lover?"
"Bow competes with the local widow (Arlette Marchal) for his attentions, but both women get a big surprise when his wife shows up (Patricia Dupont)."
The story revolves around lesbian Camilla Stone (played by enigmatic Mary Woronow) and her lover who winds up dead through circumstances I won't reveal not to spoil a delightful story.
"Goldsworthy is an accomplished photographer (of necessity I would say) and all his works, even the unsuccessful ones, he tells us, are photographed so that he can look back at them in a more reflective mood and see what he has accomplished and what he has not."
"Soon Rukh is on a murderous rampage that destroys many lives, ending with his own."
"As for the accompanying THE MAKING OF FIRE AND ICE (TV) (Mark Bakshi, 1982) **1/2: Vintage featurette on the sword-and-sorcery animated film which is only available via the washed-out VHS print owned by Ralph Bakshi himself!"
"He is a truly talented, gifted writer, actor, comic, producer,director, and creative consultant.Anna Nicole loved him , but he was not a $$$$Billionaire so he left him for a Billionaire."
Premise: A kid gets a hold of the final recording of his favorite artist Sammy Curr who recently dies in a hotel fire.
One may also think she is on to something when she accuses Philip of looking down on her for not being fine enough.
"This movie has a powerful message of taking your dreams and going with them even if someone doesn't believe in you (in this case, her dad doesn't believe in her)."
"Gunga Din longs to be a soldier too, a Bugler in particular, but can never attain that rank due to his subordinate social standing."
"Gunga Din tries at every turn to prove his mettle, but will he ever attain the rank he so passionately seeks?...."
"There the patrons happily allow Ms. Grayson to chirp her arias with abandon, and the management becomes very excited at the opportunity that Clarence and Joe have extended for her to sing with their friend Jose Iturbi (playing himself with a light humorous touch)."
Sinatra's voice was never in better form and he rarely had better songs to sing.
"Stockwell is a charming addition to the clan, and Grayson's character is endearing when she isn't posturing on stage."
"Maybe most known by younger viewers as the voice/narrator of City Confidential, Winfield ends his career with a so-so movie; but as always, Winfield shines."
"Welles himself was certainly an inveterate traveler, and he rarely lived in one place for long."
"This may be the issue that dares not speak its name in this film, which is to say Welles' personal failure in not getting over the shock of his newness in the movie colony, and his inability to deliver the goods, as promised."
Spall's range of feelings conveyed is quite moving and more than he usually gets to portray as part of the Mike Leigh repertory.
Celia Imrie puts more warmth into the supervisor's role than the martinets she usually has to play.
"Even more famous was the appearance of Robby The Robot, in his first role in either film or television."
Louise Brooks here plays a character less flapper than what she was known for: she's a stenographer who on a lark decides to enter a beauty contest despite the furious opposition of her extremely smothering boyfriend.
"Stanwyck, even in this young version doesn't do a lot for me but she certainly performs well here, ever driving herself and the film forward."
Frawley is his dependably cantankerous self as Flynn's manager.
"Some of Smith's gowns border on the garish, but she suits the upswept hairstyles very well."
"Billie becomes like a cat stalking her prey-and no prison,police force,boyfriend,or crooked judge can get in the way of her avenging claws."
"Master craftsmanship!He has made quite a couple of really great movies and was successful in nearly every imaginable genre, but even in an as prolific career as this one, THE LAST HUNT still shines as one of his best, if not his best."
"His major concern is what ivy league college to attend, her's is how to pay the rent, how to be 'happy.'"
"She replies, I just wanted a room full of balloons."
Almost immediately Elliott's block vanishes and he works steadily on a tale about a serial killer.
"Amazingly, soon after his block vanishes he begins to actually see his fictional character!"
"Again and again, the psychotic killer appears and then disappears--making it seem as if he is losing his mind."
Jon Pertwee (the third Doctor from the DR. WHO television series) is a very temperamental actor known for his portrayals of Dracula.
I enjoyed Pertwee's line when he basically said that Lee's and other recent incarnations of Dracula were all crap compared to Bela Lugosi's!
Jesse is a rock star waiting to get his big break.
She is one of the best actresses I have ever seen.
"The millionaire who funds the project to thaw the Yeti looks like Chris Penn and John Goodman both poured into an ill-fitting suit - the guy playing the scientist is one of the worst actors to ever appear on screen - and yes, there is a mute boy (who sorta kinda looks like a girl) and he's mute ever since he survived a plane crash that killed both his parents (hmmm- maybe therapy for the kid??)."
Robin Williams gives one of his best performances.
My advice to Hollywood is : use him more.
"The story of Brashear's work to become a Navy Diver, and his life as a Navy Diver beyond his graduation, is not the only story that is presented."
"There I also the story of how Master Chief Petty Officer Sunday defied the illegal order of his Commanding Officer that Petty Officer 2nd Class Brashear not be passed in his test dive no matter how well he did, and paid the price of a loss of one Stripe and a change of assignment."
"As the movie envelopes around the two love birds, it also manages to find its lens towards Orked's parents, her mother who was educated in England, speaks very good English and in which, her husband and the caretaker in the house with very much attempt tries to speak back their own kind of English, which was humor all the way indeed."
Pak Koboi as what he's nicked after was seen polishing his motorbike daily and would take it out for a ride with his newly found girlfriend.
Deborah Pratt was wonderful and it was fun watching her and Ernest Borgnine's character go at it with each other.
"Carl Brashear (Cuba Gooding, Jr.) is unquestionably a man of great courage and principle, and his strength of character shines through brightly in this film."
Mr. Pappy (Hal Holbrook) gets only one short scene by which we can judge him.
"If a director is going to make a human-interest story, he needs to humanize the characters."
"Brashear is much more complex and grounded, and the issues he faces are life crises, making the part far more challenging."
"DeNiro isn't a bad comedian, he is just such a great dramatic actor that it seems like he shouldn't waste his time doing comedy."
"The late Darren McGavin IS Karl Kolchak, an eccentric, tenacious, rumpled newsman/monster-hunter who, in pursuit of a story, always finds a supernatural angle; much to the pain of Kolchak's over-stressed, put-upon boss Tony Vincenzo(played with tremendous world-weariness by the also late, great Simon Oakland; you can practically feel the pain of his budding ulcers!)."
"A highlight of the film comes when this high-spirited wild child breaks into a frantic dance in her bedroom, unable to bear the restraints placed upon her by middle-class propriety."
"Languorous and dreamy, the inhabitants are satisfied to allow life to go on around them until a young, fresh-faced teacher, with new ideas arrives and brings with her life from the mainland."
"Cry Freedom, despite the minor flaws it may have, is a powerful, moving and compelling film about the story of the black activist Steve Biko in his struggles to awaken South Africa to the horrors of the apartheid."
Pom-hating Bazza is told by a Sydney solicitor that in order to inherit a share in his father's will he must go to England to absorb British culture.
MVP ran around the ring whilst his butt was on fire and there was a sick part of me that laughed watching this.
"JBL put it best when he berated the fans in Richmond, Virginia for sitting on their hands during this one and at one point even started a boring chant."
Ms. Blaine makes a fantastic impression as the show girl who is wiser than she lets out to be.
Stubby Kaye makes a wonderful job out of reprising his Nicely Nicely Johnson.
"In this dark and entertaining short film, an artist attempts to create a new pot for his favourite plant."
"The artist resists as best he can, but he eventually becomes overwhelmed by the constant attempts, by the hand, to force him to conform."
"At this point the hand attaches strings to the artist, puts him in a cage, and uses him to make hand statues."
All the while glorifying the artist's work and awarding him with medals and honours.
"The artist's inner lust to be able to express himself freely is what helps him prevail over his indoctrination, and enables him escape his prison, whether it be literal or in his mind, and return to his home where he now must live in constant fear of the wrath of the omnipotent hand."
The artist is inevitabally destroyed by his own creation.
"Jim Carrey plays Bruce Nolan, a reporter who is down on his luck and feeling very unsuccessful with his life."
Cage is at his best.
Dennis Hopper again shows his delightfully sinister side.
JT Walsh is perfect in his last performance.
"The best thing is here is Michelle Forbes, who always manages to shine, whether in her roles on `Homicide: Life on the Street' or in the brief series `Wonderland.'"
"See for example the opening scenes, with the remote village in the Serbian mountains, with the low-tech devices that defend the integrity and way of life of the inhabitants, the nostalgia for the good days of the Communist rule, and the awakening of the young brat watching his nude teacher at the sounds of the Soviet hymn."
"Kusturica not only tries to depart from the tragic history of Serbia described in his previous movies, but creates a whole world of himself in the process."
Music plays an active role in this film same as in all his other movies.
Joachim Fuchsberger plays an Inspector and he mostly chews gum and looks off into the distance.
"When he dies in an accident, she's released out into the world with the knowledge that her nubile body can get her whatever she wants."
Stanwyck herself is the only thing that keeps the film worth sitting through.
!This guy (Devon Sawa) has done a great job with this movie!I don't know exactly how old he was but he didn't act like a child (WELL DONE)!Now about the tornado-it wasn't very realistic but frightens you!If you want to have a nice time in front of the telly - this is the movie
"Pelletier has done fine work for his first time out, and I noticed he snuck in a couple of his buddies from Rock et Belles Oreilles, Guy A. LePage & Andre Ducharme."
"Dolph Lundgren is amazing as always, and is amazing here, he is extremely likable, kicks that ass as usual, had great chemistry with the kids, had an awesome character, is very charismatic, and he may not have shown a great emotional rage, he still was a hell of a lot of fun to watch!, he is one of my favorite actors!"
"Alex Karzis is god awful as the villain, he is laughably OTT, was boring, and not menacing at all, he also annoyed the crap out of me."
"Kata Dobo is very sexy as the side kick and did fine with what she had to do, she was the real villain in my opinion!."
Sir Ian Holm has a smaller role as the doctor treating him.
"All of the character were so authentic to me, I really took DDL for Christy Burns and Brenda Fricker for his mom."
"Michelle Rodrigez was made for this movie, when I first saw her in Fast and the Furious."
Anyway it seems that a young woman and her..aunt?
"But the only one left is Dr. Morbis (Walter Pidgeon) and his daughter, who somehow were immune to an attack that left everyone else dead."
Jeremy Northam is perfectly cast and the adorable Lucy Liu is convincingly mysterious as the foxy lady who appears to be on his side.
"Thus for instance, Dogville, even depriving the viewer of anything visual to detract from the existential insight she is hammering home, or other films promoting gay and lesbianism as worthy of anyone else's attention, or other pet causes of Kidman's."
"and when vanilla sherbert got his ass kicked, just like the record company executive is also hilarious and having they're managers getting shot every time too."
The whole thing is very contrived and barely conceals the fact that the Solo character was not part of this film's central story after his rescue.
"Ford, for his part, looks bored and lacks the style that distinguished his earlier performances."
"This decision was based on the foundations of the Christian faith she had been taught since childhood, not from the brutal Calvinist Lowood Institution, but from the Christian example of a true friend, Helen Burns, who was martyred rather than not turn the other cheek."
"Columbo enters the case, suspects her at once, and solves the mystery by simply using his supernatural mystical intuitive powers."
Columbo doesn't have any of his frequent comic moments.
"Roseanne tells all her viewers that the entire season nine was a lie because her husband, Dan, had died."
"They are almost the First Wives Club, and indeed there is much verbal bashing of ex's involved as well as some he left the credit card behaviour."
as a pickpocket (Widmark) inadvertently winds up with espionage microfilm in his possession after pilfering Peters' purse.
Peter O'Toole plays the dying killer daddy and watch for funny man Ricky Gervais who made me laugh more than anything in the entire film in his brief five minutes(nice feet).
Walter Matthau in contrast to Lemmon's character is equally as good as the slobbish sports writer who simply wants to play poker to earn money for his child benefits.
"Timothy Dalton is utterly in his element as Rochester, rarely missing the mark; his performance is astonishingly nimble and many-colored, while never straying too far from the dark complexities of the character."
"Zelah Clarke's Jane is more cerebral than otherworldly, but she makes a perfect foil for Dalton (who, appropriately, towers over her!)"
"Jackie plays a policeman who tries to catch some drug dealers and at the same time take care of a young woman from the bad guys, and still take care of his relationship with his girlfriend Selina (Brigitte Lin)."
"Strangely, the relationship between Frankie and her grandmother is convincing, but the relationship between Hazel and Frankie is a bit...off."
"Overall, it was a good film about honesty and ambition, but its star Mischa Barton didn't quite achieve the level of realism we saw during her performances in Lawn Dogs, Lost and Delirious, and her small but shocking performance opposite Haley Joel Osment in The 6th Sense."
"Fisher is played by Derek Luke, who is new to the silver screen, but has made some guest appearances on such television shows as King of Queens, and he will be appearing in the upcoming film release of Biker Boyz."
"Her ex-student is cute enough, still carrying a crush on his teacher for so long."
"Victoria must fend a barrage of intrusions on her way to the crown, and even when she takes command of her new position, she discovers the road to self sufficiency will depend on making some very important decisions and of course, the right support."
Meryl Streep received a lot of recognition for her performance when this film came out but I thought Sam Neill was just as good.
Let's just say they both were excellent but the role was little harder for Streep because she had to learn an Australian accent.
"Once Eddie plays the record backwards, he discovers he's a bit tougher, and bad things start happening to those who taunt him."
But the viewer never gets to know her as she normally is and the relationship between her and her husband is rather discomforting (in an unintentional way).
But it is the bond between the mayor and his deputy which is taken to task by the accidental shooting.
"Well this is a personal review, and my still living grandmother at age 97 (she even outlived Walter Matthau's magnificent impersonation of her!"
De Niro has the ability to make every role he portrays into acting gold.
"The debut performance of Reese Witherspoon is, of course, marvelous, but so too is her chemistry with Jason London."
"I never really had any intention in watching 'Holes', and i must admit, i only really watched the film, because i'm such a fan of Shia LaBeouf, but even if you are not a fan of him, then it doesn't matter."
"Shia LaBeouf shows that even at 17, he can act without any flaws."
"Basketball is the chosen avenue for riches, and Tsang bids to get him a spot on a University team and to promote him in the media."
"Jay Chou remains pretty much expressionless throughout, but such is his style, and when he does let an emotion flicker across it can be to quite good comic effect."
"Eric Tsang compensates with a larger-than-life character that he's played many times before (in real life, for instance) who gets many of the films most emotional moments."
"Jay Chou appears to do a lot of his own moves, and is quite impressive - he's clearly pretty strong and fast for real, and Ching Siu-Tung's choreography makes him look like a real martial artist."
"In Frank Sinatra's first three films, he was purely a speciality act: ostensibly playing himself, he merely shows up to croon a song during a nightclub sequence in somebody else's movie."
"Sinatra's good in this movie, but he would do better work (and sing better material) elsewhere."
"After Grace Hartman's death, her husband had a long career as a character actor, just occasionally dancing solo."
"Victor Borge gives a rare film performance here, handling his dialogue deftly but never doing any of the keyboard comedy which he later did successfully in his stage shows."
The Abbot disregards the value of Brendan's art in his quest for security.
Brendan's inner conflict is to find the hidden eye of creative illumination which will allow him to complete the most difficult painting in the Book of Kells.
The range of emotion which Brendan and the other animated characters convey given their economy of abstract design is a tribute to the excellent artistry of the director and his animators.
"In 2151, in Broken Bow, Oklahoma, a farmer shoots the Klingon Klaang with his plasma rifle after the explosion of a methane store in his farm and the Klingon is sent to the Starfleet Hospital."
The Vulcan ambassador Soval proposes to unplug the life support system and bring the corpse of Klaang to his warrior empire in planet Kronos with honor.
"I digress but I kind of chuckle at Jane and her obviously liberal ways being accused of racism to her neighbor, and I like the bald guy and his craziness, I found it on par with a UK series called The IT Crowd (I Think) another office comedy with a female lead."
"Kate Beckinsale, on the other hand, manages the comedy effortlessly and is still able to show what Mr Knightly (the most romantic of Jane Austen's heroes) actually sees in her."
Welles' attempt at total control (direction and production and acting) of his movies seemed to threaten the whole system.
"Welles returned to Broadway in 1946, hoping to recapture his critical abilities by his production of AROUND THE WORLD IN 80 DAYS."
"Grisby makes Michael an offer - he wants (for reasons connected to his so-called fatalistic view of modern society) to drop out of it, pretending to be dead."
According to Grisby (the plot becomes murky here) he can still collect his life insurance (although dead?)
"He sets the stage by opening this story with a black widow spider catching prey in her web before we meet Gerard Reve, an annoying self-centered writer with a morbid imagination."
"Heath provides welcome, often later delightfully humorous at his expense, critical commentary during Vance's investigation."
"One is tough and masculine and mocking and provocative (she could pass for a pretty boy, and teasingly hints at that: Are you a girl or a boy?"
"One of the rural cops (Mohamad Kheirabadi) takes the girl soccer player to the men's restroom (of course there's no ladies'), forcing her to wear a poster of an Italian football star as a mask."
"It happens that the town is puritanical beyond all description, and she provokes righteous indignation everywhere she goes."
Will Elvira best her evil uncle and save the day?
"As a character pulled apart by forces beyond her control, the sheer magnificence of this performance is central to the film's turbulent nature."
"Shin-ae's interactions with the townsfolk rarely inspires dividends, especially when they are merely done out of obligation to fit in for the sake of her son, Jun (Seon Jung-yeop)."
"Song has situated himself as a comedic anti-hero in South Korea's biggest films but his nuanced, low-key delivery here purports the director's thought process of never having to reveal more than plainly necessary."
"When Shin-ae attempts to head down the path of reconciliation only to be faced again with unimaginable heartbreak, she unsuccessfully employs the fellowship of evangelical Christianity as a foil to her sorrow."
Lee's first film since his call to office as his country's Minister of Culture and Tourism is an uncompromising dissertation on human suffering.
"In traditional film noir, the unapologetic criminal always gets his comeuppance, the rational punishment for his sins, but apparently not when they've served their country; patriotism wipes the slate clean."
"The opening scene on the train is the film's finest, as McCoy breathlessly and silently fishes around in his victim's hand bag, recalling Bresson's 'Pickpocket (1959).'"
"Thelma Ritter is terrific as a tired street-woman who'll peddle information to anybody willing to pay for it (though, of course, she draws the line at Commies)."
"HBK has the heart of a lion, and him putting over Austin like he did, on his way out, was pure class on his part."
"Taka gets a surprising pop, with his entrance."
"Sable actually looks hot, and the crowd is just eating her up!."
"Constant Sable chants, and them erupting almost every time she gets in the ring."
"Before I review the match, I'd like to note The Rock showed off his immense potential, with his interview with Jennifer Flowers, before his match."
"HBK gives it his all, in what was supposed to be his last match, and Austin has rarely been better."
"In the process, she witnesses and endures many things: the gelding of a stallion, the rape of a local woman by a new Duke, the torture of a nun who was overcome during a visit by the Tarantula Sect, and a whipping herself when she ran off with a Jew."
"The torture was particularly gruesome with hot wax being poured on the nun, and her nipples cut off."
Sister Flavia is bound to continue to get into trouble as she questions the male-dominated society in which she lives.
"Eventually, she joins the leader of the Muslims as his lover and they sack the convent."
"She manages to exact sweet revenge on all, including the Duke and her father, but finds that the Muslim lover treats her exactly the same."
"The Japanese Run Lola Run, his is one offbeat movie which will put a smile on just about anyone's face."
'Had Ned Kelly been born later he probably would have won a Victoria Cross at Gallipolli'.
"It is not self justification it is Ned's biography, an outline of what he stood for and who he was protecting."
"As a man with the means to help, he takes his job seriously, crossing off people undeserving and testing those he believes are worthy to the nth degree."
"Elpidia Carrillo, as the abused mother, is fantastic, showing the hard evolution from prideful to scared to completely overwhelmed by the kindness of a stranger, allowing her family to finally be safe."
"When Darren McGavin's Carl Kolchak starts to discover odd situations, he reacts like most people would."
Darren McGavin said that the reason why the show only lasted on season was because he got tired of doing a monster of the week show and he decided not to continue.
"Instead, it's a fictionalization of one of the earliest agents and the career he chose."
What would you say about him talking to one of the suggestive dancers and then sleeping with her?
I got to say this is one of his good leading roles.
A repulsive character is introduced who gives a number of potential suspects reason to kill him.
"Curtiz is not generally considered a great auteur, because he has no consistent themes or evidence of artistic development."
"It is obvious that Kim, the mother, is a psychologist, but she has no clue to what is going on in the mind of her son."
"Patricia Clarkson is excellent, no matter where movie she is in."
Officer Sean Cooper was murdered in his patrol car back in '68.
A dying convict in the state penitentiary reveals that he stole a block of heroin from the car after the shooting.
Foxx's scenes for instance in the jail when he is confronted by Edgar Clenteen (David Morse) are too funny.
"Scott Bakula hits the right note as a captain with Kirk's brashness and daring but without his smugness and swagger, and I look forward to the ways in which the series will feature the engineer, weapons master and communications officer (not just a glorified phone operator anymore!)"
"Tom Cruise plays David Aames, a selfish egomaniac who takes other people's emotions for granted, and thinks only of himself."
"Nevertheless, you learn that he has only studied neurobiology to prove how much he loved another woman, Hanka."
Hanka does not view her parents' bourgeois life as a good example but seems rather unsuccessful in creating a better environment.
Hanka is disappointed and returns to her parents.
Vesna (a Slavic word for Spring) who came to Prague from Macedonia works as a barmaid - and you won't learn whether she came to Czechia in order to see her dad or UFOs.
Petr works in the radio station and he is the only one who likes his job - a job that he eventually loses.
"(Well, one out of four ain't bad...) A no-talent magician with an eye for showmanship (Max) watches a very skilled pickpocket (Hugo) plying his trade in New York."
"All you need know is that, at the beginning of the film, Lollobrigida reads Philipe's palm and tells him he will marry the daughter of the king."
"Having Spike Jones unleashed is the best part of the show, as he and his band play many tunes and are a part of the action, doing a fine job of support."
"That's My Bush is a live action project made by South Park creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone.The show was cancelled after one season, not because of bad reviews(it actually got good reviews), but because it was very expensive.That's my bush is a pretty funny spoof of an average network TV sitcom.It is also a political satire.Now, this is nowhere near as good as South Park, but it is a very funny spoof of a sitcom and also a pretty good political satire.The guy who plays in that's my bush looks a lot like him!"
What they find is an ex-Vietnam vet gone crazy (he kills some of his victims using a glove with long metal finger nails a la Freddy Krueger).
The title of the film comes from the stone statue erected on Hagar's mother's grave which serves as a metaphor for Hagar's inability to express emotion during her tumultuous lifetime.
"As she nears the end of her days, she reflects that pride was my wilderness and the demon that led me there was fear."
The young Hagar is played by Christine Horne who is exceptional in her first feature role.
"Despite Hagar's pleading, her relationship with Bram is rejected by her cold and rigid father whose refusal to attend the wedding starts the marriage off on the wrong foot."
"Every joy I might have held in my man or any child of mine or even the plain light of morning, she reflects, all were forced to a standstill by some break of proper appearancesWhen did I ever speak the heart's truth?"
"John Wayne would hardly be one's first choice as a cultural attache, being about as diplomatic with his good intentions as a bull-run in Harrods."
As he doesn't really want to be a boxer (only following through on their father's wishes) she convinces his coach to take her on in his stead.
The story unfolds in an intelligent and believable way as she goes through various trials on her quest.
What is even more remarkable is that this cartoon's director made his debut here.
"Ford was always known for his luminescent, gorgeous cinematography that helped to foresee the conflicts within his characters."
"Victor McLaglen's performance not only benefits from the lighting, but by the sheer simplicity of his acting."
"magazine, with a language too sophisticated for someone who has spent most of his life behind bars."
Christopher Smith is an obvious horror fan and this is made clear in his debut horror flick 'Creep'.
"A little less glossy than recent US horrors (Amityville Horror remake, House of Wax remake) this dark and gruesome tale follows Kate (Franka Potente) through the labyrinth of underground tunnels and disused railways as she, and a number of others along the way, try and flee a murderous attacker."
Cillian Murphy is creepier than he was in Batman Begins.
"'Tulip' is a beautifully wrought, touching and heart-warming story of a man's journey in coming to terms with the loss of his wife through the relationship he shares with a very special animal, 'Tulip'."
"At Will's moment of despair, Tulip becomes the symbol of Ruth, the genuine connection Will has with his late wife."
"Although Ruth does not say a single word throughout the movie, her sweet personality and loving relationship with Will are obvious."
"The protagonist is a lady in her forties, living in her mansion, breeding orchids, and absolutely unaware of the fact that her so-called rich and truthful husband is actually broke and cheating on her."
The bailiff comes by to tell her that she is in a huge debt.
"However, my referenced complaint is that I believe the director got caught-up in his desire to display Farrah's well-known and obvious physical attributes."
"Her roommates I'm certain give performances as written and directed - however, their respective skepticism and histrionic babbling and sobbing, don't ring true -- based upon Farrah's previous experience with this guy, the obvious evidence of his having come to their premises with only the worst of intentions, and that she would have absolutely no grounds to be exaggerating what has occurred."
The 1st scene where the Blob crawls up the farmer's probing stick and engulfs his hand was enough to make me want to leave the theater.
"He knew I was in trouble, and when I got into bed that night I could not only feel the Blob in the room, but when I summoned up the courage to look down at the floor, there the red pulsating, heart-like hungry dude sat, waiting for me to try and get up and go to the bathroom."
"It was obvious that the guy was just standing at a moving car, with a camera aimed at him from an angle below."
"Michael O'Hearn seemed like a pretty good Superman/Clark Kent, although he obviously isn't the greatest talented actor around."
Clark Bartram reprises his Batman role well again and Kurt Carley seemed like an awesome Lex Luthor.
Urmila gets full marks for her beautiful and deeply emotional portrayal of a suffering woman with no way to go.
Manoj bajpai is simply brilliant as her remorseful abductor.
"But the Big Chief (Sampson, of One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest fame) who operates the Roosevelt Hotel's elevator has been all but disenfranchised from his own culture: I no longer Cherokee - I watch TV."
"Tony Curtis especially leaves denture marks in the wood panelling as the paranoid, impotent Senator, who is seen attempting congress with a Monroe impersonator (a real one, as opposed to Russell's), before being let down by his dwindling member."
"South Pacific was directed by Joshua Logan and he was a natural to do the film adaption of another Michener success, Sayonara."
"In this one, Ollie has hornophobia from working at a noisy horn factory so Dr. Finlayson prescribes going out to sea for his rest."
"Gypo is big but he is not the brightest bulb on the tree, has a warm heart but a short fuse, and never seems to really think things all the way through but he is not a criminal or a self-centered pig."
"As luck would have it, his friend Frankie is back in town with a 20 Pound price over his head and Gypo is desperate enough to inform the police of Frankie's whereabouts."
Victor McLaglen portrays the fallen Gypo Nolan and definitely deserved the Best Actor Oscar he was awarded for this film.
"Gypo's walk through the streets is narrated by the gloomy state of the town and the glaring accusations of the street lamps, each shadow constantly reminding him of his dark deed."
Maria decides to get a job as a dancer/prostitute in a club that caters to American GI's and she meets a black Army soldier named Bill (Greg Eagles) and they start to see one another on a steady basis.
Maria hears that her husband Hermann has died in the war so she gets very serious with Bill.
Hanna Schygulla was never better and her performance is the key to the success of this film.
Fassbinder himself appears in the film as a peddler and his own mother Lilo Pempeit plays Frau Ehmke.
"Ronald Colman gives an electrifying performance as Tony John, a Broadway actor who can't separate his offstage life from Shakespeare's Othello, the character he plays on stage....Two important scenes illustrate Tony's dilemma."
Tony tells her his name is Martin.
"He murders her....Colman's bravura performance, in a complex and difficult role, earned him 1947's Academy Award for Best Actor."
"It is unusual to see a film where the performance of a single actor is so good that one can feel that the film would be of little interest, if any, without his presence."
"Once able to read, he enters the system and lands a managerial position with a health care plan, a car, and a house, taking his place at the head of the family, the breadwinner."
"I knew the owner of the Downingtown Diner well, and he had a road sign out front which told all passing motorists that this was the home of the blob."
The group of people are travelling to Belgrade in an awful bus led by a drunk conductor and his dumb son (who likes to drive with his eyes closed).
The man who steals the show is a peasant 4 feet tall with his 4 sons who are almost two times bigger than him.
The film well captures this and brings to cheering as Bettie endures it all with her unshakeable faith and her unchangeable naivete.
Creasy's quest ended with the return of Pita to her mother and Creasy dying in the vehicle of the bad guys.
Don Cheadle gives his usual superb performance playing the straight man to Adam's disturbed.
"His live-in female friend, Darla, is also writing a magazine (which is real), which mainly has to do with her and Simon, as well as her and her father."
"Darla is a genuinely loveable (or loathable) character, depending on how you view her muted neurotic behavior."
"Brent is a flat character with not much to him, as is Tedra, the music-video queen for a bunch of B-rated rock bands."
Bowser is up to his usual shenanigans (yeah it's a dumb word but the only one I can think of) and Mario must stop him again.
Izo Okada follows his leader without really questioning what they are doing.
Okada's killings get more and more brutal in the course of the movie and he is proud to have a reputation based on fear wherever he goes.
"An induction of one of the actors being transferred and his character being replaced by a younger, newer inmate gives the narrative a nice subplot into someone who promises big, but in the end disappoints all and does not live up to their expectation."
One inmate in particular (Big-G) welcomes the new inmate actor (Rick) with an evident will to nurture him into their beloved practise and hopefully become a good role model.
Trudi's character is heart warming as you can relate to difficulties she is having along with the fact she is the only mother of the four.
Jessica is the party girl very single minded and knows what she wants and how to get it.
I LOVED the stepping; the romantic flirty relationship going on between two steppers; the trials that the main character's parents were going through; and how she dealt with coming back to her old neighborhood and dealing with Crabs in a Barrel.
"Asia Carrera's performance in the junkyard scene is incredible, but who would expect anything less from her."
"Davies' brilliance in reintroducing the character lies in his decision to do so through the eyes of an outsider: Rose Tyler (Billie Piper), a London-based girl who leads a very normal life until one night she is attacked by creatures made out of living plastic."
"Okay, so technically Eccleston's Doctor is the Ninth to use that name, but he distances himself from the previous eight incarnations by speaking with a Northern accent (the one he uses on a daily basis) and justifying it with a terrific line: Lots of planets have a North!."
"Writer-director Brian De Palma is best known for his string of films that have been called, somewhat unfairly, Hitchcock imitations."
Liza Minelli did a wonderful job as the side kick - though I'm not her biggest fan.
Val Kilmore is outstanding in his role of burnt-out former porn star John Holmes.
Fez is the foreign exchange student from some unknown country (we never know exactly where) and he is a scene-stealer!
Valderama is only sporting a foreign accent here as he hasn't one in reality and he is always in character and creates one of the most unique characters I have ever seen.
"But, unfortunately, Kelly's personal problems led to her being replaced by a terrible new actress in Season 6."
"For a director who is not Indian (Sturla Gunnarsson being Icelandic), he's made a political Indian/Pakistani film."
"Along the lines of cultural exploration (road movie style), Fridrik Thor Fridriksson 1994 Cold Fever is an Icelandic sojourn about a Japanese young man who went across the globe in search of the specific spot to pay his last respects to his parents, dutifully following memorial rituals for the dead."
"This is all kept in secret from Olive, Chuck's aunts Vivian and Lily (Ellen Greene and Swoosie Kurtz, respectively), and everyone else for that matter, in case anyone recognized her from obituaries, the news, etc."
Santa Anna was within his prerogatives to be angry.
Therefore we know in our hearts that the evil brothers won't take the throne but the innocent boy who manages to overcome every obstacle and difficulty he encounters during his journey.
"In fact, at times, the movie seems to be a vehicle in which Ms. Posey is allow to play herself, as she normally is in real life."
You really do find yourself caring for the character and hoping that he finds out everything.
"Joan Allen was one of my favourite things in Bourne Supremacy, here she excels herself."
Julia Stiles turns up again as Nicky and finally we learn a bit about her character.
"Julia Stiles is a very underrated actress and I think she deserves a lot more roles, well decent roles, than she gets."
Strathairn relishes the role and he too gets some superb scenes in the movie.
"Special mention must also go to Albert Finney who makes the most of his all too brief screen time, I will not say anything about the character, that's best left as a surprise, but trust me his scenes are some of the highlights of the movie."
"One theme that runs throughout the film is the influence of General MacArthur's father, himself a military hero."
Daniel Craig helps here too by bringing a no-nonsense attitude to his hard-edged cop character.
Its surprising how she can be just as convincing when she is innocent.
This role is one of the reasons why I rate her high.
"Check out Henry Fonda's big introductory stroll across the deck, his shockingly beautiful second visit with his girl by the river, his dalliance with Mary Todd on the porch, and the priceless business that follows 'Ma'am, we've got to hurry!'"
Jaffar bribes him for his daughter's hand with a mechanical flying horse.
"Indeed, it wasn't until Lung enters the room in her Vietnamese dress that the film really begins to pack a punch."
"You may notice in the first dance scene the director has all sorts of things occurring in the background:other girl dancing, a drunk falling down stairs, much activity, but he knew that we would be watching Mina dance and I'll bet unless you viewed this many times, you didn't notice.All in all, perfection.J.Q"
Having spent 22 years in the profession of cold blooded murder he now finds himself stressed out and desperately lonely.
"Danny, the quintessential nice guy, is dealing with some stuff in his own life and, truth be told, could use a friend as well."
"If you read about someone like Julian in the paper you would have a passing thought that people like him should be ripped out of society like a cancer, but forced to watch his life you are drawn in by his intense humanity."
"But boy will those kids watching it learn: even now I can clearly remember Dr. Baxter being challenged by Hemo himself to name what common material most resembles human blood, to which the Doctor immediately answers sea water."
"Deol portrays all the different shades of his character, whether positive or negative, naturally and with complete ease."
"Cole starts to question his own existence and he deals with himself, starting to question his actual time of living, trying to survive and find the crucial missing piece of the puzzle."
"Stow plays the role of Kathryn Railly, the psychiatrist of James Cole, who sees something strangely familiar in Cole and decides to help him to deal with his madness."
"The Wolf doesn't kill the lamb, even though each night he says maybe I'll eat you tomorrow."
But it's really Hepburn's valentine and she absolutely glows.
Leo is one of the fine actors of his generation.
Sid is no Moriarty (he is presented as Jake's nemesis from a number of his previous adventures / books) but he is always fun to watch.
"Even Stowe isn't out of her league here, though."
Seeing Joaquin Phoenix in this movie makes you realize how far hes come since playing a Roman Emperor in the film Gladiator.
Julia would be a Young Lady by then and her artificial Intelligence would have been greatly expanded upon.
"This movie Tom Hanks relies more on reaction and gaze rather than dialogue, which he delivers a knockout performance."
"On one night of one of his jobs, Michael's son Michael Jr., played by newcomer Tyler Hoechlin, witnesses the hit."
"So he wacks out the son and wife of Michael Sr., except Michael Jr."
"Wherever Sammo goes, trouble starts, therefore he has to rely on his martial art skills to solve the differences."
"Luckily, Sammo's character learns martial arts by imitating and mimicking his idol, Bruce Lee."
The idea of a child's drawings becoming a place she can physically visit and have influence over is wonderful.
"The bit that gives me goose-pimples is when her Dad is in the paper house, and chases her."
One aspect I liked especially is the idea of the antagonist--Luzhini's (Turturro's)--ex-mentor working his evil on the sidelines.
"One example is commentary from the Director stating how he greatly wished how certain deleted takes and scenes could have been included (because they were hysterical), but that he had to make tough choices for a final edit."
Though the late Clarke kept suggesting it at the top of his list whenever someone asked him about the best SF movies.
"This little planet and its winds and ways, and all the laws of mind and matter that restrain him."
"To tell you the truth I hadn't really noticed it until I read these comments, but I went back to the DVD and now her dialogue sounds more British than American to me, but she was ideal for her role with that one exception."
"Scarlett Johansson proves well-cast in the Diane Keaton-type role, and at no time is there any uncomfortable moments between her and the much older Woody."
The famed boxer receives a 1940s Hollywood-ization of his life--making the story far more entertaining and engaging than real life.
"However, while it could have focused mostly on the matches, most are rather brief in the film (except for the final title match) and the emphasis is on Corbett's brash personality as well as his relationship with the lady played by Alexis Smith."
"I think this film is hilarious, especially at the beginning when she is trying to arrange an audition with John Thornway."
One of the funniest scene's in my opinion is Judy's rendition of Lady Macbeth and when John is looking for her at the party to give her a spanking (Lol).
Roeper is not a film critic he just criticizes anything he doesn't like personally i.e.
This movie is a documentary that portraits the personality of Aro through several interviews with people that got to know him and through some scenes played by actors based on real facts.
The old man takes to his nurse and this angers the rest of the family.
"Bartel is memorable as a very sensual oder member of the family who ends up taking his sexy, teenaged niece on a year long missionary trip to Africa."
This would allow you to fully understand the character Jason Bourne and become attached and be a part of his world.
The lighting and shot angles in some of Harris' scenes make his face look truly diabolical.
"As more bodies start to appear with the same M.O, it becomes clear to Harry that both the local police chief and his new love interest (guess who?)"
Clint Eastwood directed this film himself and expertly handles a series of set pieces that culminate in an exhilarating climax.
Sondra Locke's performance effectively conveys the blend of ruthlessness and fragility that define her character.
"However the film has some notable problems- some of the subplots (the animosity between Harry and a gang of twentysomething hoodlums, a Mob vendetta against him) take up too much screen time and don't really have any bearing to the larger story."
"However the film moves into top gear as it progresses and the triangulated cat-and-mouse game between Callahan, Spencer, and her former tormentors assumes prominence."
"The humour was well timed, and the touching moments felt so real, you could feel the awkwardness between Sugiyama and his wife, the tantrums in the dance hall."
"Retitled from its original Japanese name of LAPUTA (for being an offensive phrase, something which director Hayao Miyazaki was oblivious to at the time), CASTLE IN THE SKY is the master animator's third film, and it's one of his most beloved of all time."
"After all, both works share similar story and character elements... not to mention that they were both created by Miyazaki himself."
"It also features an ambitious reworking of Joe Hisaishi's gorgeous musical score for a performance by the Seattle Music Orchestra (interestingly, the man behind this rescore is none other than the composer himself)."
Michael Caine has received kind of a reputation for taking any role in any movie no matter what the quality or lack of same but he does a good turn in playing Sidney.
"Emily Blunt is quite radiant as Victoria, but it's not as full a performance as I'd like, no blame to her."
"Hence Blunt doesn't get to run the gamut of queenly emotions, at least not to the full extent, since she's, y'know, the young Victoria."
"The ravishing Edwige Fenech alas isn't given much to do as Tony's whiny girlfriend Orchidea, but at least gets to bare her insanely gorgeous and voluptuous body in a much-appreciated gratuitous nude shower scene."
"Jeremy Northam does really well, at first, as quite a geeky corporate rat, willing to run through any maze to prove himself."
"The director is Bernard Rose who went on to direct Candyman, he made a great start with this film."
The film about a girl called Anna who falls ill with glandular fever on her 11th birthday.
"This was Kurosawa's first film in colour and he uses beautifully shocking hues, colours seen only in dreams."
"Another extremely funny and surreal scene is when Trudie Styler (Mrs. Sting herself) and another actor perform a scene on a cable access show, from the film the boy in the plastic bubble."
"Kei is suffering because of how he is forced to live off others, the half-life of a vampire."
"Presenting flying as the more accurate symbol for freedom, the stealing of the plane represents Mark 's inner wish for it but , his (going back or coming back or returning (segun)) shows the difficulties to come free from these bonds and as i ' ve said, A depicts the death of the dream by these difficulties winning the game."
"Orlando Bloom has finally found a role in which he doesn't look completely lost without his bow, and Geoffrey Rush's appearance as the leader of the police contingent at Glenrowan goes to show why he is one of the most revered actors in that desolate little island state."
Rush barely gets more screen time than his name does in the opening and closing credits.
Unfortunately Rukh has been contaminated by the Radium and starts to glow in the dark--and his touch causes instant death.
"Loin du 16eme: Catalina Sandino Moreno brilliantly shows what love for a child is through her subtle performance as the tale is bookended by her singing to a young child, yet totally different each time."
Faubourg Saint-Denis: Sometimes one needs to think he has lost love to accept that he has not been fully invested in the relationship.
"The male lead was an early role for Steve(n) McQueen and, though the actor may have subsequently looked at it with disdain, his sole contribution to the genre proves fairly engaging: not averse to juvenile kicks but still essentially a decent (and, more importantly, altruistic) kid."
"I like cheap perfume better; it doesn't last as long... - Ralph Meeker's convict character (Lawson) tells this to Barbara Stanwyck's Helen character, after he gets a whiff of the perfume that she picked out w/her husband in Tijuana...!"
"Michael Cacoyannis has had a relatively long career but has surprisingly few credits to his name, including some real duds such as the unfunny cold war satire The Day the Fish Came Out."
"Raymond Massey and some of his co-stars play multiple roles in this film, to good effect."
I think Enrico Caruso himself would have been satisfied as to how his singing was portrayed on screen.
Mario himself helped popularize the film with an RCA Red Seal album of songs from The Great Caruso.
Russell gives a strong and impressive almost pantomime portrayal of Todd; he conveys a lot of emotion without saying much and instead does the majority of his acting through his body movements and facial expressions.
"If you have any clue about Jane Austen's production, you'll now that she repeats the same in each of her novels: marriage, marriage and marriage!"
"In his respectable self now, I'm sure he cringes that he made this movie."
"Nana Patekar, as usual, tends to overdo his hysterics, but all others are commendable."
"Eddie Izzard is a genius, he picks in Brits, Americans and everyone in between."
"Jodie Foster's performance is striking, and it shows that she is really a natural born actress who showed her true potential especially in her earlier movies."
Hamill does an excellent job with his dramatic character development.
"It is the movie that puts you in the director's place, regarding his romantic relations and the political situation in Israel."
Neil Simon's THE ODD COUPLE set up a model for many of his later plays.
Burns is not senile - he takes things slowly.
"Walter Matthau plays Oscar, his friend, an untidy, unreliable sports-reporter who lives in divorce from his ex-wife in a bachelor apartment."
The director seemed to really grasp the story he was trying to tell.
"Having seen and loved Greg Lombardo's most recent film Knots (he co-wrote and directed that feature as well), I decided to check out his earlier work, and this movie was well worth the effort and rental."
"Mr. Lombardo obviously has a fond place in his heart for New York and New York stories (Knots is a funny and warm sex comedy about six thirty-something New Yorkers set primarily in a charming Brooklyn neighborhood, with Manhattan offices and a downtown loft thrown in for good measure) and has spent considerable time around the plays of Shakespeare."
"Not surprising, since King himself wrote the screenplay."
Bleak House was a relatively late Dickens novel and is much darker than his earlier work.
Mrs Rouncewell is only introduced at a late stage in the story and Sargeant George's estrangement from his family is left unexplained - as is the means by which she is discovered.
"Finally, Smallweed's role in the story is so diminished that he is almost superfluous."
Danny Glover's ranting is just so over the top that you can't help but laugh out loud at him at most time.
"Her husband, Ken (Tim Balme) is an electrician and forces himself on jobs that don't need doing...as well as doing jobs that need to be done, ie Jen."
"Both older sisters clash, the mother is in a state, Ken is as bad a ToolTime Tim Taylor, Carol is fuelling her Olympic desire and Chrissy is aware all of this is to be splashed on national tv - why shouldn't she be embarrassed?"
"For example, during one particular tense moment a home shopping commercial pops on and a chagrined Pumba realizes he has sat on the remote."
"Kenneth Branagh is not only a great actor but a master of accents, and he proves it once again with a flawless Georgia accent."
"Morgan Freeman is superbly human, relating with one and all, while Paz Vega is the edgy cashier behind the 10 Items or Less check out line, intimidating customers and bored out of her mind."
I wanted him to keep the baby and see what a special person he was.
"And that delicate balance, how much is the workaholic willing to give up for his guy's obsession; and how much is that baseball-crazed teacher willing to compromise in order to keep the OTHER love of his life, is what this movie is all about."
"With support from Natalie's friend, Polly, played exquisitely by Maddie Corman, she lets him."
I think Theo turns his life around fairly quickly after rehab because he wants to and watching his brother dying in front of him makes him reassess his life.
"Foxx is pretty good here although his character is annoying in the beginning, but throughout the film, I began to catch on."
Boat crashing into his balcony served him right.
"Writer-director Demme really gets into his job, always digging for new ways to present a familiar scenario."
The filmmaker creates a few surreal dream sequences that are borderline pretentious but it is fun to see how hard he tries to put this film above your average chicks-in-chains flick.
"Roberta Collins is a WIP veteran, so she does not need an introduction, and Barbara Steel is a hoot as the wheelchair-bound crazy warden."
"Highlight is Grace travelling to London to deal some of her merchandise, dressed in what looks like the white suit John Travolta wore in Saturday Night Fever and therefore sticking out like a sore thumb."
"I'd rather not go into any great detail except to say that,if you are not familiar with Mr.Maupin's works or his personal story,you feel a little bit out of the loop here."
Lana is devoted to him.
"Aside from Chloe, there is one mysterious figure who believes in Clark: a black man who in the alternate reality is also a resident of the institution, who believes he is from Mars."
"Dick Tracy relishes in its look and ghastly characters, and Beatty himself, who plays the dogged and incorruptible detective of the title, is appropriately stoic and ready to bust the bad guys at any and all costs."
"Mabel employs rock music as the medium in this movie to express her personal attitude to life, in which love, desire and the consequential frustration play significantly crucial roles."
"Mabel does not attempt to beautify rock musicians as artists at all, instead, she tries to reproduce a true life on screen, making huge efforts of years' working on this project and gathering information in Beijing underground pubs."
"Lionel's amused by it until Jean sets her sights on his playboy son, Franchot Tone."
"What a great comic talent that woman had, seeing The Girl From Missouri is a sad reminder of the great loss the world of film sustained with her passing three years later."
"A friend of mine grew up in Germany during this period, joined the Hitler Youth even, and his experiences were very similar to that mentioned in WAW."
"Not far behind her was Oprah Winfrey as Sofia, the fiery woman tamed by fate."
"Del Toro is impressive, hanging in reliably through thick and thin, from days of glorious victory in part one to months of humiliating defeat in part two, appealing and simpatico in all his varied manifestations, even disguised as a bald graying man to sneak into Bolivia."
"Use of a new 9-pound 35 mm-quality RED digital high performance cine camera that just became available in time for filming enabled DP Peter Andrews and his crew to produce images that are a bit cold, but at times still sing, and are always sharp and smooth."
"While there are necessarily some bloody scenes, there is almost no gore and the way this movie is presented (feel-good 50s style), I can't imagine anyone being actually scared or turned off by Fido & his fellow sufferers."
"Sandler's character reminds a bit of his fine performance in Punch Drunk Love, but here he brings much more depth."
Cheadle is always fine and does a nice job of expressing the burden he carries ... just by watching him work a jigsaw puzzle.
The film really touches on how the tragic events of that day affected one man so deeply that he is basically ruined.
"Amber also becomes curious about Richards' protestations of innocence, and discovers he was framed."
"It's a lot of fun watching Killian react to it in the typical 'wholesome' gameshow host way, as well, and some of the funniest moments in the show revolve around the contrast between his interactions with the crowd as the seemingly benevolent host (watch out for the cursing old lady!)"
"William H. Macy stars as Alex, a hitman who works for his father's (Sutherland) contract-killing business."
The fact that writer/director Henry Brommel decided to make the profession his main character was trying to break away from contract-killing is disposable.
"The story of a dying martial arts instructor sending his unfinished pupil out to find the 5 past members of his Poison Clan, so they do not seek out a fortune which the master's friend keeps hidden."
"Afraid that his last pupil did not have enough training, he instructs him to befriend one of the five venoms so as to defeat the other four."
Updated version of a story that had been turned into the film in 1938 England(Return of the Frog) concerning the pursuit by the police of a master criminal known as the Frog because of the frog like get up (bulging eyes etc) he wears.
"Emily Blunt is totally convincing as the young Princess, trapped in the stifling palace with courtiers and politicians out to manipulate her."
"If was obvious that this Superman flew close to the ground, with the telephone cables and buildings visible above him."
Evidently the harness and rigging supporting O'Hearn must have been located on his lower torso.
"Based upon Alice Walder's Pulitzer Prize winning novel, the story concerns a young girl's arranged marriage of hardship to a brutal, angry farmer and her painful separation from her beloved younger sister Nettie."
"Danny Glover lends solid support, though his Moses was a superior turn for him in Places in the Heart."
"Polanski returns to the themes of solitude and madness which he explored to such tremendous effect in Repulsion and Rosemary's Baby, in The Tenant."
"Polanski is certainly not a bad actor, but he seems to have bitten off more than he can chew with the difficult role of Trelkovsky."
"Trelkovsky's sudden (and somewhat unexplained) 'transformation' is more likely to raise giggles than eyebrows, which detracts from what should have been a powerful moment in his psycho-dramatic journey."
"Sidney Franklin's The Good Earth has achieved classic status thanks to a timeless story and superb acting, especially from Luis Ranier, who won an Oscar for her portrayal of O-Lan."
"Rainers performance is so complete, she is nearly unrecognizable."
Marion Lorne stole the show every time she was on screen.
"A drifter gets mistaken for a hit-man, and tries to make a little dough out of it, but gets in over his head."
"Dennis Hopper is at his best here...cocky, one-step-ahead villainous, seething and explosively violent."
"Morgan Freeman starred as an unnamed actor who finds a ""little project"" to jumpstart his career."
So did Walter Matthau(this is the first time I've ever seen him perform).
"Fassbinder's most lavish production sacrifices little of his talent for identifying and deconstructing a locus of suffering in long, mobile takes that somehow also act as social encapsulations; here, it's much more overt, since the story takes place in war-torn Germany at the end of WWII, and the central character is a woman (Hanna Schygulla as Maria) who capitalizes on vulnerabilities (both economic and gender-related) to catapult herself up the ladder of a prominent textile corp. that makes coveted goods like lederhosen available to indigent workers (as she once was)."
"writ large: 'Love is colder than death,' but not only is Maria contending with her own sanity and a husband largely incapable of loving her, but a country in deep flux with no discernible light at the end of the tunnel."
"Taken together, his films can be either unbearable or indescribably mesmeric, often at once; this falls somewhere in-between, although definitely closer to the latter."
"While a melodrama at heart, Woods focus on the character of the Count and his sadism creates one of the best horror characters of these early era."
"Not being a movie where camera tricks are essential, what shines the most in The Sealed Room is Griffith's talent to direct his actors, as the legendary filmmaker manages to bring the best out of his cast with his usual natural style far removed from the staginess that was the norm in his day."
"Finally, the legendary Henry B. Walthall appears as the handsome Minstrel, and while far from being one of his best performances, he manages to give a proficient acting that also adds a nice touch of comedy to the film."
"While not of real importance to the plot, it's nice to see other members of Griffith's stock company in the background, like his wife Linda Arvidson and a young Mary Pickford as nobles at Court."
"The movie has very good set design and while of a very low budget, Griffith's care for details makes it look very convincing and works perfectly along with his directing style."
After all it's not everyday that someone comes in to your office to tell you that he knows who the killer is.
You are with your friend Eric throughout the game until he betrays you and gets you kicked off of the skateboard team(you can pick a team to be on) and you then start your own team!
Freddy learns something about himself and his perverted life and he gets to go out in a bang!
"Not being a swooning Ed Wood Jr. fan, I prefer to appreciate his boundless enthusiasm and acknowledge his shortcomings."
"We get insight into Ed's personal and professional life: from his romances, to his drinking, to his sexuality, to his friends, to his enemies, and even to his film making."
"This ability to define a person's legacy comes through universally, as the most amazing effect of the film is to not only give a well rounded idea of the man that was Ed Wood Jr., but also to give a comprehensive view of the community that he created."
"I wondered about Domino Harvey herself, how her life became of interest to Hollywood."
"Clara delivers the movie's spiritual lesson, a great and moving statement set against the terrible happenings in her country."
Dixon cannot reconcile these calls for restraint with his own extreme and irrational hatred of all criminals.
"Dixon, however, isn't the only one to experience misfortune as Morgan, a successful model loses her job because of all the trouble surrounding her."
Ken Paine who'd been a war hero had experienced unemployment and a loss of self esteem which led to alcoholism and wife beating and Scalise who'd been set up in business by Dixon's father also suffers his own misfortunes.
Obviously Busby doesn't let a little thing like story impede him from putting together the most over-the-top musical numbers he can possibly conjure.
"But the guy was quite versatile, going from the venomous gangsters that made him so famous to the fast-talking producer-types we see here."
"All the while, Lynch is still experimenting, as he was constantly for better or worse during the period of five years he made on and off Inland Empire."
"In what comes closest to surrealism in ants, the guy mistakenly sprays bug-spray (just called Kill, one of Lynch's very cheap but fun pokes at societal conventions) on himself, and envisions ants in a musical chorus line, solos included."
"And one of the most harrowingly funny things I've ever seen from the filmmaker is get the stick, where we just see the guy, cheered on by his son, getting a stick lodged in his mouth."
All the same I'm still not sure if Dumbland is something I would put into someone's hands if they haven't seen much of Lynch yet let alone anything by him.
Poor Casper sat on a log and weep; until a little fox cub comes up an nuzzles him.
Casper and the little fox quickly bond and he quickly names the cub Ferdie and considers him to be his very best friend.
While the hunter is firing gunshots towards Ferdie Casper notices they are trying to kill him and flies in the hunter's direction and pleads that the hunter leaves Ferdie alone.
Ferdie starts licking Casper on his cheek.
Casper screams for joy because he has been reunited with Ferdie.
She sees an injured evil Muslim soldier (one of the few still alive) and tries to assist him.
Flavia spends much of the first part of he movie passively questioning all of the atrocities happening around her.
"Much of her passivity is forgotten when she becomes acquainted with the strong-spirited (but slightly loony- she likes to pee outside like me, but it's a lot easier for guys) Sister Agatha."
It is Agatha's death that sends Flavia on her violent crusade against those who have oppressed her...
This is the first movie of his in which I like him and his role.
"As part of my preparation for writing the dissertation, I made a careful analysis of this film, and of Tag Gallaghers brilliant interpretation of it in his seminal book on Ford."
"This is Lincoln, the symbol of justice and mercy, Lincoln, the man of the wilderness, striving to found a civilization within himself, and to become the remarkable lawgiver' of young America."
"The premise is that an accomplished playwright, whose star is falling, receives a magnificent manuscript from a former student and so he plans to off his protege and appropriate his play, to the (loud) protests of his wife."
"Michael Caine, as the senior playwright, plays himself in this movie - a slightly loony and very dramatic Brit."
The compositing artifice is provocative and engaging; A character is rear-projected but his own hand in the foreground isn't.
"Still this was the first of his films I'd seen him take that direction, so I was nervous."
"However, as the story progresses the actor gets to demonstrate his range, showing by turns delicate frailty, serene dignity and eventually awesome power and presence in the finale."
"Nevertheless Joseph von Sternberg cultivated for himself the image of the artistic and imperious Teutonic Kino Meister (the von was made up, by the way), and took a very distinctive approach to the craft."
"Jannings's performance is incredibly sedate and measured, and when the players around him begin to mirror this the effect is as if his mere presence has restored order."
"Unfortunately this harsh attitude did not make him an easy man to work with, and coupled with his focus on his technical resources over his human ones, the smaller performances in his pictures leave a little to be desired."
The only performance that comes close to Jannings is that of Powell himself.
"The Incredible Melting Man is a fantastically gross, trashy and energetic Z-grade production that every self-respecting camp-horror freak simply has to see for him/herself!"
"Astronaust Steve West is the only survivor of a disastrous space-mission, but turns out the carrier of a horrible disease that makes him radioactive and ... causes him to melt!"
"Doctor Ted Nelson has to find him urgently, as the disease also set Steve up with an insatiable appetite for human flesh."
The melting dude's face looks like a rotting pizza and his heavy breathing makes him sound like Darth Vader!
"This was undoubtedly the making of Kline as a serious actor, and he was surprisingly good in the role."
"Attenborough gave this the sort of direction you'd expect, and the often spectacular scenes of the masses were those of the sort that only he can get across."
"Unfortunately, the director Amos Guttman died from Aids-related illnesses the year after making this film, so we don't know how many more gay-related films we might have had from him."
"A great blues song All Night Long Blues done by an unknown female artist; if she is listed in the credits,sadly it was not translated to English."
"I don't want to sound like a soft tissue grabber when it comes to films i assure you i am quite the opposite, but the most uplifting part of this film is without a doubt shadows return, when shadow desperately tries to escape and chance and sassy, painfully are told by him to leave."
Mr. Falk shines as the older man and there's never a false movement in his interpretation of the man whose whole world is crumbling under him.
She makes a good contribution as the fleeing mother.
"I remember this movie in particular when I was a teenager, my best friend was telling me all about this movie and how it freaked her out as a kid."
"At his dental practice, Feinstone's first patient of the day is young Jody Saunders, there for his very first dental appointment."
"Feinstone sees his second patient, beauty queen April Reign."
Feinstone snaps out of his trance and quickly re-buttons April's blouse.
Feinstone decides to end the day early and sends his staff and patients home.
Feinstone has gone off the deep end and is definitely not going to let anybody stand in his way of cleanliness.
The best scene without a doubt is when he teaches that nasty IRS agent a lesson in hygiene that I'm sure he'll never forget.
"The star of the show is not a hero, she is a spoiled, bigoted pervert."
"Big Lake does win district and, adhering to his end of the deal, Morris attends a Tampa Bay Devil Rays try out."
"Also, except for one scene in which he prays with his players, the movie completely ignores Morris' Christian faith."
"In spite, of Brosnan's detached, grunting style, in the end he comes through convincingly as a passionate, dedicated man."
"I thoroughly empathized with the artist when he said, when I'm not out here (alone) for any length of time, I feel unrooted."
"Luckily for us, Goldsworthy is able to share his vision through the communication medium of photography."
"Michael O'Hara (Orson Welles} himself doesn't really know what is going on, he is as confused as the viewer is, and that is wonderful to watch as he is pulled all over the place by pretty much everyone in the film."
Director Vidor is simply delightful and even makes a lengthy (at least for 1928) cameo as himself.
Oscar's wife has already left him because he is impossible to live with due to his irresponsible attitude.
"Felix's wife leaves him at the start of the movie, and after an aborted suicide attempt he moves in with poker buddy Oscar."
"not only are the effects extraordinary, vs. crap like 'earth vs. the flying saucers'---the real 'killer' is the 'universality of plot'---everything hinges on two principles---the ancient concept of a hidden incestuous-thinking father's desire for his daughter, and the idea of what would happen should a world's tech reach the point where all citizen's desires become manifest."
"unfortunately the 'gear' of 'The Krell'---wasted by ignorance, remains, and 'Morpheus', the incestuous father, knows how to access such tech---and does so, to prevent losing his daughter to another."
Hilary Duff is very commendable for her role as central Asian pop star Yonica Babyyeah.
This chilling atmosphere is augmented by Wisbar's inventive direction and the wholly convincing performances he has drawn from all his players.
"Robert Barrat delivers his usual no-nonsense, straight-down-the-line portrait of the local bigwig, though it's hard to believe that the personable, good-looking guy who plays his son is none other than the later dullsville writer/director Blake Edwards"
Ericka Eleniak is absolutely beautiful and holds her own in this one - Better than any episode of Baywatch - and shows a knack for subtle humor.
Too bad she hasn't had many opportunities to expand on that.
"Due to his insane jealousy, he's out for revenge."
"Starting off, here's a synopsis: Porno queen Alta Lee (Lynn Lowry) is murdered by her pornographer lover Max (George Shannon) in a game of sexual Russian roulette."
Some may call MJ an egotist for consenting to the making of this movie BUT MJ and most of his fans would say that he made it for the fans which if true is really nice of him.
Why he wants MJ dead so bad is beyond me.
"Nah, Joe Pesci's character ranted that he wanted people to know it is he who is supplying drugs etc so i dunno, maybe he just hates MJ's music."
Michael Jackson is truly one of the most talented people ever to grace this planet but is he guilty?
"The Selma Blair character is hardly unlikable, and there's never a scene where I thought to myself, Why did he want to marry her in the first place?"
Julia Stiles proves again why she's so damn likable.
"Julie Hagerty also has a small part, and she's always enjoyable to watch, which makes me wish she received better roles."
There is only one John Woo and til this day there hasn't been one director that comes close to his brilliance when it comes to action!
"The filmmakers' interpretation of the Wendigo's form is interesting, and can be properly menacing when filmed correctly - when the fleeing killer sees the Wendigo in a flash in his rear view mirror, for instance - and the tree-form was actually very good."
"The character of Otis comes across as truly dangerous and unpredictable, making him the real monster in the film."
"I have heard unconfirmed reports (from a newsgroup) that the reason the Wendigo doesn't do much is that, when the monster suit was built, it wound up so heavy and and uncomfortable (in order to mimic the stance of it standing on cloven hooves, the performer had to walk on his toes) that it was nearly impossible to run, walk, or otherwise perform in it."
The Major at a boys military academy is paranoid that every kid is bad and wants to cause trouble (in this movie he is right).
May becomes attracted to Darren because he is virile and she enjoys the connection they seem to have.
Darren becomes attracted to May because she offers a kind of peace and understanding that he does not get from the other women in his life.
"They end up sleeping together in the spare room during the day, and May enjoys fulfillment as a woman that she has not known in years, nor had ever expected to know again."
"At a writing group that Paula leads, May is introduced, rather forced to get together with a widower to whom she is not attracted."
"May, however, also had revealed earlier in the film that her husband didn't like her having any friends, so she didn't have any."
"Thanks to this marvelous Hammer short movie, I now at least know NEVER to offer a strange visitor any wine and a slice of bread with salt in my own house, because he might just be hypnotist and this combination will give him the power to control my thoughts & mind forever!"
And this is where our Masked killer starts his/her brutal killings.
There are some absolutely crazy things going on in this movie (one badguy gets his arm lopped off with a pane of glass and hardly notices).
"Li has seldom been better, and he has surrounded himself with a bevy of beautiful female costars (Yip kicks some serious ass as a fellow supersoldier)."
"(Maybe to Bach's boyfriend, because think of it where's he gonna stay?)."
"Speaking of which under-the-weather Vicki slips off her clothes and gets into a nice hot tub, not realizing that Keller has crept into her room to inspect the keyhole."
Lamm comes home next (Bach is out finishing an argument with her beau) and can't find anyone in the house.
"Well, at about the time poor Lamm is getting her quietus in the kitchen, we do a flashback into Mr. Keller's past and get the full story of what his sick, sadistic background really is and why his wife doesn't smile much."
Bach finally gets home and wants to know where her friends are.
"The opening credits showed many differing images, one of which was a snippit of COLONEL JOHN PAUL STAPP, riding his famed rocket sled, at the point where he was often referred to as The Fastest Man Alive"
"There's the danger with the critic/philosopher Slavoj Zizek with his film, directed by Sophie Fiennes, which takes together a wonderful amalgam of silent, horror, sci-fi, surreal and other contemporary thrillers together to make his points ofr Freudian comparisons to overload."
"Now it would be one thing if Zizek himself went about making these sincere, excited, and somehow plausible points just face on to the camera or mostly in voice-over as Scorsese does."
Lost Highway) by putting himself IN the locations the films take place in.
"A more plausible reason was that the FBI regained her trail in Queensland before she again skipped overseas (one guess: No, not Jordan)."
"Secret, because in it Khouri's American security guard Jeremy is heard to have an Australian accent: he's an actor!"
"So this becomes the filmmaker's triumph, as she never flags in her tone or commitment."
"Her on-camera revelations lead her audience to learn from the mistakes of others given such a litany of reasonable doubt, FBI documents--and Khouri's most shocking initial crime."
"And when the seasoned sniper is caught, it's up to Miller to put politics aside and save him."
Little does she know that she has been followed by Jackson Ripner AKA Jack the Ripper (Murphy).
"Nana Patekar also gives out his best, without even trying."
Never mentioned any other children or wife prior to his speaking with and falling in love with the teacher?
Poor Warden must have had a really stinky childhood to be so mean when she grew up
-Ben is a fundamentally good person who made a big mistake that he won't forgive himself for.
The acting is OK but despite his top billing I didn't think Caine had that much screen time.
The screenwriter talked about how she work with autistic children and other special needs children as a volunteer for several years.
Jeff Combs has more talent than he is recognized for.
and moves up to Wyoming with her daughter.
"Elinore's routine (and her employer's) is one of endless, backbreaking labor, where there are no modern conveniences and where everything must be made, fixed or done by hand."
"Elinore has the baby all by herself, with no help whatsoever."
Clyde calls Elinore urgently to help him deliver the calf.
"And I liked the woman who played Harriet Smith in this movie better, too...she was more believably sweet and sentimental."
Abby's final appeal to his good nature is rejected because he has too much self-respect not to do his job well.
"And Zizek himself is constantly making us laugh, either from bizarre little jokes or from his enthusiastic insistence on, for example, a bold Oedipal interpretation of The Birds."
"With only one 'toilet humour' gag, Over Her Dead Body manages to actually come up with realistically funny scenarios and, without spoiling anything too much, some of the moments involving animals are hilarious."
"The result is a feature that may disgruntle historians thanks to its relatively flippant regards to facts and the like, yet never to let document get in the way of extracting a compelling story, writer Julian Fellowes sticks to his guns and delivers a slightly romanticised yet convincing portrayal."
The evil doers watch and are about to spring their surprise attack when a wounded Din climbs onto the golden dome and blows his bugle which then alerts the British to the ambush.
I was greatly affected by the scene of the man and the children who he raises as his own.
The man still persuades tho boy that he is their father by the only definition that counts.
"Ed McMahon's character is an over-patriotic right-wing yahoo (he thinks that everyone should have listened to Joe McCarthy), Kenneth Mars's coach/principal is a tense dweeb, and then there's more."
"(title song lyric)he can sink a beer, he can pick a queer, in his latest double-breasted Bondi gear."
"Prison is the Finnish director Harlin's American debut, which still counts as his best effort even though he went on making blockbuster hits like Die Hard 2, Cliffhanger and Deep Blue Sea."
"I am embarrassed to say that my favorite character is TISH, but still enjoy watching her make her space outfit like super cool with a like totally bitchin belt and stick on rhinestones on her face."
"Regarding plot, one interesting feature here was Jane's near-fickleness and inconstancy, when she was being subject to Martin's flirtations."
Jane's duplicitous actions tricking Tarzan and delivering Boy to his family.
"Jane, showing us that she is truly of Tarzan's world now, quickly displaying her enterprising woodcraft to work up a line of fire to keep the lions away."
"Reda (Nicolas Cazale) lives with his Muslim family in Southern France, a young student with a Western girlfriend who does not seem to be following the religious direction of his heritage."
Cybill Shepherd as Corinne isn't bad in her role as the woman who can't get over her husband's death.
"But that problem was salvaged because Mary Stuart Masterson has a fresh-as-a-daisy sweetness to brighten it up, and Robert Downey Jr. is so charming that he melts the screen."
"And he does it, I might add, without a lot of help from his male actors, i.e., Curtis and Tone."
"Siodmak's use of sex, light, shadows, and music is truly remarkable as he tackles this genre."
Alan Curtis didn't seem upset that he might die and didn't seem happy that he lived.
FDR was the new president and hopes were so high that he'd pull the nation out of the Depression.
"Dear little Miss Ruby Keeler was never better than she is playing the Chinese hooker, Lil."
"When he looks at Freeman adoringly and says, You make me want to be a woman."
Make-up specialist Perc Westmore briefly appears as himself to try to make one character resemble another.
"Powell leaves the band and his girl friend (Frances Langford) and goes to Hollywood, only to find he is a contract player (most likely for musicals involving saxophonists)."
"He is met by Allen Joslyn, the publicist of the studio (the owner is Grant Mitchell)."
"Lane is like Jean Hagen in Singing In The Rain, except her speaking voice is good."
"Joslyn finds a double for her (Lola's real life sister Rosemary Lane), and Rosemary is made up to play the star at the premiere and the follow-up party."
This leads to Powell knocking down Mowbray when the latter makes a pest of himself.
"Lexa Doig's character was confusing to understand, at first, she was out to trap Bob but i really believe she landed up loving him although by then she had broken his heart."
"Same thing with the original Little Shop Of Horrors - Jack Nicholson was in it for all of five minutes, but now they have him on the cover as if he were the main star."
"Sidney Stratton is an eccentric inventor who isn't getting the chances to flourish his inventions on the world because nobody pays him notice, he merely is the odd ball odd job man about the place as it were."
"Jimmy's life of crime came full circle when Rose, after she found out about his secret life, ratted him out to the police to prevent him from executing a Valentine Day like massacre, with his gang members dressed as cops, of his rival mobsters."
But then we discover that this is the story of Martinaud's imperfections and his difficulty in coping.
"The story of a doomed bomber pilot who is missed by his heavenly conductor in the English fog during the second world war, and his subsequent brushes with the celestial authorities (or is it in his head) is played with panache by David Niven and Kim Hunter and is incredibly touching - especially in the opening scenes when the doomed pilot (Niven) describes his plight to the ground radio operator (Hunter)."
Did this person feel that the road was finally over and that he had spoken all that was necessary and that any more would be chapters added to a life already filled with many burnt pages?
Marisa Tomei is excellent for her relatively short appearance (the fact that she bares her flesh adds to this).
Amy Ryan also performs her job adequately.
"Maggi Smith is pretty, sexy, bourgeois, and turns out to be not nearly so dumb as she seems."
Mr. Wuhl uses examples and show and tell to get his points across.
"Not only is Picardo such a great actor but the premise setting for his expansive, self growth, as a doctor, self realization now that is science fiction at its best!"
I was right because in 1990 handsome Daniel Day-Lewis turn a little bit ugly by playing an crippled person and he did it with a great sense of reality.
Turturro definitely gives his best performance to date proving he's worth much more than what we thought.
(3 victims were buried & couldn't be found so he was only convicted of 52 out of 53 of his murders.)
"A man that becomes tortured and obsessed with finding this killer despite the additional obstacles placed by party hacks, his part is essential to be sure."
"Rea's performance is so well done, he doesn't overact, chew up the scenery or do anything that distracts from his portrayal of a man who is hell bent on finding his killer."
"Rea does so much with his face, his eyes, he doesn't need to overact."
"Either way, his performance is very well done."
"Although this movie deals with a morbid, grotesque and violent story, it really is more about what it takes to catch a killer than the killer himself."
"The final scene in Mecca is truly a sight to behold, and you too would feel the claustrophobia and fear as Reda tries to hunt down his dad amongst the thousands of people congregating."
Geoffrey Rush is the wrong actor for the part; he needs to be way over the top to make the conflict between good and evil a galvanic one.
Ben Stiller has always seemed to be slumming in the roles he takes.
"This one is no exception, but he goes at it with such conviction that you come away feeling that he'd learned something about comedy growing up in a household run by Jerry Stiller and Anne Meara."
"Jeaneane Garofalo proves with this performance that she should have been the star of One True Thing, not Renee Zellweger."
William H. Macy does something very difficult; he makes stolid magnetic.
"I have not checked the movie against the play to see how many lines were cut out, but I know that Shakespeare tends to develop his characters, even the seemingly unimportant ones, very well."
The old guy who flies the chopper... How the hell did he fall for the trap?
Unlike that film The Fourth Man is also perversely funny as Gerard's deeply held Catholic beliefs seep into every aspect of his life including sexuality.
"Or Idrissa Ouedraogo's part (which features a bin Laden-double so much resembling the real one that you'll be shocked when you see him, I promise), in which 5 boys muse about good things that can be done with the reward put out on Laden."
"The girl who was pretending to be deaf in order to corrupt and seduce him says I am Lilith, the witch who loved Adam before Eve"
"Wagner's dismal attempt to honor this film was a bit disappointing, but his few scenes didn't detract from being entertained."
"Watch as Gene sings, acts and dances his way through Paris in any number of situations."
And it lacks much of the energy a comedy needs to get your average audience member to sit through it without checking his or her watch.
Look at Azaria's relationship with his long-suffering mother; Macy's endearing innocence in his unwillingness to accept Cap.
"Amazing's secret identity; Stiller's rage (not unlike that one weird, spazzy kid you once knew who'd always go into quivering, impotent rages on the playground); Garofalo's desire to avenge her father."
Clark Gable plays con artist Eddie with all his usual charisma and mischievous eyebrow raising.
"Pauline Aquart is the youngest of the three, only aspiring to join the team she so much admires."
Blachere is a good actress and adds to the ungainliness of the character through her performance.
But then the soi-disant slut takes the skinny Pauline under her wing and reveals to Pauline that she's still a virgin.
Is she USING Pauline the way she seems to be using men?
Alec Guinness is a scientific genius - but an eccentric one (he has never gotten his university degree due to an...err...accident in a college laboratory).
"Guinness has support from a female shop steward, but not her chief."
"With only Greenwood in his corner (although Parker sort of sympathizes with him), Guinness tries to get the news of his discovery to the public."
"But Sinatra's young and naive in this one, and in his own sung words falls in love too fast."
This is an unwelcome surprise to Dr. Johnson since he is a married man with two children.
"Bozz is totally cool and non-plussed, testing and tweaking his military superiors, getting their goat at every opportunity."
"He is a Jesus Christ figure with a psychology degree, saving his fellow soldiers and showing the ones in genuine need, the way out of this man's army."
Reynolds character Lewis was interesting as a guy who comes off very tough but underneath the manly veneer lies a very soft and broken man (I was impressed with his performance!)
"Jon Voight seems to be the character thats on the spotlight the most, the unfortunate circumstances that seem to find him at every corner really mold and caste him into a different man at the end (his character transition was excellent)."
Soha probably has her first (?)
"Soha looks beautiful, and when she smiles she fits the role, but I found her unconvincing in the more serious moments."
"Kazan already won an Oscar in 1947, before this movie, so he was not a completely unknown at the time."
As the cast waltzes through finely appointed Manhattan offices and apartments his slowly moving camera creates a palpable sense of anxiety as we never know who might be around the next corner or what this person might do in the next room.
Very good dramatic comedy about a playwright trying to figure out how to keep his head above water after running out of ideas.
Everybody has his or her own agenda.
"""The Verger"" tells of a church sexton (James Hayter) - for which the story's title is another word - who's dismissed after 17 years of service by the new parish priest (Michael Hordern) simply because he's illiterate."
"Rather than rest on his laurels, despite his age, he not only takes a wife (his landlady, played by Kathleen Harrison) but opens a tobacconist shop strategically placed in a lengthy stretch of road where no such service is offered - and, with business flourishing, this is developed into a whole chain."
"Know-All"", is the shortest but also perhaps the most engaging: a voyage at sea is utterly beleaguered by the insufferable presence of a pompous young man (Nigel Patrick), British despite his foreign-sounding name of Kelada, who professes to be an authority on virtually every subject under the sun."
"During a fancy-dress party, however, the passengers decide to enact their 'revenge' on Kelada by having one of them impersonate him (a jest which he naturally doesn't appreciate)!"
"Soon Jonathan is ensconced in the palace as Alphonse Simms, and Simms' prostitute girlfriend Madonna (Braga) who realizes the switch promises to help him in any way she can."
It's one of those performances where you never quite know what the character is thinking - he can be pleasant or turn psycho at any moment.
"Director Ruggero Deodato has made some actually very good movies, like House on the Edge of the Park, and also his Atlantis Interceptors and Live Like a Cop, Die Like a Man are enjoyable action movies."
We all loved JJ's dynamite and his antics.
Gypo gets his friend killed and sinks into a pit of despair and drunkenness.
"We also understand his sorry character, and there's a lot of sympathy that arises for him."
"Yeah,it's one of Candy's earliest films, but it is maybe his funniest!"
"If the murderer wanted to whack the dame, why not just off her and let the cops try to figure out whodunnit?"
Lupino looks identical when playing the young Trent as she does when playing the middle aged Trent and this diminishes the tragedy of the situation significantly.
Hal Hartley's Henry Fool was an independent film masterpiece and certainly his best work.
"Fay starts her adult journey as an immature, utterly normal, spoiled child and responds to the onslaught of ridiculous circumstances by becoming a mature, utterly normal, experienced adult who holds no advantages."
"The movie is in two parts, the first dealing with the beginning of Fay's struggle and subsequent hardening due to authoritarian hostility, and the second dealing with her battle to soften only just enough to regain Henry."
"Elina Lowensohn perhaps eclipses her in emotional commitment to the role, allowing Parker to play both straight man and comic against the lively, stage-like comedy happening around her."
"By the end, you are shown Fay's newly developed character and integrity are the offspring of her time with the fatally intense Henry, whose piercing honesty and unique passion lights a spark in anyone he meets."
"Even though she has no interest in him and basically treats him like dirt, Phillip is obsessed."
Nora gives Phillip all the love and confidence he needs but he is incapable of returning her love.
"Kay Johnson was always called on to play sensible, believable women - which she played to perfection as she was obviously sensible herself."
Craven keeps us guessing as to the involvement of others and if anyone will come to her rescue.
"I think the Dark-Heart character is a little on the rough side and I don't like the way he shape-shifts into a mean frog, fox, boy I was wrong, This movie was made for my kid, not for me."
"In this sense it is visually and spatially satisfying, as its hero, a good cop with a bad temper, gets into very hot water when he accidentally kills a guy with a plate in his head."
"Gary Merrill makes for a very interesting villain, with his natural warmth providing a nice contrast to Andrews' coolness; his smiling, amiable-seeming bad guy seems to be continually challenging his nemesis by the mere fact of his being emotionally open, as opposed to the tightly wound and moralistic cop who is pursuing him."
"Brett Rickaby (Frank Gorshin) bears a stronger resemblance to his subject, but captures none of the late Gorshin's charm, only his characterizations."
"The story isn't about the street life or the Italian mobster who tries to buy Stix off, then threatens him, it's about how love can overcome even the worst tragedies in life as portrayed in song and style and the character that was the life in the times for young women trying to be discovered back then"
It tells the story of Patrick Galloway an expert of the occult and a formidable fighter who is summoned by a friend to his estate in Ireland to investigate some weird phainomena.
The game is set in Ireland after World War one so don't expect to find weapons like chainguns or rocket launchers.All the weapons in the game can be considered antiques but the real fun in the game are its spells and the system they operate on.Our hero is ambidexterous so he can use both his hands at the same time: he casts spells with his right arm and uses his guns with the left.So you can shoot and cast spells at the same time which as you understand very fun and also unique to this game!
Corbin Bernson is very much in command of this movie with his slick portrayal of the loony control freak eponymous practitioner.
"Linda Hoffman plays his cheating wife and she is very easy on the eye - unfortunately for her, the little tryst with the pool guy brings severe punishment in a way the good doctor knows best - shame about that pretty smile!"
"His eloquence is shown in the interviews, which he did himself, and the amazing additions that he himself adds to the commentary."
"Katzir's film allows Israel escape from dark informative crux in which they live, and this wonderful country arises to the light as a splendid bird which is born of his ashes."
"Preminger doesn't jump around and show off- his long slow takes encourage you to listen and reflect, and Graham Greene's script condenses Shaw without sacrificing complexity.The piece has the look of a made for TV movie, and is certainly studio bound but none the worse for that."
"Scoop is Woody Allen's latest film and though he appears in this one, it's OK."
"I love Matthau's grumpy character--he's just the same as he always is, and yet also very different."
"Fishburne has always been a good actor, but this performance as the Moor of Venice may be one of his best."
Desdemona's character is given far less depth than she has in the play.
The film-maker's personal experience in interviewing Herge and the story of his relationship with the artist who was the inspiration for the Chan character was very moving.
"A young carpenter, played by future Tarzan Lex Barker, asks him if he wants his lallies to be rabbeted, or some such thing that only a carpenter would know."
"Lena is the true pioneer of the modern riot-grrrl movement, confusion, curiosity and wit are her main attributes, she is occasionally angry, but aren't we all"
"Mother Night is a very good Vonnegut novel, and most certainly one of his easiest novels to adapt into a feature length film."
"The traditional Western is synonymous with wide open spaces, clearcut morality, inevitable storylines, the optimistic faith in a hero's ability to shape his own destiny, to escape his past."
"Noir was neurotically charged, focusing on the dissolution of an unstable protagonist, where morality is blurred, the hero is as often the villain, trapped in an interior-labyrinth of his own making, a passive victim to destiny."
"Mann's incisive technique intrudes his camera in crucial positions, alternating revealing distance with intense examination, making the saloon doors and stagecoaches seem thrillingly alive and lived in"
"Melvin Frank and Norman Panama, a great comedy writing team from that era, saw the potential in Eric Hodgins novel, whose hero, Jim Blandings, can't stand the cramped apartment where he and his wife Muriel, and two daughters, must share."
The direction of H.C. Potter is light and he succeeded in this film that will delight fans of classic comedies
"I liked DeNiro in the lead, although its not on par with his masterful works (taxi driver, godfather and all the others) it is as good as his other good performances such as in King of Comedy or Angel Heart."
"The acting of Clara Lago is simply amazing for someone so young, and she is one of those special actors who can say say much with facial expressions."
"Ruby Keeler seems to have a sickening smile plastered on her face at all times, but at least she's not required to act like in some of her later unfortunate films."
Extraordinary focus is given to Che meeting the volunteers who accompany his guerrilla factions.
"There is an abundance of the terrain, where these men live for weeks at a time, and the all-consuming effect is of languor, Guevara himself having malaria part of the time."
The story is a much-used formula: Rising musical talent must overcome personal and professional hurdles to find his audience and self-respect.
"Bruce Willis is great for this role and he acts good, but Brad Pitt is completely 100% excellent."
"As Mildred Rogers, Davis burst forth with a completely unsympathetic role of a slutty waitress who becomes the target of Leslie Howard's affections, and already eager to sink her teeth into a role like this, she had no qualms of the awful things her character was meant to do throughout the course of the film and the awful transformation she would undergo."
"All the same, the two seem awkward with one another; their scenes together remain stiff, only salvaged by the ferocious acidity Davis brings to her lines and her own nervous presence."
"Then again, Cromwell's direction has a certain stiltedness about itself that fails to come through at times -- he tries to fill in some space (whenever Davis is not there) with dissolves and montages indicating the passing of time (a calendar superimposed over a changing Frances Dee)."
"Carla covers his mistakes and he, anxious to go straight, reluctantly helps her to take revenge on her colleagues."
Lisa Ray looked lovely not seen her before and hope to see her again in the future.
And it is great to see a 19 year old Ben Affleck giving his best in a moving and sincere performance.
Gere is an over obsessed vigilante whom is on his way out.
"Gere sees his flock as very sick, disturbed puppies."
"Amanda Peet screams star quality with her winning combination of beauty, brains, and serious acting ability."
"Suddenly he too needs an urgent escape option and, as the prisoners experiment, Danvers' book starts to reveal some of its terrifying powers..."
With all its budget limitations it is greatly to the first-time feature director Eric Vallette's credit that his film succeeds as well as it does.
Another thing that was missing in the movie is information about the origins of his hatred for Jews.
"Little does she know - though we learn immediately - that the employment agent is a front, set up to get just the right woman for this assignment, a woman with no family and no boyfriend."
"It's a live-in situation; once Julia gets to the house, she's drugged, and when she wakes up, she's told she's Mrs. Hughes and not allowed to leave."
Kenneth Branagh is a cocky attorney who finds himself framed for murder after he gets involved with a client (Embeth Davidtz) who has enlisted his help in protecting her from her cuckoo father (Robert Duvall).
"Bruce Almighty is the story of Bruce Nolan, an average man who feels God is messing up his life."
"With the safe being soundproof nobody at the mansion the butler maid and Abigail's personal secretary Veronica, Mariette Hartley, hear him screaming for help and the next day Edmund is found suffocated to death."
There's also something very odd that's inside the safe that has been on Lt. Columbo's mind ever since he came on the case.
This has to do with the black paint residue that was found under the dead Edmund's fingernails and on his belt buckle!
Ray McAnally gives one of his finest performances as Pym's con man father Rick who (as le Carre has said) is based strongly on the author's own father.
In fact if it wasn't for McAnally's performance a year after this in A Very British Coup this would the finest performance of his sadly too short career.
Sure wish he'd make more films
"Over the coming weeks the child revisits the place where she found her fox hopeful that one of said days she will see said fox, who she begins to call Lily, once again."
"Eventually, spring comes around again, and the young child finds her fox, and indeed does strike up a friendship with the animal."
"A young, seemingly lonely child lives in a house in the middle of nowhere and walks to school, seemingly on her own, every day, seemingly without a care in the a seemingly perfect world."
"ever scowling, of the title character, and the hard-to-believe dedication of her lawyer, I'm forced to accept that life does imitate art, and that there are people out there like that."
"One gets caught, the other remains free and is not given away by his companion."
And it is certainly the man himself we hear.
"The acting is good, and the evolution of Julia Stiles' character Nicky put her situation into a new highly sympathetic light."
"Bourne regrets all the people he killed, and he considers (or at least made me consider) the meaning of action without purpose, life without meaning, and how the government has transformed men into resources."
"Lara Flynn Boyle performs as the cold mean seductress, Walsh as her heartless husband, and Hopper as the Lynchian hit-man he's already done before."
"I love the director's portrayal of the relationship of the two daughters--as one of six siblings, it's clear to me he understood how complex those relationships are."
"Alice is always fiery and seems a little rough around the edges, but she seems more fun than Darlene."
"Darlene is always a little on the conservative side and although that can get irritating sometimes, it would have served the two girls better if her way was adhered to instead of Alice's."
Tess Nanavati is clearly a great screenwriter and I would love to see more of her films.
The boy playing William did a good job as well though I didn't find him convincing in every scene.
"Michael Winner does a good job with his central location, as the block of flats provides a creepy and macabre setting for the story."
"It's difficult to not have a liking for Israeli director Eytan Fox and for his movies, which describe the life in the middle east and the inherent problems gay people can have in these regions."
"A boy at school has to attend a lesson when his friend plays truant and is given the most important lesson of his life, only to find that when there are not enough copies to go around he has to share with the school bully."
"Charlie and Itchy only just lacked the same sparkle, but I loved King Gator and his song."
Omar Epps plays a track star with a partial scholarship and having a hard time keeping up with his work.
Any idea where he's starred in before?
"The initial woman storms out, and she is kidnapped."
This is a thin story -- and quite predictable at times -- but he gets very good performances out of his cast and has some rather intricate camera moves that involve the viewer intimately.
"The first part looks like a Cinderella story, though anyone with brains can see that the bottom will fall out of that -- the rich 'prince' will lose his fortune."
"Nonetheless, because of his good cast and fast pace, it's easy to get caught up in the cliches."
"The film chronicles Bettie Page's (Mol) life from her physical and sexually abused days as a kid in high school in the South, and onto her new life in New York."
"Save for a few shady characters during her teenage years, everyone she encounters is an innocent, and everything she does has an innocence to it."
"It just feels so natural and so wondrous, that if there were any reason to watch the film, it would be to see the spectacular depictions of Mol's body as she plays Bettie Page."
The other reason is Mol herself.
Mol plays her exactly to the right amount of squeaky-cleanliness needed to make this character feel authentically from the 1950's.
"Moon Child's story starts with Kei - a Japanese vampire, who loathes what he has become and lives in denial."
"Feelings of paranoia and desperation begin to take over Kevin's character, and when he finds out that his ex girlfriend AND collaborator (Elisabeth Shue) is having a torrid affair with another of the young scientists in the team, he finally snaps."
This one simply has the one fan of the band kind of helping the killer spirit at first then trying to stop him.
"Of course, one Mr. Mickey Rooney is indeed, INCREDIBLE in his role as the ring-leading Killer."
I love the Mick's last line before he goes out for his dose of lead poisoning.
"Jeff Goldblum is navigating his way around a variety of characters, trying not to get shot and acting deftly rather than dorkily, trying to stay abreast of what he knows and others don't, whom he can outshoot and whom he can't."
"Gabriel Byrne and Richard Dreyfuss (his best performance) have a ball, and the supporting cast look spot-on."
"After Bake returns from several years of duty in the Navy, he finds Sherry as dance hostess in an unsophisticated San Francisco ballroom."
"Following a dispute between the participants in a card game, a man called Kochak (Lewis Charles) is shot and his body is dumped in the dock area."
"As the identity of the dead man is unknown, the task of finding his contacts is expected to be difficult and this situation is not helped when city officials and the Police Commissioner are not fully convinced by Reed's briefing."
"The investigation that follows is hampered by a lack of cooperation from the immigrant community, a group of seamen, the proprietor of a restaurant and also some illegal immigrants before the man's identity and his contacts are eventually found."
Richard Widmark gives a strong performance as an underpaid public official who copes efficiently with the onerous responsibilities of his job whilst also dealing with his domestic preoccupations as a family man.
Jack Palance's film debut sees him giving an impressive performance as a ruthless thug who misjudges Kochak's reason for leaving the card game and also the reason for the intense police investigation.
"Claire Danes did a great job as usual, she is a great actress."
"Not only that, but Batwoman's alter ego seems so incredibly 'stiff' and dull that the viewer doesn't really care what happened to her that caused her to put on the mask or what happens to her at the end and therein lies the main reason we don't get this special emotional appeal."
"October Sky is about a young man who believes in himself named Homer Hickam, growing up in a strict, traditional family in the 1950's."
"Made pretty early on in his career, the movies that followed were vastly inferior."
"Alec Guinness is a fantastic actor; he has the ability to light up the screen with his presence (and he does in this film, literally), but he also manages to portray his characters in a down to earth and believable way."
"It follows King David, who as a child had slain the giant Goliath, and now we find him in adulthood as the second King of Israel."
the German actress katja riemann completely deserved her award.
"The story of an unstable actress, Myrtle Gordon, (Gena Rowlands) trying to put herself together for a play, fighting her demons; Opening Night is not only about a woman on the verge of a breakdown but also about the complexities of the lives of theater actors and the theatrical world."
"Cassavetes is so harsh with his characters that this unkindness turns towards the audience, but the audience in the cinema."
"Myrtle (Rowland) says she's an actress and that's the only thing she knows how to do; and I imagine that if I had a friend who was a professional performer, it would be really difficult to tell when he's saying the truth because I would know he's an actor and he can fake anything at any time."
"When she witnesses the death of a teenager, a fan; all of this comes together and affects Myrtle, but no one knows if her delusions are for real."
"When someone's talking, the camera doesn't focus on him, it shoots the person who is listening; so we can see how he or she reacts to the things the other one's saying."
"However, Noriko's coach, Koichiro Ota, has faith in her."
"And he has made it his personal mission to see that she succeeds at becoming a pilot, for he was a survivor of the battle in which Noriko's father was killed."
"Director Harold Becker is a director very familiar with elements of the thriller having done Mercury Rising, Malice, and Domestic Disturbance and I think in many ways he incorporates so many of the formulaic thriller genre that its almost to a fault."
"As the film continues it broadens its political spectrum to include a democratic boss, and his connections and then we are introduced to some of the goings on within the city."
There is just something brilliant about his entire demeanor.
Danny Aiello is terrific although his character is a little under explored as democratic boss with ties to the mafia Frank Anselmo.
"The movie mostly took place in a small, out-dated radio station's studio with a very bad history, where the main character was forced to broadcast his talk show due to the radio station was in the process of re-locating."
"Director Verhoeven does a great job, or should that be the special effects boys make him look good."
"However, she has a similar I only trust myself attitude to Jeff."
"Jeff wishes to steer clear of both, and head with his new wealth and Ben for a ranch they want in Utah."
"Roman is an interesting blend of opportunist and human being, whose fate is determined by her better feelings."
Stallone is rarely this interesting in his action films and he certainly looks the part in terms of the action scenes.
"Pierre Fresnay turns the crazy act of murder in something understandable within the temporal madness of his character, the tortured defrocked Morand who, in this terrible way, comes back to his duty"
Shemp's scene when poisoned and her reaction are truly magnificent.
Leslie Caron was an unknown at this time and she was of the French gamin type.
"A talented dancer, she was never a real beauty."
"The way mark's brain works is also so obscure that you never really know what he is thinking, and if you think you do, you are wrong."
"Frankly, if someone who hadn't read the book stumbled across the hour and a half or two hour versions, they would think that's pretty much all the story entails--Rochester's secret and its affect on everyone around him."
"If one remembers the book, so much of the adult Jane's fieriness and passion occurs during her private struggles."
Ms. Clarke shouldn't be tall and the filmmakers toned down her looks to make Jane's declarations of her lack of beauty credible.
"I wanted the sly humor of the scene where Jane opines that Rochester's ardor will cool and he'll become gruff again, but he may like her again by and by."
"Dalton's performance is so good that the rare misstep is glaring--when Rochester weeps in the library, I saw him as an actor doing a crying scene, not as Rochester."
"The boys then fool around in the studio, put on Miss Van Doren's record and Curly gets dressed in women's clothes and pretends he's singing."
"About Richard Benjamin: I personally find his acting annoying in general, and his work in this movie is no exception -- although he has some fine moments here."
"Oscar theories aside, here's my bottom line review: If you like Matthau's comic acting, then see this movie and savor his powerhouse tirades and wonderful grandmother-inspired gestures, fleeting facial expressions and seemingly unscripted asides."
"(But if you're currently dealing with the pain of watching an old person lose his grip, then be warned that this movie might either be the comic relief you need or a dose of reality too painful to watch right now."
"Shelley Winters, Debbie Reynolds and Michael MacLiammoir deliver excellent performances; the latter is especially impressive as the larger-than-life and vaguely sinister diction coach (though he ultimately proves a mere red herring!)."
"The scene with the sexually frustrated mother at the museum is gripping and well done, as is the later sequence leading to her untimely death."
He dismisses Zizek's interpretations because they don't seem in line with what the director originally intended.
It can leave a viewer feeling like he's treading on well worn ground.
"In one shot, the deteriorating mental state of a character is shown as he sits in front of a 3-way mirror, suggesting multiple personalities."
"The same character, who is an artist, has Van Gogh's self portrait with the bandaged ear hanging on the wall in his apartment."
Cecilia Cheung is beautiful and her presence on screen makes this movie worth watching.
"He states right from the beginning that for him the primary conflict within the film industry is that between the director's vision and the distributor's profit motive, between art and commercial viability."
"Scorcese doesn't necessarily focus on his absolute favourite directors either (Orson Welles and Alfred Hitchcock, two of Scorcese's biggest influences, are only mentioned in passing)."
"I can imagine that, had this assignment not been limited to America, Scorcese would have also loved to talk about, for example his Italian influences or his British hero Michael Powell."
"While I didn't care for the narrator, as I felt he was out of balance with the rest of the performances, this film features some of the best ensemble acting I have ever seen, and the lead, Summer Phoenix, is fabulous."
The Fuhrer hoists himself on his own petard with smug pronouncements before his people and the world as he says one thing and does another as his army moves East.
One of the nicest parts of the film is the relaxed way the in which the other children treat him.
"Walking into the pub, he announces, My son's a genius."
O'Conor's facial expression and the way he drags his warped body is gut-wrenching.
One is exhausted for him and heartbroken at the same time.
"Brenda Fricker is amazing as Christy's mother, who never stops believing in him and what he can do and who holds her family and husband together during the hard times."
The character would never consider herself a heroine or as someone doing something out of the ordinary.
"The way on how we respond to such problem is very crucial and if a person is not strong enough to face such, he may be left defenseless and useless."
"But getting back to the film the music stands up to the test of time, Hazel/Kate had something to say about 80's Britain..actually it was the same decade I moved to Canada for some of the same reasons one being Thatcher and what she was doing to the country at the time."
De Sica's most accessible picture is also one of his best.
"When a small hobbit named Frodo Baggins inherits a magic ring from his uncle, the wizard Gandalf investigates and discovers that the ring is an ancient creation of an evil dark lord."
Frodo and his loyal friends set out on a a quest to destroy the ring with a band of warriors.
Ralph Bakshi worked well with the low budget he was given.
"Misty Mundae's makeup is bad in this movie and her hair is in awkward braids, so she's not as hot in this as she has been in others."
"My mother insisted that it was too violent, but said that I didn't know much about what she was saying but this was a great picture."
Giulia's emotional instability is only equalled by her prodigious sexual desires.
"Dudley Moore makes a character that could well be hated very easily (spoiled, rich, lazy drunk who feels sorry for himself) but turns him into someone you love."
"Terry-Thomas underplays this part nicely, as does Sellers in his role as Prime Minister Amphibulos of the tiny country."
"Ian Bannen almost steals the show here as Gaillardia's suave king, and my girl Lucianna is as appealing as can be in her minor role."
"And Sellers' seedy prime minister, with his cracked English and seemingly perpetual sweat stains, is yet another memorable character in this great actor's pantheon."
"As I recall, a minister and his wife have stopped to aid some people by the side of the road, circa 1870, somewhere out West."
"With this strange little moment, we already realize there's something highly unusual about these seemingly normal folks, though the possible danger to the minister and his wife remains vague and uncertain for a long time."
"Denholm Elliott is excellent as Charles, he was vulnerable, showed fear, was very likable, and i loved his facial expressions, he rocked!."
"Jon Pertwee annoyed me here, and was quite bland, and completely unfunny, he also had no chemistry with Ingrid Pitt!."
Marion Davies proved with this movie she really had great talent and was not JUST William Randolph Hearst's mistress.
The story involves a hick from Georgia coming to Hollywood with every expectation that she would be an instant star!
The great Jenna Jameson doesn't do those kind of sexual scenes of what she is capable of.
Henry Thomas' (he played the child in E.T.)
"Even Stone gives her character a different dimension, creating a lustful, devilish Catherine Trimell, who can perfectly well rank among other monsters like Hannibal Lecter."
"Unfortunately, she seems to be the main target for those who enjoy trashing this flick."
"And if you go by what we have seen from Jet Li in Lethal 4 and Black Mask, you have to at least say that he would match up well against Chan."
"You got Elvira, with her low-cut black dress, her big black hair, and her enormous 'twins', and she's in a Christian town where most of the girls aren't even allowed to wear makeup."
Carla is virtually deaf without her hearing aid.
"This guy John (Ben Chaplin) leads his mediocre safe life of a bank teller in a small provincial English town, until the stunningly gorgeous, wild, girl-to-die-for Nadia (Nicole Kidman), ordered by email from Russia, enters his life to become his beloved wife, by Johns plan."
"Nicole Kidman proves her talent once again by playing a character quite different from the previous roles, at least from the cultural background."
The Odd Couple movie has some wonderful jokes about Oscar's apartment and his sloppy habits.
"Bettie escapes a Depression Years downtrodden life in Nashville, enlivened only with church singing and soul-saving, and goes alone to make her own way."
Bettie is frequently rejected in auditions once they realise she is the well-known pin-up girl.
Eventually a star witness explains how his son's life came to an end as a result of such photos - 'being 'trussed up like that'.
"After a 12hr wait, Bettie is told her evidence - she is the one person who could state definitively that she was not photographed in agony - will 'not be required'."
"A clever twist, though, is that the dentist is the film's protagonist, so instead of being some one-dimensional bad guy with no clear motivation, his development is the most extensive of any character and he is very human and believable."
"Honestly, anyone could've played Louis' character, if he or she possessed a wandering, willing, and comfortable heart."
"Many of the film's images lingering in my mind revolve around his expressions, vocal but mainly physical."
"It put together some characters that normally wouldn't be seen together(not to mentioned, try to save a human baby and bring it back to his father)."
"Frank Roberts is fantastic as the killer, he is menacing, creepy and had one hell of a mask, and this guy didn't mess around, he was fantastic!."
Kylie Minogue plays a bitch very well in her small role.
"A self-appointed matchmaker, Emma takes great delight in the romantic notion of playing Cupid and attempting to pair up those she feels are suited to one another."
Larry Burrows has the distinct feeling he's missing out on something.
"The main character has a special bread making power that he was born with, and he goes off to bread baking school."
"The film has tremendous style and as far as Jafri's direction goes, it's exceptional--especially for such an inexperienced film maker (it's his first film)."
"Ramon Salazar, a Spanish motion picture director defines his first feature Stones in this way."
"Set in a small American town, Halloween centerers around serial killer Michael Myers' attempts to track down his sister Laurie Strode, and in the process eliminates all her friends in rather brutal ways...leaving poor Laurie to fight against the seemingly indestructible Michael."
Baron Dalmar vacillates over whether she should stay.
"This is the conflicted David on the downhill slope, abandoned by a vengeful God he no longer understands, and the film doesn't back away from the awkward unanswerable questions about why a loving deity would choose to wreak vengeance on the innocent rather than the guilty."
"Kline is the straight - the suit - the conformist of the film, and as such his performance is crisp and refreshing."
Von Trotta told me so herself!
"Early on, there's a moment where a school teacher smacks a couple of bullies on the head with her attendance book."
The film went off the rails for me when the assistant mayor starting snooping around the mafioso to get to the bottom of something his boss clearly didn't want him meddling in.
The Director has a heart and it beats with his actors throughout.
"OK, so Frank Sinatra's acting leaves a lot to be desired but his singing is a great redeeming feature and the songs fit in perfectly with the romantic atmosphere of the film."
"The Abbot is a loving guardian, but perhaps a bit too strict and much more concerned with fortifying the wall around the town from a coming attack by vikings than he is at nurturing the boy's imagination."
The native Eskimo simply has different beliefs and behaviors about women and life than do the whalers that darken his landscape.
Eventually the lead Eskimo (Mala) realizes that he has been duped and he takes his revenge.
Dakota Fanning (Pita) puts life back into him with her undying love for him right from the start.
Creasy's art is death...he's about to paint his masterpiece.
"Second, the main actress Cheri Christian has a face that lets you hope she will be the leading actress in major pictures of the future."
"Gary Busey is the title character, Frank Bulletproof McBain, your standard-issue reckless maverick cop who's earned his nickname because no matter how many bullets he takes (38 and counting), he never stops going after the bad guys."
Fluegel is a great female lead; she not only looks incredibly sexy but makes for a fine butt-kicking action babe.
Tony King was very realistic in his role of Satin.
Hagar's relationship with her two sons is painful - and reflective of so many of our own experiences in this world.
"A young American pacifist of German descent comes to post-war Germany, intent on doing some good to pay for the bombs his countrymen dropped."
"Our hero falls in love with his daughter - who later turns out to be a member of the Werewolf, Nazi post-war terrorists."
"Three witnesses give evidence - Father Warecki (Henry Travers), Wilhelm's brother Karl (Erik Rolf) and Wilhelm's former lover Marja (Marsha Hunt) - before Wilhelm speaks in his own defense."
Martha Hunt has some powerful moments and matches him with her strength and Henry Travers is also very good in his role as a priest.
Christopher Reeve is serviceable and actually grows on you the more you see him act.
"Mr. Keller, who Carla reports to at her office."
Mr. Club Owner is a pulpy mess in his own bathroom.
"It's very quotable - who could ever forget Dr. Loomis' (Pleasence) speech in which he describes Michael Myers to the sheriff (Charles Cyphers, a reliable repertory player in several of Carpenter's earlier works)?"
Shelley Duvall can be thanked for giving a performance that allows the audience to relate to Jack's desires to kill her.
"HAD Jack always been there, like Mr. Grady told him in the men's room?"
What's up with the relationships between the girls and the parents (especially between Alice and her dad)?
"In another one of Bugs Bunny's hare-raisingly wacky shorts, the famous leporid* works in a department store display case, when owner Gildersleeve decides to stuff him."
"After an escape from an institution, Myers tracks down his younger sister."
"Halloween's director, John Carpenter, got a lot out of the horror movies of the '50s and combined everything he knew into one film that scared the hell out of a lot of people back in the late '70s."
"This films solidified him as a director to watch and also jump started the career of Jamie Lee Curtis, who plays the girl being stalked by the masked killer."
"After all, the way the plot goes on this it very much looks like one man has the power to sanction killing everyone including his own people in order to kill Jason Bourne."
Worth picking up just to see her
Ms. Duke has much to be proud of in her accomplishments with her struggles for survival of a disease that often leaves many victims without hope.
I wish I could thank Ms. Patty Duke in person for having the courage to let the public know about her illness.
"So every time you think someone will finally take him down, one of his friends comes out of nowhere to sabotage it."
It could have included fictitious moments of Page sobbing hysterically and begging God to forgive her.
"Tatsuhito's brother is getting involved with said society, so Tatsuhito himself is forced to become a dirty cop and use similarly violent and sadistic tactics to penetrate into this sordid realm."
And Tatsuhito himself is a similarly tragic figure when he's forced to contend with his lack of ability to control his brother.
"Bill Paxton is awesome, his directorial debut is even better than what I expected of an actor whose most memorable line is Game over, man!"
"Haunted by a secret, Ben Thomas (Will Smith) looks for redemption by radically transforming the lives of seven people he doesn't know."
"These movies are very realistic, which depicts a common man's life & his struggles through life."
"Director Gabriele Muccino once again is the winner all the way, with his emotional yet inspiring message."
"I f you thought Sam Mendes' first film, the much heralded American BEAUTY was a movie with style to spare, wait until you see his highly anticipated second effort, the unrelentingly grim 30's gangster melodrama ROAD TO PERDITION."
"This story of a hit man (Tom Hanks) and his relationship to a surrogate father - figure who is also his boss, an elderly Irish mob leader (Paul Newman) , seems to have been culled from innumerable gangster movies of years past."
Veteran cameraman Conrad Hall will very likely win another Oscar for his work here .
"Mr. Mendes continues to astonish with his vivid use of color, and he and Mr. Hall again make very dramatic use of red blood splattered against pale colored walls , all the more effective and disconcerting due to the preponderance of blacks, blues and grays that dominate the movie's color scheme."
"Castle may not have been a Hitchcock, but he was no Ed Wood, either."
"For all his look at me, I'm a bloody genius posturing, Newcombe is in fact revealed to be a singularly gifted, if immensely troubled, musician - far more talented than his rival, the Dandy's Courtney Taylor who narrates the picture."
"Steve Carrel Proves himself to be a great leading man in this wonderful, original, raunchy breath of fresh air."
But there's something so underdeveloped about Neil Simon's adaptation of his hit stage play as to make it seem more like a skit on a sketch comedy show than a full-bodied film.
Dennis Cooper completely his residency in internal medicine- so he definitely applied his knowledge/experience to the film and that is greatly apparent
"Feroz Abbas Khan's Gandhi My Father, a film that sheds light on the fractured relationship between the Mahatma and his son Harilal Gandhi."
"Which is why when we finally see an outburst from Harilal, it comes off looking like he's over-reacting."
What happens to Harilal's children after his wife's death?
"The film version of an immensely popular play directed by Feroz Abbas Khan himself, Gandhi My Father is a disappointment, no questions asked.Cinematically, it struggles to translate the filmmaker's ambitious intention to the screen."
Then the Professor wants to try out his new potion... A very funny little film.
Jim Carey is superb as a down on his luck reporter who is given the power to change himself and the city in which he resides.
"But listen to the dialogue between them, which suggests an older Lesbian and her young, restless companion (one can only wonder if A.I."
Maybe Sean Connery was miscast in his role.
However Sean Connerey is of course a great actor and that is the only reason why he is still able to carry the movie as good as he does.
Especially Ed Harris is just totally great in his role as a psychopathic serial killer.
"Willy's nephew, Ben Clark (Golden Globe winning Richard Benjamin) is confident they can get together again with no hard feelings for each other, how wrong he is."
It doesn't so much engage the viewer as assault him.
''Scarface'' is as voracious and unyielding a production as Tony Montana himself.
Even viewing Antonioni's Blow Up today gives you the similar feeling that he is passe.
One of them (Mark Frechette) died in prison in USA extending the reality of the non-conformist values he personified in the film.
The plot in this one isn't so bad as these things go; it involves a female lawyer trying to prove her lover is innocent of killing his wife.
"Bauer is called to his office in order to discover who is behind all this and, at the same time, figure his daughter's path to the unkwown after fleeing from her bedroom."
"The right to be presumed Innocent until proven guilty is a basic entitlement of anyone in a civilised society; but according to Fred Schepisi's partisan but sadly convincing story of a famous Australian murder trial, it was not granted to Lindy Chamberlain, accused of killing her baby."
The Young Victoria tries to redress the balance by showing us the events surrounding her accession and the early years of her reign.
"(According to one unfounded rumour he, and not the late Duke of Kent, was Victoria's natural father)."
"The second strand concerns the growing romance between Victoria and her German cousin Prince Albert, and the attempts of King Leopold of Belgium, who was uncle to both of them, to influence this romance."
"(Leopold's hope was to increase the prestige of the House of Saxe-Coburg, to which both he and Albert belonged)."
"Their leader Robert Peel is shown as statesmanlike and dignified, whereas Melbourne, for all his dash and charm, is shown as devious and uninterested in social reform."
"King William IV certainly disliked the Duchess of Kent (who was his sister-in-law), but I doubt if he would have gone so far as to bawl abuse at her during a state banquet, as he is shown doing here."
"Jim Broadbent gives an amusing turn as King William, although he does occasionally succumb to the temptation of going over the top."
(Although not as disastrously over the top as he was in Moulin Rouge).
"Cage is pretty good, and goofy as well, and Olympia Dukakis as Loretta's mother and Vincent Gardenia as her father are terrific."
Dakota Fanning is rapidly becoming a staple in movie that require a child with an old soul personality and she has never disappointed me with her talent.
"The swimming instructor is an almost-Olympian, reduced to teaching adults basic lessons, and often the target of horndogging from his female students."
"If you feel, as he did, that the film does not work, then you're saying, I think, that Howard does not work."
Kiera Nightly moved straight from the P&P set to this action movie... she could hardly have chosen to remake her image more dramatically.
* Kiera Knightly alludes to Domino Harvey's sexuality in her interview with Lucy Liu.
Jimmy Stewart plays a blatant fortune hunter who follows the trail of miners before him into the Alaskan wilderness to prospect for gold.
"In a similar fashion, the character Sammo Hung himself plays is a country boy come to the big city of Hong Kong, utterly convinced that what makes the city interesting is that Bruce Lee made kung fu movies there."
"In other words, Hung is not really urinating in the street - but he certainly would - and what's the problem officer?"
Of course Hung's obsession with Bruce Lee also gets him into big troubles as well.
"This seemed to me to be quite contrary both to Wagner's clear AVOIDANCE of Christianity, and his very deliberate attempt to generalize the Christian elements of the story."
"__________________________________________________________________ FOOTNOTE CONTAINING A SPOILER: A good example would be Kundry's famous line, I saw him...him...and laughed."
"Peggy, even catches herself as she encounters the famous star Marian Davies at tennis, turns up her nose and comments, Ohh, I don't like her!"
"Tiny wants to go to art school (cliche', yuck), so he gives up his boxing allowance to Diana, who actually wants to box."
Seemingly unstoppable murderer escapes from mental institution and returns to his hometown where he begins to stalk a local babysitter on Halloween.
"Carpenter well-times his suspense and his jolting shocks to make them the most effectively startling, that in itself is a feat few horror filmmakers ever manage!"
I think I love that it is a true story written by Antwone himself just as much as I love the movie.
He was the most precious little boy I had ever met.
And I am so happy Antwone's happy and found his family.
The heroic actions of Captain Salgueiro Maia aren't exaggerations and the film is also a tribute for his deeds.
"When the scientist and family man Matt Winslow (Robert Urich) finally accepts the invitation to work the Micro-Digitech Corporation in a space suit project, he moves with his beloved wife Patricia (Joanna Cassidy) and their son Robbie (Barret Oliver) and daughter Chrissy (Soleil Moon Frye) to a huge modern house in the corporation compound."
"Matt feels the changing in the behavior of his family and decides to investigate the club, finding an evil secret about Jessica and the members."
"One is The Gunfighter, an exquisitely grim tale of a famed gunslinger (Ringo) facing his last shootout."
"In The Gunfighter, he's the town marshal expected to arrest Ringo but once rode with him in an outlaw gang."
"In Winchester, he's the sidekick to Jimmy Stewart, a kind of Horatio to Stewart's Hamlet in this epic/tragic tale."
"Dan Duryea steals the whole show as a giggling outlaw leader, while Shelly Winters, just before she began to gain weight, is fine as the shady lady who ties all the plots together."
The latter of these two comments is particularly false as Kinugasa himself admitted to ripping off Caligari on more than one occasion.
"The viewer concentrates more on her acting than on the way she speaks, which occurred, most probably, to 1931 viewers."
"Junkermann portrays a real alcohol addict, a man with hopes, with fears, who overdoes the care of his daughter."
Ruth's Abigail is a smart sleuth herself and she matches wits with Columbo always played wonderfully by Peter Falk
There is no edge to the story like Cash puts in some of his faith based music.
"Then our hero, who is called Tenshu, is taken to the chair, he's zapped, and then....he's still Alive."
After Pusser recovers he goes after the men that killed his wife.
Whoopi Goldberg is a very funny comedian and she has done a lot of funny movies; i.e.
And Jane's student is not only embracing but also thriving with his previously untapped sexuality.
"While not a hero in the typical sense of the word, his character is certainly heroic in deed & action."
Allan Jeayes uses his fine voice to good advantage as the Storyteller.
Its a fantastic story and tells the real truth on alcoholism and ruined marriages and a mothers fight to keep her son away from her brutal husband.
"You could feel his lust for a beautiful woman, Gregory Peck showed the real human side of this man who in his time was larger than life."
"Susan Hayward's fear, reluctance, but then obedience to his authority as her King was beautifully portrayed by her."
Raymond Massey's powerful and authoritative condemnation of the King made me feel his anger.
"This is the main plot of the film, but there are other smaller plots involving the same secretary mentioned above (Mary Louise Parker) as well as Mack's wife, (Mary McDonnel) who discovers an abandoned baby not long after their son Roberto (Jeremy Sisto in his first movie role) has gone to camp for the summer, and will likely be moving on with his own life soon."
"Aiden Quinn was quite good as McCartney, also bearing a striking resemblance to Macca, although he did occasionally trip over his Scouse accent."
Probably a more apt punishment would be to let them live after the initial shot and let them suffer forever like she and her sister has...Anyway.....
"The chief rapist, played by Andy Drake is suitably vile and gets his punishment at the end (of course!)."
Hopper is a love him or hate him kind of guy.
And this is one of his better films.
"A professor of his stature *should* have one... And while we're at it, for an engineering student, hick or not, Remy's a pretty dumb character - I'd think that he'd have a bit more in the way of basic intelligence - he talks and acts like a total buffoon)."
Jennifer Connelly was flat; though it's not completely her fault: her role was stereotypical and one-dimensional.
"The movie has a large cast of characters, amongst them an American couple who find a woman's dog while vacationing in Europe and decide to return it to her for a reward - only to find her dead body upon arrival."
"He was my favorite host of the show, hands down."
"The wife, who is forced into her marriage, shows both lust and a strong will, characteristics we're not used to seeing in 'respectable Victorian southern belles'."
"As you see here, when the freed slave indicates that he's cutting out to free his mother, sold into slavery in Texas."
Louis Morneau isn't all that well known but he has done a perfectly OK job with this one and I never really grew impatient while watching the movie.
"Sam Waterstone was my favorite actor these days (i think i was almost in love) and he remains one of my favorite actors to the day, mostly due to his appearance in the series."
That's what Virginia starts to think when she starts having some odd side effects and extreme moodiness from the treatment.
Jorja Fox plays a woman who serves as a surrogate in order to get a down payment for the restaurant that she wants to open.
Bill Nunn plays a Cadillac-loving mystery man who becomes her lover.
"Anglo-Indian Jesminder Bhamra (Parminder Nagra) and her WASP friend Juliette Paxton (Keira Knightley) love to play football (yes, I'm going to say it the British - and international - way) and just adore football player David Beckham."
and i Will never ever forget the part were wader tels Luke he is his father.way too cool.
if you never ever Saw a star wars movie you go to she this one.its the best.
John Waters' tribute to the people he loves most (Baltimoreans) is a twisted little ditty with plenty to look at and laugh at.
It also has Harriet Hilliard who is rather good in her role.
"Since Educating Rita, Julie Walters has been one of my role models, and her performance in this as a woman who helps the man she loves get in synch with his feminine side is magnificent."
Tony (Stephen Rea) has the concession on condom vending machines when he runs into the son of the promoter of a famous music festival.
"Brian, the lead guitarist, is dead, so a young guitarist is hired to replace him."
'10 Items Or Less' for me marks the return of Freeman to a role that truly showcases his considerable acting talents.
"Scarlet, for her part, displays a fierce pride and sharp tongue that serve to hide her own insecurities about herself."
THE GIRL FROM MISSOURI arrives in New York City knowing exactly what she wants: to amount to something solid by marrying a millionaire - without losing her virginity.
"Spade, in particular, was not presented in the best light in the earlier promotions, but his character comes across quite well in the pilot."
"Boyer is Luis Denard, and everyone is out to stop him except Bacall."
"The turning point for Izo is when he realizes at what cost self-advancement comes, the loss of identity and by consequence the loss of self."
You have to forgive this movie its many shortcomings and just try to appreciate what the director and his crew of technicians were able to put on the screen while working with what was obviously a tight budget.
"After Dan Jansen's remarkable Gold Medal performance in the Winter Olympic in Lillihamer, Norway, he established a Foundation in 1994 to help fight Leukemia, which claimed the life of his Sister, and to support youth sports programs, educational and scholarship awards."
His Dan Jansen Foundation promotes the philosophy that: as his Father always told him at a young age: 'there is more to life than skating around in circles!'
"But if you've truly looked carefully at Bettie's poses, she always looked happy."
"Gretchen Mol turns out a career high performance (she may just have the most perfect breasts ever), which I am happy about, because she did have the curse."
"Intensely private, Bettie herself has not seen the film yet."
After Anji's passing Carmen became the mother of the house of Xtravaganza (she was in the beach scene) and she is looking more and more lovely as well.
Madge (Marlilyn Stroh) is the shy girl in over her head.
"Upon successfully completing his first assignment, Sullivan/Thursby is sent on further missions to obtain the same type of information previously gathered."
"Since Chan's concern is character-development, the comedy is largely character driven - as in the conflict between Chan's character and his best friend, an argument over a girl."
This film represents an effort on Chan's part to find a viable formula that he can use and develop over time.
You can look at Clooney's subtle touches in scenes like his one word good-bye to Andy Garcia in Ocean's 11 when they just utter each other's name disdainfully.
You can pick any number of Jack's performances dating as far back as Five Easy Pieces in the diner to A Few Good Men and his court room interrogation scene.
"I don't mention all of this to insinuate that Man On Fire is perfect just because of Denzel's work, but he is definitely the cog of the production."
"I am interested to see how his next film, Domino, turns out."
Denzel's anger and acerbity are ubiquitous and not easily quelled as he hunts down each person responsible for Pita's violation.
It is touching and beautiful to see this bond between the young boy evacuated from London and the grumpy old man he is left with develop - a real grandfather/grandson connection.
"Silberling had the good fortune to pair veteran actor Morgan Freeman, in between his big projects, with Spanish actress Paz Vega, and the result is a dialogue between two people from different vantages who manage to enhance the life of the other."
"Morgan Freeman plays himself - yet part of the comedy is that he is depicted as an actor who has been out of work for four years, scouting a location for a little 'filler film' to get back into the flow of things."
"His 'role' is to be that of a market manager and he is dropped off at seedy market in Carson where he encounters, among others, one Scarlet, the girl at the argumentative 10 Items or Less checkout line."
"There is a LOT of over acting in this film - there's really nothing subtle, and when little Jack Wild has to emote his concern for the kidnapped residents of Living Island it's really little more than yelling."
"I was Genuinely shocked at the ending and It was performed with excellence by all involved but I feel both girls should have got out or, barring that, at least the cop should have got what was coming to him."
"Plus there's this one part in the movie where the audience at the racetrack is upset at something Stroker Ace (Burty R.) is doing, and it shows one guy in the audience bending over and sticking his finger up his butt to display his disappointment!"
"Giovanna is a bored house-wife cemented in the familiarly of marital permanence: she doesn't want to leave her home and husband, but would rather remain where she is because it's safer."
The film ends with Giovanna's deathit being in karmic similitude of her husband's death.
"The plot is corny, a psychotic serial killer on his way to execution is splashed with genetic acid turning him into a snow man."
Jack Frost then goes on a murdering rampage to find the small town sheriff that finally arrested him.
"Douglas plays a talented police detective married to his job, while his girlfriend waits for a wedding that is constantly postponed."
At the time I felt sad for the blue camel and his sad life.
"While certainly a funny movie, Falk's mob boss character was a far cry from the lovable lieutenant he's played for so many years, especially with the offensive language he used."
The supervising animator was Ward Kimball and he modelled it on his own cat.
"Cinderella is Disney's return to features after an eight-year hiatus, and neither with it nor with any subsequent movie would he recapture the raw brilliance of his early years."
"This is a very dark movie, but his very best, most linear (despite the plot twists which hold up under examination), and one which gets better with repeated viewings."
"This becomes a running notion throughout her participation in this story from passive/resistant to active and even slightly crazy believer that Something Terrible is coming This Way, especially when she meets him six years later: she has seen Cole before."
"At the same time, Cole continues talking about a dream he keeps having in which she also plays a part as a blonde woman running down the aisle, screaming for help, after shots have rung out and a particular red-headed man in a ponytail (Jeffrey Goines?)"
Cher gives a good performance in a role that is very opposite her real-life self.
Lots of literary and cinematic references and indeed this is the Franco film that Lang himself praised.
Old Jess could make 'em when he tried.
"Reeve, rightfully associated with his now legendary portrayal of Superman, stole the show in what should've been an Oscar worthy performance."
"In fact, it was thanks to this movie that I got into a Michael Caine phase and started renting as much of his stuff as humanly possible."
"Because of the true talent Melissa Joan Hart and her supporting cast had of demonstrating that whit, comedy, light-hearted humor, and deep thought could actually coexist."
"I had fun watching this movie, perhaps because Cat is everything I wish I could be, I am not going to post spoilers or reveal plots but there's are things that i really found amazing, the way she manipulates people it's just so divine."
The film opens with him rubbing out Lips Manlis's henchmen in a Valentine Massacre style shooting and then Lips himself being fitted for a cement overcoat.
But Caprice's moves are making him a target for Tracy.
In the meantime a third mysterious and faceless individual is looking to topple Caprice himself.
"Only Beatty plays it completely straight, the others all seem to play off of him."
The way she alternately shoots Sellers lecherous character down and seduces him is beautiful to watch.
**SPOILER ALERT** W. Somerset Maugham classic on film about a love obsessed young man who's abused hurt and humiliated by the object of his obsession to the point of losing everything he has only to find true love in the end under the most unusual circumstances.
"One afternoon Philip is at a local cafe with a fellow medical student and spots pretty waitress Mildred Rogers, Bette Davis, and immediately falls in love with her."
"Going into hock buying an engagement ring for Mildred in an attempt to ask for her hand in marriage the cold hearted Mildred tells the startled Philip that she's already engaged to be married to Emil Miller, Alan Hale."
Balduin is haunted by his double (the intertitles express this beautifully as does the action.
"Some of the scenes are incredible, the sense of doom when the Devil disappears with Balduin's mirror image is amazing, as is the sense that his pact has forever cut him off from human society (the scene where he runs away from his double and ends up in the 'wasteland' at the edge of the town, no longer entirely human (he has lost his soul) he is like a hunted animal outside of human society."
Vivian Blaine is just excellent in this part and Adelaide's Lament is my favorite of her songs.
Frances Drake makes a very good female lead in her role of Dr Rukh's beautiful young wife.
"Each character trying to live his own life, to watch and control the other, while being himself watched and controlled by other characters and mostly by the continuous pressure, by political and historical forces well beyond his control."
The main character played by the director is a playwright whose mid-life personal and creative crisis is amplified by the pressure of the events and by the fact that he is lucky enough to leave a terror attack site minutes before the bomb explodes.
Houellebecq's insights are masterfully captured by Harel and the hero's apathy and indifference to a world which has rejected him is perfectly portrayed.
Santa Claus was amazing and I couldn't wait for him to come back each year.
"Gary Cole was absolutely brilliant, better even than his role as Custer."
"Lucas Black turned in an amazing performance for a kid, and Paige Turco was at her best too since Party of Five."
"Rauol Julia gave an outstanding performance, we lost him too soon."
"Alvin is, by this time in his life, a man of great experience but modest means."
I actually wish real life kidnappers could suffer the same fate as the one's Creasy did his fine job upon.
"This is all signaled by Kirk's resolute response to Sulu, who voices his lack of understanding about any of these events just after McCoy's death - Kirk will get to the bottom of all this, come what may."
"Liam Neeson was excellent as he always is, and most of the cast holds up, with the exception of Owen Wilson, who just did not bring the right feel to the character of Luke."
Still Chris refuses to admit he's a member of a native tribe and he and his four friends are convicted of manslaughter in Billy's death with the sentences to be handed down by the judge within days.
It's also revealed to David that he himself has some kind of spiritual connection with the Austrailan aborigines as both Charlie and his step-father Rev.
"Judy Davis shows us here why she is one of Australia's most respected and loved actors - her portrayal of a lonely, directionless nomad is first-rate."
It's a gorgeous print that lets you really appreciate the work of director Duffell and what he was able to accomplish with a very small budget.
"Jeremy Northam's characterization of the stuttering, mild mannered bookish Morgan Sullivan and watching him let loose bits and pieces of his real identity under the influence of single malt scotches and under the spell of Lucy Liu's presence is brilliantly crafted and a joy to watch."
"This film is terrible, the main character would give any charlie brown subtitler a run for his money he just constantly mumbles which is always a laugh, most scenes just feel awkward with characters more often than not gazing across to another with a look of...its your line now, then i will react."
One of my friends said it was her favorite movie.
Ilona Novodny has a gentleman friend who buys her fur garments.
Mr Pirovitch's life is centred around his wife and children.
"Lars von Trier's Europa is a worthy echo of The Third Man, about an American coming to post-World War II Europe and finds himself entangled in a dangerous mystery."
"Will Smith's screen persona is just likable, even when he's playing such a troubled character."
"The 39-year-old star, coming to the end of his contract with Fox, plays the upstart Skip McCoy with the irreverent brashness of a teenager."
"When Joey's exit from the subway is barred, it is as if the steel sinews of the city are ensnaring him."
"Richard Nixon had just been chosen as the Republican vice-presidential candidate, having made his name with his phoney Alger Hiss expose - bogus communist microfilm and all."
"Moe carries her trade mark box of ties, and candy's purse, container of the microfilm, is the engine of the plot."
"Skip keeps his only possessions in a submerged crate, symbolising his secretive street-wisdom."
"Candy is shown above the skulking Skip on the rickety gangway of the shack, signifying her moral ascendancy."
Especially the scene when Anna's dad comes into the paperhouse trying to kill her is a bit short.
"It is curious by reading some of the opinions submitted to IMDB that compare Orson Welles with the Coen brothers, Roman Polanski, even Woody Allen, when it should be all of those directors that must be regarded as followers of the great master himself."
"Lucky are we to still have his legacy either in retrospective looks such as the one the Film Forum in New York just ended, or his films either on tape or DVD form."
"One beef: the funniest comedian ever (eddie izzard) is almost wasted, but his heart is in the right place."
Eddie Izzard is genius with his non-stop humor.
"Mr. Scott seemed to bring Scrooge to a more personal, understandable yet highly conflicted level; his role was acted with the great authority Scott always bring to the screen: yet his usual bellicose voice would sometimes be brought to a whisper, almost as a soliloquy, as he would berate the Christmas holiday in one breath, yet reveal his own human frailty in his next line."
"I've been impressed with Chavez's stance against globalisation for sometime now, but it wasn't until I saw the film at the Amsterdam documentary international film festival that I realize what he has really achieved."
"Joe Johnston surprised me with his subtle directing, very different from his other directorial features such as Jumanji (1995) and Jurassic Park III (2001)."
I almost forgot this is probably Steve Martin's very first serious acting role in any film he has ever done.
One of the greatest moments in horror since Ash got his hand possessed in Evil Dead 2.
"Icy and lethal ace hit-man Tony Arzenta (a divinely smooth and commanding performance by Alain Delon) wants to quit the assassination business, but the dangerous mobsters he works for won't let him."
Dominick (Nicky) Luciano wears a 'Hulk' T-shirt and trudges off everyday to perform his duties as a garbage man.
Dominick's disability came as a result of an injury to the head in which he suffered traumatic brain injury (TBI).
Dominick is actually more able to live independently than he may seem at the beginning of the film.
"Eugene must face the fact that he is to continue his education in a different city, and that he must move away from Dominick."
Eugene also develops a romance which begins to separate him from his twin brother.
Eugene yells at Dominick and throws him against the wall.
Michel Qissi did a good job directing his first film without Van Damme.
IT would be great to see something else from her in the same genre.
Harry Manfredini composes another score which sounds exactly like all of his other musical scores & is basically the same as the theme from Friday the 13th (1980) & it's sequels.
Its amazing that Miss Ritter was nominated six times for an Academy Award and she never won.
Dud nearly chokes on his repast.
"Dud would on occasion interview the eccentric Sir Arthur Streeb-Greebling ( Cook ), who when he was not teaching ravens to fly underwater, was planning on opening a restaurant called 'The Frog & The Peach'."
"In an unforgettable moment, she drove through London, bellowing through a loudhailer: I want to be alone!."
Chris Gerolmo took care not to simply give us a `Jack-the-stripper' type of list of murdered people: he delved into the psychological characterization with convincing results.
Soha reminds you so much of her mother Sharmila Tagore.
"Slowly slowly, over the time, he falls in love for her."
"For example, head gangster Blackie (Jack Palance in his first film role) is offered a Get Out of Jail Free card if he'll cooperate with combating the plague."
It's really great to see MJH in a different role than her Sabrina character!
"While the actress who plays Ms. Fahey does a fine job, she does not have her dark long hair."
Even President CLinton offered his assistance in the Anne Marie Fahey case.
"I have always been a fan of David Lynch and with this film Lynch proved to critics that he has the talent, style, and artistic integrity to make films outside of the surreal aura that he's become known for in the past decade."
"Richard Farnsworth turns in a beautiful performance as do the rest of the cast, most notably Sissy Spacek in an endearing performance as his daugher, and Harry Dean Stanton in a small but infinitely crucial role."
"Those looking for another violent, perverted gangster film aren't going to find what they're looking for in YOKAI, but if you're a fan of Miike because of his imagination and wit, there's plenty to satisfy here."
This film is pure Elvira and shows her at her breast...
"Whoppi Goldberg truly turns in the performance of a lifetime as a tough, gritty cop who is against her will teamed with a hot shot dinosaur as her partner then the hi-jinx ensues to say the least."
"Fascist principal Miss Togar(Mary Woronov, who is lensed by expert photographer Dean Cundy as if she were ten feet tall)has a plan to turn her high completely square."
The ending pretty much sums up the film as a whole..Riff and her classmates take over the high school and one massive party begins.
"Nevertheless, the Frenchman is granted unrestrained course of the village, is sooner or later given a wife, and assumes their accustomed appearance rather than his Western clothes, or any clothes."
Arthur is the acclaimed comedy classic about a drunken millionaire (played with enthusiasm and wit by Dudley Moore in an Oscar-nominated performance) who must choose between the woman he loves and the life he's grown accustomed to.
"Arthur Bach is essentially nothing more than a pretentious jerk, but you can't help but like him."
"Especially when he delivers lines such as, Don't you wish you were me?"
Moore lends such charisma and charm to a character that would otherwise be loathed by his audience.
"Another is that one of the group is only in the business for the money, is greedy, runs away when the heat is up but somehow gives in to his better nature."
At first I thought the computer would kill the charm and character of the plot but I was quickliy convinced: Whoever did the animation knew his or her stuff!
Clarence falls in love with her.
Rarely does an independent film leave me feeling as good as his did.
"Adam Jones may not be a well known name yet, but he will be."
"Onstage and in her show, she's racist, crude, insensitive and hugely self-centered."
This blindingly honest look at an older woman's awakened passion after decades of dutifully obeying her husband's desire that she stay at home and raise kids (she also mentions he didn't like her to have friends-what a guy) surfaces a number of issues.
"While May's dalliance with Darren doesn't constitute incest, there are real psychological dimensions, and issues, with a mother bedding her daughter's lover."
"May is strong in her resolve to both acknowledge her sexuality and expect, indeed demand, a future of happiness."
The film has one Peach of a line... He's no Angel.... when he in fact IS Angel!!!
I just found out today that the guy who played Marty(Simon) killed himself a little after the movie was released which is a shame since he did a good job.
Skip breaks one of the glass windows in the gym using a brick to get the teacher to excuse him.
"The main hero is so likable and good natured, that he is easily sympathized with."
Also included is the brief introduction she taped in 1986 when the special was first released on VHS.
"Or a nice, elderly dog fancier encouraging his pack to howl at he moon?"
"Dukakis believes so, and (oddly enough - although he is not totally convinced) Aiello."
"At the same time, the fact that Cher forgets to deposit her uncle and aunt's daily business profits is brought in momentarily in the concluding seven minutes of the film - but just as quickly dropped."
"Sally Field is absolutely perfect as Celest Talbert, a fading soap star whose supporting cast is trying to get her replaced in hopes that their own star will rise."
But whereas (for instance) in Lang's The Big Heat (1953) the home life of the hero is destroyed by elements of vice surrounding the embattled central character - ultimately sending him back to work with an increased vigilance and sense of vengeance - Panic In The Streets places Reed's rising anxiousness within the confines of what amounts to just another working 'day'.
"Blackie's logical assumption that the police would not normally bother with the murder of some anonymous illegal immigrant has a ring of truth about it, and his so confusion is understandable."
It's about a woman searching for her missing lover; a psychiatrist who has suddenly vanished for no apparent reason.
"Some think it makes him less scary, which I do agree."
It's the kinda film that makes a distributor feel happy and contemplate his next phoren visit!
Ishwar has to make a serious decision about his son's careless attitude towards the responsibilities of life.
"Some of the more fantastical dramatic episodes felt like they would be better being shown late on night on the Lifetime network, like the episode Ghost Train, which was directed by Spielberg himself."
"Great directors have also had part in episodes including Spielberg himself, Clint Eastwood, Burt Reynolds, Bob Clark, Joe Dante, Mick Garris, Paul Bartel, Joe Dante, Robert Zemeckis, Danny Devito and even Martin Scorsese."
"Samuel Fuller is an interesting filmmaker, mainly because he had some very inconsistent politics in his films."
Richard Widmark makes for a great anti-hero and Jean Peters is quite sexy as a girl who works for her communist spy boyfriend.
Helena Bonham Carter is so convincing as a person with ALS that I found it hard to believe that she was only acting.
"Kenneth Branagh, a superb actor, lives up to expectations as the quirky artist who misbehaves and is forced to provide companionship to Helena's character as part of his community service, an alternative to prison time."
Great story too and ably directed by Clint himself.
Every episode also features Tony's other family in some way which includes his children and wife carmela soprano (Edie Falco).
The famous international conductor Daniel Dareus (Michael Nyqvist) has a heart attack with his stressed busy professional life and interrupts his successful career with an early retirement.
The two other key actors in the movie are Chris Cooper (the dad) and Laura Dern (the kid's teacher who encourages him all the time.)
"Director Jean Eustache is not as well known as other directors from the New Wave, but he should be."
"Eustache himself committed suicide in 1981 and the real-life person that the character Marie was based on, did too."
"Ben Affleck was believable in his character, but the real star of this one is James Gandofini."
"Surely Welles was as much screwed with, and in much the same way, as his character."
"Urmilla plays a girl in North India in the background of the partition, and all troubles seem sweet if compared with the problems she happens to face."
Bette Midler showcases her talents and beauty in Diva Las Vegas.
"If anything, the Inca was rather arrogant - as you would expect any leader would be when dealing with foreigners, if his country has not been conquered in living memory by any other world power."
"Val Kilmer... Love or loath him, sometimes he gets under the skin of a character and pulls out a performance that makes you go 'Hey!"
"Go see him, you'll know what I mean"
quote: I said goat milk his reply to Stan asking him how do you milk a ghost!
"Maria meets a French/German business man, Karl Oswald after she bargains her way into the first class train compartment."
"I particularly liked the scene when Karl and Maria meet in the Munich restaurant (apparently, frequently visited by Hitler himself)."
"Consider Gino, the young drifter, not well educated, unemployed, and resorting to stowing away, stealing and conning people in order to get by, his one pair of shoes so threadbare as to be virtually useless."
After a while he gives in to Gina's demands to get rid of her husband.
"I liked the way the Spagnolo character came back into Gino's life to act as a judge of his misdeeds that was very good, and interesting, adding another dimension to the story."
"A minor quibble: The amount of time (hardly any) that elapses before undying love is pronounced by the lovers, how quickly they kill the husband (there is no botched first attempt as in the U.S. version); Gino's very quick-to-escalate relationship with the dancer/hooker they quickly profess their love as well, and she is willing to risk a great deal for a man she just met!"
"Laura Dern, a favorite actress of mine, left nothing out of her performance."
Carrie Anne Moss turns in a comedic performance I never imagined would come from her!
"(Lots of parallels, of course, especially the lonely combatant trying to escape his crumbling surroundings: lunacy within, lunacy without.)"
"I never get tired of seeing DeeDee mess up his Pizza lines or Joey mess up the name of the teacher over and over, haha."
"Like others, I have seen and studied most of the books and films concerning the Clutter Killings, including a few dramatic works thematically based on the actions and psycho-mythology of the participants to the crime -- including Capote himself."
"As to Capote, I cannot forgive him for willfully withholding Perry Smith's confessions, intimacies and writings from even the defense counsels."
Capote himself could never write another major literary work after In Cold Blood.
It is drama and melodrama spiced with his own creatively psychotic imagination.
"The actual cold-blooded killer, Mr. Capote, and his hypocritically artistic non-fiction novel do not control these interpretations and performances."
"and, of course, Scotch actor Billy Connolly in his least animated, yet somehow deeply moving role as the titular character."
Jack O'Neill was a great character with his sarcasm and love of Homer Simpson--it's really too bad he slowly faded from the series in later seasons.
Lauren Bacall is appealing as the British girl who falls for him.
"Ann Lord is elderly, bed-ridden and spending her last few days on Earth as comfortably as possible in her own home with her two grown daughters at her side."
"Discomfited by the memories of her past, Ann suddenly calls out a man's name her daughters have never heard before: Harris."
"Both Ann and her two daughters - one married with children, one a serial commitophobe - struggle with the central question of whether true love really exists, and perhaps more importantly, if true love can endure the test of time."
The subtle fact that the aged Ann is still wrestling with an answer to these questions on her deathbed is not lost on her two daughters.
"Claire Danes is beautiful (appearing to be really, really tall, though just 5' 5 in reality), and is absolutely captivating in one climactic scene where her singing talents are finally put to the test."
"I can't really say anything negative about this film at all, though Hugh Dancy's struggle to have his character emerge from utter one-dimensionality is in the end a total loss."
Neve Campbell surprised in her pivotal role of Sarah.
"TRAVIS: I rated this a 7 mainly because the Oliver Twist kid (Mark L.) irritated me, and his songs were torture to my overly sensitive ears."
"Although the sardonic Julian (ironically surnamed Noble) appears to be a tough guy on the surface, underneath he is really just a mass of neuroses and insecurities, a man who realizes that his chosen profession has left him virtually alone in the world and friendless."
"This could be because this is the feature film debut for writer/director Richard Shephard, and he hasn't quite gotten his movie pacing down yet."
"It's a great story about how one person, even if he is retarded can make a person find reason in an empty life."
"This was my first exposure to the young Alec Guinness, and it's obvious from the first frames what made him so special as to eventually receive a knighthood."
"I only rate it an 8 because it's essentially a rather lightweight parable that examines human nature but doesn't really skewer it; and because the plot takes the easy way out at the end, rather than actually resolving conflict between the inventor and the mill workers and industrialists who are chasing him all over town."
"In the end, he ended up getting shot through the eye while taking a bath, and that's my most favorite scene ever in the history of The Sopranos."
"At the same though Callahan is on a heat of trouble by his superiors after he provokes a mob boss to a heart attack, of which the mob are hunting him as well."
"So in order to let the heat die down within the city, Harry is on order to take a vacation on a seaside town, but at the same time the raped victim is in town as well, while hunting her attackers one by one."
What is the truth in the relationships that Alexandre (Jean-Pierre Leaud) has with the women around him?
"Luckily Leaud delivers the crowning chip of his career of the period, and both ladies, particularly Labrun as the whore Veronika (a claim she staggeringly refutes in the film's climax of sorts in one unbroken shot)."
Finally a story allows Welling to show how he has grown as an actor.
The man in charge of the movie (the narrator if you will) does depict movies here in his own way.
"It came to my mind soon that the plot seemed pretty much completely borrowed from Bend it like Beckham, where we had an Indian girl playing football and spoiling the wedding of her sister."
"The lead actress Semra Turan is not only Denmark's female champion but she also delivers an excellent performance, so that it appears to be safe to assume that we have quite some autobiographic impressions here taking into account that this is her first movie and that she has no education as an actress."
"The film was directed by Beatty himself, which was interesting."
When he fell from the sky I split a gut.
"If you don't like how the character is drawn, look away, and just listen to him."
"Verhoeven thinks he can make it better by adding in a series of dream sequences, which instead of defining our main character and his situation, are just used as a way to drive forward the predictable plot."
"Brosnan is genius; as anyone will now testify, he is not to be pigeonholed in the bond role."
Alan Arkin was especially good in his role as Uncle Lou.
Scientist keeps his girlfriend's head alive in a lasagna pan in his basement while he cruises town and tries to find her a body by checking out the local chicks.
"The severed head makes friends with the failed experiment in the closet and the conehead comes out of the closet and rips off the assistant's remaining good arm (his other is not right from a scientist's earlier failure), and the whole place burns down."
Scott has the artistic talent and acting ability to play any role and keep the character unique to himself.
This was one of his few roles as a good guy and he plays it very well.
He likes to twist our minds and therefore puts together a film that might seem very mainstream and far from Lynch himself.
"Farnsworth puts in one of his best performances in this film, making him one of the most likeable ol' men ever depicted on film."
Need I say that his weak health in this film wasn't acted?
"Made me want to read more about this fascinating character, which means, the director fulfilled his purpose, and the film was a success"
"Donald Sutherland's performance as his cynical superior, and the only person in the Russian government willing to help him, is as outstanding as Rea's."
"While movie titles contains the word 'Mother', the first thing that comes to our mind will be a mother's love for her children."
"Before Daniel Craig takes on the role of James Bond, here, he plays Darren, a man who is helping to renovate the house of the son of the mother, and sleeping with her daughter as well."
"The story begins with May coping with the sudden loss of her husband, Toots, in a family visit to her son, Bobby."
"Daniel Craig, on the other hand, had took on a similar role in his movie career, such as Sylvia (2003) and Enduring Love (2004)."
Will the aide of their new friend The Camel With Wrinkled Knees help them or just slow them down with his hallucinations of his friends leaving him?
How will they escape the Kookoo king and his henchmen!?
What will their owner Marcella say when she sees her 7th birthday present doll gone along with her other toys?
"Michael Pollard looks suitably seedy for his role which pretty much sums up the unfulfilled early promise of his career, and everyone else plays it pretty straight ahead."
Jeremy Sumpter is so hott and he is perfect for the role!
"Gabby Hayes(Juke, sounds like Duke) is the driver and begins his usual tirade against women in general, with his girlfriend Pearl being an exception."
"This news also ends Uncle John's trust in Letty as an informant, and he suggests she leave town."
"When someone asks him a question, he flashbacks to the past as if reviewing past moves."
"Various characters become either his helpers or his enemies, pawns, bishops and knights, their actions enlightening you as to who's side they are on."
First off I'll be the first to admit that the scarecrow himself is quite a bit over-the-top.
Also Downey looks great in his underwear!
Perhaps Lady with Red Hair contains his best work in films.
"Margaret Sullavan was his most frequent leading lady on the screen, he did four films with her."
Bressart has my favorite moments in the film when he takes off after Morgan starts asking people for opinions.
"Linklater here gives us the story of Celine and Jessie, a French girl and an American boy who get off the same train heading to Vienna, and on the way there start to talking about things, at first arbitrary, then personal (Jessie seeing death for the first time in his great grandfather)."
"The casting of Henry Fonda as Lincoln seems a mistake, for while the actor had the right doleful qualities for the part, even with several inches of makeup and a false nose he's way too handsome for Honest Abe, who was famously homely."
"But Ford is too reverential in his treatment of Lincoln, who is presented as just shy of a saint, and in the final scene the movie goes way over the top"
Lisa is a hotel manager or owner and she gets on a flight to Miami.
While the idea was good (a reporter is at the scene of a terrorist attack in Tel Aviv but his story gets bumped because of what happened in New York is something that a lot of us who live in countries at war can relate to) the realization is terrible.
"The clip ends up as just some entertainment reporter trying to get some air-time at all costs, a guy saying he's a witness and hoping that he can go on TV, and soldiers and paramedics shouting just because."
One episode had been about an emotionally troubled 12-year old boy and the other was about a vibrant young man (Clu Gulager in his best performance) who is dying of cancer.
"Spielberg says on the DVD of Duel that he loved Steven Bochco's Murder by the Book script (based on a Levinson/Link story), and he tried to make the production look like a million dollar feature, even thought he had a lot less money to work with."
"He had to manage filming of some of the vital songs without Meena's close ups, because Meena Kumari, the lady in the lead role was terminally ill and fighting for her life in early 1971"
Mauricio proposes that whoever murders the animal can be regarded as the greatest and he also promises that it will be the last battle that he wages against his adversary.
"Whilst the majority of the runtime plays by the concrete rules of the category, the final third heralds a significant step in individuality as the maniac arms himself with a machine gun and entices the hero to his lair for the final showdown."
Winfield shows a very sympathetic and heart warming portrayal of a man lost by his memories.
"Just trade in the confines of Nakatomi Plaza to the open mountain ranges of the Rocky Mountains, complete with scenes created to point out the weaknesses of our hero and keep him mortal."
"While I may not be a follower of Desperate Housewives, she herself is always watchable - same goes for Lois & Clark."
"Moriarty absolutely shines in this movie, just as she had everywhere else she's appeared."
"Sally Field gratefully departs from the usual 70-MM-sized Lifetime Tragedy of the Week movies, and we're all reminded why she is who she is today, having started off in comedy afraid of nothing."
The movie really isn't about baseball but about one man's quest to reach his dream.
Just seeing this lovely guy and hearing his wonderful music is a trip to Heaven for me.
In this sequel Liu plays a hapless loser who has to learn kung fu after causing his friends to be beaten.
"Vigo's character knew what he had to do to escape Johnny Law, few movies had the effects-night vision, CB radio-okay I forgot the name of the movie, guy has 76'Caddy souped up, toys with guy he upset."
"Sinatra may have had to work hard at it, but his dance with Kelly is credible, and he would do better in their next pairings."
"Finally, it was strange to see the fresh-faced Dean Stockwell and remember that he would later play a thrill killer in Compulsion, based on the Leopold-Loeb murder from the 1920s."
Louie is killed on their one-year anniversary when he is hit by a car.
"Now, only God himself is capable of answering the question why in Gods name would they create another one of these dumpster dives of a movie?"
"Matthew Modine is almost always pedestrian and annoying, and he does not disappoint in this one."
"Initially, this foursome encounters a desperate father, Frank (Christopher Meloni of Runaway Bride),and his cute little daughter Jodie (Kiernan Shipka of Land of the Lost) blocking the highway with their SUV."
Frank realizes that there is no hope for his daughter and he lets the heroic quartet appropriate his SUV and take off.
"Incredibly, our protagonists manage to escape without getting shot, but Brian has a scare when he almost falls into the water with a floating corpse."
"Brian catches a slug in the leg from the passenger, but he kills her."
"Chris Pine makes quite an impression as fun-loving Brian and his energetic performance is the only reason to hang with this hokum, while the only other well-known actress, Piper Perabo, is relegated to an inconsequential girlfriend role."
It is a testament to Pine's performance that he can change his character to the point of putting himself before others.
"Essentially, Pine has the only role that gives him the ability to pull a one-eighty from happy-go-lucky guy to heartless guy."
Although I didnt like Danes's character and first and found her very annoying.
I feel bad because 'Columbu' I just bet has a good heart and a caring spirit for people in America as well as for his own countrymen.
Then another sequel he would have to get the young people rescued from excessive sugar addiction and so on.
One would think that a film about a young person's coming to terms with his burgeoning homosexuality would be anything but boring.
Von Bulow himself: How bad is this film?
"Nevertheless, someone obviously thought that the character was too good to waste, because he ended up as the hero of two more films in the eighties, plus the recently released fourth instalment."
"Murdock intends that the mission will prove that there are no American prisoners in Vietnam, partly because that will improve relationships between the American and Vietnamese governments, partly because it will make his own life easier."
"In First Blood Rambo was unquestionably a criminal, even though his responsibility for his crimes was lessened by severe provocation and by his mental instability."
In Rambo he is a bona fide all-American hero.
"Director Ted Mikel is a hack, but is so lovable a person (I generally like the guy thanks to his smile inducing interviews and commentary tracks) that you can pretty much excuse the garbage he mostly turned out."
"Even though people like to ridicule Hasselhoff these days, he's not bad in his role, either."
"Madeline Stowe is her usual cardboard self, and does little to be a convincing victim."
"He does, of course, and Russell drills him 10 times with his 9mm, which was ENTIRELY unnecessary."
"What's Conn still doing in school, I guess she just likes hanging around Rydell High even though now she's a beautician."
"The Police don't bother to try and find an escaped mental patient, they don't bother to interview his daughter."
The movie was supposed to be about a young man's rise to military power - not the slave ship captain getting jiggly with the English maiden looking for her daddy...
I feel personally responsible for suggesting a friend and me watch this movie and am surprised she still considers me a friend after the torment I put us through.
"The more direction an actor got, the worse he performed."
"Twenty years ago, the five years old boy Michael Hawthorne witnessed his father killing his mother with an axe in an empty road and committing suicide later."
"The plot's basically; a girl's parents neglect her, so this sicko PokeMon pretends to be her dad."
Gwyneth Paltrow walks through the entire film with a confused look on her face and its hard to tell what David Schwimmer even sees in her.
I think that the major problem in this film is his lack of sensibility.
"The movie supposedly caused quite a stir among the critics in Cannes, but for me the final scene was just a pathetic attempt for a newbie director to get himself noticed."
There are some things an artist should not do to try and achieve his/her goal.
Mac even goes so far as to have one of the women drugged in order to keep her from discovering his cheating.
"At least Priyadarshan changed the title for this remake, rather than brazenly using the original without giving credit, as he did in his 1985 version of this same tale."
Demi Moore's character in the movie was selected for the SEALs because of her looks.
Here's a sampling of the lamer aspects... ***SPOILERS*** Professional Slayer insists on sleeping outdoors by himself at night.
The guys in the gang and Lowe himself seem to do quite a bit of needless exaggerated as New York street toughs.
"In reality, Dr. Lorenz is responsible for the crimes, by putting the brides in a suspended state, and using their gland fluid to keep his wife eternally young."
"Russell steals the show (even out hamming Lugosi- who does not give one of his more memorable performances, even considering his Monograms) as Countess Lorenz playing the role with the qualities of many of the stereotypical characteristics of many of today's Hollywood prima donnas."
"Mr Coppola did not inherit his father's skills, unfortunately (neither did his sister, who can however make movies which one might watch)."
Chris Pine fights to keep himself above the surface whilst being drowned by a misery of a lightweight cast.
Lou Taylor Pucci couldn't be dryer if he spent the summer with Keanu Reaves combing the Navada desert.
"The monster from Enemy Mine somehow made his way into a small mountain community, where he has taken up residence."
"i mean, the whole thing with Sybil Danning going three-way with two of her werewolf minions was just out of place and quite disturbing (but kinda hot), Christopher lee about to stab a dead karen as if she's a vampire, etc."
"actually, this movie was actually like some sort of mish-mash of Dracula and The Lost Boys...except with werewolves, because everything Christopher Lee (whom played Dracula himself) was saying about werewolves pretty much ripped off from every other vampire movie (stake in the heart, garlic, the creature of the night must die AT NIGHT, and the ruler of werewolves lives in TRANSYLVANIA)."
"Peter's renting out his house, and his ex-girlfriend Darcy (Chandra West), and her daughter Cole come to stay there."
"Cole meets a neighborhood child, and they talk of the Tooth Fairy, and how you shouldn't lose your tooth, or she'll come for you."
"Unfortunately seconds later, it looks like the Tooth Fairy steals her bike and knocks her tooth out (How ironic)."
The only bright point was Ron Cook's portrayal of Parker - he caught it perfectly.
Seagal is always in shadows because of his weight.
This oddity in the new DORIS DAY COLLECTION doesn't really need to be included as she is only in the film for less than 30 minutes.
JANCIE RULE shows promise and it's a shame she didn't become a big star.
"Reading the book, my impression of NC was that he was supposed to be this charming, dazzling, amazingly handsome guy who spoke English with almost zero trace of an accent."
"Instead, they found some Clay Aiken pencil-neck who looks like an employee of the month from Best Buy, and gave him a really bad fake accent."
"Luis Guzman, Pachanga in the original, is in the movie but he plays a completely different character."
"However it's visually numbing the viewer, it somehow brings him inside the blues with brief dialogs, monotonic scenes, dynamic cut, music and abrupt noises."
when he earns so much Just to show how poor he is?
"Elvis gets to sing just a few utterly worthless songs, and is pursued by a young boy-crazy gal and her gun-toting mother."
For instance are we really expected to believe our hero dug that twenty foot deep tiger trap in a morning without even getting his jodhpurs dirty?
Sellers isn't one hundred per cent bad; he conveys a quirky warmth as Smith when he discusses his fetishistic attachment to his lawn mower and he's oddly moving as Manchu when he expresses his love for English music hall entertainment.
Sellers' routines where he revitalizes his fading strength with electric shocks are particularly excruciating; he seems too convincingly agonized to be funny.
"It seemed as though the director just added stuff on because he thought it would look cool, while conveniently ignoring the plot of the movie up to that point."
From the What Was She Thinking?
"Goldberg's mere presence on-screen can often spark good will and laughter no matter how poor the script, but here she's drowning and you can see the unfunny results."
"While most of the cast are talentless no namers who will probably be forgotten in a few years, the one and only big name in this movie is Eugene Levy who spends almost all of the time he is on screen with this knowing smirk on his face that says to the viewer I know this isn't funny and I'm wasting my talents but hey I'm getting payed for it so who cares he doesn't even try to make any of his jokes funny (he really deserves better than this garbage)."
"This is the kind of movie where every time something happens, you'll be sure to hear someone shout out he's lost his gun!"
Heston appears in a nonsensichal scene to spout out his most famous catch-phrases from the first movie.
"One kills the victims (stockbrokers involved in a scam) and asks witnesses for the exact time, while the other is deaf and is proved innocent because he could not have spoken to witnesses."
"The character never shows us *why* he is wounded, however."
George Zucco is present as a potentially villainous High Priest but isn't used to his full advantage.
Kim Basinger is a great actress but she was definitely slumming when she took this role.
The Director wants us to realize she's adapted a play.
"King himself made a cameo in the movie (sort of like Dave Barry), which reinforces my belief that authors should stay just that: authors."
King has his usual cameo as the minister.
Followed by a sequel also directed by Mary Lambert (is it any wonder that she's had no mainstream film work since?).
"The man's brother is jailed on charges that he was an accomplice, but soon escapes."
"Setting aside the fact she's nude in a fair amount of this film, she presents herself as a decent actress and a very strong character."
"A prison escapee finds time to kidnap people to torture them, for no reason (because they wronged his girlfriend?)."
"Still the main reason you see a movie like this is because of Eddie, unfortunately he is not very funny in this one at all and it just seems stupid to put him in the Raiders of the Lost Ark type scenes."
"The black Africans are, to say the least, offencive impressionistic portraits of former colonised peoples now colonised by the director's poor handling of her material."
"They are no more than a dark and moribund backdrop against which the blythe-like France wonders seeking a world she never knew, and hoping for one that can never be found in Cameroon"
"A kid in a foam-rubber monster costume pops out, instantly kills the soldier with a scratch across his face, then escapes to a nearby city."
"Runner dumps the lost boy in Othello's flat, where he promptly starts granting more wishes."
The sergeant especially is guilty of using his monotone to bulldozer every single line he has.
"Gordons a great director, but this movie he made, just didn't do it for me."
"Hey, whats with the killer only wearing his mask in the beginning?"
"Angel's character rapidly transitions from her city-slicker ways to a cowgirl, slipping into southern slang after two days on the ranch."
"And it`s young Sam I feel sorry for , not only are his parents divorced but he`s as thick as two short planks ."
"Edison started really good with some good effort from the singers-who-want-to-be actors and a once again great Morgan Freeman but... (In a movie there is usually a good start to catch audience,done, a bit boring yet story filling middle of the movie that is more about characters and less about action ,done, and the third part is something really good so that you can remember the movie...) when you see 30 elite police officers (packed with weapons that can demolish a building) shoot at a guy behind a car, fail to hit him even once while he kills all (but 3) and then the guy takes out a flame thrower (to kill the rest 3) ,you realise that the Greek summer sky filled with stars is way too good to be distracted by a movie like this"
Harold Pinter rewrites Anthony Schaeffer's classic play about a man going to visit the husband of his lover and having it all go sideways.
Michale Caine walks Law through his odd modern house with sliding doors and panels for no really good reason.
(Never mind a late in the game revelation that makes you wonder why he bothered) In the original we never suspected what was up.
here we do and while it gives an edge it also somehow feels false since its so clear we are forced to wonder why Law's Milo doesn't see he's being set up.
"Mira Sorvino is SO bad in the movie, it is very painful to watch the scene with her."
"She is a pretty girl, but in this movie, She is not seductive at all, but I will have to witness her awkward attempt to seduce almost all the other major characters."
"The idea of reviving the character in a bigger, slicker production must have sounded good, but there was no point in it, other than the hope of making money; it's just a show, which mostly fails to capture the atmosphere of the character's world and wholly fails to take the character anywhere he hasn't been already (also, the actor wasn't at his best)."
Even as the character pre-death in a flashback Englund plays him as a boo-hiss pantomime villain with a slop of Transatlantic (ie.
"Only Kananga himself, Yaphet Kotto, keeps his dignity."
Copping-out by allowing friendly critics to claim that all this artless crap was a satire on mainstream film-making is no more than a safe get-out to offer those who clearly see Godard's poverty of intellect and arrogant contempt for his audience.
Gosha suggests that he is fighting mainly for his personal advancement rather than for the Loyalist cause.
"This foolish, implausible tale is redeemed only by the opening scene in which a hard-boiled police detective delivers some nearly-audible lines confirming our greatest fears: He is dead."
"Instead, it just made me wonder how a guy with a mask that covers his entire face, including his eyes and ears, can move so stealthily without bumping his shins on chairs or tables."
"Then again, given the things the Cupid Killer does, maybe he can teleport and his eyes are on his hands."
"Jesse James's mentor William Quantrill is mentioned several times, but all the actors mispronounce his name."
"If singer tried to make a romantic titanic like movie to crash the box office record, he failed."
"Kate Bosworth plays a 22 year old star reporter, she's looking like 19."
"Routh is not so bad, he is playing a little bit wooden, but the whole movie is wooden, so..."
"Even spacey, this is not his terrain."
"The scene in which Rochester wants to find out Jane's reaction to his dilemma by putting his case in hypothetical form before her after the wounded Mason has left the house is completely missing, and the farewell scene, the most important scene - the climax - of the novel is reduced to four sentences."
And during the first 15 minutes of her screen time I was enchanted by her performance.
"Additionally, during many moments of the movie, Hurt's facial expression leaves one wondering if he is fighting against acute attacks of the sleeping sickness."
Particularly in the proposal scene he grimaces like a patient rallying from a general anaesthetic and is hardly able to keep his eyes open.
"Willem Dafoe gives a credible performance as the investigator, but he has little to do with a script that is stretched to the limit."
"The next 5 minutes are hilarious - it's just that Columbo's hair is so perfectly groomed, then he can't afford to pay the bill and then, when he makes enquiries at a jewellers he keeps glancing in the mirror to admire his hairstyle!"
"**spoiler** It plods along in a tedious fashion for quite a while,.... then a Lamb does a runner, prompting woman in period dress to run off after it, she goes into the woods where she is set upon by an erect penis attached to a man in a bear/rat manky suit, I put it like that as its obvious the penis is in charge & gets way too much screen time, ejaculating for the most of it, anyway, in a nutshell, it turns out she liked a bit of bear/rat tadger & thats about it, the rest is just padding."
I didn't like the way as a Roberto Angel played his character and his little either.
"Raquel Welch does give a decent performance as Myra, and she looks lovely besides."
"Although West's part was originally larger, she was reduced to a cameo role by the time Sarne was through with the editing."
"Maximally manipulative Anabel Sims (Betsy Drake) sets out to trap her ideal man, aided by her co-worker, Julie."
"Granted, his ocker Aussie attitude is funny, but also becomes annoying as the film drags on."
"Well, of course the acting is terrible and the story line is childish but it does have his moments."
"A killer, wearing a plastic white mask and black overcoat, is killing the friends of Hollywood producer Shawn Banning(Danny Wolske)who inherited his position when someone sliced open his former employer from crotch to chest."
"The set-up was too long and talky, and when it was done, the main character remained as flat and opaque as he had been in the first scene."
Be nice to your enemy and this will confuse him into self-destruction.
"), seems embarrassed by the whole thing, as well she should be."
Pearl goes browsing and she finds much more than a shmatte; she gets the salesman as well.
"That is the basic premise for the film, which becomes a soap opera when the young daughter, Alison, decides to play hooky and go to the Woodstock festival nearby where, horror of horrors, she witnesses her own mom making out with the blouse salesman!"
"Anna Paquin plays the rebellious Alison and Tovah Feldshuh is the unhappy Nana, who would like to have stayed in the city watching her soap operas instead of witnessing first hand one that is playing in her own backyard!"
"Ms. Borel is, unfortunately, not a werewolf; she is merely a very strong lunatic."
"As a film, Werewolf Woman (in English) would have been better if Borel's character really was a female werewolf; with her sexual victimization a great bit of characterization."
"Filmed in what the old movie posters used to call A Riot of Color it resembles nothing more than an expensively-dressed but intellectually-challenged production of The Student Prince .Mr James Mason,wearing a very natty little white number,utilises his all-purpose mittel-European accent whenever he remembers.I am a great admirer of his and I sincerely hope the remuneration was comensurate with the distaste he clearly felt for the character he was playing."
And as for the rest of the matches: the first match was Christian defending his European title against Al Snow.
The Rock was too caught up with his acting to be there when the invasion began.
"January Jones gives such a wooden performance, I was surprised she didn't go up in flames when she got near the candles in the film."
Granted she's given lines and situations Meryl Streep would have trouble with but I swear at times shes reading from a cue card off set.
"Cristina's well-being is so important to him that he's fleeing capture and jail or deportation for her, but he's willing to risk all that to appease her when she doesn't want to go to Mexico."
CCH Pounder's Detective Wims could wipe the floor with her.
"For example, every impassioned speech Pablo makes, and Mrs. Knight's lament that her child won't be crawling into bed with them in the morning."
"Hackneyed and over-the-top deus ex machina: as an employer, would you really waive checking his green card just because he can quote the author of the inspirational saying on a poster behind your desk?"
And why doesn't the mother recognize his face from when she saw him before he drove off?!
"Speaking of unnecessary traits that never went anywhere, Detective Lightning's saying skeptical Detective Bright must be a Scorpio shows how little he really knows about the occult."
"What, she has to shoot him just because she said 'Stop, or I'll shoot'?"
")also,the movie really doesn't appear to be about anything,and i didn't find any of the characters likable.really,the there doesn't seem to be any point to it all.maybe i'm missing something,but for me,this movie is pretty much a waste of time,when i could have been doing something more productive and enjoyable.like using my face as a pin cushion.James garner is in this thing,as are C.Thomas Howell and Shirley Jones,and James Cromwell.all are wasted here,and i'm sure this was a low point in each of their respective careers.Jennilee Harrison(from the later years of Three's Company)is also in the movie,and it is nice to see her in a non ditsy role.but other than that,she can't rise above the mediocre script.for me,Tank is a 3/1"
"Morgan Freeman looked incredibly uncomfortable, especially when made to dance around to rock music for no apparent reason half way through the film after him and Timberlake meet."
MGM's intent behind this comedy was to contemporize and Americanize Garbo's image for wartime audiences whom the studio heads felt were not interested in the tragic period characters she favored in the thirties.
There's this one scene I remember when the mafia ape guy explains to his minions what rhetorical questions are.
"Having Burt Kwouk (of whom his master says, Your face-- is familiar.)"
"Louque agrees, but actually turns him into one of his hypnotized slaves."
Frank puts all his dreams on the back burner and gets a normal (boring!)
The bitterness and resentment of the filmmaker towards his stepfather is obvious.
"The actor, while not only completely wooden and deadpan, could not read his lines with any gusto at all."
"Juliet is almost passable, but she gives no depth to her character,and seems to be completely out of touch with the play."
Miss Belmont was totally different to what I had imagined her to be!
Most of this toothache deals with Jack Pearl seeking in vain to get some chuckles from the audience himself as a man who impersonates Baron Munchausen (here's a good example of the level of humor: I object!
"At the beginning Leonard himself says he is not sentimental about his past, and then for the next hour and a half the film emphasizes all the worst sentimental elements of Leonard's songs."
Cohen's interview is all done in lo-fi video closeups and I so wanted to see a medium or a long shot of his whole body!
"Forget this one, and go buy Leonard's most recent album if you want to pay tribute to him"
"The acting is okay (Myers is good as the cat, it's just that he is REALLY annoying)."
The story involves a girl with glandular fever who escapes in her dreams.
Eric Norris has primarily worked on all his father's films and TV shows.
"When a captain is put under arrest, he IS under arrest, you take all his keys and open the safe where the guns are kept."
My dad cleaned all the mess the dog made wherever he was.
With the full ten minutes plus of running round the fields looking for the missing child (did he crawl out of the window?
Englund plays the well known Marque De Sade who in the 17th century was enprisoned for his obsession of pain and the pleasure of bringing pain upon himself as well as watching others also be in pain.
Englund tries to make a comeback from his once hit move Nightmare on Elm St. by using these pull in and out needles to put out peoples eyes.
I will say one thing positive about the movie: the guy who plays Van Helsing is pretty slick with that knife of his.
The soul of an ancient mummy is transferred to one of his followers so that he might punish everyone involved in the desecration of his tomb.
"With only one exception (Ziva Rodann is the lone bright spot wish the movie could have focused more on her mysterious character), the cast is as dull as the screenplay."
"When the King leaves the scene, his Queen makes music with the palace's Minstrel (Henry B. Walthall)."
"When the King discovers the lovers, he decides to enact a horrific Edgar Allen Poe-type revenge."
"Down is simply awful as the visiting British scholar (that she seems to know absolutely nothing about the culture of Egypt and even less about antiquities is the fault of the writers, certainly; but that she's annoying as all get out is her own fault entirely), and the rest of the cast, including Sir John Gielgud and Frank Langella, seem as downright confused by the proceedings as I was."
"Cathy Lee Crosby was more familiar, thanks to That's Incredible, but her acting was no better."
"Time and again, characters (usually The Narrator and whoever he is with) are shown walking...and walking...and walking."
"In one shot in London, there appear to be at least two men over six feet tall walking just behind the narrator's brother (played by star Anthony Piana without his distracting mustache)."
Wow... Why Timothy Hines talked up this film the way he did is beyond me.
"Burt still has presence, although it also means you notice more when he mouths insultingly half-baked one-liners"
!- the mother or other elderly people never took her for check-ups - nor did they try to feel the baby's movements in the womb !
"Now, director Bert I. Gordon is not exactly famous for delivering masterpieces (on his repertoire there are titles like Earth vs. the Spider, King Dinosaur and Food of the Gods) but he really surpassed himself here with a totally senseless, redundant and utterly nonsensical tale about witchcraft and secretive little towns."
"Phyllis Dietrickson has a designer home to die for, and Neff's comfy pad would be hard to afford on an insurance salesman's salary, not to mention the sporty Mercedes convertible that he drives."
"Crenna fails to capture the cynicism of Neff, and his attempts at double-entendre and sexual suggestiveness fall horribly flat."
Director Jack Smight and his three principals have all done much better work.
"Merry Anders overacts here terribly as Laura, as she didn't convince me at all."
"Ivy Bethune is OK, and somewhat creepy, but also overacted, she did have a creepy smile at the end though."
Chris Rock deserves better than he gives himself in Down To Earth.
"After Lance learns the Apollo Theatre will hold one final amateur night extravaganza, he implores Whitney to get him in the line-up."
"Excuse me, but if Lance is such a deadbeat stand-up comic, why does the Apollo keep inviting him back?"
"The snag is Lance cannot reclaim his corpse, so he must inhabit another body."
Down To Earth features Rock in his most unfunny role.
I really didn't like this movie because it didn't really bring across the messages and ideas L'Engle brought out in her novel.
Just have a look at what he as done so far.
"Director Russell Mulcahy is very much in his element, but there's only so much he can do with a TV budget and the network censors on his back."
But then producer Little Richard was probably too reluctant to bring to light any sordid details of his life and just gave us a forgettable facsimile of his career highlights from the 50s and 60s
"Jed reluctantly leaves, and then sits in the middle of the road to put his shoes on."
"Bogey is supposed to be the same type of cynic-about-to-reform as in Casablanca, and naturally he often refuses money or other valuables when being offered them - but how does that fit in with the tough cynic in him?"
There is a scene in which Bacall breaks into tears; very unsuitable for her character.
"Keith is as breezy as possible playing the eponymous lead, an unabashedly drunk jungle guide shanghai'd into escorting rich boy Van Hoffman and his gorgeous wife Shower on a hunting expedition in cannibal country."
"The characters and plot are completely uninteresting (as is Fulci's mad camera work, which is usually a redeeming factor in his films), and any grasp of suspense is nowhere to be found."
"And by that I don't mean sick and angry about the human condition or anything so general and profound as that, because that is exactly the line that most critics have adopted in their fulsome praise of the film - an ordeal to watch in its ruthless dissection of our emotional cowardice and cruelty and so on - and, if it really managed to put across a universally or even broadly relevant message of this sort, then the director would have good reason to be satisfied with himself, however pessimistic his conclusions may be."
"Gong Li is great, but the power of emotions that she showed in this movie had not been translated into Japanese style."
"The main problem wasn't that art, by all means, is susceptible to endless points of view, but that a lot of people just don't get it, that every single human got his own genuine taste, his own opinion, hence what I suppose it the greatest movie ever made, can also be your worst one ever, and how that is right both ways, but how many people can understand this correctly?."
"In fact, by the end, you lose track of who you're supposed to empathize with, failing to feel even the slightest emotion for either of the men whether that was the failure of the director or perhaps the underlining message he was trying to tell is up to you to decide."
"Plus, there wasn't much chemistry or energy in pairing her with Cary Grant--an actor generally loved for his grace and class."
"As a profile of Amin it may have been interesting, because Forest Whitaker is incredibly good, and if this was a better film, he would get an Oscar."
It tells instead the fictitious story of the Scots doctor and his impossible love life from the point of view of Amin.
And if you want to know why the doctor was so foolhardy - he wasn't
Hearing Christopher talk about Pie- O-My's death could therefore only lead Tony to the conclusion that Chris himself has set the fire.
"Lockwood plays her as a narcissistic vamp, wearing so much makeup that I thought of her as a Restoration-era Joan Rivers (or a restoration-era Joan Rivers, ha!)."
"Number one, there's no reason that the player's character, Tom, can't have his full range of motion controlled by the left analog stick."
"The supporting cast is competent, but has little to do, even the young doctor and his fiancee blackmailed into helping Frankenstein."
"A bumbling police chief is introduced, along with his put-upon sidekick, to generate some comic relief, then they are completely dropped from the movie!"
Another problem is Branagh himself.
"Brenda Blethyn is a capable actress, and I have liked her in other movies."
"Patients and their visitors are around too, including pregnant Mrs. Tidey (Joan Sims) and her nervous dad-to-be husband Mr. Tidey (Kenneth Connor)."
"I personally will grab the shoulders of the director if I ever see him and shake him into submission, demanding that he run home and swallow two-gallons of Drain-O or I will do it for him."
"I think it is only fair to say that my opinion of the director and his previous work is as low as it is possible to be but I am happy to point out that there are a few elements that boarder on pleasurable and are a great improvement on his previous film, Darkhunters, which is one of the worst films I have ever seen."
The best moment is reserved for Robert's comments about people who have taken the time to review his previous film.
"As always these sorts of comments say more about those saying them than those they are targeting, they simply make the director and his friends look ignorant."
"At one point in the commentary track Robert's says jokingly I can see people sitting at home saying this isn't amazing, its sh$t he isn't wrong"
I will now look at Michael Clarke Duncan with apprehension...why....he lent his name to this vermin
Priyanka doesn't realise that she actually needs to play her role rather than just looking glam on screen... An utter waste of beauty without acting skills.
Her best bit of advice: I've only been to Nancherrow (the local Stately Home of England) once.
"And lastly, fourth warning sign: no on-screen female character is Mrs. She's either Miss or Lady."
"had a crush on (when, I don't know) comes home from some wartime tough spot and is found living on the street by Lady of the Manor (must be some street if SHE's going to find him there.)"
The script for this TV soap opera is so bad that even A. Hopkins at some point had to play like an undergrad drama-student so as to bring some life in his script-dead character.
"Ten years on he's reduced to again recycling the plot of 'Home Alone' in this second sequel, which is not connected to the other films but is equally uninspired and sadistic."
Pitch...he is so useless.
"If AAG was Ramu's most ambitious project, he has clearly jumped off the high cliff he has ascended by giving the industry some of the greatest works of all times."
Ramu's favorite Nisha Kothari did a fantastic job in Sarkar because she didn't have many dialogs (in fact none if I remember clearly).
Dolph Lundgren gives a performance that is better than either this script or his other action films have allowed.
My favorite scene is when two people are supposedly having sex and the statue knocks the guy off the bed to show he's fully dressed!
"Poor Robert Englund, I give him credit for at least doing a good job with the awful material he was given."
Tito has raised a foundling (a young and beautiful Loretta Young) to adulthood and names her Simonetta.
"Tito has raised the girl in the circus life, and she has become an accomplished ballerina."
"William Baldwin is the only 'name' on the cast list, and even he doesn't make an impression."
"Within seconds after infection the patient reaches for his neck, develops tunnel vision, his skin will turn white of the calcium, after which he falls and his hand and scull will crack in a cloud of chalk."
Fortunately it could be stopped by throwing over outdated desktop pc's in a rack and electrocuting the nerd with his back on a broken computer and his feet in some spilled water.
What I did like about this film was the look of the wolfman himself and the scenes where he attacks.
"A Spanish-Italian co-production where a series of women in a village are being murdered around the same time a local count named Yanos Dalmar is seen on horseback, riding off with his 'man-eating' dog behind him."
Yanos agrees to hire her in place of his brother and together they seek the formulae for the regeneration of dead cells.
"The lead actor (Victor Garber) seemed so uncomfortable, almost embarrassed in his role -- perhaps he realized how bad the writing was!!"
Juliet had good skills as a teen but she can't give emotional depth to her lines and we really can never connect to her.
"Kareena has improved her figure, but is not a good actress anyway."
And Jebidia deserves an Oscar for his role in this movie the only thing that let him down was half way through he stopped his silly name calling.
"The sole administrator of this Academy is a young and seductive headmistress, and she retains her handsome charges on a short leash, so to speak."
"Denzel Washington is an outstanding actor, but his role in this movie did not affect me whatsoever."
"If you do not believe me, search for him on the internet, and read the articles some people have of him."
Whenever the mother is advised not to do anything you know fine well she is going to do it.
"The caretaker of the manor, Gary(Simon Peacock)warns Karen and her students to stay on the path and not to stray into the forest."
"Gary is supposedly clairvoyant, his cousin Pandora(Ginger Lynn Allen)tells us, because he was born on Samhain."
Paul(Howard Rosenstein)is Karen's love interest who made the wrong decision coming to Ireland without his girlfriend's prior knowledge.
Most of the violence flashes across the screen quickly with not much dwelling on the breeder's acts of death towards his victims.
"Phil Price has the really irritating trickster character, Steve, often shedding bad jokes..how he is able to get Leigh's Barbara naked in the shower for some action is anyone's guess because I have no reason why he'd stand a chance with such a hottie."
Jenna Jameson drops by long enough to get her heart cut out of her chest(at least we see her breasts momentarily before her chest is opened up)with a few minor lines about two missing friends she's looking for.
Angela Robinson directs and she does an okay job.
"While it is clear that the director had access to and went on the advice of Elinore Stewart's children, it is key to note that the children believed their mother to be a complete liar in regards to the good, enriching, strengthening experiences of homesteading her land."
`Twin Warriors' is Jet Li's best Shaolin era flick while `The Evil Cult' is his worst.
Why does the police chief not care when he learns of the Black Mask's true identity?
"I'm talking about watching the lead actress, a stunning blonde, run amok in her birthday suit."
"Even as a young gay kid, I could see what she was doing to the rest of the class."
She was the only teacher I had who in any way could have been played by Elizabeth Berkley.
"In A Woman Under the Influence Mabel goes crazy, but I can see why she does go crazy."
Mabel basically runs their lives because they are afraid to stand up to her and stand up for her.
"If that is true, are their friend again in the very end fruit of her madness?"
Is such usage okay because a member of the group uses a pejorative term to refer to the group because he or she is a member of the group?
"The real treat though is Ms. Eastwood, whose inability to speak in plain English is so pervasive I actually googled her, expecting to learn that she was a Russian beauty who pronounced her lines phonetically, with no understanding of their meaning."
But in the second half he himself looks confused.
Denzel Washington played the same character he always plays - enjoyable but nothing new
"Jang Lee Hwang is also the villain, who is usually pretty awesome but his screen time is significantly small."
"Robert Carradine has a role as a ruthless businessman who is being wooed by his truly repellent ex-brother-in-law, Nicholas Bell, the one opening Primal Park, a resort / zoo featuring genetically created sabretooth tigers as it's major attraction."
Brian Wimmer is Haiduck's lover and his role is a mechanic keeping operations running smoothly.
"Carradine spends a great deal of the film taunting Bell, his arch nemesis."
"Gus, a man besotted and passionately in love, is prepared to give up his love without complaint."
Maybe Peter Sollett saw he didn't have the money to do the movie he wanted to make and decided to take the easy way out by making a bad film that cynically apes the tenets of current edgy film-making.
"Not that this would've been any more bizarre than the fantastical plot line that was probably dreamed up after 10 pints of beer at a fancy dress party, where someone's caveman costume inspired the writer to return to an African theme for his next blockbuster"
"Buried alive, he digs his way out and plots revenge against those that put him away and flicked the switch."
"The usually dependable Warren Beatty looks drunk, and the usually hilarious Goldie Hawn acts like she's on depressants."
"Maybe it wasn't such a big sacrifice for that priest to have left Brigadoon, maybe he was just trying to get the hell out of that dump."
"The name Uwe Boll is automatically linked to bad horror/cult cinema and every new movie he releases which is about two, three per year immediately always receives negative ratings and harsh criticism."
"So you know this will happen later on, but still the first three quarters are wasted on catching a serial killer and bringing him to the electric chair."
Nobody believes that cops and prison staff members will just bury a mass murderer alive without shooting a few bullets through his head first.
Nobody will accept that a fugitive convict cannot be found for another six months even though he went straight back to the exact same hideout place where they first caught him!
Jesse has just declared his homosexuality to the world at the age of fourteen.
"Robert Carlyle puts in a valiant performance as the most hated man of the twentieth century, but he is hamstrung by two things."
It is also quite ironic that the films or miniseries which give a far better insight into Hilter's character do not feature him at all.
Marvin(Rob Schneider)does not have the ingredients to be a cop which is his lifelong dream.
The doctor has to use animal organs to rebuild him.
"In fact, this is the his first film I have seen."
"Welles is misused, but, make no mistake, he is the best thing in this movie."
"Other than her performance, real slim pickings from the rest of the cast sans Welles."
"Humphrey Bogart clearly did not want to be in this film, and be forced to play a part-Mexican or he would have been suspended."
Nobody seems to know why she took her own life.
Guernsey is the story of a woman who suddenly starts looking at her own life.
"It seems less ends-oriented, and more like the cop just wants to prove his power."
"From the shocking moment our main, naive character realizes he is a victim of credit card fraud (perpetrated by the psychopathic villain) to the turn-around-he's-not-really-dead finale"
LeRoy's direction is full of innovative visual touches but he cannot overcome the bad acting and the unintentionally funny situations.
It seems that this was another case of the director needing actors and decided to gather his friends around instead of finding anyone with experience.
"The whole film just feels Luke-warm; there's potential alright, but the director either wasn't experienced enough to make it work or just didn't know what the hell he was doing"
Demi Moore gets into a hospital in the middle of a massive earthquake and gives birth to her child.
To be honest the movie had it's moments...I thought it was cool when the guy got his head ripped off but that was about it.
"It opens with a young female auto fanatic getting the business from her arch rival, who pressures her into a car race."
The film's only redeemable quality is that it did make me realize that the character in the Time Machine probably should have shown a little more moral outrage at the odd behavior by those in his future
"Violence is beyond anything realistically imaginable but in this case it's not a case of social issues but a white, upper-middle class student uses it to turn himself into the crime kingpin of his local high schoiol."
Danny Glover does a good job making you wonder if he's the bad guy.
Dennis Quaid didn't have as much room in the story as he could have had.
Marlee Matlin in her underwear just shouldn't happen.
A fabulous book about a fox and his family who does what foxs do.
"Hey man, i'm fixing the sprinklers ((that guy was my favorite part of the movie)) Suddenly there's a preacher tied up on a couch watching home movies, he gets killed."
And what space dudes worth their moon cheese abduct the ugly photographer first instead of his model?
Writer-director Mario Gariazzo apparently researched his subject by skimming a stack of UFO-themed tabloids as he took in a Sunn Classics double feature.
Explanation : it's no use trying to get back the jewelry Jacquouille has stolen ; don't you remember this nice red shiny and expensive car he bought at the end of the 1st episode ?
"Unfortunately, Roy Scheider's Harry Mitchell comes off in the film as a sexy, handsome Uebermensch dancing through his problems without even working up a sweat."
Alan Arkin looks embarrassed throughout his performance and son Adam simply looks numb.
The camera is literally making out with her face and she gets sexually assaulted not once but twice in the film.
"Ching Siu Tung's choreography, while still retaining his trademark style, editing, and postures, lacks the vitality and originality of his earlier films like A Chinese Ghost Story, Dragon Inn, and Duel to the Death."
"Now, instead of seeking medical attention for his slug bite, this guy runs around his greenhouse screaming like an idiot, spills some highly volatile chemicals, starts a fire, knocks a bookcase over on himself, and cuts off his own hand- then the fire and volatile chemicals mix and his house explodes."
"Kornbluth grew up in this neighborhood, and his compassion for the people is evident throughout."
"I mean, the mother of the monsters shows her true form only at the end of the movie."
"There are many, many flat scenes in the Whitehouse between the president and his aides which don't work."
Only laugh: Connery throws away his wig before putting on his helmet and jumping out of a plane.
"On the other hand, it is one of those really really sick movies where one cannot help but wonder whether the director himself likes to stage specific scenes, and, yes, one cannot help but wonder how many copycats will such a movie inspire."
"Michael Shannon is due credit for pretty much the same reasons, except he's a hippy stoner."
Then there's the addition of Christina Applegate as a greedy chick (yet very pretty of course) who wants Gram's body back so that she can begin to cash in on his estate.
"Her character, and her acting are non-existent and one wonders why the director didn't just go the whole hog and include a lesbo scene between her and the chick who plays Kaufman's girlfriend(it wouldn't have lowered the tone a whole lot more)."
"In fact I believe they just drove around in a circle of forest over and over again since they didn't have a high enough budget to film in a wider location, that or the director didn't want to waste his precious time filming in different areas of wood he was to busy sitting in a trailer jerking off to be bothered with such trivial matters."
In fact the director had so much fun doing this that he didn't have enough time to hire a big enough cast or even an editor.
"And so he told the eight members of the cast to dress up as different people and try not to act inconspicuous, whilst I assume he changed his name and began randomly snipping at the film reels editing isn't a hard job anyway right?"
(WWE wisely didn't take him!)
"Let's talk about the acting for just a second, the Carradine guy who's career peaked in 1984 when he did Revenge of the Nerds (which was actually a great comedy)."
"Once there, they start dying one by one because the killer escaped from prison and no one bothered to warn Donna because apparently her prom is too important to interrupt."
"This is about a teacher who falls in love with his student, so he kills her entire family."
"Here, we have half the characters dying in the same hotel room off screen, a woman being stabbed several times with no stab wounds, and a closeup on a bad actor's face as he screams in agony."
Steven Feder's big success is that he convinced people to make this bland movie
"And it seems that one mess after another comes along to embarrass herself in her painfully long, redundant, and cliched quest to prove her worth to everyone."
There was a side story about the main character and his partner.
"I'm a Jean Harlow fan, because she had star quality."
"Director Takashi Shimizu, pulling a George Sluizer and remaking his own original film(s), valiantly attempts to build atmosphere in the first hour by repeating the same scene over and over and over and over."
"Karen gets stuck in Paris, and befriends a sissily-handsome French man with whom she is having sex soon."
"I'm just going to go ahead and spoil it: the good doctor goes from being a shuffling half-man, half-lizard thing to being what appears to be a man in a rejected Godzilla costume, when the police finally gun him down."
"Lorenzo Lamas had the look of an action star back in the early 90's but he is certainly no action star, that is why he is doing soap operas and not action blockbusters."
Vince Vaughn plays the guy he always does -- the only time I've seen him play someone else was in that movie with John Travolta.
"Director Michael Sarne (who only had two other previous directing credits to his name at the time), took a lot of flack for the finished film, and, in honesty, it really does not look like he had a clue about what he was trying to achieve."
"Ms. West was 77 year old when she appeared in this film (she had been retired for 26 years), and apparently she still considered herself to be a formidable sex symbol as she plays an upscale talent agent who has hunky men (including a young Tom Selleck) throwing themselves at her."
"Raquel, in particular, appears so hell-bent in turning her poorly-written part into something meaningful that she single-handedly succeeds in making the movie worth watching."
Here's an example: a guy wants to kill the main character as he got fired because of him.
So (after loads of crap) here they are: the guy puts a knife at his throat and says something like You're dead now.
Michael Caton-Jones and the half-wit responsible for the script even included the There is no smoking in this room dialog in the interrogation scene and yes she sends her attorney (who is now a solicitor) away!
"For no one else sees his strange transformations, but he himself seems to think that he's changing because his wedding ring pops off when his hands turn into claws, etc."
Tautou could have saved this film from the disaster it was if only Firode would have given her the center.
"Firode fails because he focus' so intently on the minor details that, for one of those rare film occurrences, he actually forgets the central focus."
"Firode could have saved this film if he would have strengthened his characters, while lightening up his premise and story."
"Oh, how I only wish I could time travel back to the production of this film to show Firode the errors of his ways."
All in all for me this would be a much more enjoyable picture without the attitude of Bing Crosby but because he is in virtually every shot it's pretty hard to sit through this movie
Burt Reynolds came to a point in his career where he appeared to just be going thru the motions.
There is an acting exercise that involves using masks to free the actor to enrich his presentation of character by verbal and body language means.
Cruise's masking only painfully emphasizes his inadequacy as an actor.
"Even though Serbia and its nationalist politics is main reason of Yugoslavian breakup, it is not mentioned in this documentary, which is made by Bogdanovich whose name tells us that he is Serbian and his movie that he is far from being objective."
Ennio Morricone would have known what to do; and his results would have oozed enough atmosphere and tension to raise my rating a good two points.
"This director should have taken the trouble to watch 'Lawrence of Arabia', or even Sergio Leone's westerns; he might have learnt a few things."
"Or think about this: The plot of this musical revolves around a love affair between two musical superstars, yet, while Streisand's songs are performed in their entirety -- including the interminable finale -- her costar Kris Kristofferson isn't allowed to complete even one single song he performs."
"Or consider this: Streisand's name appears in the credits at least six times, including taking credit for musical concepts and her wardrobe (from her closet) -- and she also allegedly wanted, but failed to get co-directing credit as well."
"One of her credits was as executive producer, with a producer credit going to her then-boyfriend and former hairdresser, Jon Peters."
"(The following may look like a spoiler, but it really just describes a large class of movies) There is the passionate, wise main character, his goofy but well-meaning sidekick with his ill-placed attempts at humorous comments, the initially-hostile but soon softened gorgeous lady who triggers the inevitable unlikely love story, the loved ones taken hostage, and of course the careless evil adversary with his brutal minions."
"But this part is really just a nightmare, and she wakes up beside Sean, obviously still dealing with her traumatic experience."
The guy Mike is a major wimp and moron I can't believe he didn't want to take a shower with his bride-to-be Toni and be in a threesome with the french photographer Jan.
Made prior to his rise to fame and Jennifer Connelly one can be assured that had he been offered this garbage now he'd have immediately changed agents!
"The movie also has a back story about another person (brother of the lead character) trying to patch things up with his girlfriend, I reckon this part of the story was a waste of time, this also includes a very steamy sex scene between the couple which to me is a complete waste and wasn't needed to be shown."
"It started out interesting enough watching the villain (if you can call him that) watching the neighborhood kids and writing in books about who is naughty and nice, but after awhile you are looking for some action and this movie doesn't deliver."
Under no circumstances can what she did be justified.
"A woman's sexual needs are no excuse for her to commit adultery and continually betray her husband and worse, there are no other children."
Cher almost makes up for this with her reactions to Cage's shifting accent and out of control body language.
Cage simply never settles into his role.
"And to compound this musical assault Rob Lowe's character played saxophone, and there was one scene where he played a solo that went on and on like he was Charlie Parker, only his shrill tone and playing were more reminiscent of a monkey playing a kazoo."
This tale lacks the all-important transition from I'm a straight boy smacking my guy friend around for fun to I think I might be gay and hitting him because I'd like to spread his ass and do him S/M style.
"In the British army, a sergeant does not order up a rescue attempt, and if you get past that, he does not attempt it with only one other soldier and an Indian servant when there is a full regiment on hand."
"I would like to know how exactly someone enters a clinic, gets a nurse outfit, kills a doctor, takes out a patient in her bed, puts into his Chevy pickup and leaves?"
"While not as bad as his game-to-movie adaptations, this hunk of crud doesn't fare much better."
Boll seems to have a pathological inability to accept that he doesn't make good movies.
Just like Uwe Boll himself shouldn't exist.
"Don't miss the best of many moments of unintentional humor when Babs' male friend thinks she's a man, but pins 'him' to the ground, sits on top of 'him', and looks affectionately into 'his' eyes.... *snicker*."
"Music agent or producer comes in, thinks that she is awesome asks her to race."
"Bo Derek is just naturally boring and tasteless; fortunately, fate and a lack of funds and skill redeem her by making her seem cheap as well."
"as for Derek's infamous tendency to reveal her breasts - i can't imagine a less erotic nudity photographic display, she is so weird looking with those broad shoulders, i can't imagine what any one ever saw in her."
The girl who played Pony should be paid to keep her mouth shut.
"Here's the film, dreamy reporter guy reports on big snake tracks, flashes back to a time he and dad wandered into what must have been the competition for the store in gremlins and dreamy kid reporter finds a box that glows."
Its a Korean legend and she's reincarnated from a Korean princess but everything is in Chinese.
That Giant snake acted his heart out.
"When he ate an elephant i felt like no one past, present or future would ever eat an elephant with as much feeling."
"There is no real twist (which is fine) , but the final reveal doesn't make a great deal of sense either (how can she be racked with uncertainty and fear for the whole film, if she's an evil id from beyond the mirror?)."
"This is Clay's first film, I would be delighted if it is his last"
"All that is desirable in this movie is the opera, and one can best find a recording of Pavarotti doing what he does best."
Just get one of his many superb opera or vocal-concert recordings and recognize the master tenor where he is most suited.
Pavarotti would have been a decent actor had he not shown such a superb voice.
Stephanie Beaton is quick to pull off her top for a pretty enthusiastic sex scene in the kitchen.
"I had always been a big Lynda Carter-Wonder Woman fan so when the Sci-Fi Channel ran this movie,I had to see it.I was bitterly disappointed.This is a Wonder Woman movie in name only.She doesn't wear the right costume [she must have refused to or had ordered major changes] and the plot runs like a poor man's James Bond.There's none of the things that made the comic book heroine a success i.e."
"smith's character does nothing but degrade the doctor for the better part of the film, and yet she still wants him."
"Nine years later he is almost forgotten, and his tentatives to make it on the big screen failed miserably."
"The casting was based merely on physical appearance, and not acting talent (with the obvious exception of Peter Gallagher, who was neither blond-haired, or able to act his way out of a wet paper bag)."
It totally seems to ignore the audience and the director seems to have made the movie for himself.
"Adding onto his ever-growing pile of folders left over from Oliver Stone's eh-I-grew-out-of-it conspiracy drawer, here's Down On Us (i.e.- Beyond the Doors) which is the working definition of historical inaccuracy."
"One of his female colleagues, Ilona Elmann, is involved in a vague form of hypnosis...Chematodes, a nonsense word used to refer to a bunch of wires attached to a victim's head."
"Ellman feels this will enable her to change the direction of the human brain, naturally enabling her to rule the world, provided she can get us all attached to those wires with no trouble."
"But for the life of me I don't understand why it was necessary to make the father of the missing Japanese girl, a guy used to getting some cheap jollies because the romance in his marriage has run out."
Bronson's time in the vice squad have told him exactly where to look for the kidnapper.
What kind of a documentary about a musician fails to include a single track by the artist himself?!
The interviews are as much or more with other musicians and figures rather than with Cohen himself.
"The movie really didn't capture much about the artist's life story, either, or about his development through the years."
"Dark Floors is an infuriating experience that while ultimately shallow hallmarks potential and at the very least shows a plethora of creative energies from Mr Lordi, who perhaps should look into working solo to fully develop his ideas."
"The premise was interesting, but the first victim died before you get the chance to care about her or not."
"There's even the inevitable episode in which one of the ladies being held up goes into the next room and has sex with one of the robbers, so turned on is she by the romantic derring-do of the criminal lifestyle."
"Heath Ledger fails to distinguish himself in the title role, providing little in the way of substance to make his character either interesting or engaging."
So let's recap: a groovy 70s Euro-horror with loads of tasty women in various states of undress; spooky Gothic retreats and misty graveyards; a sadistic rich psycho with a penchant for drop-dead gorgeous babes with cracking bods; several vicious murders (including a great bit where one victim has her head bashed in with a rock and her entrails eaten by foxes).
Things seem to be going pretty well until Jack skips town with his girlfriend Trish (Denise Richards).
"It is a tribute to Streisand's impenetrable vulgarity that she not only didn't commit suicide, but went on to make more awful movies"
Gene Hackman gets himself busted out of prison by a nameless government agency who want him for an assassination.
"Nobody tells him anything though, he's given as the audience is given bits and pieces of information."
"The ending itself includes plenty of sudden and shocking gore as the madman wields his axe and meets also some nails, for example, on his furious way."
"Until finally he wins by clicking a box on the screen with his mouse that release gas that instantly kills 20,000 virtual people (nobody is near the gas)."
Even though any 5-16 year old could complete this same task - The government believes he is a lethal threat to humanity.
"We have no real idea what caused the creepy central character to embark on his killing spree, despite the fact that large amounts of narrative voice-over are drawn directly from his own narcissistic journal."
"Oddly enough, that is perhaps one of the best sequences in the film, but it has no discernible relation to his subsequent killing spree, which appears completely different in both motivation and execution."
"In the meantime, we are supposed to believe that the killer himself is a criminal mastermind who comprehensively outwits the police, thereby securing the briefest of incarcerations in a mental hospital before being released so that he can kill again."
"I hadn't known that the whole thing had been done by autocue (although I knew it was scripted) but it was really terrible to see these supposedly good actors unable to insert expression, look away from the cue and stumble over simple words (Natalie Portmanif there's no director, she's gone)."
Add to the formula a sufficiently creepy gardener who still cherishes the memory of the man's first wife who he was devoted to.
"Peter Falk is great, and he is one of the reasons its worth watching."
"During the holy week (Semana santa, see?...everybody begins to fall sleep..told u it was bad in so many points, even from the beginning), a killer executes his victims like bulls in a bullfighting arena."
let's reveal right now who the killer is and why he kills.
Then the director thinks he's a director.
Why is there a subplot about the ship captain forcefully trying to win her heart when this story goes nowhere?
And the Lund guy (Robert Clarke)... does his character even have a point?
"If you're going to make a female android, wouldn't the purpose be to have her be seductive and lure enemies in?"
The guy with the mustache goes out in the fog for some reason even though the old lady tells him not to.
There's a sneering young Ray Liotta telling a pigtailed Pia that her creative writing trophy looks like a penis.
"There's a firm chinned Pia telling her domineering Mom that she wants to go to bed with Ray's geezer father, Walter."
"Characters show their advanced teleportation powers, for example Alex Thomas who falls into the lake (drunk), and then ends up on his boat in an impossible position."
God knows what his performance is like in Something's Gotta Give!
What did our protagonist do to get himself cryo-frozen?
"I know there are certain people who have their own agenda but lets take it on merit; poorly acted, badly shot and the story felt as the director was making it up as he was going along."
"While I acknowledge that I can't know exactly what the author wished to convey, I have enough affection for her and her works to desire to remain a fan."
An idiotic dentist finds out that his wife has been unfaithful.
"The exception was Marianne Jean-Baptiste, i thought her performance was wonderful."
But once inside the house she was satisfied by pushing rifle's top in bad guys anus and went away while he has gone crazy and execute bad guy.
Personally I think that director run out of money before finishing this because movie ends before they execute anyone else involved in this gang-rape and beating which is not big surprise because sponsor obviously has seen this and wanted to take back his money.
But then Rahul (Salman Khan) appears and he claims to be her boyfriend.
"Sohail Khan is not a handsome actor, but he is funny!"
"Sohail Khan should make more movies, this role for him was too small."
"Verhoeven has a nice visual flair but resorts to scenes of wild hallucinations, overt symbolism, and gratuitous gore when he runs out of ideas"
"For example when the cult leader murders one of his followers with a buzz saw, Igor upon seeing this, yells out Paul!"
Perhaps one of the more embarrassing moments was the friend returning home from cricket with a bunch of flowers to declare to his wife I'm giving up smoking.
They talk about legal issues that we never hear about again; Ben talks about getting into music that we never hear about again; arthur says he is looking for a job and money for college and the next thing we see is he's running a porn shop.
"Troubles arise as we see Pete's close involvement with the First Lady, and a sudden threat against the President himself (David Rasche, UNITED 93)."
"Woody Allen, when at his best, has one of the sharpest pens around."
Williams at his best is an actor's dream providing many unforgettable performances.
Had Gielgud seen Boom he would have held his tongue.
"He seems to be enjoying himself camping it up, but barely manages to amuses, that from the man who claimed such a talent."
"Johnathan Frakes is a good actor and, when he's not directing a family film, a fine director."
Poor Michael Madsen; he must be kicking himself to know folks have found out about this horrible flick.
Ted McKenzie is gross and his character's a twit on top of it all.
"Sly Stallone is hardly the finest actor in the world but compared to his brother, Frank...well, roll out those awards now!"
"Please, somebody make him an acting offer 'he can refuse!'"
"The actor who played Carlito did not do too bad a job, but he could not have saved this film if he tried."
"Skid's a great trumpeter, so he embarks on a musical career, which is predictably meteoric in both its rise and fall."
"This film is pretentious but, while much of the pontificating from Youssou N'Dour and his gang of merry men (and one token woman) grates, the music saves the day."
It's never entirely clear what N'Dour himself wants to achieve.
"For example, somebody obviously felt that it was not possible to tell the story of black music without involving a gospel choir, but N'Dour and most of his mates are Moslems (a point made repeatedly throughout the film)."
Are they in the team just because N'Dour has played with him before?
"Mark L. Lester is (un)known for his violent (without reason)movies (Commando, The Base)."
"The main actor has one setting for emotions and he sticks to it throughout the entire film, even though he was supposed to go through love and hate and everything in-between."
"Now we hit the middle of the film where they are obviously trying to rip off Morpheus from The Matrix, although he is doing just a horrible job."
"Her Iris Caine is supposed to be a light hearted version of her dramatic Bree Daniels prostitute character in Klute Yet, one doesn't believe her for a moment."
"He makes some crap, but hey, I can forgive him."
The writer/director said in an interview that he didn't want to give away how the title relates to the story.
Susan Montford should stick to producing (Shoot 'Em Up ) as she is not very good as a writer/director.
"Goldblum's dialogue for the whole movie could fit on a 3x5 card, and he wears a single facial expression - a sardonic grin - throughout."
This film just goes to show that if an actor cannot act in his earlier films doesn't mean he can't eventually learn to be a great actor.
Perhaps VD should take the Leslie Nielson track and do send-ups of his genre.
Greenaway seems to have a habit of trying deliberately to disgust his viewers.
"She had one of the most artificial performances I have ever seen for a leading character in any movie, A or B. I figured okay, maybe she didn't really want the role, just got a hefty offer for a movie she wasn't into?"
he was my hero for all time until he went along with {if you can call it a movie} I went to the show to watch it and come out and not just asking for me money back but asked for double the money thats how bad my hero's acting and the hole thing was.............I can't believe that Steven Segal's career has hit so low that he has been reduced to making 4th rate films with 5th rate secondary actors.
Steven Segal goes through the motions and seems as if he is only doing this because he is under obligation.
If this movie used a military adviser they ignored him.
"First, I am not really a fan of the whole things eating flesh in disgusting new ways genre of film but I am a bad movie afficionado so my next door neighbor said he had the worst movie ever."
The major problem is that the character is underwritten and the actor who plays him Blake Shields is unable to embellish any script deficiencies .
"Director Alex March takes an interesting tack on this material, shooting it in a quasi-documentary fashion (with macho commentary) and yet giving the tale a touch of Capraesque whimsy; still, by bringing out the cinematic flashiness in this set-up, he turns the main narrative into a jumble."
Harry Reems was the Ron Jeremy of his day.
"No, instead, this doctor got everyone to the house under the false pretense of studying their insomnia (he really invited them there to scare them to death and then see how they reacted to their fear...like lab rats, who he mentioned never got told they are part of an experiment...nice guy)."
"The original was so like a gothic novel in the way that the story was mostly told in the first person, through Nel's eyes, and we always were privy to her thoughts."
"The original Nel was not a bad person, but she was a bitter person (could she be otherwise after sacrificing 11 years of her life to a selfish old woman and a spiteful sister?)"
Even talented actors have to work hard at their craft; Timberlake is NOT talented and no amount of hard work can save him.
The basic plot is that a guy (Brandon) takes a few friends on a trip to his cabin in the woods for a weekend holiday away from work.
The Clown Killer himself is a rather a sad excuse for a psychotic killer.
"In that film the Gary Oldman character is a complete lunatic, but he is *very* interesting."
"Al Pacino perhaps did a good job in Scarface, but his character just did not engage me"
I kept thinking that maybe in the NEXT scene things would gel... Alas... Those who like Gus Van Sant's films - especially his later ones - will probably like this.
"If you buy the DVD you'll find a behind-the-scenes look at Eddie's tour (interesting in places, but not very funny), and a French language version of one of his shows."
"You may giggle when you see Ed's films, but somehow you are aware that you are laughing WITH him, and not AT him."
"Hugh Hudson's direction is clumsy throughout, both in his mismanagement of Pacino and the other key actors, and in the decision to use irritatingly shaky camera work during the action sequences."
"Even after Kober is given the gas chamber, his spirit comes back in all kinds of guises."
Its also unrealistic that she would get a HOCKEY scholarship when she figure skates.
"No, wait -- in fact, the friend is dead and it is his dad that's in trouble."
"Our first hero, Joey, is killed by an exceedingly horrifying (super pointy) meat tenderizer as he tries to defend his father's small store from the local protection gang despite being wheelchair bound from the war."
Hell: I'll donate that money that I was going to send to Ethiopia if he's that desperate.
"Charlotte Gainsbourg (Jane) was almost tolerable and certainly looked the plain part, but she had no emotion in any of her lines."
This is his worst film he has ever been in.
"Camera work is bad, editing is not present, background score gives a headache, action is shoddy, dialogs are unintelligible, Acting is abysmal and well Kareena used to look like a wrestler, now she looks like a starved wrestler."
"Dr. Dallas is not out of the picture, still maintaining a tenuous, but caring relationship with his daughter and..I'm rambling, and worse yet, making the movie sound somewhat interesting."
"When he is invited to participate in a new project, he asks the clumsy cousin of the director to drop him in a poor Latin neighborhood in Carlson to research the work of the manager of a small supermarket."
"Or was a clash of classes, and he realizes that his fancy neighborhood would not be adequate to a simple worker from the lower classes?"
I am not quite sure what they mean by ground-breaking and original when they fawn all over Lynch and his silly little TV opus.
"Don't get me wrong; there is nothing wrong with getting an attractive cast, especially with beauties like Fenn (the way Madonna would look if she were 1000 times prettier), but then don't go around saying you're making a weird show with weird-looking people."
And I have never understood Lynch's misguided fascination with Kyle MacLachlan (I should get a medal for bothering to spell his name right).
"His character's laughable eccentricities were not at all interesting, merely one of Lynch's many attempts to force the weirdness, trying hard to live up to his reputation - him having completely lost his edge but that time."
What followed were often mediocre efforts that relied on Lynch's relatively small but fanatical fan base to keep him in the public eye by interpreting meanings into his badly put-together stories that don't hold any water on closer scrutiny.
"And also when the clown is looking through that black box paper thing and grabs Mark, he doesn't even look like he's scared even though the clown like grabbed him and started attacking him."
(Even though anyone could probably outrun that clown because he's like 300 lbs.)
"This movie starts out with a certain amount of promise; but, in my view, begins to lose it when the protagonist kidnaps the good Samaritan who comes to his aid when his car breaks down."
"That this well-meaning stranger begins to fix his car while he is away making a phone call is implausible enough, but that she is one of the few people in the country who can help him put his family's life back on track is the type of coincidence beginning writers are warned against using in their stories."
Alberto Tomba was surely a good skier but he has to thank God (and we too) that he does not have to rely on his actor skills to earn his living.
"Nevertheless I must admit that she could be the Tomba's acting teacher, because he's even a worse actor than her, and that's funny, especially considering that she isn't italian."
"I enjoy the bush jokes on Conan, Letterman, Leno, because I admit that W is not the smartest guy to ever walk the earth(I do believe he's not the dumbest either.)"
Nisha Kothari proved that she is one of the worst actresses we have today.
"Santa lives high above Earth in the North Pole where he, and kids from all around the world get ready for Christmas."
Satan dances a lot and he actually seems much more merry than Santa.
"Santa talks about delivering presents to all the boys and girls, yet he seems to only deliver to 5 houses of kids in Mexico."
"Only Bruce Springsteen's performance raises a pulse; I've never been a big fan of the Boss, but he absolutely smokes, no question."
Maverick cop with family problems and fondness of using his gun Check!
Jack Wild is the cop in full on John McClane mode here who even manages time for the ye ancient bad guy with gun has used all his bullets gag at one point.
Only a few rabbits - including his brother Hazel - believe him and they set out on a dangerous journey to find a new place to live..
"The producer pretty much ended his career by pushing his girlfriend, Cybil Shepard, into several movies that were way above her acting ability."
It wasn't until Moonlighting that her career started to come back.
"But why does a film - which could have made a big impact on black audiences - have to contain drug addiction, bad parents and a title that sounds like a first-grader saying the phrase, How she moves?"
"Oh yeah, after Hanks almost jumps from one of the World Trade Center towers because of his delusions, he goes home to recuperate and is visited by his friends."
"Lugosi pulls off a role in which he's the good guy pretty well, although I frankly found him a bit unconvincing - especially during the scenes set in Africa."
Pretty Boy Floyd meets his demise dramatically.
"Few remember Melvin Purvis as an FBI hero, partly, I would guess, because of his name."
"We all remember J. Edgar Hoover, who fired Melvin Purvis because he was a rival in the quest for public attention though."
One of the main characters is a priest and he cares more about food than anything else.
"We aren't properly introduced to Jake for at least an hour; when we are, it becomes clear he's a gormless pimple of a man, who isn't a confederate by choice so much as by habit - the kind of person who says and does what everyone around him says and does, whose psychology is purely immitative."
Debra Winger was more convincing as Wonder Girl than she is as a Texan
Gammera lies on his back looking defeated when suddenly fire blows from his armpits and he skyrockets himself up in the air.
When he is yawning or grunting when he is fighting you hear the actor's voice.
"Screaming Mad George was responsible for the killer toys(..including a larvae which enters a victim's mouth and out his eye, another where soldier toys actually shoot real bullets at a babysitter after her boyfriend was practically strangled by a severed hand toy, operating from a remote control)."
"Derek's real father, Noah(Tracy Fraim)fears for his son't safety, and informs, reluctantly, his ex-girlfriend Sarah that the local toymaker, Joe Petto(Mickey Rooney)once was arrested for setting traps in toys to harm kids due to the loss of an unborn child when his wife was killed in a car crash..kind of a retaliation in saying that if he couldn't have a son, then others shouldn't either."
"Rooney's name adds an allure to the film, gaining it a notoriety, but his histrionics can only help so much."
"Bremer is appropriately weird and robotic as Pino, longing to have Sarah as his mama."
"As for the story itself, Chretien de Troyes is spinning in his grave at this horrible adaptation which turns the lovable, unbearably innocent Percival into a most ungallant and rude churl."
The script sinks to it's nadir in the truly offensive sequence in which Janssen's character tests Drivas's character to make sure he's not gay.
"The movie ends with Chuck about to throw out the first pitch, with the President telling his new best friend Chuck not to worry about striking out every batter, as he hasn't thrown a baseball in a year."
"So the President calls the underworld boss (But it's one a.m. I don't care, get him on the line) and tell him that he is to resign from all company boards that he sits on and sell all stocks that he has."
"First, Daphne Zuniga, in her first appearance in a film, young and supple, with looks that still encompass her body today, steals the very beginning, which is all she is in, and that is that."
John Carradine is shown twice walking down into a grave and pulling the lid shut after him.
"Faith Domergue hears him, and thinking it's lover John Ireland back from his night-shoot, goes out."
Though Ireland has just stumbled upon 3 murdered people he's more concerned that his film has been exposed and ruined!
"Did Zombie #1 carry her down, throw her in, then zoom back upstairs just in time to crush John Ireland?"
"Zombie #2 never makes it into the house himself (everyone's dead by now, anyways, thanks to Zombie #1) but instead he carries Carol Wells back to the graveyard."
"And what if Zombie #1 comes along and wants to climb back in -- is Zombie #2 gonna let him, or will there be a zombie fight?"
I can't believe that Steven Segal's career has hit so low that he has been reduced to making 4th rate films with 5th rate secondary actors.
Steven Segal goes through the motions and seems as if he is only doing this because he is under obligation.
"Everyone says what about the director, what about him."
"There is no reason to give this movie some credit just because of the director, maybe he was asleep?"
"The background behind this chance, yet forced meeting is the mobster who is hiding Ben Gazzara, introduces him to the girls hanging out at his pool."
"The 30-ish blonde disses him, but our villain must be quite smitten by her, because the courtship is on at that point."
"Kind of like the girl in high school you didn't like, but still wanted to have carnal knowledge of anyway... Let's just say, he catches UP with her in the cabana later"
Billy Crystal tried his best with the what he was given and the rest of the stars seemed to be walking through the motions.
"It's usually satisfying to watch a film director change his style/subject, but Soderbergh's most recent stinker, The Girlfriend Experience(2009), was also missing a story, so narrative (and editing?)"
"So, like a poor student who has read only ONE of his allotted texts for his assignment, Soderbergh's product is exceedingly limited in perspective."
"Instead, it dawns on us that Ah, Soderbergh's trying to hobble his audiences the same as the Latino peasants were at the time."
But these are the SAME illiterate Latino peasants who sold out the good doctor to his enemies.
DelToro's Che has no opportunity to grow as a person while he struggles to educate his own ill-disciplined troops.
Soderbergh buries his lead because he's weak on narrative.
McCabe tells them to buzz off -- he's holding out for fifteen thousand.
"Once again, this director hijacks his own movie with sheer barnyard laziness and sloppiness."
I cared about what happened to both Gwyenths -- or rather the characters she played -- and the performances by supporting cast were fantastic.
"One Melinda is so dysfunctional -- her first glass of wine is at 10 a.m. -- and so melodramatic she is laughable, and not in the comedic sense."
"Woody Allen's previous ensemble movies worked because, I'm guessing, he spent time on the screenplay and the actors were talented."
One piece of trivia for this movie is that he wrote this screenplay in two months: you can tell.
"Stallone has never been a favorite of mine, but when he is acting circles around Lithgow, Turner, and the worst of the bunch Rooker, there is something wrong with this picture."
"Turner's part is so small and pointless, but she still manages to appear lost on screen."
"It's his fault that I was never drawn into this movie at all, because he should have made the people actually act."
"In one case, he comes to a farm and is leaded into the sitting room, where a dog lays in his basket."
"On the assumption that the dog is the sick animal, Mr. Chinnery euthanizes him."
"A second later, the farmer opens the door, holding the real sick animal, a sheep, in his hand."
Jean Claude Van Damme tries to rescue his career by making the sequel of Universal Soldier.
"And guess what, Goldberg is one of the hunters, who was always a silly sentence for the audience before he gets asskicked."
The woman (Virginia Bryant) has recurring dreams of herself as a little girl going down to the old wine-cellar of this villa an encountering this cocoon-like structure hanging down from the ceiling.
This doesn't make sense because of the panther growls we heard earlier (Maybe he's allergic!
The one that is going back to his car breaks his leg.
"Director Harlin's full American flick debut he does a good job & there's a decent atmosphere but after over an hour of constant drab, dull, dark prison cells & corridors I started to get bored."
I didn't think it was scary & the gore is pretty tame apart from the best moment in the entire film when a police guard gets killed when a load of barb wire wraps itself around his body & face with a nice close up of his throat being torn open.
"Instead of a snot nosed punk kid, we get the spooky girl who's a total brat to everyone around her."
"Stan could mime and make whatever he would do funny, but he doesn't get the chance to do any of that here."
"Also, without giving away anything, when one of the characters has a tragedy, she almost appears nonchalant."
"Also, what is the point of having a character named Boss Hogg if he's NOT overweight"
"Especially I find it impossible to muster much sympathy for the main protagonist, not to mention his screwball friends and sex obsessed fiance."
"The mutated Grant looked like a cross between Jabba the Hut, and in the early stages of mutation- Chet from Weird Science (after he was turned into the monster) and one of the alien creature/children from The Explorers."
The writer's name sounds Israeli or something of that nature but it is clear he doesn't have a clue about the subject he is writing about.
Reading this guy's credits it's no wonder he has written scripts on all C grade films that somehow feature stars.
Ms. Rogers continues to develop her skills.
Mr. Talbot adds a little humor to his characterization.
"The bad guy has his bad-guy music going on and says sinister bad-guy-like things, just in case you didn't quite catch on."
The good guy does brave and noble things just in case you didn't know he was the good guy.
"The singer woman with the crazy eyes is best when she's dead in bed; and even the wolf was sub-par (although she was the best performer in the movie) -- maybe they fed her before the shots, or something."
The hired killer is an excellent shot unless he is aiming at Michael Douglas than all he seems to be able to hit is large panes of glass.
The ghost comes back and wants his killer to live as a Jew to atone for the murders he committed.
"Otto, the German policeman actually knows this ghost's name because, the last thing he did before he died was said, in Yiddish, `Kiss my ass'."
"The policeman didn't speak Yiddish, so he asked around until he found the meaning."
But the butcher maintains that he would be very busy if he killed every man that slept with his wife.
"The woman persecuted by the beast was not adolescent, the girl having sex with the black butler (is he also characterized as a beast?)"
"P Diddy needs to stop tainting movies with his horrible acting, he actually made me laugh every time."
"A street value of 32 million but yeah, let's send Doyle to find this guy, it was his pinch after all."
"An obese lawyer drives over the Gypsy woman, and the Gypsy curse causes him to lose and lose weight... to the bone."
"The lawyer is not only criminally irresponsible, he is fat too, haha!"
"There was a really amusing sex scene where he looked like he was bobbing for apples as a busty lady rode on top of him and later his nappy sized underpants were hysterical, but then I remembered it wasn't supposed to be a comedy."
The ridiculousness is that the director simultaneously presents himself as an extremely annoying and heavily flawed character and then expects us to be concerned
"And Alfred Santell's direction (he also directed one of Susan's first films, Our Leading Citizen, in 1939) is lackadaisical at best."
The director gets so confused with the plot that somewhere even he gets baffled as to how to share the time slot to six different star casts.
Salman (Who calls himself rahul in a weird manner for the entire movie.
"That is also a shame because she is also a fine actress, having turned in two exceptional performances in Bonnie and Clyde and Rachel, Rachel None of the other actors do particularly well either."
"Presumably because Leigh things that all of us are as ineffective and pathetic as his actors, and he wants to film real life."
"Throughout the film, the girl's reactions to what is being done to her just aren't what they should be."
"The story revolves round bullying of one girl (Laura) by the other two characters, and her discovery of sex, a quite accurate representation of an aspect teenage life."
"One problem with Man In The White Suit is that Sidney's vision of progress is awfully small-minded, too, more so even than that of the bosses or the laborers who also resent his work."
"I've never seen Guinness less affecting in a movie, even though he looks impossibly young and earnest (though actually in his mid-30s)."
Also Miss Beasley was miscast as the book mentioned her being a Plus Size lady.
"One chimp named Washoe has been in a concrete cage since 1966 for that purpose, and to this day she remains thus."
"I don't know what it is about Donald Sutherland's acting style, or vocal style, but he always seems to be acting from behind a massive wad of soggy Kleenex."
"He's just...I don't know, THICK?"
William Shatner sport a variety of things atop his head that only faintly resemble human hair (or anything organic for that matter).
"The last five minutes of the film don't have any dialogue at all and the result is the best part of the film subtle, detailed (Cole does his best work of the film) and most importantly, cinematic."
Which not have the proper witch-like outfit that was such a clever play on her name?
"Thank G_d it bombed, or we might get treated to such delights as Skate Fu where we can see the likes of Brian Boitano performing a triple lutz & slashing bad guys to ribbons with his razor-sharp skates, but I digress."
"I truly believe that porn would have suited her 'talents' much better, although Aubrey Hepburn couldn't have stayed afloat in this sewer."
The director should do everyone a favor and quit his job immediately.
"Jonatha Frakes should hand in his directors chair, his version was completely hopeless."
"An acclaimed scientist is killed in a freakish accident and his father, a noted brain surgeon saves the brain."
But I won't hold that against this movie too much since the story is slightly tweaked this time around and many more obstacles are planted in Azumi's way to prevent her from reaching the warlord and displaying any signs of charisma.
We then move on to seeing the BTK killer's youth as well as the present and his history of crimes.
A beginning filmmaker may find himself/herself tempted from time to time to think At least I accomplished SOMETHING or Just finishing this will be an accomplishment in itself.
Peter Reigert does his best with a dirt poor script.
This is a soap-opera type parody about a fetching young woman who sleeps her way to power.
Sean is killed (or is he?
Just because he is a musician does not make him sexy.
An assortment of old and ugly university professors don't care for the popular Houseman and cut off funding for his project due to lack of results.
"Much to my amazement there are side effects and he, get this, metamorphoses!"
He also beds Dr. Mike's crush Sally after a whole day of knowing her.
"The second story, Old Blood, is probably the strongest out of the three and is directed by Lindenmuth himself."
"A guy is walking distractedly across an intersection, for instance, and there is the sudden rumble of a truck that almost hits him."
"A wealthy, but sexually lacking woman is on her way back home after being with her male gigolo, but she's is running late."
Soon enough she's being terrorised by the mangled corpse of the dead hitchhiker.
"Lois Chiles was okay in the lead role, but that constant assuring and the little conversations she has with herself became pitifully aggravating and downright tired."
Dr. Seuss would be ashamed and certainly would've never given his thumbs up at such a dastardly attempt to capitalize on a classic.
Former private eye-turned-security guard ditches his latest droning job and is immediately offered a chance to return to his previous profession.
"Al Gore tries to make this issue sound complicated, even though it just needs common sense to see this whole thing is a big hoax by a man with his own moneymaking agenda!"
"No, not even Gore himself!"
"His masterful novel The Amazing Adventures of Kavalier and Clay won the Pulitzer Prize a few years back, and he had a hand in the script of Spider Man 2, arguably the greatest comic book movie of all time."
"I imagine it must be what death feels like, he says."
"The film then attempts to take us on Jon's journey as he shakes off the shackles imposed on him by his father, Phlox and his dead-end job as he finds freedom and expression through his relationships with Cleveland and Jane."
There is a problem having us follow Jon throughout the film: he's completely uninteresting.
"But it didn't take long for people to start squirming in their seats, whispering derisive comments about Pacino's horribly misconceived accent -- he was supposed to be an American frontiersman of Scottish ancestry(!)"
"And while director Sarne repeatedly states in his commentary that he wanted to make the film as pure farce, the only laughs generated are accidental."
"It is true that West is unexpectedly well preserved in appearance and that she had lost none of her way with a one-liner--but there is no getting around the fact that she is in her seventies, and her conviction that she is the still the sexiest trick in shoe leather is extremely unsettling, to say the least."
"But worse, really, is the fact that West is outside her era."
"Niamh Cusack did her best, (as did the other actors) but surely her talent deserves a better vehicle than this."
Wayne makes no attempt to hide the fact that he is definitely checking out her butt.
I saw Paris Je T'Aime because a friend really wanted to see it so I went along with him.
Credit goes to Carpenter for attempting to create something beyond a derivative teen horror flick; too bad he's created a derivative psychological thriller.
"The film's young hero is Junior (Michael Oliver) who, since he was a baby, has been placed at the front doors of foster parents for adoption."
It's hard to know if our scriptwriter intentionally crafted intellectually limited characters or if he was simply running his tether's perimeter.
"Clearly Mr Chevy Chase thinks he's funny, after all Miss B.di Angelo laughs a lot at his jokes,but she's getting paid for it and didn't have to fork out PS2.50 for the privilege."
"Jordan took a month to train, and they cast her as a person who makes the Olympic team."
"With just this one film, director Rick Sloane proves that he deserves mention alongside the likes of Coleman Francis and Bill Rebane as one of the worst directors of all time."
"And finally, why are scenes in which the lead character is a point of sexual interest to the audience (when she is getting undressed or with her boyfriend) is her father always involved?"
The first part of this movie does an exceptional job of setting up the characters and the new relationship between Creasy and the girl he's paid to protect.
"Whatever the director was trying to accomplish, all he succeeds in doing is making the audience literally nauseous."
"when i thought to watch this movie with my Jewish best friend and his family we thought oh hey, this may be funny!"
The entire movie I was hoping that he'd put that stupid sword down and let someone kill him!
"The usual wackiness ensues with the human, Bridges, eventually bonds with him and helps him to get home."
The problem is Messing thinks she's still in a sitcom...she has only one presentation: as the wide-eyed doormat that she's made a career out of.
You can't help feeling good for Mulroney...you can read it in his face that he sees through all of this.
Dennis Hopper makes a few sparse appearances and is his usual disjointed self; his role was clearly not a stretch for him.
"The mechanics of the zombie material are vague and confusingHalperin even resorts to using superimposed footage of Bela Lugosi's googly-eyes from his 1932 film, White Zombie, but never explains what it has to do with anything."
One potential villain is disposed of unceremoniously before he gets to do much.
Grant is the comic center of what is after all supposed to be a service comedy which is contra to his comedy style.
"A gunfight means a hero can walk into an open field with 10 people shooting at him with uzi's, pick up a gun, start shooting back and not get hurt."
"And IF he gets back home, does he just go back to his job?"
"Follow-up to 1973's far better Cleopatra Jones has statuesque black actress Tamara Dobson returning to her signature role as chic, super-tough narcotics agent, here busting a heroin ring in Hong Kong."
"The shoot-out finale is right off the assembly-line, and Dobson herself seems less energetic than before (she's still sexy, and she puts a unique spin on her comically-stilted dialogue, but these surroundings may have been too much of one thing for her--she's jaded)."
"Anyway, the scientist drops his test-tube onto some mushrooms - and soon the mushrooms grow and kill some people."
"Continuity is another huge problem as for instance: The eager-hungry groom is lying in bed, waiting for his virgin-bride to get out of the bathroom and after a long while, falls asleep(!?!)."
"After the atomic bombs carried by a shot-down Soviet bomber explode in the Arctic, the creature 'Gammera' is released from his hibernation."
The giant prehistoric turtle proceeds on a path to Tokyo and destroys anything in his path.
"But while Vanessa's character being on her deathbed and recalling a past event she felt was a mistake was riveting, at times, the part actually showing what that past mistake was does nothing to clarify the matter."
"Ajay Devgan(Heero) is extremely mundane and the only reason i think, they cast Prashant Raj in the role of Raj is because he has a striking resemblance to Amitabh of his young days."
"Sushmita Sen carries herself well, with grace and make-up."
"If you have a mortal enemy, take him to this movie."
"The cliches come thick and fast; (waking from a recurring nightmare, maverick cop has his badge revoked by hardass lieutenant, to list more would be spoiling it - you can see the end a mile off)."
"Apparently this messed up that kid for the rest of his life, though the scene was about as steamy as when Ralphie's dad got the Leg Lamp in 'A Christmas Story.'"
"Shot as if the filmmaker thought he were approaching some daring new territory by presenting a homosexual coming-of-age story, the film utilizes David Lynch inspired visuals with Fassbinder inspired acting."
"I don't know who this director thinks he is; maybe he has pretensions of the surreal like Bunuel, Jordowsky, etc."
Charlie Creed-Miles does an able turn as the fuse-lighting druggie son Billy although he must have wondered sometimes exactly what he let himself in for.
"Denise Crosby, particularly, delivers her lines like she's cold reading them off a cue card."
"While I am not a huge fan of Reagan because government growth did NOT slow during his administration, the country, in general, was far more optimistic than it had been in the Ford and Carter years."
Also the action sequences aren't as exciting this time and Jean-Claude relies more on gunfire then on his martial arts.
"After a few failed attempts, the creature is slain, but it's angry and vengeful mother soon attacks, leaving it up to Beowulf to, again, lend his mighty acts of bravery and strength to defeat it."
"SWEET SIXTEEN (1983) **/***** 86 minutes Director Jim Sotos Cast Bo Hopkins, Susan Strasberg, Aleisa Shirley, Patrick Macnee, Dana Kimmell Fifteen year old bad girl Melissa is new in a desert town and it isn't long before folks around her start dying off."
The detective has to put together the clues with the help of his Nancy Drew good girl daughter played by Friday the 13th alumni Dana Kimmell.
"If you can get through the first twenty minutes of this mess, you will be treated to Lugosi whipping his lab assistant for disrespecting one of the brides he has murdered, explaining that he finds sleeping in a coffin much more comfortable than a bed, and other vague parodies of real horror films (the kind with budgets and plots)."
"Only the father suspects that this canine is more then he appears, the rest of the family loves the demonic pooch."
"Plummer's character was so corny, he would have fit better in a Bullwinkle toon."
Matt is working for property developer Morton (Robert Wagner) who wants to build a holiday resort on the land & he calls in fellow archaeologist Angela (Kristen Miller) for reasons I'm unsure of.
Technically The Fallen Ones isn't anything special & apart from the impressive giant Mummy effects there's little her to get excited about.
"What we do is, first we get a major star with no idea whatsoever how to do a Germanic accent, and we let him flounder around between French, German, American, and British for over 2 hours."
"In return, our hero learns from his young protege a kind of vague, undefined Buddhism which is never really brought out or treated in a serious fashion."
"The actors, namely: Mark Addy, Thomas Garrett, gave an outstanding performance in his native land England, and we have seen him in Still Standing a TV Series."
He then chases the kid out into a nearby cornfield and kills him.
"This scarecrow, aside from having a snappy one-liner for each of his victims, can also do Matrix-like flips through the air and kill people on sidewalks in broad daylight."
I fell in lust and love with the young Brooke Shields and loved her dopey adventures in the Grand Canyon in the 1940s.
"And by the end, the film becomes so self-centered that there's no rational argument left, just an angry former Christian lashing out at the people and places he blames for his messed up childhood."
"Wishing to create a romantic masterpiece he seems to be unable to produce anything without experiencing it himself though, occasionally, he sends pieces of magazine stories to a local editor that helps him survive."
Camilla being an uneducated girl trying to receive US citizenship through a marriage also carries her heavy cross of a non-perspective racial heritage.
Che's charisma and looks have as much to do with his iconic stature as the misinformation that has been spread by Leftist propaganda (such as this movie) about him.
(Wouldn't YOU want to find out more about a person before you start advertising his/her face to the world?)
"Once the sex and nudity begins, it is a nonstop sequence involving masturbation, a looooooooong flashback to an alleged 'beauty and the beast' encounter, and a naked woman running around the mansion (nobody, even her supposedly protective Aunt, seems to even think of putting some clothes on her!)."
Chris Parnell was also funny in his short scene (one of the funnier ones in the movie).
"This is indeed quite the strange movie... First, we have an ex-U.S.-gymnast trying to turn actor (or something), and this seems to be the only role he ever got (that I know of anyway) -- and for good reason."
Aside from Ms. Sofia Loren none of her co-actors are known nor remembered by this writer.
"Instead, watch this movie if you are a fan of Ms. Loren and wish to see her at age 19 -- no matter what the production is."
Lenny's next plan is to see his uncle and his wife have sex.
"Bill Murray turned from being a quick witted, humorous guy into an arsehole who was shouting things at people in the street that just weren't funny, its like he was trying too hard to be funny."
The Karate master offers up his service to anyone who can provide information on the drug lords.
"Let's see he kicks a gun in half, kicks a guy so hard what looks like his dentures fall out and of course chopping the bottle scene, give me a break."
"Stupid: The man in the first scene does not have a reliable firearm when hunting the Yeti, nor does he have a backup."
"Fire being warm as it is... WTF: The pilot has frost formed all over his face while he's alive and talking, but oddly enough, no one else does."
"WTF: If the one guy knows so much about the hibernation habits of squirrels, bears, and leopards in the Himalayas, then why doesn't he know enough to make shelter and set traps right from the start?"
"The obvious being the ten or fifteen minute introduction of the characters, namely Brian and his mom."
"You might even feel briefly bored with the passage of time as we witness Brian dealing with his situation through first, primitive means, and then more improved ones (using tools, etc) for his survival."
"Some conflict between Brian and his parents that created a rocky, awkward relationship between them."
"Unfortunately, this brilliant and respected actor only tarnished his reputation, first by accepting the role in this horribly re-scripted nonsense and then by turning in a performance that only looks competent when compared to Jude Law's amateurish overacting."
"Of course, the dumb vampire Arly jumps out to say hello and Bon Jovi sticks her again with another impaling device."
"Bon Jovi then decides that if that blood is transfused into him, he can beat Arly by becoming a vampire also."
"A scientist tells the soldiers that they move incredibly fast, yet when you see them run, they run at the speed of... an actor in a rubber suit trying to run as much as he can."
"On the next day, after their classes, the date of Cristiano in the previous night comes to his house and the three friends rape the girl."
"The girl dies, they panic and decide to get rid off the body, but Cristiano's mother arrives, startles with Gabriel and rolls the staircase, breaking her neck."
Claire Danes was the same wiggly-lipped awkward girl that she was in My So-Called Life.
A wonderful television mini-series completely ruined by a 45-year old woman trying desperately to pass herself off as a 16-year old ingenue!
"Also added to that mix are the ranch scenes, which also seem to be from somewhere else, and as funny as Brozzie Drewitt, played by Magda Szubanski, is supposed to be, she's not."
"Also, the lead singer sounds more girly than Geddy Lee, and even more his voice is horrible!"
"If you're looking for comedy with music, go to that Weird Al Yankovic guy 'cause he does it a whole lot better than these untalented tweens"
"Russell can't quite convince when she claims never to have been in a gymnasium, but is otherwise rather wonderful."
"And then there are the moments of extreme ridiculousness, like when the daughter of a high level public servant does NOT head straight for airport security, at her first opportunity, to warn them of an assassination plot against the both the head of Homeland Security and her father."
Gina Gershon sported an inexplicable and unnecessary English accent - she should be ashamed of her participation in this film.
Gloria Reuben had a weird little cameo in it - she should also be ashamed.
"Before Stan Laurel became the smaller half of the all-time greatest comedy team, he laboured under contract to Broncho Billy Anderson in a series of cheapies, many of which were parodies of major Hollywood features."
"Nearly ninety years old at the time, Rock's memory was impressively clear ... but he remembered nothing at all about 'West of Hot Dog', and I can't blame him."
"As soon as Stan takes possession of the property, surely any further questions of ownership or inheritance become his decision, not the previous owner's decision."
I found that the 6 year old understood what was going on and he was presenting solutions to the issues that were taking place.
And why did the protagonist throw the wise old sage character to the ground when he was never in danger.
It forced the old guy to mask the injury out of pride and so the young guy would feel guilty leaving him with a life long disability.
I guess thats why the main character refuses money though and why the old guy works him like a dog even when he volunteers for extra work.
Allen goes to the country (somewhere he hates going in real life) and has a weekend with his friends - which are the usual successful white middle-class bellyaching types that feature in many of his films.
You'll completely forget that this guy was even in the movie until he crops up again later near the end.
"Intensive Care by Dorna von Rouveroy is easily one of the worst horror movies ever made.This extremely cheap Dutch slasher flick offers some gore and plenty of absurd situations.A horror veteran George Kennedy is completely wasted as as Professor Bruckner.The acting is abysmal,the action is slow and the climax is laughable.A famous surgeon has a car accident.He lies in a coma seven years and then he wakes up and goes on a bloody rampage."
"But then Guttenberg finds himself in court, supposed to identify the heavy (Greenquist) and we discover through cross-examination that he is NEAR-SIGHTED and can't identify objects at a distance, let alone faces."
"They'll follow the flagitious creep into one of his seedy haunt and McGovern will act like the doxy that the murderer is attracted to, just to get him to try to kill her."
"But everything will be okay, see, because not only will Guttenberg keep a close watch on her, and not only will he alert the police a few minutes after she enters this dive, but she will keep a can of mace handy -- just in case."
The killer is so formed and so groomed that he looks like he's wearing one of those masks of deformity in that Twilight Zone episode about greedy heirs.
"I own 10 of his books, and I have read the entire series about Lindsey Boxer."
"Short after moving to a guy who falls in love with her, it becomes obvious that she has an evil twin=doppelganger, who haunts her."
"Roy Scheider rounds out the rest of the cast in this movie, and he does a decent job as the mentor of Jason Scott Lee's character."
Just look at the way his coat hangs & the way he never grabs onto to anything as he just pulls himself along!
"Even in this dud, she didn't disappoint."
"Granted the title is not totally misleading as she did sort of leave the grave, just not under her own power."
"In one of the scenes, a character gets stabbed in the rear end and choked with his intestines!"
Chris (Linda Blair) is stuck in there after running away from her abusive father.
"Spirit is about a stallion that from the beginning of the film looks like quite a handful, as he is a horse that cannot be tamed, calmed, nor controlled."
"Yet, if you are going to refrain from making horses talk, why even have a narrator interrupt every so often, which just so happens to be the main character himself?"
So it is only adequate that the images which are used by this picture are simplistic - Man To Man doesn't let the viewer decide what he thinks is right but is hammering its message in his head.
The Army has disrupted his bowel movements on top of perfecting his fighting technique.
"Unfortunately, the same can't be said for his gal."
Poor assistant guy and his crummy useless hand.
"Oh and get this, Seagal goes through a brief sting of identity issues, because apparently he and his cohorts in the film think he is Wolverine!"
"Ward, by the way, is aging quite well since her Thorn Birds days."
"My regards go to the cameraman, at least he tried to make something out of it."
Matthew Tyler gets very sick of his widowed father spending most of his time at work.
Matthew decides that the only way he can spend time with his dad is if he becomes the boss and orders him to stay home.
"Dom DeLuise plays the evil bank owner, but his part is a throwaway."
Power is the ultimate aphrodisiac as we all know and he's determined to woo Dorothy Stone away from rival Robert Noland.
"However, while contemplating just that action, he is anticipated by Rondo Hatton's escaped killer dubbed The Creeper and, naturally enough, saves the poor guy's life with the intention of having the latter do all the dirty work for him in gratitude!"
"Curiously enough, although this was Hatton's penultimate film, his name in the credits is preceded by the epithet introducing"
Alothugh the make-up jobs this so-called 'chameleon' used to disguise himself were just laughable.
"Already writer-director Preston Sturges is experimenting with unusual cinematic effects in telling his stories, creating broadly drawn yet distinctive characters and situations, and writing clever and sometimes unexpectedly wise and compassionate dialogue."
The guy who wrote the entry must be completely out of his mind.
"Advertised in its trailer as a movie about three generations of women - Jane Fonda as the matriarch, Felicity Huffman as her daughter, and Lindsay Lohan as the rebellious, over- sexed, scantily clad grand-daughter, the viewer thinks this will be a cliche, light, chick-flick about growing up and coming together as a family."
I can only imagine the swath that this guy is going to cut through game-to-movie adaptations if he's not stopped.
"Lommel claims to have written this, if that is the case he is a classic case of someone who is illiterate in two languages."
"Once again, it could have been funny, and though I was happy that Corsaire (Ann Dusenberry in real life) wasn't afraid to bare all, her acting was horrible."
"Falcone is young, naive, thinks he can really help people, though he becomes cynical after being shot several thousand times."
"I can go on about the crappy Drill SGT., the radio man that has a speech impediment (that's right, he is the kind of guy I want radioing in for help in a real crisis) or the pacifist fighter that resembles the exact same character mold as our hero in the first film but I believe you get the point."
"There is very little gore or violence, a bit of splashing blood, a few strangulations & the only decent bit in the whole film when someone has their head blown off with a shotgun, unfortunately he was invisible at the time & we only get to see the headless torso afterwards."
Dornwinkles laboratory is basically two jars on his bedside cabinet!
"Robert Altman might have breathed life into these unlikeable characters and made them interesting, but Brian De Palma, for all of his visual sophistication, has never had an eye for the nuances of the human experience."
"Vince Vaughn is your typical snob, but we are led to believe he's really the long lost brother of the never-aging Santa (Paul Giamatti), who invites his good ol' brother to visit."
"As for humor, the best that FRED CLAUS could possibly come up with is Santa's brother being his exact opposite and some joke about a DJ elf."
Dave Coulier only thought he was funny and it was pretty much the same show as America's Funniest Home Videos except with a hosts who have a combined IQ of three.
The spirit of Tyrannus accomplishes his little to-do list (killing some people and saying repetitive phrases in Latin) by possessing the body of a college guy.
"Tyrannus has his own green backlighting for no reason, and has apparently been sitting next to CG fire in an ancient concrete tunnel for centuries like this."
"Although he brings the extra weight of a star turn to the cartoon, Sylvester's role here could just as easily been filled by any other generic cartoon cat."
"That was okay, because neither did I. Keaton's endless self-absorbed prattling was intolerable and at times Shepard's dislike for her seemed genuine."
"It was so bad it made me want to exhume Rodney Dangerfield's body, slap him around and scream, How could you?"
Jean-Luc Godard is one of the most overrated and pretentious directors of the cinema industry and this pointless crap is among his most hermetic films.
Justin leaves the confines of living at home with a pain killer-addicted mom to go live with his cop father despite Mom's warnings that Dad is no good.
"I would have generously slapped an extra star or two on here had she peeled down a bit, but no such luck."
Romance develops eventually leading to tragedy when his wife finds out.
The actions of this perplexing ally and his polar opposite --- the vampire leader --- are insupportable.
"Meanwhile, the vampire leader fails to achieve the goals of centuries of scheming, because he chooses to refrain from action for two days after the kidnapping of the child."
The hotel staff didn't seem to notice or care that one of their maids had vanished and are further proof that a murderer is unrecognisable after he has had a shave.
"The worst thing was, I hold the belief that that the director was trying his absolute hardest."
It has nothing to do with how the filmmaker wants the viewer to take his out of context scripture.
"It is not like this film maker does not make decent points in certain areas, he does, but he is engaging in the same blind bias of the religion he is bashing on."
"Once he engages in these tactics, in my strong opinion, he loses credibility as the religion he picks out, and the film is no longer a documentary, but a personal opinion, and a bias of the film maker, nothing more, nothing less"
"The lowlight of the whole thing is Michael Oliver, the most repulsive and unlikeable kid actor ever to hit the screen believe me, you will want to smack him right in the mouth"
Ninjas to thwart KGB and rescue Markov and his daughter.
Apparently Matt Frewer was cast because he is tall and skinny.
"Not only does Frewer have a lanky lackadaisical walk that is hard to watch, but he looks uncomfortable in the stereotypical Holmes overcoats that he is wearing."
Frewer's cadaverous face grinning all the time as he spouts on and on in a very bad Upper-Crust British accent is painful to see and listen to.
"Frewer is always smiling at the witnesses he talks to, and he is so polite and courteous that he could be teaching at a Charm School instead of being a Sleuth."
"Walsh does not ham it up compared to Frewer, and when he is often interviewing witnesses, his demeanor and conversational style are much more natural and credible."
"Aside from being a serial killer, he is also the oldest beat cop in LA."
More than half of the story focuses on the dirty deeds of our deranged German LAPD officer and the futile efforts of two young rookies to stop him.
One of these young actors is especially pitiable because he's the only actor in this whole mess with even a vague shot at a real career in the movies.
"This phantom is not very mysterious, and no effort is made to even try and keep his rather average guy face in the shadows to create any tension or spookiness."
This amazing martial arts fighter doesn't use any of her fighting skills to try to fend off her attackers.
"Secondly, this wasn't Zuniga's first horror flick, it was her first screen appearance period, cinema, TV, whatever."
"Not only is Tony a womanizing adulterer, he's also an unrepentant murdering scumbag, with a crew of Saturday Night Live skit-worthy caricatures for subordinates."
The majority of the film is shot with Sherwood talking directly into the camera about his opinion of this conflicting time in the history of our nation.
She is unhappily married to a gentleman who owns his own business.
"There's no thought gone into it at all and the director just makes up a part for himself, so he can appear in the film."
"Phillipe normally the cool character as in Cruel Intentions and Way of the Gun but in this he's supposed to be a bumbling hero which he attempts to portray by slipping when he's running and having geeky friends, but he just doesn't look right."
It had good casting - Kevin Dillon's role of the sociopath serial killer was very believable - he was both charasmatic and chilling.
"Michael Des Barres did a good job considering what all he had to do, which wasn't much."
"Nastassja Kinski was alright in her role as the concerned sex therapist, she could've of done more though and I'm not suggesting her having sex."
"The non descript villains are the usual selection of cardboard cut out gun toting thugs who are dispatched by various means as the film progresses, the hero naturally is an ex cop or something that has family and attitude problems and of course he brings along to the party not only the usual emotional baggage but also a matching piece of eye candy and his annoying son."
"I also must've blinked at some point, because I'm not sure how 'Dracula' got clothes on his body, especially since he's big wild and angry & I figure if I was in that situation, I wouldn't want to be the one dressing him."
Frank Capra's creativity must have been just about spent by the time he made this film.
"While it has a few charming moments, and many wonderful performers, Capra's outright recycling of not just the script but considerable footage from his first version of this story, Broadway Bill (1934), is downright shoddy."
"A better actor than he ever got the credit for when given the right material, here's he's given less a properly thought out character than a series of outrageous reactionary quirks."
"You half expect the writer to pop his head round the corner of the screen and say, How d'ya like them apples?"
"Keenan Ivory Wayans is probably one of the worst directors, i swear he has no real knowledge on how to make films."
"There are some nice moods and touches throughout, and I dare say director Sean Ellis could fashion a genuinely stylish and suspenseful mystery movie if he was to hire an imaginative screenwriter next time"
"Noise is the story of a New Yorker (Tim Robbins)who is so perturbed by noise pollution that he takes on an alter-ego as a as a vigilante, The Rectifier, and vandalizes any cars he finds with a car-alarm sounding."
Ashley is to contact Kate's spirit hoping to help Henry get on with his life.
"), and, last, the beautiful Tina Chen who looks up from the copier, realizes she is about to be murdered, and says, pitifully brave, I won't scream."
"After having killed these innocent good guys, von Sydow switches sides (because the other side is willing to pay him) and assassinates the evil mastermind behind a complicated intramural CIA plot."
I don't care how suave and cultured the murderer is or whether he knows how to reach the Louvre on the Metro.
"Robert Redford does an admirable job of projecting his character's initial shock and confusion, but then turns into a telecommunicational semi-genius."
"And, man, he looks just fine!"
Faye Dunaway is alright in her role but it's not too believable a role.
"The fight between him and Redford in a crowded apartment is exquisitely choreographed and, for once, we really don't know for sure how it will turn out, because Redford (a book reader after all) seems mismatched against the brute cunning of this hired assassin."
Maddy (Debbie Rochon) is a mentally unstable young woman with a troubled past who gets more than she bargained for when she goes to a pool party with a handsome coworker.
"Whilst awaiting his execution in the electric chair, he claimed that his soul would return to life and continue to go on a never-ending murder spree."
"Instead of using his newly gained satanic powers to wipe out the entire world (that's what I would do in his position), Channing simply prefers to play cat and mouse games with his nemesis the copper."
Finally Kurt Hale's fortunes have changed (thank goodness) and hopefully it will be a long while before we see any of his features in theaters.
"Anyway, former Playmate Jaime Bergman is also in the movie and she eventually becomes a werewolf, too."
Maybe they approached King and he nixed?
"The only date given is 2002, leading an unsuspecting renter to believe he's getting a recent film."
Kenneth Branagh is Rick Magruder a high powered Georgia lawyer who in the film's heavy handed opening scenes manages to get himself preposterously seduced by a mysterious catering company waitress who convinces him she is in grave danger from an ex-husband and a loony dad.
With red flags everywhere the astute lawyer plods on even managing to get his children in harms way.
Running around in a trench coat in all kinds of weather he's blind to the obvious in order to keep the story going.
Robert Duvall as the old man is Boo Radely all growed up en crazier than a bed bug serving some thick slices of ham but at least his twang is plausible.
"Elvis Presley plays an Indian bull-riding champ who leaves the rodeo for a stay at home on his folks' desert-spread in Arizona, where government suits have just invested in the family's herd of cattle (which is in dire need of a stud)."
The punk enlists his friend and an old mobster to help him save his life.
"Palance is as ineffective as the rest of the cast, doing what he must to get a paycheck."
"He needs to learn that just because the role is controversial, it does not mean that the character herself is strong."
Ash is wooden in her role while Anil Kapoor does nothing but shout.
this guy's lucky if he ever manages to get laid.
"Giovanni Ribisi is quite good in films like 'Suburbia' or 'Lost in Translation', but here his pseudo-Italian accent is hard to bear."
"Meryl Streep as his gifted bride and Glenn Close, as her sister in law."
The only thing right about Chinese history in the movie was when Wendy's mother explained to her husband about the statues that guarded ShiHuangDi.
"I understand, Satan is a crafty fellow but I don't think he is desperate enough for soul to lull RPG lovers into worship him."
I get that the poor guy lost his brother and is not right in the head because of it so the movie does win points for being intentionally tragic.
One of the characters describes Richard E Grant's character as a whining little turd and unfortunately this sums him up perfectly.
"Janeane is a lot more complicated than the character she plays here (real life is always much more complex than Hollywood can imagine), so take a cold shower gentlemen."
Michael Garfield seems to know that this script is a stinker and he delivers his lines with a facial expression that suggests he knows how preposterous this film-making endeavor is.
Lorne Michaels once again proves that he has absolutely no business producing movies.
"I'll keep this short; thanks to Greg for helping me to put this succinctly: Captivity is about a guy who drugs a girl's drink, imprisons and tortures her, then poses as a captive to have sex with her."
"Raul Artigot directs few jarringly unusual visuals and creepy passages, but for most part seems sporadically non-existent and unfocused just like his writing."
"As far as the true identity of the killer goes, when the identity was released as to who he was, I just laughed, but it was all to obvious and he really made a true jerk out of himself as well as an annoying character after his true intentions were revealed."
"Cuba can't make out a painting, and she says, You're too close...stand back...look from a different perspective, look from my perspective."
"At one point, a character has a prime opportunity to simply shoot the villainess dead, and instead she gets up and runs away without picking up the gun."
"Betty, long past her prime, thanks to the Production Code, is running a pet shop and leaves Henry in charge for far too long -- five minutes."
"I think Micheal Ironsides acting career must be over, if he has to star in this sort of low budge crap."
And all he wants is blood... So obviously from the get-go it doesn't make sense: why is this clown in the woods to begin with?
When the idiot back talks the teacher at the boarding school place he starts crying and talking to the sky.
"Pier Paolo Pasolini, or Pee-pee-pee as I prefer to call him (due to his love of showing male genitals), is perhaps THE most overrated European Marxist director - and they are thick on the ground."
"Pasolini is sloppy in everything, and that includes trying to get as much out of his toothless amateurs as he can."
"The anti-Kubrick, I suppose... Pee-pee-pee's principal goal when casting must have been to find as many toothless old people as possible (and young men that are to his liking)."
"If 3P-0 felt that microphones are too much of a hassle when filming a movie, then he ought to have at least made a concerted effort in post-production, i.e."
"Where Mrs. Bennet in P&P had similar flaws, she was still endearing, whereas Mary was more of a freak-show."
"Mrs. Croft and Wentworth were brother and sister, which felt very unrealistic as Mrs. Croft looked old enough to be his mother."
There is also a porno start (neighbor) trying to make a movie with an actress he does not seems to feel comfortable with.
"Being a staunch feminist in real life, she must have cherished this script."
"No wonder Left Wing critic Roger Ebert loved this movie; it's right up his political alley, too."
The woman has been having dreams about the Boogeyman and his victim's from the first film.
The rest of the movie is the main character having the bad dreams while her therapist drones on a the narrator.
"The tedious monologue continues as they go to duty-free shop, and to a bar, where finally her self-involved rant pushes him away."
Well let me say that I have always been a Steven seagal fan and his movies are usually great but this just don't measure up to the rest.
"Celia is employed as a highly motivated probation officer for the County of Los Angeles, while her evil natured twin has become an iconic figure within her fetishistic world largely because of erotic performances upon CD-ROMS, but when disaster befalls Mistress Vanessa, virtuous Celia, determined to unearth her sister's vicious attacker, begins a new job as a sex slave at the private Castle Club where the specialty of the house is a dungeon party."
Poor Will would be rolling over in his grave if he could this this horiible German-TV adaptaion of his classic play.
Exactly why RIPLEY shut Will's machine down isn't explained (he's only playing an online game?)
As for RIPLEY activating his mobile phone?
"RIPLEY agents arrive at Massude's home, take him away & Will is given a envelope which turns out to contain a lot of money."
We discover that the guy who ran into Annie is Falken (not played by the original actor sadly) who faked his own death.
My favorite part: a guy gets so scared that he jumps headfirst through a door (!?)
and the narrator explains he went unconscious from shock.
The guy keeps going back to the lab he has been forbidden to enter.
Then there's his relationship with a young woman and her son.
Even his tyrannosaurus suit looks like it came off the rack at a Star Trek convention
"One is the haunting score by Ennio Morricone (perhaps the greatest composer of film music of all-time, his talents wasted on various tenth-rate clunkers during the 70s and 80s)."
"Harris appears extremely ill throughout the film, his hair bedraggled, black rings around his eyes and skin deathly pale."
"If these people had met E.T., they would have roasted him in two seconds flat!"
"Woody Allen's misogyny, and his fixation on women young enough, at this point, to be his granddaughter, has crippled any ability to make movies he may have had at any point."
"Much is made of the fact that unlike in his previous films, Woody Allen, now a septuagenarian, has FINALLY allowed a younger male lead to get the girl."
"There is an early scene where Johansson, for no reason central to the movie, allows herself to be gotten drunk, and seduced, by a powerful, older director."
"One day maybe some really brave Hollywood soul will make a movie telling the truth about how many American men and women clandestinely aided the mass murderer Stalin, and worked to impose his vicious system of government on the western world, giving an accurate account maybe of Joe McCarthy's career-but I won't hold my breath."
"And I'm sorry, I like Reid but she was VERY unbelievable as an archaeologist."
"Sascha is played very well by Joanna Pacula, but she needed more lines than she was given, her character needed to be developed."
"Scenes where I wasn't sure what the director was doing or which direction he was headed, but somehow still seemed to work well as a whole."
"Rip Torn seemed out of place in his role as Clyde Stewart, a loner that somehow finds a connection with Conchata Ferrell's Elinore Randall."
"Another fact is his gadgets actually work to the point I saw, except for the oil slick."
Karloff finally injects the old geyser with poison and he kicks off.
I suspect the director thought it made him more sinister.
"Long story short, remember our little friend Molly, she saves the day...or does she?"
"I loved how the government's plan to capture the terrorist leader is to air drop in one man, who is unarmed, and expect him to capture him and escape with a rocket pack."
The dialogue was difficult to swallow along with the silly things Colin Farrell's character was allowed to get away with by his superior officers.
I would not want to fight alongside someone like him in war because he was more concerned with people's feelings than with doing what was necessary to protect his unit.
"In one scene, I really wondered why one of the characters had rouge smeared on his face."
"This doesn't mean, however, that the director can't achieve something with his next film."
"The lead character is tepid and dull, he can't even fight with a sword and the sword is from the 16th Century."
The best moments for me are the KUNG FU U scenes as well as the great moment when John(in a trance) goes up on stage and talks about how much he loves his girlfriend-that is how much he and his genitals love his girlfriend.
"Levy has his moments, especially filming the wedding at the end(think Rod Serling) and the great scene when he is talking to his mother on the phone."
"A nice effect, but misleading as he is never in the film... why not recreate this with the new actor's eyes?"
"For those keeping score, in this one, Drummond is planning to ask Phyllis to marry him and Algy is worried about missing the baby's christening."
Cusack seems to be so irreparably damaged by his hatred for George Bush and the Iraq war that he is willing to commit career suicide.
"Not that I expect a great deal of plausibility in movies, but you'd think that even the homeless and urban-dwelling Jack Mason would question why a group of experienced hunters would want to hire him as a hunting guide."
"And upon reaching the hunting grounds, poor Ice-T plays his part as if he is actually going to lead these men through woods he's never seen before."
"However, I didn't understand why the director made his friends so insensitive, mean and rude."
"The ironic part was his new female friend accused him of having stalking behavior for simply looking up an old friend, when she did a really odd thing to get a hold of his name, address and phone number...she seemed to be the stalker!."
"Dr. K(David H Hickey)has been trying to master a formula that would end all disease and handicaps, but needs live donors to complete his work."
Eddie has a girlfriend named Sarah(Lizabeth Cardenas)who is pre-law and plans to attend law school herself the coming fall.
When Dr. K applies his serum to Eddie horrifying results occur.
Eddie's face bulges massive warts while he has also acquired a taste for human flesh.
"I tried to convenience myself that it was a flashback, and therefore supposed to look old, but it looked WWWWWWWAAAAAAAAAAAAYYYYYYYYYYY more 80s than 60s or even 21st century trying to be 60s... then an adult coworker of the lead character turns up, and he looks just like the boy featured in the flashback sequences (yet it's a different, much older character whose youth is featured in the flashbacks)."
Who is that weird little troll who helps him out and what's up with that female cop?
Marriott himself is like a hideously disfigured Chro-magnum man who struggles to put together the simplest sentences.
Bela Lugosi revels in his role as European horticulturalist (sic) Dr. Lorenz in this outlandish tale of horror and dementia.
Too much superfluous material and stuff like the chief bad guy looking like he'd escaped from The Phantom of the Opera didn't help.
"Teddy is a dinosaur detective who is never taken seriously, but after a dinosaur is murdered, he's given the case to work on, but he has to be partners with the toughest cop of them all, Katie Coltrane (Whoopi Goldberg)."
"Teddy starts the picture as a normal acting character, but by the end he is unbearable to listen to."
"Whoopi blames him for farting and he says, It's not my butt trumpet!"
Florida was the strong lady that would everyone including James when he needed a shoulder to cry on or hug to make it.
Their neighbor Willona was also a key element because she represented not only a friend but some dear enough to be family.
It is here that a TV-guru named Dr. Blake and his adorable pet-brain begin their quest for nation-wide mind controlling.
The funniest thing about the plot is that it never explains where Dr. Blake and his monstrous brain actually come from.
A girl named Christine Kossak provides the nudity-factor and she's obviously a great talent She has exactly 3 movies on her repertoire of which THIS is her masterpiece.
"I'm not sure what point this was in Sandler's career, but I'm guessing it was even before his SNL days."
This is like watching one of his home movies.
That guy who played the nasty comedian was completely annoying and it was implausible in the first place that he would receive such a mass audience.
"Eislin's father shows up once, and there's no seeming connection to the rest of Mike's personal life that we see displayed while he tries to survive the room."
"The guy who played the chief scientist has heart, but no talent, utilising pauses in his lines entirely at random, so he ends up sounding like a confused asthmatic."
"Jim Nabors seems as if he's sleepwalking, not acting."
Why did this guy hate himself and the world?
After taking great pains to make this guy as crazy and anti-social as possible and making his fate as dark as possible the writer then has the nerve to make a happy ending....
He ends up a wriggling (why do Yanks add an third syllable to this word I wonder) torso in the road still shouting threats at his nemesis.
"I'm not a woofter, so I can't claim to be a good judge of such things, but the tedious wimp who is wheeled out for this role seems only to have the title of servant in his favour."
There's a fellow whose only job is to react to the news that his girlfriend is preggers.
"If they don't have any clue that the person is within a couple of miles of the place, then why do they wander about aimlessly shouting for him?"
"Pretty much nothing, unless you get entertainment out of watching Christopher Walken, who is capable of being brilliant, put so little effort into his acting that he falls into self-parody mode (WHY did he decide to do this film anyway?)."
I bet this clever officer will find some cunning way to save what left of his troops.
"This one's nothing different, and a lot of the time you just want him to take his awful one-liners and get off your TV screen."
"Lisa Wilcox may be a great actor, and sometimes it shines through the cracks here, but she can't save this movie."
"There ARE some frightening scenes in this Highland mystery (mostly when the monster attacks and we see it from his point of view), but I'm afraid that I found most of the story unintentionally funny !"
Jeremy Irons is an Academy winning actor do you want to see him play Rocky Balboa?
"Michael Parks gives one of his typically shifty, lethargic, mumbling performances, but in this case it was appropriate as his modern style sheriff symbolizes the complacency that technological progress can bring about"
"Margret Laurence probably didn't intend on having any of her novels adopted for film, let alone the Stone Angel."
"Mohanlal is barely in the movie, but he impresses in his few scenes."
"Seems as if she needs to find a director who will help her talent, not her cute looks."
"I had high hopes for RGV because of his Jungle, but seems as if he lost his talent during the shooting of this movie."
But it's made worse by Longoria Parker's presence that just rubbed me the wrong way every time she appeared on the screen.
"Just to start out with, compounding her lack of comedic talent, she is covered with so much pancake makeup, who knows what she really looks like?"
Kate gets killed while setting up for her wedding by a falling frozen statue.
"Since Dan is apparently attracted to both of these severely flawed women, he deserves whatever he gets."
Liam Neeson is adequate in his role as the doctor-pretending-to-be-a-sleep-psychologist -- I don't think he is capable of turning in a truly bad performance -- but even he cannot save a lame script and weak story.
"And that blond guy, whoever he is, is more wooden than the laughably strange statuettes of children carved into the woodwork around the house."
"After inadvertently dropping a large diamond into the handbag of Vanessa, a career-woman who is reluctant to have children, Calvin realises that in order to recover the diamond he must ingratiate himself with her."
"So, as any normal man would, Calvin dresses himself up as a 2 year-old and parks himself upon the poor woman's doorstep, where he is discovered by Darryl, the broody husband of Vanessa."
"Britain's greatest ever screen actor does not seem too interested in this role, which is a pity as he might have elevated it with more conviction in his playing."
"William Holden is better, but his screen time is fleeting and, again, his character is not well scripted."
"Beverly Johnson is as beautiful a woman as I have ever seen, but is given very little to do, the film might have gained a great deal by concentrating more on her story."
"Richard Fleischer has to be blamed for not directing this more effectively, he was an infuriatingly unpredictable film director, and this is one of his weaker movies"
Jules tells Vincent that the Only thing she did worthwhile was pilot.
Then I watched the director/writer Carlson explain his process as a special feature.
This hunky boxer is somehow traumatized by the persistent attentions of a fleshy momma's boy who works at his gym's parking lot.
"The boxer is so traumatized that he turns up at the stalker's house, strips in front of him and gets excited in the process."
Ben Stiller is simply repulsive in his role and I'm a fan of his work most of the time.
"Sunny Deol is famous for making daft movies, where he beats up a 100 bad guys on his own."
"Maybe cos she was playing a Muslim, but she doesn't act like one in the movie."
"But as he hasn't, I'll have to give it a go myself."
The mayor of the town (Telly Savalas) is a brutal leader who thinks nothing of meting out justice with his gun.
Add to this the fact that she rides around in a hearse lying dead like in a coffin for God knows why.
A blind man (Fernando Rey) claims he can identify the rebel leader by touching his face.
Shaw spends most of the film fixating his trademark stare at whomever is handy.
Al Lettieri would also emerge with a role in The Godfather (1972) and go on to other memorable roles before his untimely death in 1975.
Reed Diamond plays a man suffering from amnesia who's been in a mental asylum for over a decade after he was found wondering the back roads with blood on his hands.
"(In the interest of full disclosure, I've been a huge fan of his since Homicide and his brief, but extremely pivotal, role in The Shield up through Journeyman & Dollhouse) Not a great film nor a good one, but serviceable enough."
Mike Myers on the other hand gets his laughs by being annoying.
"Rod needs to go to his quiet place and before anyone can say Kevin Bacon, he is footloosing a passionate, overwrought bodyswerve to the strains of a band who wishes they had the big-hair faux-metal chops of Europe."
"Without one jump under his starry belt, he plans for a 15-bus extravaganza - which would surely kill a lesser bad comedian, like Jason Biggs or Rob Schneider - to win the day and save his stepfather and simultaneously wipe out cancer and whatever... who watches these movies for plot anyway?"
"This film seems like an attempt at artistic suicide on behalf of the director, and I for one be believe he has been successful in his mission."
Did Amitabh Bachchan read the script and believe that people would remember his dialogue in this farcical abomination of a film?
"For what is supposed to be a 'Romantic comedy', there is absolutely no romance between the central characters, let alone chemistry, and as for the comedy- (possible SPOILERS)well, the only moments of mild humour came off the back of Cusack's role in Grosse Pointe and his relationship with Alan Arkin- the scriptwriter obviously unable to show any originality whatsoever."
"I suppose one could say that at least the horse didn't die in vain, since it was the beginning of the public waking up to the callous and horrendous pain caused animals for the glory of movie making, but I can't help but feel that if the poor animal had a choice, this sure wouldn't have been the path he would have taken"
"Sledge has a pretty girl friend, but there's no reason why she slobbers all over the guy or why she wants to be in the same room with this no-account pig."
Will you waste some of your hard-earned cash over a lady singing in her see-through tank top?
Police come and arrested him.
Hyuck seems to just smear it all over the picture and by doing so dangerously overplays his hand.
"Murphy is the Chosen One in question, and as the opening song suggests, he is the best man in the world."
"For if the child were to die, compassion would die with him, as he is the bearer of compassion."
"Almost as awful is Nelsan Ellis, it's difficult to understand what he's even saying sometimes."
"Later Kristen was assured by Taryn(Jennifer Connely) that she holds no accountability in that matter, and despite willfully jumping into a guy's bed she wasn't ready for sexual intercourse and was viciously taken advantage of by a sexual predator."
Mr. Mikels and his silly little handlebar mustache actually has people who STILL buy this crap.
The long close ups suggest a function that the viewer may fill in by himself.
"An introvert person suggests to have depth, but sometimes it turns out he has nothing to say."
that changes Anna's view on life and makes her suspicious.
Producer: We can only afford to hire him for one day.
Producer: But he'll still need to understand his motivation and all that.
"If you do that, it becomes like a film about a pedophile chasing a kid and rapping to seduce him."
"Bo Derek plays Jane Parker who sets off into turn-of-the century Africa to be reunited with her boozy, abusive Dad, Richard Harris."
"I'm a big fan of Amber Benson, I think she's usually a wonderful actress, I can't imagine why she decided to do this film."
"Yes, this is a low budget movie and yes, the director needs time to learn his trade."
"Aside from being a serial killer, he is also the oldest beat cop in LA."
More than half of the story focuses on the dirty deeds of our deranged German LAPD officer and the futile efforts of two young rookies to stop him.
One of these young actors is especially pitiable because he's the only actor in this whole mess with even a vague shot at a real career in the movies.
"The young emperor Commodus would have hundreds of slave girls and a city full of marriage-minded girls all over him, but no -- he only wanted his sister?"
One reader even (so it seems) actually indicates that he believes these events did or could have happened when Bush was in grade school.
"IF there had been some sort of change in the election back in 2000, according to that writer, he was so sure that there would be a completely different acceptable president."
The Devil and his imps are actually kind of cute--like Hot Stuff from the Harvey Comics but with cool evil goatees!
Will St. Nick get down from the tree and get the monkey off his back or will the devils win?
"***MAJOR SPOILER*** The killer is obviously Helen (she speaks in her dead mother's voice, washes blood off her hands after the murders and is seen killing a child molester with a broken bottle as a little girl!"
One day an old friend of Stefan's arrives with a favor to ask him.
Gene Wilder (star AND co-writer) tries hard at it all: he plays a romantic lead (with his looks!!
"Knightley plays her as an obnoxious, cynical brat who has done nothing to warrant our respect."
"Mickey Roarke looks good as a grizzled bounty hunter, but he disappears into the background as the narrative progresses."
This is not the usual complaint of a book-lover that his favorite text has been violated.
"In any case, despite my irritation at the author, I couldn't deny that his book stuck with me; and what I couldn't get out of my head was his character's attitude, her angle on the world, which was almost as vivid as a Goya portrait."
"The Morvern just described is not the Morvern of the movie; or if it is, most of her is kept offscreen."
"Unfortunately, as the film turned out, she doesn't have the character from the book to play."
"In short, the filmmaker chose for some reason to turn a brisk, edgy serio-comic novel into a genteel art TV film, and chose as her typical image one of Ms. Morton languishing in a artistically shaded melancholy; as if the outing Morvern signs up for were a tour of the Stations of the Cross."
"And finally the film is missing the end of the story: Morvern's spending all she has and coming home to icy darkness: it's winter, the dam has frozen, the power has gone out, and the pub is dark."
"Amanda Peet has proven that she can act, as she was a high point of 'The Whole Nine Yards'."
What is really dumb about this film is that we are expected to believe the place this guy works is against him.
"He could probably make millions for the institution that he is working at, but the head of the institution tries to sabotage his teleporter every step of the way."
In the end the projected man electrocutes three people for no reason then goes after those that have wronged him
Ben Vereen should have had his name permanently stricken from the cast.
Muscular man-ape in the jungles of Africa is hunted by an opportunistic expedition team; the comely daughter of the team's leader finds him first.
John Derek is bereft of inspiration beyond cheesy slow-motion action shots and peek-a-boo glimpses of wife Bo Derek's unclothed body; he has about as much talent behind the camera as Ed Wood.
For Carradine it was in those last two decades of his career that he appeared in anything on the theory it was better to keep working no matter what you did and get those paychecks coming in.
"Unfortunately, I don't see where she has made any movies since."
"If you look at Corey Large's information here on IMDb, apparently there's a movie called Reload in production (as of June '08) in which he's playing a character named Sebastian Cole."
"Freddy is back, but he's got something we don't know about, a daughter."
"Maggie, she's not aware that he is her father, but soon she finds out what his dark secrets are and he wants her help."
"They find it hard to communicate, something that the main character had no problem with really, except he DID have a problem saying I love you at one point- which was a bit of a feeble effort at establishing his cold character."
I felt cheated that at no point were we really alone with the character to really get a sense of his inner loneliness and turmoil.
"Brooks's musical parodies are usually the highlights of his movies; here he plays the whole thing straight, like a dancing excerpt from an aging guest star on The Carol Burnett Show (on which Rudy DeLuca, this film's co-writer, began his career)."
The usual London story of the chancer taking his chance.
Her lover has just died one month prior to her arrival at the 'Rubber House' he had given her.
"Even though she is married to Dafoe off screen, her scenes with him were cold and unemotional."
"I'm sorry Rhodes Reason whoever you are, but this guy has way more screen presence and you can bet that everyone wants him to end up with the cute little blonde, played by Linda Miller."
Of course like all Kong leading ladies her primary relationship is with the King himself.
She discovers a nice trick: if you talk to a giant ape really..... really.... slowly..... he'll understand what you're saying.
"Kong himself seems momentarily infatuated with Mecha-Kong, a story element that might have made the film more interesting but wasn't followed up on."
"Basically this movie squanders whatever majesty was possible in the Kong character by making him a heroic and friendly figure much too early, just like the newest version of the story."
"Kong is just a guy in a suit in this movie, and they show quite a lot of him to the point where the goofy face becomes impossible to take seriously."
Me thinks he (the lady) doth protest too much.
The whole thing sounded to me as if the author was trying to convince himself!
"King of the Ants features Chris L. McKenna as Sean Crawley, an average guy ready to make a name for himself in this world, even if it means murder."
Erroll justifies his actions by bringing up these deviants' pasts.
"It is this good justification that challenges the audience on some level, letting us see how brutal Erroll is and yet how out-of-touch he's become (by being too close to his job)."
Disgusted with those he's responsible for overseeing.
"Even Leslie Nielsen was a bad fit here, uncomfortably neither straight dramatic actor as he was at the time nor deadpan comedic actor as he later became in Airplane!"
"There's also no way the then-43 year-old Knotts could pass for a 35 year-old, as his character insisted he was."
"I may have to see another of this particular director's films, as he seems to have a certain following."
"Dr Suess is rolling in his grave right now, what with the dirty ho S.H.I.T and fake erection scenes etc etc etc."
"He also finds time to slag off films that he doesn't like, something I thought was reserved for losers like me."
Surely being in a position like his you'd think he'd try and make a point about cinema a little more intelligently than this.
"And when he started fawning over his newborn baby, I just wanted to go and be in the company of someone normal, preferably not a self-obsessed film director with a strange penchant for tacky music."
"Sinclair also got some sense knocked into his head when his private chauffeur David, Mark Rasmusser, who's gotten sick and tired of his weird and crazy hallucinations almost running him off a cliff in a kamikaze like drive along the Pacific Coast."
"It turns out that the crazed Logan got so carried away with his masterpiece as he tried to replicate, on the helpless and tied up Suzanne, the actual crucification of Jesus Christ some 2,000 years ago."
"For example, in a scene when lil bush has his underwear on his head: Welcome to camp al-qa-eeda!."
"Only once, when Yumi takes the zombie-like mother in her arms, did One Missed Call startle me a little."
"The inconsistencies are pretty entertaining, one of the main characters says he has no friends, yet he latches onto the new guy in a minute of screen time, and has a whole gaggle of women on the side."
"De Martino steals multiple ideas from successful blockbusters, like most Italian directors did around that time, but he always adds a lot of stuff to make it even more complex, confusing and overwhelming."
Less well-known but equally effortful are his exploits as a full-time philanderer.
You wonder when this guy will get caught with his pants down.
Hers was the most interesting character and she played it to perfection.
It was also nice to see Candice Bergen at the beginning of her career.
"The performances are godawul, from Grisales (her naked scene is absolutely pitiful), to Bejarano, to Fanny Mickey (who looks right out of a Tim Burton nightmare), to Diaz, who makes a notable effort to bring life to a character so one-dimensional, so cliched and so badly written all he's left to work with is a mustache."
"we were just told 'oh we have all the tapes and evidence against you since 1997', and THAT is how he got caught."
Martin Freeman is okay but then he seems to have one character which always plays so I am beginning to wonder if he was given a script or just filmed and told to react as normal.
"The guy who did this then has his conscience spiritually cleansed by the flames from the burial/burning of the horse, which of course is still dead, having been tortured to death."
"Molly Shannon is so funny just SEEING her makes you laugh, but somehow her segment fails to snowball into something hysterical."
Mack Derringer is approached by his ex-wife Vanity (Jennifer Derringer) who works at having sex talk over the telephone.
Jennifer is being threatened by one caller who wants to do horrible things to her and she asks for his help along with several other ladies.
"By episode 5, Bill's furrowed eyebrows are so low that his face just consists of a forehead."
Tara and her drunk mother are far more interesting than the major characters.
"Ossie Davis, a reverend in this film, shoots his son and then puts the smoldering gun down on top of his Bible."
"Hey, folks, here's another Bible reader and look what he''s like!"
"Ben Gazzara sports his usual cat's-got-canary grin in a futile attempt to elevate the meager plot, which requires him to pursue Audrey Hepburn with all the interest of a narcoleptic at an insomnia clinic."
"One minute, Palme is a humble hero in search of himself, the next a violent psycho with an unhealthy fixation on a girl he once took care of."
It seems that the writer was more interested in cramming all the drama and complexity he could into this movie than actually exploring his characters' motivations and personalities.
The writer seriously needed to streamline his story.
"As a sane minded and rational individual, I could not understand where the writer came from nor where he was going with this movie."
"However, the director should have NEVER put himself as the main character in the movie."
"All her character does is whine throughout the film, and she can't pull off being a b**** and still be entertaining."
Mark Wahlberg proves once and for all that he is not an actor (as if BOOGIE NIGHTS wasn't proof enough).
Henry Jaglom did better with Eating which suited his style much more
"Jim Carrey is noteworthy in his performance as the devilish Grinch, but whether it's the dialogue, the pacing, or extraneous storylines heaped upon the initial plot, the transformation from bitter miser to gleeful benefactor just does not ignite convincingly."
"Luckily I didn't pay for this movie, and my friend reluctantly agreed to watch it again siting that it was so awful but he needed to prove to me how awful it was."
Nick Millard aka Nick Phillips should have left well-enough alone when he made Criminally Insane 10 years before the release of this god-awful waste of time and effort.
"I usually enjoy Loretta Young's early movies: her acting back then was light and breezy, and she sure knew how to wear clothes."
Young is a hatcheck girl who talks her writer-husband (Paul Lukas) into becoming a championship bridge player.
"After watching this supposedly gay made film, I suspect someone rounded up a brain damaged half blind neo-nazi and had him make the worst gay film ever, all in some deluded attempt to attack gay culture."
Muriel comes from a village and wants to change her life in Brussels.
Dave's infatuation with the on-again/off-again Gwen is inexplicable in light of her fatuous inability to defecate or get off the pot.
Richard Gere's acting was good as usual but the blond girl that's supposed to replace him was wishy washy at best.
"There was nothing scary about the whole movie, in fact the only two vaguely interesting bits were when you saw the kid sister, Misty, in the shower and when you saw Nurse Toppan take her top off."
"If it was before or after,I'm not sure,but,still,Zombie Nightmare is a classic(check out the Mystery Science Theater 3000 version first and last)compared to this.The gang is very annoying and over-acting by some of the actors.A rip-off of The Wild One starring Marlon Brando,of course.Tina looks stunning though.I hope her and Adam got a good paycheck!!"
"Maria's acting is so dry that lacks any feeling whatsoever, her most intense moments seem almost comical."
"Ioana seems even more tense than Maria and even worse, she doesn't seem natural at all."
Bill (Buddy Rogers) is sent to New York by his uncle (Richard Tucker) to experience life before he inherits $25million.
"I have seen other films by this director, unfortunately this is one of his worst."
"Jeanine Garofalo is supposed to be the ugly duckling, but the funny thing is that she's not at all ugly (actually she's a lot more attractive than Uma Thurman, the friend who looks like a model)."
"I won't point out all of the others, but here are a few more to see: When the young daughter leaves at the start of the film the catch to the cage door comes down and the hook part of it that is on the right clearly goes back around behind the round knob thus effectively making sure Roddy would not be able to get out and yet he does just by simply kicking at it."
"He tries very hard, but I suspect that he didn't want to make the film, but was contractually obligated or something."
"The strange man then recounts a pair of gruesome tales connected to the area: in the first story, an adulterous couple plot to kill the woman's husband, but eventually suffer a far worse fate themselves when they are attacked by a zombie; and in the second story, a group of campers have their vacation cut short when an undead outlaw takes umbrage at having his grave peed on."
LL Cool J is a great actor; he gets a lot more screen time than Freeman or Spacey in this movie and really struggles to come to terms with the poor script.
"Then he brings up the chronology of Christianity's origins and presents an 'ok' case, but not one that blew me away."
"The lawyer has a drunk friend and keeps him around, why, no one knows."
Costa-Gavras is a well-known communist sympathizer and his movies are always biased.
"The most annoying point is, however, that at no point in the film does anyone explain whether the motivations for Bacon's character's madness are due to a power trip or a physiological reaction to his condition."
Goldie's gotta be a contender for an actress who's done so much in her career with very little quality material at her disposal... <br /
"There were a few interesting moments (e.g., Judy Tenuta's scene reminded of her early comedy routines touting Judy-ism) which led me to rate this two stars rather than one."
"However, it proved to be not at all enjoyable, but instead the acting and the general movie was mock-able, such as the ways the the 'unsees killer' murders his victims and how all of the people killed just happen to be young blonde women."
"Of interest, is the fact that this Marsha Hunt is the famous Brown Sugar of the Rolling Stones song, and that she was in the infamous nude scene in the London cast of the rock musical Hair."
"Morgan falls in love with her, leading to a definitely one-sided marriage, spent on a huge estate in Chicago (which appears to be surrounded by mountains!)."
"Yet, not one shred of imagination went into the making of this film, as Attenborough's complete indifference for dance and the show itself is evident in his lackadaisical direction."
"In two words:Flat story,that has become a cliche,bad acting,bad special effects...Only the dumb Russian cop,Vlad, was a bit funny while punishing around the bad guys.The pile of muscles was so incredibly STUPID,that it made me laugh at him for a moment."
"From the new eyebrows to other parts of her body, Ms. Boyle is hardly recognizable as Col Kennedy, the character at the center of the mystery."
And near then end of the film the viewer is rewarded with seeing her completely nekked.
"Hopper gives the only believable performance, and Dean in the climactic scene displays remarkable talent as something we usually don't remember him for--a comic actor."
"I know that this is an movie made by one person, but to think that he could make 97 minutes worth of crap, maybe he could at least make 1 second worth of funny."
They high-jack a cargo plane kidnapping the pilot and his daughter with demands to be flown to Mexico.
Rich widower American aristocrat Penn Gaylord leaves his small daughter in charge and goes off to World War I where he is killed.
"We instead just follow Fiona's life from one train wreck to another, the evil Barclay takes away her home, her fortune, and even her child."
"Dr. Feinstone (Corbin Bernsen) has been a successful dentist for several years now, but when he catches his wife cheating on him with the poolguy he snaps, and he brings his anger and frustration to his work."
"what the heck, he is basically the hero of the book and they just kill him off like he wasn't important."
"Eddie Murphy was hysterical in this, but apart from him, the whole movie was bad, I rarely laughed at the parts in this, I also remembered that the other people in the theater almost hardly even laughed."
"Achilles had a young male friend with whom he was very close, but it's OK."
"And the police are JUST NOW calling in a specialist (who ONCE refers to himself as a psychic, but that never comes up again)."
"After the captain dies in a violent confrontation with a mob of bloodsuckers (and as it turns out, lovers of the finer parts of human anatomy) his first mate takes over... blah, blah, blah... everyone hates him... blah, blah, blah..."
"The original screenplay called for Maria to commit suicide after the reading of Oswald's will, on finding out that her husband had in effect sold their marriage to Oswald."
"Maria is then summarily blown up, rather than having to confront and live with the consequences of her self-delusion and moral compromise."
"Maria is thus intended to be a woman specific to and reflective of her time and place, but is in reality unoriginal and nonspecific."
"Except to the oblivious, there's some obvious things going on here...Mickey Rooney plays a toymaker named Joe Petto and his creepy son's name is Pino."
"Now, a little boy named Derek heard a knock at the door one evening, and opened it to find a present on the doorstep for him."
Pino is probably even more agitated and naughty because he suffers from Kenitalia (a smooth plastic crotch) so that could account for his evil ways.
Atlee tells Memphis that his brother Kip is in deep *bleep*.
"But, right when Nicholas Cage starts the engine up again, the police officer jerks his head to the right, sees the car, and immediately begins to chase after him."
"Alice just became more annoying, she's not Nancy or Kirsten, so her carrying this film on her own didn't work for me."
"Alice is back and she's carrying a child, she couldn't be happier with her life."
Well that's what A Nightmare on Elm Street: The Dream Child investigates and Alice soon finds out what Freddy's childhood was like and that maybe that's the one thing that can defeat him.
"Nobody, of course, but director Damien Lee thought it was a good idea, anyway, and he put together a belated sequel that stands as one of the most redundant movies in horror history."
Lundgren mails in his performance and the movie is flat and lethargic.
"This sort of role usually fit his style perfectly, he was just adequate here."
"Wiliam Holden did the best he could, but nowhere as good as he usually was."
Also very funny was the send up of the bloke in the movie who wanted to go faster as a maniac running around demanding *everything* be faster including the sinking of the ship and himself being the first to die.
Jeff Daniels basically playing the same role he played in the live 101 Dalmatians remake which wasn't too juicy to begin with.
Did Goldblum feel that Independence Day would be a flop and then just take the next role that was offered to him to make some money if Independence Day were a bomb?
Tara Reid needs to be stopped before she's put in another movie.
the lunatic almost had an altar of Brett in her home that could have proved her sick obsession.
"never marry a woman with a life insurance: as soon as she falls down the stairs her husband will be thrown into jail, guilty or not."
The chick from clueless should never be forgiven and she is stripped of any remaining dignity she had.
I'm sure someones going to call up the news guy and ask him to go out with you.
(Ain't he the lucky one?)
"Naschy's facial expression never varies, whether in or out of makeup, and apparently no one gave him any coaching on how to act like a werewolf."
"So anyway, after being bitten by the cross-pollinating yeti, the poor schmuck returns home from Tibet to learn that his wife has been sleeping with one of his students."
"One of the bikers always wears a football helmet, a weak attempt to distinguish him from all the other outlaws."
"However, the scientist realizes that he is also at fault."
Why the heck did the scientist want to split his soul into 9 homunculi?
"Director Matt Steinauer shows great promise, and I wish him luck"
"Most likely from something he would of done in the past, but you don't know of any of this at the moment."
He supports what I heard is called Pro-Life.
The Father then performs what he believes is done to the Women.
"The Father sees this later on, and starts questioning why this happened, he did what he was told to do, and doesn't understand why it's like this."
The only good thing about this movie was the shot of Goldie Hawn standing in her little french cut bikini panties and struggling to keep a dozen other depraved women from removing her skimpy little cotton top while she giggled and cooed.
"In Chase's best films, I tend to admire his professionalism rather than laughing at him."
"Oliver Hardy gives the best performance in this film as her blowhard father, who disdains Chase as a 'mollycoddle'."
Film historian William K Everson dealt with her very dismissively in one of his film books.
Even Mel Gibson got that part right... letting his characters speak some gibberish Aramaic in the Passion.
I generally LIKE watching Burt Lancaster's films--especially when he is needed to go nuts with his imposing screen presence like in Elmer Gantry.
One of the older ones is sincere in his attempt to get a job.
"jeffrey combs did a pretty darn good job as the mad scientist, which is sort of his specialty if you don't know such things :D. bill forsythe .. well, i'm not EXACTLY sure why he was in this film."
"Among them is a scene where a man's being attacked and defends himself with a number of unlikely objects, it made me laugh at the time (doesn't seem quite so funny in retrospect but there you go)."
"I never heard the title character's name mentioned in the movie, but he's the one who overacts the most, hooting and hollering."
"The wife of a good friend of mine, sat on the bus at the back row, a seemingly arbitrary and meaningless decision that saved her life."
"This movie, according to Haim Buzaglo himself is the first part of a current agenda trilogy."
Probably the coolest thing was the 1000lb saber tooth who crawled around on his front legs killing the mad scientist with a tooth statue of sorts that somehow shrinks and goes through the guys neck.
"In particular, Ms. Keaton's performance is flighty and over the top, well below the quality of her Annie Hall and Sleeper days."
"Jennifer Tilly is again the model of stridence, with her hi-pitched voice and whining style."
"She then goes on a screaming rampage, killing a gay former student because of his sins."
Our good old comrade General Secretary gets a bit worried and calls the Pope just before his coronation to ask him to broker peace.
"So when the Pope gets crowned in Rome, he pledges the entire wealth of the Catholic church world-wide to feed our poor Chinese brethren in Christ."
"When Pierre, Cedric's ex shows up in the club and starts trouble, we don't see hide nor hair of him until near the end, and it took me a good chunk of time to figure out that Pierre WAS the ex."
"Jamie Brett Gabel's acting was the only good point, but he could have been so much better with a good director, and better actors to work with."
"The plot is the real problem, and I feel sorry for 'Sly' as he puts in a decent performance for his part."
"I particularly love the way near the end he manages to pop from the foot of a mountain to the top, whilst the helicopter is on the way."
-- Military Officer: That's just science fiction (he then proceeds to cause a complete disaster just like the scientist predicted).
"Like Albert Brooks said in an interview discussing his character in Taxi Driver, it's important to be funny as your character, rather than be funny as a comedian."
"If a regular person were being thrown in jail, would he really be acting goofy while having his mug shots taken?"
"Epps has the same flaws when it comes to comedy, but at least he chooses a more low-key approach."
Antoine Fuqua has proved his directing chops in movies like The Replacement Killers and Training Day.
Field overacts here with a gracelessness I've seldom seen from her.
"From a poorly contrived plot line that makes almost no sense to bad dialogue and disjointed scenes to the ultimate downer, bad acting (even Peter Falk can't find his way) Finding John Christmas is better left lost."
A Japanese friend of mine actually laughed out loud at some of the cultural absurdities she watched unfold before her eyes.
"Mind you, I've seen far worse, but if you're going to have him out on full display for a lot of the flick, your monster better look damn good."
"Sure, the acting is almost awful except for the actors fortunate enough to be playing the crazed dwarf (Angelo Rossitto, who later played The Master in Mad Max Beyond Thunderdome); his crazed brute of a brother, Angel (Frank Moran), who grunts a lot and has a fetish for the virgins' hair; the crazed mother of the two (Minerva Urecal); the crazed wife (Elizabeth Russell), who sleeps in a plush coffin and, of course, the crazed doctor (Lugosi)."
"When the doctor and his wife invite Pat to stay the night, a raging storm immediately breaks out."
"As Dr. Vitas Werdegast he's a sad, ironic man protective of his two young friends."
"Lilly, being sightless since her birth, is teacher for blind persons, and wants to make him seeing again."
The theatre director is on the road to his mother (Jenny Grollmann).
"His mother is living somewhere in Russia on the sea and making artistic installations - of course, what should she do other!"
"Parallel to this roadmovie the sister of Lilly, staying at home is asking a gawky schoolmate to deflower her, who has first to booze himself to courage."
"Final Verdict The feeling throughout the whole movie was that this probably would be very moving and just amazing and that it would teach me some great life lesson, if I could only get what the director was trying to say by his unique decisions."
"Writer/Director Peter Greenaway cements his title as the High Lord of Art House Pretension with his latest exercise in obnoxious self-indulgence, 8 1/2 Women."
"Giulietta has no legs and uses a wheelchair, she's the half woman, get it?"
"Greenaway's work is tasteless and arrogant in its fetishism, and the only person likely to enjoy watching it is the auteur himself"
I can fondly remember Bo Derek's heyday and the UK press attention (the mucky Sun & News of the World papers especially)- all following her small role in 10 with Dudley Moore.
Randy Travis was really good in his role.
I was happy when the main character flashed her boobs.
"Before the movie is over, we are treated to yetis ripping hearts out, yetis waddling in an effort to run before jumping 50 meters, yetis ripping a man's legs off and beating him with them, a woman killing a rabbit at 30 meters with a javelin, a yeti surviving several bullets and being set on fire with no apparent harm, a yeti dangling off a cliff by holding to a man's shoe, yet then jumps off, and a whole collection of further, bizarre occurrences."
"The second are original finds, the combination SF-Western is obviously original, if terrible, but other finds are more original, like the gunman Zack Stone being able to sense the pain of the people he shoots (though his acting falls short here)."
"The poor performances (Perlman is sadly wasted here) become an outgrowth of the script, and Carpenter's direction feels exhausted, as if 'Pro-Life' is the source of his next hot meal."
The costume designer Albert Wolsky did his best!!!
"It would be OK, if the scriptwriters would for example say that now there is a different soul in the body, but they did not, they only deprived him of memories."
"This isn't a 'fun' movie in the sense that Ed Wood's movies are 'fun' (he, at least, believed in what he was doing and was sincere in his efforts, despite a lack of talent); Sykes' home-made movies are, in fact, aggravating, boring and almost completely devoid of any redeeming virtue, and most viewers will feel justifiably angry and cheated by such unimaginative, badly-conceived junk."
"Haddad was not made aware that her new lodger had, in fact, come fresh from The Patton State Mental Hospital where she had been incarcerated for an inexplicable knife attack on a married couple three years previously."
Haddad's fears were confirmed one night when she awoke to find her lodger sitting astride her chest holding a bread knife announcing that God has inspired me to kill you.
Haddad managed to knock her assailant out with a telephone but not before she had lost a finger and suffered deep lacerations to her face and chest.
"Mol plays Page as she seems in her photographs, happy, carefree and fun - even the bondage shots betray little more than a good humoured incomprehensibility."
Her 'mysterious' disappearance fed the fires of any number of conspiracy theories only adding to the allure of her legend.
"William Nicholson wrote the screenplay, and his latest offering, Elizabeth, the Golden Age opened three days ago, so I do hope there is an improvement."
"Kol, space prisoner on space death row, manages to hijack a space shuttle and escape to the woods of America where he, along with some new found friend try to escape from the 'Alienator a female cyborg killing machine."
Vaughn seems like he's on autopilot though most of the film and he keeps running into walls with his lackluster performance.
"OK, I understand, soldiers become a bit out of their mind out there, but it's hard to believe that a person would risk his life, carjack into the middle of a hostile city, and after being shouted at by a professor's wife run away, without having asked a question (in a proper way)."
"It feels like the movie makers wanted to create an image of an emotional brave soldier, but all these 'curves' of his psychology seem simply unnatural."
"Sylvester Stallone is once again John Rambo, author and survivor of A Season in Hell, recruited from prison by his only friend, Major Richard Crenna, to secretly return to Vietnam, take photos of the American prisoners believed to be still held in horrible camps, and return without engaging the enemy."
"Stallone and one of his POWs are betrayed by one or two of the suits from Washington, cynical politicians who, you can bet, were never even in a fist fight in grammar school."
"The leading man, Michael Des Barres, is not even feasibly good-looking, especially for this role he is given."
Stowe is okay but her Spanish accent doesn't work.
The 'good girl' in this movie must use her smarts and skills to defeat the 'bad guy' and save the day and her loved ones.
"Though we never learn the exact reasons why and who is really behind this madness, Jackson more then explains how this is going to happen and why its in Lisa's best interest to help him."
Couldn't he just sneak a bomb into the building?
Wouldn't that make it safer for him and his team by leaving out any third parties?
(possible spoilers) Someone once asked Dr. Seuss if they could secure the movie rights to his 1957 Christmas classic How the Grinch Stole Christmas.
"When the good Dr. died in 1991, his widow, Audrey Geisel, still obstinately refused to sell the movie rights."
The character that Dr. Seuss wrote and Chuck Jones later animated was a sly fox whose slick attempts to hijack the holiday season were undermined by his sudden change (and exponential growth) of heart.
"The innocent two-year-old waif who walked in on this spurious Santa is now older and wiser, constantly questioning the false values of the Whos and trying to understand the Grinch's point of view (her one major scene from the original is re-enacted, making it seem out of character)."
The bad guy even looked like he had horns.
How did the mayor of Cincinatti find himself here?
"he cries for her, ... o my god samurai 4. how many arrows is he got?"
The emerging double chin isn't his fault; but rehashing his geeky kid shtick in another bad wig simply isn't working.
"Then, out of nowhere, this peaceful race decides they have to destroy the planet because it causes too many diseases (though they do offer the main character and his wife a spot in their society)."
Rosie Perez based this documentary on herself.
Poor Marisa Ryan must be racking up lots of frequent flier mileage as she travels around the country working in these amateur regional films.
But the effects are good for a 30 year old movie with a budget of $50 - the title character takes quite a while to actually melt but when he does it's reasonably impressive; we also have one inventive death scene involving electrocution.
"Clive Owen, hmmmmmm, this guy needs a better role on his plate soon."
"Surely this guy knows acting, what he doesn't know is better way of choosing roles."
"Jodie Foster was brilliant in the movie, if you are watching her for the first time in your life."
"Ms. Dressler is supported by her tenants, best friend Polly Moran (as Ivy Higgins) and her stuttering husband Roscoe Ates (as Peter Higgins)."
Batman is much better without The article in front of his name
"The guy should have used his gun in the beginning of this movie and shoot himself, to save the audience from this atrocity."
THE ENTIRE world is under attack and he's the ONLY person ever fighting back.
Upon returning home Reuben and his best friend Sandy (Philip Seymour Hoffman) go to a party and run into Polly Prince (Jennifer Aniston) whom they went to school with years earlier.
Stiller works a lot but maybe he should work less and just wait for the better scripts to come his way because this film doesn't work as a comedy or as a romance
"Where to begin ... first, Campbell Scott's non-stop angst becomes a real turn-off after awhile (a very short while) as he internalizes his mounting anguish, curiosity and anger."
"This little girl Rosalie has some psychotic tendencies as the movie opens with her feeding kittens to some kind of creatures in the cemetery, and she has recently lost her mother who went crazy but whilst alive enjoyed staying in the woods all night."
"There are so many guffaws/ridiculous moments to list, but I will just list a few here that at the very least made me chuckle from the lack of aptitude from the creative powers involved: 1)Watch the gardener's body well after he has been slain."
Len comes in and sees him butchered and you can see his fat belly heave with life.
"I hate to knock the guy, but the sooner he realizes that pop is his forte, the better."
Let's face it; some lame kid who dies and has his soul transfered into a scarecrow.
"Her father, the sheriff, yelled to the madman to stop, and he said Hey, stay awhile!"
"If you have a high school student still drawing cowboys I'd think him to more likely be gay than a high school student who draws crows) and later, kills Lester, in a cornfield, under the titular scarecrow."
"The scarecrow then goes on to kill those who tormented him, those who smoke pot in the corn field, those who dig graves, boyfriends of daughters of gravediggers, pretty much anyone who showed up on the movie set."
"So this is the scene I am talking about, the hero just watched his brother crash and his brothers car exploded right there just feet away from him (the hero)."
In the middle of his fit and his uncontrollable rage/emotional break down he says I am so sad - he said that right?
"IN conclusion, this film robs Clara Barton of her struggles."
"The writer doesn't know Clara Barton, and seems to have based his script on an encyclopedia Britannica article."
"In it, a photojournalist with a big mustache cancels his vacation to get away from his girlfriend."
"There is a scene where the writer thinks a peeping tom is in her window, but the scene is so dark, I had no idea what was going on."
She walks into what I see as an abandoned hotel or something.
Cuz she wants to know why the people (who aren't there cuz the place is abandoned) won't answer her when she calls out: Is anybody there?
"The plot of the movie is pretty simple, Nell plays a writer who has a bad case of writer's block, and needs inspiration, so she goes to visit Mexico to absorb the atmosphere."
"While Nell is visiting with her father's partner at his mining camp, a gang of local bandits kidnap her and bring her to their camp deep in the wilderness."
"There's Miss Lilly's predicament of being stranded in the rural west, cut off from the funds that fuel her spoiled life of luxury (she's mistakenly believed to be dead by her family and the press)."
"Eastwood isn't on top of his game either, though he looks better simply by virtue of being surrounded by such a lackluster bunch."
Bill's problem is that he presumes that religion is uniformly negative.
"That fits into the other large problem with Bill's movie, which is that he never subjects himself to anyone either on his level or who is better than he is."
"In this movie, you have Maher the Cornell grad spend most of his time talking down to truck drivers at a nondenominational Christian truck stop service, in a night club with a Dutch guy who smokes pot all the time, with the minister of a storefront church in Miami who claims to be the reincarnation of Christ, and with an actor playing Jesus at a Holy Land theme park."
"I get a lot of what Bill's saying, but for someone possessing his intellect and influence, this film was nothing less than pathetic."
"Danny Glover was cast as the bad guy, but - again - most viewers' imagination could not go far enough as to believe him in that role."
Casper Van Dien wasted his talent doing this film.
"Michael York's work was a fair match for the role, since he was the center of the film, and did a good job."
"Only one character (Wendy) is seen doing anything remotely useful to society, and she dispenses with her long-saved virginity in a throwaway one-night stand with a scumbag, in a lushly filmed scene that we're supposed to think is romantic."
"After so much hype about Joel Silver's Midas Touch with action flicks, he might want to make sure he bones up on his alchemy."
"Having said that, Zane's performance falters about 2/ 3rds of the way through, as he doesn't even seem to know what else to do other than look smug."
Did Howard Fine really tell her to pretend to be a Terminator for the first half of the film?
Jeanne Bauer showed more natural life in her five minute bit part than Corinne showed at any part of her screen time.
Someone should take Welch's iMac away from him before he hurts himself or anyone else.
"And finally, Van Ryck de Groot simply was outclassed and way out of her reach, even for complete shlock like this."
"Anyhow: The lead actor portrays a loser who escapes into a fantasy world of being a cowboy in an Urban sprawl.He comes across a family with two spoiled brat children, a teenage girl and boy; taken care of by a strict single parent father who can barely cope."
"The cowboy spends the whole time in a state of unreality and depression.A total loser who prefers to go to the beach then work for living, and then commits a burglary on his family as he is too lazy to make money legally."
"Terrorizing his parents his schoolmates his neighbors and finally the entire world as a she named Delia York, Asia Vieila."
Little Delia didn't waste any time making her peasants felt by scratching her mom at a house party.
Later Delia almost get killed by a runaway truck only to have herself saved by this Devil Dog named Ryder.
Going to school Delia takes care of the local bully by getting the big guy to wet himself in front of all his classmates.
"It's only later when Jo, Ann Hearen, is hired as Delia's nanny that the truth's comes out about her strange and evil powers."
"Jo herself is later thrown out, with the help of the sweet and cuddly family pet Ryder, of a second floor window to her death because she knew and talked too much."
Were put through the usual ringer with no one believing that little Delia is Thee AntiChrist until it was almost too late to stop her in her deadly rounds of destroying the entire human race.
Chad Allen pops up as Brad and he's TERRIBLE.
"The first centers around Nora and her struggles with various men in her life, including an elderly father who discovers he has only a few days left to live."
"After traveling along on separate tracks for awhile, these two narrative strands eventually come together when we learn that Ismael is a former lover of Nora's and the man she has chosen to adopt her son from an earlier, tragic relationship."
Ray Milland is a little scary because he looks as if he's been stuffed by a taxidermist.
Yvette Mimeux looks as if she's smoked up all the Beautiful Downtown Burbank Brown.
", All through the house, and Dig that cat, he's real gone."
Game On is a funny British sitcom and apparently he left because he wanted to break into Hollywood and star in this film.
Janeane's character is sickeningly arrogant (and guessing from her role as stand-up comedienne and arch-feminist is in real life too).
"Although having said that, I fail to see the appeal of Uma Thurman as well: she's lanky and gaunt looking."
"But, in later years, both actors have shown that they are better actors in other projects (Birney in his short-lived role in St."
By far the most valuable element in this documentary is to hear Leonard's reflections on his own life and career.
"And just as in the whole film, only Leonard Cohen remains his part and can tell about his own part."
"Astronaut Steve West sits in a plastic space capsule, commenting that you haven't lived until you've seen the sun through the rings of Saturn, all the while the obvious mid-day sunlight is streaming through the window, when suddenly he has a nose bleed."
"When dismissed, Gina feels like her whole surrounding is changing."
"Writer/director Sean Ellis definitely invokes feelings of curiosity and suspense in his script, but unfortunately he fails to properly elaborate them."
What does it say for British police when helicopters and a number of officers at Snipe's location can't find Snipe's and he manages to evade capture by hiding behind some stairs?
"Mma Makutsi moans about not having a computer, but given her constantly restyled hair, makeup and jewellery, I'm surprised she doesn't have a MacBook in her handbag along with her Visa card."
Eddie Murphy goes for shock value rather than laughs to try and win his following over.
"One of his jokes was something like, 'I wouldn't use crack, especially having the same name as between my ass' - Oh man, how did he come up with that one?!"
When the little bear gets lost on the ice burg and he is in the water he is trying to get to a piece of ice it says Come back stupid ass fool.
The film's main thrust is how a boy's temporary excursion into the Canadian wilderness after surviving a plane crash solo allows the disgruntled adolescent to deal with his anguish over discovering his mother's extramarital affair.
"Furthermore, despite the heralds of some reviewers of the family viewability of the film, there are several scenes not suitable for very young children or family viewing, including a graphic scene of the dead pilot underwater with one of his eyes apparently exploded."
"Such an emotional outburst could have easily worked to his advantage in his declaration of his nervous condition, but obviously the movie wanted to show him as a human being and only when he is about to die does he become sorrowful."
"But the driver does come to find them, and it's not just that the headlight on her vehicle got dinged, it's for another reason that the girls do not yet understand."
Of course the girls are scared to death & don't know what she's talking about.
"Additionally, the premise, the funny trailer, his co-star Jennifer Aniston's involvement, and the fact it was a massive hit stateside encouraged me."
DuncanCisco Kid Renaldo was actually very good in one of his first feature films.
Why he never got any bigger roles is beyond me.
"Seagal also went through hit squads like jellybeans, every time I look up he was commanding a new face so it kinda got hard to follow character development as well I know Steven's athsma prevent him from yelling at the top of his lungs but even so why is he constantly being dubbed by people who sound nothing like him?"
One major thing that has been changed about the older character is his obsession; in the original he was obsessed with games which turned out to be VERY important once the twists come into play.
"The rest of the film is devoted to Laurel and Hardy's support of wealthy patron Trudy Marshall and her inventor boyfriend, Robert Bailey."
"In this genre movie the first thing you need is a good music , and thats where Mr. shankar and his party fails."
Only Rhys Ifans tries to fill his role with life.
Director Roger Corman should be hung from a lightpost so that children can use him as a pinata
Nicholas Cage is a terrific actor - when he is in the right movies.
Proximity tells of a convict (Lowe) who thinks the prison staff is out to kill him.
"Much like Danny Devito's Penguin in Batman Returns, Carrey's Grinch is so thoroughly unlikeable that any degree of comedy that might be mined from his character simply evaporates."
"Where the 1966 cartoon featured a Grinch that we could all identify with, Carrey's Grinch is that angry, soulless old man that we've all seen at one time or another, sitting in a parked car muttering to himself or tripping toddlers at the supermarket with his cane."
"This Grinch is thoroughly bereft of any degree of humanity, humor, or insight whatsoever, and his redemption at the end of the movie rings false."
"Unfortunately, he tries to take it seriously seemingly without first taking exposition, sound design (in his defense, Hip-Hop is notoriously difficult to work into a period piece), set design, script writing nor period historical research (was it me,or were these the cleanest people with the whitest teeth in the old west?)"
Not a knock on Korman as he was very funny on the Carol Burnett show.
" Entrails of a Virgin is so bizarre and incomprehensible that it allows the viewer to interpret it subjectively, applying whatever meaning he wishes to its inexplicable excesses of sex and violence."
"This monster precedes to slay orgy participants one by one, except the proverbial virgin (if you don't count oral sex) who receives his seed and consequently becomes so passionate with desire that she masturbates with someone's severed hand."
Linda whole-heartedly tending to her lover's needs and desires.
At times this movie is harsh and dark of heart; a very unattractive look at the 'King' and his queen.
Morally ambiguous and predictable ending thanks to the foreshadowing and the good veteran cop's coming to terms he should submit to the vigilante attitude of the majority of the characters - check.
"Kamal Hasan has made a lot of effort in getting the period look right, pity he did not spend more time on the plot."
"Deidre turns out to be an ambitious daddy's girl who will stop at nothing to move up the corporate ladder, including screwing a top broker she can't stand and murdering anyone who gets on her bad side."
"overall it had bad, i mean AWFUL special effects, the acting wasn't too bad, but wasn't good either, and sasquatch himself was like.... well, not sasquatch."
"Franke Polente has little to do with a thin script than run down a lot of tunnels and scream every so often, indeed she was like pretty much everyone else in this film, out-acted by a small dog and a pack of tame rats."
"Kevin Bacon's acting was pretty good, but he couldn't salvage the movies lack of plot"
"A doctor removes a particle of grit from a woman's eye at a railway station, he is in a miserable relationship, she is happily married social worker of Italian ancestry."
"City girl Meg Tilly receives a horrifying phone call from her mother and, understandably shaken, returns home to her family's rural digs, only to be faced with a mystery: why are all the homespun residents acting out in bizarre and unsettling ways?"
"Some of the cinematography by Thomas Del Ruth is good (particularly a fire sequence set inside a garage), though he is let down by the scrappy editing--and a fairly bathetic finale."
"Now Dr. Lorenz is a mad scientist with some strange habits, including sleeping in coffins and injecting his elderly wife (Elizabeth Russell) with the fluid of young brides to keep her young."
"The story is very similar; a mad doctor develops a serum that he believes will alleviate pain, sickness and death, but he's apparently not a big believer in clinical trials and so winds up with a brain-eating zombie on his hands in the person of his nephew."
And director and writer Simon Gornick should be ashamed of himself to give men an injustice as he does.
Cary Grant tries to portray his usual charming and urbane persona but at times seems uneasy and staccato in his delivery.
"Capote coined the phrase nonfiction novel to describe the book on which this film is based, and the spirit of that form was carried over into the film script, which he co-wrote."
"If he was, I take back my compliment.)"
"What I'm waiting for -- not really, that's just rhetorical -- is a movie almost exactly like this one and a dozen others, but in which the victim is LYING in order to get her name and photo in the papers and garner all those sympathy chips from right-thinking folk like the rest of us."
"These barely-animated furbies have some kind of scheme to fulfill fantasies (which involve basically groteque characters' sex dreams - oh joy), but what that has to do with anything is anybody's guess, except to let the director indulge his kinky penchant for erotica."
"Moore allegedly stalled this project for years, waiting for just the right script before committing herself."
"A friend of mine lent this video to me and I was fairly excited to watch it, but after ten minutes of James Hetfield's slow pitched vocals and Lars banging on his drum set in what appeared to be slow motion I began to think, `Why am I watching this?'"
"Billy Bob is only in it for about two minutes (I guess he needed the work at that time in his career), and the rest of the movie is painful."
The killer snowman seems to be made out of styrofoam and his arms look like oversized oven mitts.
Ronnie Corbett must have been flat broke to demean himself with this rubbish.
"First off, the movie starts with a cop and his partner parked outside of a warehouse/furniture store."
"The bad cop eventually returns with a heavy duffel bag, and the newbie cop doesn't think there are any problems, but he still wonders what was in the bag, so he asks, gets a bullshit response, and then he thinks everything is OK (for now)."
"Now, the bad cop eventually kills this magically protected bitch, and then he gets rid of the duffel-bagged body."
A famous Punjabi singer with cancer checks into a small town hospital in the third world when he could easily afford the best medical treatment available.
starting with laying a ton of guilt on a small child to spare her pain!
Tree sucks as a bad guy despite all his disguises that makes him look exactly the same as he normally does.
"The film looks like it was shot by a D+ grad student of some film school excited to use every film technique he ever learned while attending classes....sometimes, less is more buddy."
"The beautiful, rebellious, curious teenager has 'all grown up' into a bland, boring wife and mother, and her trademark red hair is all tied up."
Michael Madsen is the only one in the film that has any kind of credits behind him.
"I came out of the film feeling that the mother of the victim was selfish in her mourning and completely closed minded due to her side of the fence, so to speak."
"Chris Rock is a wonderful stand-up comedian, but he just can't transfer his talent to this film, which probably only has two strained laughs in the whole picture."
Nadia was really pretty and I hope the movie didn't destroy her career.
"Director Danny Boyle has lost none of his predilection for raking in the gutter of humanity for characters but he has lost, in this film, the edge for creating inspiring and funny films."
"At one point near the end of the movie as an army of sasquatches were chasing after the remaining survivors, one gets shot and as it's running it looked like a poor man's version of donkey kong himself!"
"Personally I think it was Barney's attempt at flashing the audience with his anal, fecal, self-mutilation, and cannibalistic fetishes."
"It's mawkish, unnecessarily manipulative and dodges many of the big issues - ie Nash's affairs and his predilection for having sex with men in public places."
"His ignorance of the novel's real subtext (a straight man's fantasy, not a gay pride recruiting poster)caused him to make choices that were not only bad, but bizarre."
Uma plays it more like she's in a TV movie about a girl dying of leukemia.
"Sholay, the old one is a milestone in Indian cinema with an all-star cast, cult dialogue, stylish cinematography and a brilliant soundtrack which is still a hit with present generations too.A good actor like Ajay Devgan's TALENTS ARE wasted and his performance was average.Prashant Raj, a newcomer doesn't know what acting is ."
And then there's a scene where the hero hits his father's tombstone with---a sledgehammer?
"In an interview I heard that the director wanted to express in this film the feeling of a loss of identity that, according to him, the majority of the people in this globalizing world experience."
"When I started watching this movie I saw the dude from Buffy, Xander, and figured ah how nice that he's still making a living acting in movies."
"Reid is pretty much exactly what she should be, background sex appeal, as whenever she tries to act it is a disaster (as is the incredibly bad scientist look she has in the beginning)."
"MacLaine is charming as ever, but she plays a caricature - and this reliance on caricatures is one of the basic problems with the film."
"The place is utterly crowded, with the typical noise and chaos - plus it's happening in the evening - and yet the guy somehow finds Frankie (in spite of being drunk as a doorknob) and shoots at him."
The writer of this nonsense seems to have read crappy dime novels his whole life - how else is the writing of this movie to be explained?
"MacLaine is treated as worthless by everyone, while the blond bimbo is treated as a princess and an intellectual; the ironic truth is that the latter's character comes off as rather dumb and not at all as intellectual; her behaviour, comments, and opinions are mostly cliched, silly, confused, pretentious, and primitive."
At least MacLaine's character KNOWS that she (MacLaine) is dumb.
"So, yeah, a kid stops playing little league because he doesn't like nukes, this prompts major media attention and a quick resolution to the cold war."
It is too bad the R rating did not allow much of her to be seen.
Here's a puzzle - it's revealed during Police Inspector Russell's (Purnell Pratt) investigation of Harker's death that Terry/Morgan had been employed as his secretary for three weeks.
The revelation of janitor Peterson as the bad guy of this piece comes under somewhat gruesome circumstances as we see him stuff the unconscious body of Miss Morgan in the building's incinerator furnace!
"Alvin Rakoff reveals himself as a dreadful director, both in the technical and artistic aspects."
"In the former, because he commits mistakes that even a first grade film student would wisely avoid."
This Tybalt is so mean-looking that we don't believe the characters' pity after his demise.
"Brian Poeshn's character has an unhealthy obsession with Tab in one episode, and it's hilarious seeing him in a Tab T-shirt."
But actor Clayton Moore (the movie Lone Ranger) acquits himself competently as an actor.
Can this young punk keep his street cred whilst making it big?
"Unless you're interested in seeing Chad Lowe's early days, before he finally got his piece of the pie with his role as the HIV-positive gay guy on the series Life Goes On, or Gail O'Grady who was on NYPD Blue and probably got to stare at Dennis Franz's buttocks)."
"Probably the director wanted to show the fragility of the human life, but what he does is bore and impress the audience with scenes that shock you a little bit."
"I know a kid doesn't grow much in half a year, which is fine, but he at least grows more than he does in three weeks."
"Just don't get another actor to play Ned, or at least get him to play the five minutes when he's three weeks younger."
"And even if the original actor did die, the filmmakers should have at least gotten an actor who looks like him to play the remainder of his role, and re-shoot the measly five minutes of six months later scenes."
"Duncan Renaldo is fairly convincing as an Arab sheik--despite his Spanish accent--and veteran bad guy George J. Lewis as Renaldo's Arab rival does his usual fine job of villainy, even if he goes a bit over the top sometimes."
"A Yank in Libya isn't very good, of course--well, OK, it stinks--but it would be worth a look just to see Parkyakarkus in his prime."
"Our hero, Mark, may or may not have done it, but he is forced to run to avoid prosecution."
"For someone who is supposed to know much about movies, his own is, cinematographicly speaking: yeiks."
"If you're a Ewan McGregor fan... believe me, by skipping this film, you haven't missed anything but five minutes collective of him in a silly hat and a bad haircut"
"Movie opens with chimpnaut blundering a simulation, proving he's not that smart from the outset."
"Marky Mark appears in shot without his characteristic underpants showing, then is turned down by a plain woman who prefers the touch of chimpanzees."
"Marky then demonstrates the space station's mind-boggling security ineptness by stealing a pod without anyone noticing, while simultaneously demonstrating his abject stupidity in mounting a deep-space rescue mission into a worm-hole for an expendable test chimp, with a million dollar vehicle with limited fuel and oxygen supplies."
"Since Marky Mark did not get to show his pecs, take down his pants, or bust his lame whiteboy rap, he was characterless."
Michael Clarke Duncan's gorilla teeth being inserted crookedly helped immensely in establishing *his* lack of character.
Marky Mark has currently only established that he has tight underpants.
"Later, the commander orders two of the crew to remain in the ship while he and another go outside."
The two he ordered to stay say 'no way' and follow out; I didn't have high hopes for the expedition's success by this point.
So how would a cop react if he saw lewd acts performed by adults with children around?
LaBute has said he created the fiance and daughter story thread to give Cage's character an incentive to search.
The irony of course would be that the child Cage saves ultimately brings him death.
Sarandon sends a hired-hand up to the high-rise one night to check out a certain room above Cristina's apartment where she heard metallic clanging and other loud racket.
He winds up dead the very same night Cristina kills her DEAD father in a nightmare.
How the priests know that now is the time when a certain man will die and must be replaced to guard a certain gate in that high-rise and why Cristina suffers through the trauma she does isn't adequately explained.
"And the girl Modine was in love with, suddenly she's shoving half a head of lettuce in her mouth and acting in a goofy way?"
Far worse than the old crippled guy who wants to take over peter's work and gloats over him while he's in the hospital.
"Lois Chiles plays a cheating spouse, who ends up running over a hitch-hiker, or so she thinks."
"The plot is pure pseudo-religious hokum, the acting is wooden and Roeg's attempts at his trademark dislocation of time are pitiful."
"The cameo by a very young Ernie Hudson (of Ghostbusters fame), the continuity errors (characters looking one way in one shot, and another in the next, Dolemite's suit changing colors in every single shot of his nightclub act), and Queen Bee's demonic eyes in her first scene."
But the real joy here is Rudy Ray Moore himself.
"The Captain, Gene Hackman, is all for launching, while his first officer, Denzel Washington, is in favor of confirming the launch orders first."
Lee Remick is good although she also is ageless in her later years.
The talented Joanna Lumley is under utilized and also manages to look forever young when her middle aged son (Robert Urich) finally marries Grandma Stephanie Powers.
Stacey Keach's ceaseless arrogance makes you wonder what these women saw in him.
Can anybody believe that handsome Robert Urich would remain single for decades waiting for Stephanie Powers to finally accept his endless marriage proposals?
"One of the best kabuki actors alive, and he gets lost in the dreck"
What in heaven's name do Bel or Frances see in him as he is neither drop dead gorgeous or even interesting?
"To make matters worse, actor John Gordon Sinclair attempts to rehash his performance as the adolescent Gregory right down to the facial expressions and awkward body language."
"It's hard to know what was going through Bill Forsyth's head when he wrote this script or why he thought fans of the original film would embrace a story so completely lacking in the charm, wit and warmth that turned the first movie into a classic."
"Also, after they leave Costner for dead, they make Madeline Stowe's character become a whore, then she attacks one of Quinn's men that was paying for a turn... she stabs him with his own knife, and the next thing she's been moved to a convent!"
Franchot Tone walked through this one as if he were hungover.A casting disaster is one thing.This film is a total disaster.
"Meryl Streep gives the performance of her life, melodramatic, overwrought but with that comic genius that keeps you laughing even as a mother struggles with the ultimate horror."
Jeff Lowell has written & directed 'Over Her Dead Body' poorly.
"Meanwhile the neighbors who sold the Pykes the cabin find themselves victims as well, alcoholic Mr Booth's abuse to his wife coming back to haunt him."
"Cheri Christian remains so vacuous and lost, it's incredibly hard to connect with her despite the fact that you understand her plight."
"Cheri comes off as cold and detached, as I figure a mother would tend to be when you lose a child in such a way, but the icy nature left me pleading inside to embrace her which I just never could."
"Somebody might shoot him, but this kind of risk-taking is limited to the movies."
"But that said, Holland Taylor's histrionics and the amount of leeway afforded her, in the courtroom portion of this story, made the actions of Matlock/Mason more-closely resemble the slow, often boring detail such as seen on Court TV and in real-life courtrooms."
"SO, they put patches on his head."
"One of them for instance discovers that the skin virus has infected her legs, so what does she do?"
Another kid likes to drop F-bombs in reacting to everything around him and shoot squirrels.
Instead that was the night one of the best wrestlers to come out of Canada a true human being fell to his death due to a stunt gone wrong.
Vince Mchmaon has made some stupid decisions in his life but this was by far the stupidest decision he ever made.
"Also, the dubbed dialog is pretty hilarious in a camp fashion, especially the worlds most swinging doctor (he drinks on the job)."
"Meanwhile, the mob boss guy has made a deal to get into the prison so that he can save his imprisoned brother."
Who would ever ask fat Texas sheriff Joe Don Baker to escort an Italian he illegally arrested in Mexico back to Italy?
Incredible that no filmmaker has been daring enough to show the real side of Che and his posthumous media transformation.
Try me for the sequence where Stallone's character jumps some 20 meters with full climbing gear or (and this is really my favorite) snuffs a bad guy by sticking him onto a stalactite.
"Laszlo Kardos is also a director who has done only 10 movies in his lifetime, despite the fact that his career span from 1935 till 1957."
Snafu realises he was wrong when he thought they had it easy.
A cannibalistic backwoods killer is on the prowl and two bickering couples might be his next source of protein in this bargain basement Friday the 13th-clone cheapie.
"Take a well-know genius you have not read, describe him as demented, include crazy physicians to cure him, a couple of somewhat good looking women, have his role played by an actor with an enormous mustache, have every character speak with the strongest accent, show ridiculous dreams, include another prestigious figure who has nothing to do with the first one (Freud), mention a few words used in the genius' works, overdo everything you can, particularly music, and you are done."
"Sam Mraovich is a genius, perhaps the most genius writer/director/producer/chef/babysitter/walmart greeter to ever grace the cinema world with his art."
June Allyson as his regular love interest holds up the family values and E.J.
The director and co-writer says he wanted to mix genres - in this case drama and comedy.
Eventually toward the end I fast forwarded the final long speech one of the main characters makes to his ex-lover's son.
"To the detriment of the audience, viewpoints keep changing from Nora and Ismael, her ex-lover confined against his will in a psychiatric hospital."
The epilogue does not really wrap up many of the sub-plots and seems to want the viewer to believe Nora somehow will find happiness although given her circumstances in real life the chances are equivalent to a snow ball's chance in hell.
Give Meyers the hook and lock him in a cell with Adam Sandler and Will Farrell.
And there's that bickering Dad who rails at his pregnant daughter as though he himself were the stressed out boyfriend.
While I love the Richard Donner movies I didn't like their sometimes campy nature or the changes they made to Superman's character and his powers.
Singer however chose to take the worst elements of the Donner movies and put them in his version.
"Unlike Singer has said, this is not a movie about a superhero returning and trying to find his place in the world."
Lois is the only one who's not happy to see him back.
Even Luthor is happy to have Superman back because it gives him a chance to settle the score with the man of steel.
"Only complaint about the story is Roy's love interest, a rather threadbare, unlikeable woman who can't give him the time of day until he becomes a big shot -- if you're like me, you'll be hoping that he gives her the shove-off at the end."
"The director Makinen is up there with the best camp directors, and this is his best movie."
This brief (just over sixty minutes) tale isn't so much inspired by the classic spaghetti Westerns as it is a rip-off of Sam Raimi's THE QUICK & THE DEAD (his admitted homage to the spaghetti Westerns) brought into a contemporary setting.
I hope with the next four movies that more of the book is followed and if Clarks character is in them I hope he's got a bigger part and I hope his part isn't so bland.
Liv Tyler is also not up to her role.
"Mike White needs to find another character,he has done this same type person a few times too many."
Sutherland is the best pal who believes his guilty because there would be no movie if he didn't.
"As usual in a film like this the role of the Prez himself is nothing more than a tool, a token and is very badly written."
I've enjoyed LaBute's early films and a few of his plays...but it's a strange fascination he has.
"It's as though the director sensed that he was making crap, so he thought it best to keep the crap short"
Detective Russell Logan(Lou Diamond Phillips)has a major problem on his hands.
"They will seek help from Sister Marguerite(Elizabeth Arlen)who has tried to inform her superiors in the Catholic church of The First Power, but has been denied access to a weapon that can stop Channing..a cross with a blade that can penetrate the heart of Channing ridding the world of his evil."
"In the film, Mykelti Williamson, always a reliable welcome supporting actor, gets the partner of Russell role..so you know what will happen to him."
"As in films of this type, everyone around Russell is dying, but when he attempts to kill Channing, he's merely murdering the weak host of some other poor soul he possesses."
"So this metal kid gets some powers and instead of using them to kill the bully boys (which would have made much more sense), he freaks out and tries to protect all of the bully boys and girls from harm."
The rest of the movie is about this metal kid going around town trying to kill the horrible metal star he idolized.
"One was of the side of her face and head/neck and you could clearly see the cord that was used to strangle her around her neck, and bruising on her face."
The story then witters on about a psychologist and her failing marriage which is tied into the failing marriage of wife-killing blackout driver.
"Somehow, his direction is not enough."
"I noticed how funny Dani (1,65m; 5'5 height) looked in his platform shoes ripping a head of a mugger apart."
"We do know, however, that this cat must have been on illegal substances, as his heart is almost half his size.)"
"That isn't fair, and even Clint Eastwood has fallen prey to the urge with his new movie about Iwo Jima."
Whether or not his film is any good stands as a separate consideration from whether or not that battle was a noble cause fought by men who were heroes.
"Previous commentator Steve Richmond stated that A Walk On The Moon is, in his words not worth your $7."
"Sure, his character spends the vast majority of the film neglecting a wife with an existential crisis, but he plays the angered reaction of a man who feels cheated brilliantly."
"Viggo Mortensen also deserves credit for his portrayal of a travelling salesman, although perhaps not to the same extent."
"No matter how many times I rewatch Liev's scenes, I cannot help but feel he has been shortchanged in the direction or editing."
If the casting director was intending to cast a Jane who was plain he certainly succeeded.
"Anyway, a twitchy vampire who seems slightly autistic becomes infatuated with a stripper (as a result of watching too much porn in his crappy home)."
"Much is made of that deadline, despite the fact that he also says that he can go without feeding, it will just make him hungrier."
"Asrani a great talent, but overdoes his bit as before."
"When you're not looking at a horribly filmed angle of the narrator at a lecture hall, you're watching him set up his camera to take pictures in different locations."
Powell is the writer of a revue called Meet The People and he's a shipyard worker who wins a lottery date with movie star Lucille Ball.
Dick Powell's next film was Murder My Sweet in which he finally bid a not so fond adieu to musicals.
"Divorced lawyer Rick Magruder (Branagh) stumbles drunk out of a party hosted by his firm one night and has a chance meeting with a woman named Mallory Doss (Davidtz), who was a waitress at the party and seems to have lost her car."
I don't know enough about Lindsey Lohan's work to have been interested in what she would bring to the film.
"Mack's performance doesn't add much to MABEL AT THE WHEEL, but he probably had to be on hand for the filming of this one to make sure his stars didn't kill each other"
"No idea, the director was probably his brother!"
The inept writer/director (same dude) butchered up everyone's talent with his horrendous uh...work.
This was the 70's and looks like the director was on a bad acid trip and wanted everyone to experience what it's like to be inside his head.
"Dave Coulier is a one note joke 30 something year old that does cartoon voices and acts like a kid, and he's horrid."
"Christian Slater must be proud of himself, he successfully proved that it is possible to act decent in a film worse then drinking antifreeze."
Sometimes I'm glad he or she was taught such a lesson to never put money towards garbage worse then dog dung tied up in a bag.
"Hardly one to be faulted for his ambition or his vision, it is genuinely unexpected, then, to see all Park's effort add up to so very little."
"And since the movie received an R rating, I expected to see her nude."
"Alas, no dice for her or of the other gorgeous actress that appeared here: Stacey Nelkin who's supposed to be a teen but was actually 20 when she made this."
He also says one of my favorite lines: I'm trying to come.
Morvern is completely detaching herself.
Pretty Egyptologist Erica Baron (Lesley Anne-Down) is on a working vacation in Cairo when she stumbles across the shop of antiques dealer Abdu-Hamdi (John Gielgud).
"Consequently, he shows her a beautiful and incredibly rare statue of Pharoah Seti I that he is keeping secretly in his shop."
"Afraid yet tantalised by what she has seen, Erica attempts to track down the treasure."
"Down couldn't be less convincing as a female Egyptologist one assumes she would be quite well-educated and resourceful, yet she spends the entire film screaming helplessly like some busty bimbo from a teen slasher flick."
Stuart Granger hid his British accent and turned in a formidable performance as Taylor's partner.
Taylor is a bigot here and his hatred for the Indians really shows.
"(Not to be confused with Moore, Mandy -- although I'd like to see her again too."
"Gamera, however, develops a much more unique personality in his later films - most of which are worth watching if you are a kaiju fan"
"Even with less than a second of screen time, the viewer can easily see that it is just a man with a tail apparently taped to him running around."
I find it fascinating that the character does nothing that requires him to have that accent - therefore there was no reason for the actor to try to do one.
"This movie hasn't aged very well at all and now it's main appeal is just to see a snap shot of Sin City, circa 1969 and all the incessant smoking, the weird hair (Drivas has an atomic comb over that makes him resemble a well-groomed hip Cousin It) and trendy fashions that went along with it."
Don Rickles is on board as a blackjack dealer... seemingly preparing him for a role as a floor manager in the much better CASINO two decades later.
Pacino would have been great if they could just have dubbed him.
"Don Corleone would have made this disappear five minutes after meeting him, smiling and patting him on the back all the while"
"Jamie Brett Gabel was the only guy in the film that looked any good at all, but his good looks were sadly put to waste."
"long, and at the end the director opens his can of sentimentality."
"Doc showing up, then using his wrist-watch remote-control to open the safe, and the sniper's bullet missing him by 5 inches because the refractive glass, were just about the only things left the same."
Pamela Hensley-- though her part was almost unrecognizable from the original story-- is terrific.
"Before she let her hair down, I also realized she looked a HELL of a lot like Ardala Valmar from those awful John Calkins BUCK ROGERS strips I just read the other day."
"(Ardala actually got plastic surgery in the George Tuska strips-- after, she was stunning!)"
"Of course Shen lets her, but his character has an excuse."
"Shen also told Wendy that it was his destiny for him to die for her in battle, as he had for her great-grandmother (I am assuming that part)."
"Until finally, the great evil comes out of Wendy's rival-for-homecoming's body, and creates the actual embodiment of himself out of the broken pieces of the bodies of his ancient warriors."
Then Shen goes and defends her from this guy- forgive me for forgetting his long Chinese name- and manages to get himself killed.
Wendy catches Shen as he makes his long descent from being thrust uncomfortably high into the air.
"Even though her neck should have been broken and she survived the ordeal, still, you've got to give the director some effort for trying a western first."
"SAFE sex in its many forms IS healthy and not some evil that apparently Richard Gere character is obsessed with , on his way for some sexual crusade."
or for how long an American teenager can see extreme violence on pg-13 but he can not even see a woman breast until R-18!?!?
And the idea that a convicted murderer would actually ask his victim's parents to take in and care for his daughter is beyond belief.
"Most Hilarious is porker Gil Gerard, who's so fat that you will never recognize him as TV's Buck Rogers."
"And I also got the impression that the flight attendant was NOT able to get the door closed, that she basically just gave up on that point."
Gruner is probably not very well known because of his script-choosing if this movie is anything to compare possible choices to.
"Normally, a director will grow and learn from his previous efforts ... not this guy."
The vampire himself would not look out of place in a Bela Lugosi film.
This film started out very promising with the story about a director who loses his sight and a blind woman who is bound to help him.
"One unbelievable event followed the next (Russia must be very small because they are all bumping into each other all the time), the motivation of the female lead character comprehensible (why does she still follow him after they got off the ship?"
"Pasolini's work is visually jarring, but this is less a matter of what is actually on the screen than how it is filmed, and the jumpiness of his films seem less a matter of artistic choice than the result of amateur cinematography."
"** CONTAINS SPOILERS ** The truly exquisite Sean Young (who in some scenes, with her hair poofed up, looks something like Elizabeth Taylor) is striking in her opening moments in this film."
"Walker is open, emotional, and at ease at all times...in that there's no apparent barrier between what she may be feeling and her expression of it."
"Basically, she doesn't have a clue."
"The film also has several self-aware moments that come off a wee disconcerting, such as references in songs to LeGrand himself."
"Russell discovers the chimp's talent, and uses him to advance his own career."
Annie Mcenroe's reaction to being told that her sister (presumably Dee Wallace from the first movie) is (was?)
"The storyline is good, if a bit bland and the acting was good enough though I didn't understand why Olivia d'Abo had such a pronounced Australian accent if her character was supposed to have been raised in the US."
"And that potato sack-like, sad excuse for a coat she wore throughout the film made me break out in hives."
"The scene where the kidnap victim is told that her parents are not dead, and have been looking for her since she was taken, is just bizarre."
It is written as a cathartic therapy moment with the head of the shelter for runaways handing her a missing poster from when she was eight.
"In the real world, if the head of a shelter for runaways found out that he had, under his roof, a solved kidnapping, what would have followed would have been an immediate call to the police."
"Washington did a decent job with what was handed to him, but you could tell that this was not Lee's favorite film."
"By keeping the same pacing and direction, he was able to bring this tragic character around full circle and give him the chance to change his life."
"As for the male lead, Armand Assante, his interpretation of the role reminded me mainly of doctors in cheese 1980s hospital series."
"Steven Segal should never ever show his face in public again, I can't imagine what made him agree to star in this, the worst film I have seen in my entire life"
Things got so bad by mid way my cat took his first ever bath.
"Then, the tinder for the plot to kill the king was because the king didn't have dinner and sex with his Queen?"
"I read another user's comments about audio being dubbed, but don't think his was dubbed ... after all, he speaks English, right?"
The German general being practically scared of his captured American private.
I also enjoyed how the hotel manager attempted to talk him out of entering the hotel room.
"The movie has one nude scene: A man sitting on the edge of the bed, with his exposed genitals smack dab in the middle of the screen."
"Audrey Tatou is cute, of course, but her character is an unhappy girl."
"I wondered if the director was from a very upper crust, educated French family and he looks down on these characters."
"Not entirely sure what happens, but I think the screenplay writer found God somewhere in there, finished writing this script, and had no time to edit it because he had a KKK meeting to get to with his friends from the Westboro Church and his hood wasn't clean."
This nutcase is quite wealthy and his bachelor status can be quite alluring.
"Alan's cousin, George(Rod Murdock), seems to be quite a good friend who often supplies him victims..I mean dates, while holding onto hope of getting his lord's estate some day."
To simply believe that people put up with this guy because we are told he has a heart of gold does not mesh with the reality of the situation.
"My best/worst part of the film is when a female character is pointing a gun at someone and threatening to shoot them if they don't back off, you can see that she isn't even covering the trigger with her finger just holding the grip."
"2)His intentions are somewhat uncertain the killer want all of the main victims family and friends dead so he can have her all to his self, he says he loves her but the next minute he trys to kill her, so does he want to kill her, love her or just plain rape her??"
"3) The killer is too good, how did he develop all of his skills?"
"I look at 'The Return' as a test for Kapadia because for all of you that don't know, this is his first full-length feature film."
"This kid is rather bad, but in no way do they make him the type that outsmarts adults and can foil experienced thieves at every turn."
A nice couple looking to adopt get rather suckered into adopting him and while the husband is a bit more willing to give this kid a chance the mother is not.
"Even the kid is rather annoying at first in this one, and they kind of chill him out in the sequel too."
"Not sure about this character, at first I thought it was supposed to be his real father or something."
"Even though he seemed to be giving it some effort, he MUST have needed the money... there's no other explanation"
"I wonder which... 5) The singing professor gave Holly the Carmen song saying she had the range, which she clearly did NOT."
Bogart plays a laughable Mexican bandit who can't decide who's side he's on.
"This wannabe director, Miike, will NEVER make a film equal to one of the geniuses I just listed because he just doesn't have the talent!"
"Lansbury is always good, but her character here is very one dimensional and the motives for her crime in the mystery are totally obvious."
Jeanette is more than embarrassing in her one hep number with Binnie Barnes--and Nelson can only come up with a blank stare when faced with the most ludicrous situations.
But perhaps fate has something nasty in store for her too...
"It's also very easy to point out which ones will make it out of this adventure alive, especially when one of the soldiers is against all types of violence and another one continuously stares at video images of her cute 3-year-old son."
Plenty of tidbits purely for American audiences (the supermarket boss and his horribly forced catchphrase).
"The storyline is simple : a catholic priest who does abstract painting tries to find out who (another abstract painter) killed his little brother, a male prostitute (raped by another priest when he was young...)."
The kidnappers happen to be former business partners of the son's father and are looking to exact some revenge on him.
"While Messing has perfected the repressed princess, 30- something woman with a failed relationship history, her neurotic and drunken moves on yet another faux beau is simply the restating of her TV series."
When Charlie's fiance goes out of town he's stuck with all of the wedding planning.
"Plus, one sickly confederate soldier said that he was a Johnny Reb, A Confederate a Rebel,...--almost like he was the cartoon character Mojo Jojo from the Powerpuff Girls."
"Back then in the early 1930s, she would have been entitled to hefty spousal and child support but lets the guy off amazingly easy...with no support...what a sap!"
"is now pretending to be the daughter's friend, but he has lecherous designs on her."
"There aren't even any hotties in the cast, except for maybe Esai, although for the younger set he's pretty old, since he's over 25."
"So when Mr Anderson's film reached the cinemas the disgruntled former revolutionaries revelled vicariously in what they saw as Mr Malcolm McDowell's glorious victory over an amorphous Them despite the fact that he was ruthlessly gunned down at the end,a fate that would have undoubtedly overtaken them had they succeeded in their attempts to get into the U.S.Embassy."
"The film told us nothing new about Public Schools,homosexuality,bullying cold showers,patrician sarcastic teachers,silly traditions.an all-too familiar list .It was declared to be an allegory comparing Britain to the corrupt,crumbling society represented by the school.Well,nearly forty years on the same schools are still flourishing,the British social system has not changed,the October Revolution has been long forgotten except by those involved on one side or the other and Mr Anderson has completed his State of the Country trilogy to no effect whatsoever."
Adam's father Alan plays a shrink who seems to be not top of his game.
"After all these years Tony seems to be very out of place due to the attack, and then he'll get the chance to catch in his state."
I turned it off after one of the bad guys was shot through the forehead and still had the forethought to turn to his shooter and smile before collapsing.
Kata Dobo was something nice to look at despite her ridiculous outfit and make-up.
"I have been a fervent Hal Hartley supporter since I saw his short Surviving Desire in high school, and even then was still completely unmoored by his searingly brilliant Henry Fool."
"The majority of the new faces are as frivolous and poorly-developed as the movie: one particularly flat character ends up hogging half the time we spend with the infamous Henry Fool himself, and it's his only spoken scene in the film!"
"and I still don't understand this guy that they find in the cave, what in the hell is he?"
"Ann-Margret, she of sex-kitten repute and too often accused of lacking acting ability, finds her actual and rather profound abilities wasted here - despite her speaking with a nigh-flawless Middlesex accent."
"While this film has been praised in some quarters as a serious depiction of the tragedy, it is in fact nothing but a star-studded display of a once-talented filmmaker being overtaken by his own narcissism."
"An army guy and his sex crazed girl will make you wanna leap off a cliff, and the dorky friend who gets his kicks off phone sex will make you say, He has got some nice red shorts."
I Am Curious is really two films in one - half of it is the sexual experimental side of Lena and the other half is her curiosity with political/socialism.
"William Baldwin keeps reappearing in films, and frankly, one wonders if he has a great agent, or is it that directors and producers love his unusual goofy looks, complimented by that strange hairdo he sports in most of his movies."
Even though his role in this movie is limited and even completely unnecessary...it was good to see him again.
"Jerry Stiller seems to be phoning in his role just to do a buddy a favor, and the rest of the name actors must simply be desperate for work."
"Richard Burton looks close to death in this film, and we're supposed to believe he looks Good for sixty."
"And if you're a fan of Burton, rent something when he was good looking, and not a fossil"
Frankie Darro had a sometimes abrasive screen presence but in this he was playing a good kid.
"He blows the smoke off his gun one too many times, if you know what I mean, and I think you do."
"Dr. John Banning(John Hubbard)plans to wed Isobel(Elyse Knox), but doesn't know that Bey secretly covets his fiance making plans to kidnap her with Kharis' help."
"Though Metamorphosis starts off with a lot of promise, the film unravels into bland idiocy and MST3K-style cheese as Clark Kent wannabe 'Doctor' Peter Houseman (Gene LeBrock) is pressured into releasing information on his secretive projects."
All this changes when a bank robber runs over Preston's bike and passes him a blank check as compensation.
"Preston uses the check to withdraw $1 million from the bank (ironically, the money belongs to the bank robber who gave him the check)."
William Fischter is the only actor who is believable in his role as a brainless grunt who just wants to spill blood.
"Spacey shows he's not a terrible director, but he lacks a sort of feel for shaping a movie and it feels like he's just filming actors act."
Spacey himself appeared in a similar movie about hostage situations: The Negotiator.
"My guess is that they BAGGED Sutherland first, and used him to lure the others like lemmings into this."
A friend once asked me to read a screenplay of his that had been optioned by a movie studio.
"Anita and Me seems to be little more than an excuse for Meera Syal, the author of the novel and screenplay, to air her prejudices, grievances and general antipathy towards the English."
Just imagine you are being cut open like that and then listen to what he says.
And his mother...how the hell does she figure something like that out?
"Someone comes to tell her, her son died in surgery (what she kind of had to expect)."
"OK, really finally - when the introductory comments (in a voice-over, no less) casually mention that one of the characters gave up her boyfriend to focus on her fencing you can be darn sure there'll be some fencing by the end of the movie."
There's no real skin here--Ayers just strips down SLOWLY to her underwear (twice).
Caine even had the nerve to do a remake of Sleuth with Jude Law playing his original part.
This movie was made during a period of Caine's career when it was obvious he needed to pay off gambling debts.
The skeleton who gives muscular Captain John Bromfield (as Brannigan) his half of the treasure map is very good.
"I was interested to see the move thinking that it might be a diamond in the rough, but the only thing I found was bad writing, horrible directing (the shot sequences do not flow) even though the director might say that that is what he is going for, it looks very uninspired and immature) the editing could have been done by anyone with 2 VCRs and the stock was low budget video."
Philly is awkward and doesn't know how to react at first but soon he goes for it and has sex but than to his horror it seems that Nicole has died from a heart attack!
Director Alan Myerson can boast that he made a hit film but the truth is that he never really had a career in films although he did go on to be very successful in television.
It staggers along to a dreadful conclusion which appears to only happen because the director got bored and just wanted to wrap up quickly in order to get home for his dinner.
"Reporter Ethan Kendrick is called in to investigate the matter, and he arrives at the conclusion that a girl, stricken with a mysterious illness, named Sarah is suppose to help him."
Condon just shot her stomping around the stage--no drama at all!
"Boll does his best to ride over these naysayers, exploiting tax credits available in Germany and Canada to keep working and raising money from a network of dentists as Zero Mostel did with old ladies in The Producers."
The difference being that Mostel's character knew he was making bowel fill.
"Mindful of the fictional law that says anyone still alive after 3 attempts must go free, though if you'd been fried with that much electricity why would you want to, they pronounce him legally dead and bury him, only for the disgruntled killer to resurface and begin a whirlwind tour of his gaolers."
Boll begins his 'exploration of nihilistic rage' with Seed watching footage of animals being tortured for experimental purposes.
"A lawyer makes more sense since he ends up representing Jabez Stone against the devil him/herself (he was a man in the story, but was a woman in the movie) in a trial where both of their souls are on the line."
More interesting we learn what a washed up director is willing to do to regain his position of power in the entertainment industry and/or political establishment.
"One of her first lines is, I'm not here!"
"The second act has the three studs all falling for Mia and then developing brain rot, failing to ask each other or her about what's really happening between the four of them."
"The right-wing Republican James Stewart was a huge racist in real life, just like his close friend John Wayne."
The thing that I remembered most of Ron Moore's earlier work was that he was the one who penned the death of Capt.
"At one point, after a character is attacked by an ax-wielding fairy, his brother asks him, Why is your dick over there, Chuck?"
"Some of the acting isn't too bad, but the kids all stink and P. J. Soles should be ashamed of herself for doing this film."
"If this was a film posted on YouTube by a teenager, I might have applauded the teen in doing so much with his mommy's video camera."
"For example, the scene with the kid throwing a radio into a lady's tub and watching her naked and frying is pretty bad."
The movie's focus is Gray (Graham) and her issues with intimacy.
While Rani plays the college friend of the wife who does her the same favour.
"The author never even comes close to undestand his brother's motivations, but at least realizes, that he is lacking the slightest amount of homour / fun."
One of the problems with the film is the central character: we're supposed to sympathise with her but end up instead urging her to get a life.
The makings of the film don't understand that the George Romero zombie films only worked because he kept his politics subtly in the background of most of his films (Land of the Dead withstanding).
"The duel between Anna's two realities drags on far too long to sustain interest, especially considering that the little girl playing her is the most abrasive child actor I've ever seen."
"Putting Melanie Griffiths in, for eye candy reasons, is understandable, but again, she did not portray the depth or ambivalence, so need to pull this off."
A major failing of this film is that it introduces and then leaves its hero (Fillion) to follow Grant Grant (Michael Rooker) as he is first introduced and then becomes the monster.
"By the time this character is attacked, we know hardly anything about her and could care less about her, even though she is a winsome teenage girl in her bath."
"Had Gunn decided not to use this character and just used one of the established minor characters, he could have completely avoided introducing her family, and saved time and money."
"Fitz returns to Manchester after 7 years for his daughters wedding and gets involved in a murder investigation were a soldier, tormented by flash backs from his tour of duty in Northern Irland, goes on a killing spree."
Kurupt should be ashamed of himself.
His character Twitch is pretty much a spineless minstrel puppet who spends most of his time posing while getting jacked up by Burke or the other inmates.
Bill Goldberg spends most of his time sulking throughout the movie as if he had to take a PHD(pretty huge dump).
"He plays the recurring organ theme music (sort of a death rattle used for the killings), the brother's spirit starts talking (The whole house will go with me!)"
"Bela Lugosi is an evil botanist who sends brides poisoned orchids on their wedding day, steals the body in his fake ambulance/hearse and takes it home for his midget assistant to extract the glandular juices in order to keep Bela's wife eternally young."
"Bela Lugosi hams it up nicely, but you can tell he needed the money."
They're is one real beautiful woman in the film who plays Dragonfly but she's barely in it.
"Seagal rebounded a tiny bit with the Trashy-but enjoyable Shadow Man last time we saw him.However Attack force has to be his absolute worst movie ever!Don't argue for out for a Kill,Ticker,or even Black Dawn folks.This is the bottom of the Septic tank here."
The Producers have also unwisely decided to do what the fans hate the most:throw in stunt double after stunt double and horribly dubbed Steven Seagal.Who seems to show little enthusiasm here.Can ya blame him?
So Now This leaves Seagal in the impossible position to come up with something to atone for this mess.But after seeing how bad Attack Force has turned out do we really want him to make another movie
"Aside from the actor playing Robin Hood himself, the rest were just terrible."
It began with some poor peasant trying to hunt for a deer to feed his family.
"Kevin wants to impress his incredibly insensitive, bratty, and virginal girlfriend AMY."
"Daphne's already a disgusting slut, so she doesn't have a heart's desire."
One can only hope that he won't be making deals anytime soon to make another cliche-ridden film like The One.
"On the other hand, who better to not see the mistakes and drawbacks of the play and fix upon them than the original writer himself?"
The church is secretly torn as to whether or not he really is committing heinous sins behind everyone's backs.
"Streep seems to be Oscar-worthy in every role she's in, and here she is no different as her sternness and cold-hearted behavior places a blanket of fear in all the students and with some of the staff in the church."
"I look forward to William H. Macy's installment, and hope he gets a decent director and screenwriter for his segment."
"To much nudity, which seems to appear from nowhere and has no connection or whatsoever to the plot proves that Alt&#305;oklar was unsuccessfully to try something new as he has quoted."
"Lamas is, well, himself."
The division in the movie title seems more indicative of the gulf that exists in Greenstreet's ideological differences with his religion and State.
"Sybil Danning is nice to look at, but her acting performance is less than satisfactory."
"Judd Omen looks the part he plays, but his voice and acting are unconvincing to say the least."
"Side note: As of this writing, the censors at youtube.com have still not taken down the ending credits with Sybil Danning ripping off her top several times while the Babel song is playing!"
Stephen King should have openly denounced any affiliation with the film and he should have forbidden using the title The Running Man for this shameless waste of film.
"MY BROTHER TOM Aspect ratio: 1.85:1 Sound format: Dolby Digital Following an episode of sexual abuse at the hands of a trusted neighbor, young Jessica (Jenna Harrison) forms a relationship with a strange boy (Ben Whishaw) she meets in the woods."
We again see Cusack as an assassin protecting *spoiler* the person he's supposed to kill as he grips with his conscience.
Hilary Duff tries a Russian accent and doesn't make a fool of herself.
Ben Kingsley might have to return the Oscar if he doesn't start doling out a decent performance now and again.
"VD does his best move in his career, like always-the HELICOPTER KICK."
"The woman runs away from camera, and suddenly a single blood pack (only 1) explodes on her back (looked like she was hit by a paintball), and she falls flat on her face."
"The bad guy chases the good guy and the lady he's protecting down the stairs, shaking his plastic uzi all the way."
"The plot for 'Darkness Falls' goes something like this: The Tooth Fairy, a murderous woman who hides her face due to disfigurement kills people who look at her out of revenge."
Nicolas Cage is not so much an actor as he is a force of nature.
Its obvious she's just using him as a meal ticket but the director is immature enough to think we are going to buy that there is actually any love taking place.
"Turning likable Winkler into an obnoxious goof-off probably sounded like an interesting idea at the time (and a sure way to separate him from his television alter-ego), but the jokes and situations are often wrong-headed and mean, staged rather sloppily by director Carl Reiner."
"As Henry's beloved, Kim Darby looks a little out of her element--particularly when surrounded by all these TV hams--rendering the romance aspect of the script inconsequential."
"Jonathon Schaech has done better, and his acting here came close to being phoned in."
Lands in with her cabin living-granola type family who are right-wing loggers.
"Family takes to him and it takes 2 hours of our time for the chick to see he's a better catch than her liberal looking ,french wine drinking, porsche driving, loud cell phone talking, lazy, city slicking, Jewish looking fiance."
Dr. Hackenstein also show's Dean Slesinger a skinned chicken running around in a cage & explains that with the process he has developed he will bring Sheila back to life.
Dr. Hackenstein being the genius that he is decides not to waste the opportunity of having three young beautiful specimens available & starts to 'borrow' the bits 'n' pieces he needs to complete Sheila...
"Nathan Detroit runs illegal craps games for high rollers in NYC, but the heat is on and he can't find a secure location."
All of his most fundamental traits are gone.
"Whatever Gable had by way of charm is missing in this portrait of a thoroughly selfish man, Crawford is as endearing as ever she was i.e."
The final boss of the film is a twisted and perverse adaptation of the original character and barely gets any development to show just why he is the way he is.
"And the lady who played Pollyanna, how old was she?"
"Tadanobu Asano plays her friend, who works in a cd shop and occasionally indulges his otaku interest in trains."
Even as a dumb kid though the movies plot was stupid and a bit boring when the killer was not using his light knife to kill people.
"Taking into the fact that I anticipated an average-mediocre film even before I went in, Wenders' ambitions seem to always get the better of him."
"Yes, that was Wenders' best and he should understand now he needs a good scriptwriter."
Harlow never explains about the witness' accusing her of murder and her panic!
It could very well have been the director who miscalculated what he needed from the actors.
So the real Hitler haven't shown his evil side to the people.
"Jared and his bird go to Ireland after she falls down the stairs while lashed up, as you do."
Once out of the PRI Jim starts having bizarre hallucinations and crashes his car.
"Through means that are never explained, he sends an evil minion with an embarrassingly bad haircut to exercise some sort of vague electronic mind control over the space crew's genetically engineered scientist, played by female lead Annabel Schofield."
"On his death-bed, Palance finally tells our boy hero his last name (while wearing a horrible bruised makeup job that makes it look like somebody put a balloon under his eyeball), which he kept quiet about before."
Perhaps Charlton Heston's grizzled admiral character knows him and the plot will advance thereby once his name is repeated.
Its just that the show is unrealistic and the way he handles things makes me just squirm.
Julie Bowen is and was beautiful as in other series she participated but is now dragged to the lower depths of Media programming of sex and violence.
Hybrid starts as water treatment planet security guard Aaron Scates (Cory Monteith) is involved in an accident which leaves him blind.
The movie is basically the story of a Russian prostitute's return to her home village for the funeral of a sister/friend.
"Ann Miller doesn't get to dance until the last couple of minutes of the film, and she has little to do but strut her stuff amid a barrage of patriotic propaganda."
"He is by far one of the worst actors I have ever seen, and should face the same fate as the entire F.R.A.T."
Elvis has left the building and he's lucky because he didn't have to watch this unfunny stinker.
"Mr. Dispenza informs us that most people lead lives of mediocrity and clearly implies that he, on the other hand, is living on a higher plane."
"As I'm required to add more lines of text before IMDb will accept my review, I will mention that the actor playing Guy Maddin does manage to ape his facial expressions pretty well"
"Macbeth (knock your table, off his drawers, puck will make amends, OW!)"
In My 5 Wives Rodney plays Monte (a name he must love since that was his name in Easy Money) a rich (isnt he always) guy who loves women and gets married like its nothing.
I half expected to see the harness and wires holding up Uma in her flying scenes.
This time the mummy is played by Lon Chaney(which doesn't make much of a difference because he's really not asked to do much acting for this character).
The new priest becomes a morgue-keeper in the town and sends the mummy out to do his dirty deeds after feeding him the tanna leaf juice.
Yosi tells Sonia off for loving him more than G-d or their parents.
Sonia flips out at her son's bris.
Nor will she be shunned by the community if the marriage doesn't work out.
"Kerr keeps her cool dignity and fares better, despite having to lip-synch to Marni Nixon's vocals."
"To begin with, the scriptwriter seems to have got his werewolves and vampires mixed up."
"One of the victims is a candidate for DA, which is causing problems in his relationship with his wife."
"Michael Des Barres does okay with what he is given to do, which is to act like a sex addict out of control."
Someone must have directed her to scream at all costs.
Even if he was covered in manure that man would be as appealing as anyone.
"Andy Dick plays the role he was born to play, one of the two diabolical executives."
"The first half has Rajni uttering his usual array of oneliners and style and in the second half, becomes a quasi saint after a beggar takes him through a interdimensional portal to the Himalayas where Babaji (not the famous Saints he took a dig at earlier) gives him special powers for no apparent reason (other than karma)."
Oh and the black magic never worked on our hero because he just happened to have a Param Vir...er....Shakti Chakra with him.
AR Rehman is said to have composed the tracks for his movie through the cell phone.
This movie was probably promotional material for Rajni entering politics but the results of the movie itself would have killed off any of his political dreams.
Someone must have told Bettina Hirsch (yes THE Bettina Hirsch)she had a knack for comedy before she started directing this movie.
"So the bottom line is run, don't walk, to your nearest Blockbuster and shake hands with the manager and thank him for not having the grapes to stock this pile of garbage on the shelves"
"His knowledge on the subject of racism is STAGGERING, and IMPRESSES me on more than one level."
"If someone doesn't agree with your political views, you simply apply violence and throw him off the bus."
Though other medical mistakes did give a brief chuckle especially when the good doctor samples his fellow physicians medication... Well continue giving it to her Unfortunately these 2 outstanding performances could not keep me awake through 3 attempts of sitting through this unbearably slow movie.
"It's rather telling though that although he worked prior to this movie, this child actor didn't work again after the sequel, Invisible Mom 2."
"For a child actor, he's pretty good - no better or worse than any of his more experienced co-stars."
"Cuba Gooding Jr. is a secret service agent who blames himself over the assassination of the U.S. President, i'll point out straight away that this is not the type of role that this very talented actor is noted for, and this film shows us why."
"), was a strong indication of Coscarelli running out of ideas and seeing how far he could ride the franchise..."
Burton is hammy but weary...not even telekinesis could save him at this point.
The main character looks like he's 35 and I've seen scrawny beanpoles with more balls than this guy.
"I'm just glad a friend loaned me her DVD, so all I wasted was time."
Jimmy's aunt (Honey Wilder) is concerned about his behavior so she hires him a private teacher (Kay Parker).
"Oh, my God, this was very possibly the most stupid serial killer that has ever existed, I know it's a film, but why would a man who never(or at least we know of) killed any one before, kill a girl's family and friends that he's just obsessed over?"
of that movie again i think I'm going to shoot myself...and i do know the whole entire movie because my friend told me what happened at the end and i wasn't surprised at all i mean who didn't know she was going to do the right thing and let him be happy i mean for real you would have to be a complete idiot not to know that.
"Jennifer works at a new age shop with her friend (played by Joan Cusak), and they are in the business of developing aphrodesiacs."
"Jill Hennesy is good in the role, but her character is too predictable, and too formulaic as a much needed element to create conflict for Danny."
Cusak would've made even a lousy story outrageously funny (as she sometimes does in her co-starring role here).
Robert Patrick in particular hits a new low in an action sequence that has him firing a machine gun while standing on the hood of a moving school bus.
Luke Wilson is actually a good actor - I hate seeing the pained look on his face as he suffers through the bad dialogue.
Then we enter the music world (punk was a new variety of music at the time of this film) where D rate bar performer Rootboy Slim performs boogie till you puke in his own lazy style of dirt and eclectic sleaze.
O'Brien plays an officer who adheres to military discipline in the creation of a new kind of soldier from his cadets--the bombardier.
"You could feel him clicking in your mind, the kind of click that only happens when a great actor gets a great role written by a great writer."
"If you love this character as much as I do, you'll be delighted with how he is portrayed in the movie."
"And the reason for this, unfortunately, is not due to any believable psychological trauma rather, it seems that the murders are here simply to allow the writer to display his personal political beliefs."
"Two other small points: Panhandle not being around is a disappointment, but what's worse are her replacements."
"Still, if there's new series to come after this, it would all have been for the good: I'm convinced that McGovern can still write great stuff, and maybe now that he's got his politics out of his system he can go back to writing about people"
"True, Farrah Fawcett's character is subjected to two uncomfortably prolonged assaults before gaining the upper hand on her attacker (a suitably slimy James Russo), but scriptwriter William Mastrosimone and director Robert M. Young take these unpleasant scenes only so far before unveiling the dilemma which informs the moral core of this production."
"Acing and technical credits are fine, though Fawcett's overly subdued performance won't play effectively to viewers who might be relying on her to provide an outlet for their outraged indignation"
Ajay shines as his character shows his dark side.
"Johnny Weissmuller's final film as 'King of the Jungle', after 16 years in the role, TARZAN AND THE MERMAIDS, is bound to disappoint all but the most ardent of his fans."
"Amy Adams, who was the best asset in Junebug, comes across as a shallow girl who is willing to keep her lie going on and not come clean to the man that loves her and is going to marry her."
Greenthumb Grace is left penniless after her husbands death so she turns to ganja-growing in order to pay the bills.
"We finally have a girl heroine who can take care of herself,who isn't a *beeping*mary-sue,but unfortunately she dresses like a slut and her breast are huge."
Game-play: All she does is shoot.
"Obviously not, she went on to make more bad films."
The director knows what he's doing!
"I might add that, much like that cheering London crowd (per review below), I too am enthusiastic about this being his last live performance."
Richard Donner had the idea of 'keep it real' for his 2 outings.
"When the visitor enters the home, he somewhat menacingly establishes himself as part of the unit."
And Bradbury even wrote the script himself.
"Pam Grier was fine as the witch, but the charecter of the Dust Witch herself wasn't well pulled off."
Are they friends of the `director' (sorry for using this word) and decided to help and promote him?
The main character is a snotty girl who gets shipped of to a place where she doesn't belong.
"Amazingly she finds a way to fit in and make everyone to like her plus, gets the guy to fall head over heels in love with her."
"Mr McNamara is no Tom Cruise, the actor he obviously wants to be"
So I found it difficult to sympathize for this looser who mourns his loss.
As a Scottish woman (& as a viewer who likes her real life films to be a bit more like real life) I really don't think it would have hurt to use any one of the countless talented Scottish actors...or at least got English ones who could toss together a decent accent!
"O'Donnell might seem charming as Robin (with Batman), but in this picture he lacks any charm."
"The boy born to the couple from the experiment constantly runs a fever of 100 degrees, and when he's an adult, people in his life start spontaneously combusting."
Something else that struck me as silly about the movie is when a character has visions of his late parents.
Chong arrives in her ship just as Wirth nearly drowns after driving his motorcycle into a lake in a fit of recklessness being the result of just breaking up with his girlfriend.
"Chong also makes pals with Wirth's mother, who seems to have lost a few of her marbles over the years."
"Well, this is because Wirth's father was an alien that abandoned her."
"The opening scene involves Chong on her spaceship, communicating with her superior, someone who we do not see but that Chong communicates with through a vat that emits pink light."
"Trouble is, both Chong and her superior's subtitles both look alike, and the director gives you no indication as to which of the two are actually `speaking' at any given moment, which makes the whole conversation nothing but gibberish."
"Joe Don must have found a new agent, since he's now graduated to comic relief in James Bond movies."
"In another thread the stupid, clueless, and secretly gay strike leader, having been rejected by labor, his gay lover, and found out by the neighborhood thugs, gets stomped by the thugs."
"The closing scene to the beating shows the streets of Brooklyn, and the streetlights are very, very similar to those of Nazi death camps...and the scene drags on and on and on...and the camera pans down to the body of the labor leader, and he's been crucified.....ppppuuuulllleeeeeez."
The real shame is that I am sure some college student is busting his nut making a film twice as good and half the length.
Somehow ten minutes later he shows up at the cabin (how he could find it and how he could travel at the speed of light to get there is a mystery).
Another of the brain surgeon type at the cabin realizes something is amiss so he hides out in a cave to let this blow over.
Most of the movie focus is on Max and his parting ways.
"Unfortunately I think Ritchie seems to have fallen into his wife's trap of taking himself far too seriously.It seems it wasn't good enough for him to make films with good plots, laughs, snappy dialogue and good characters."
"It's almost as if he had a checklist of films he wanted to rip off, here are some of the ones I noticed: The Matrix, Fight Club, Kill Bill, The Usual Suspects, Vanilla Sky..."
"Personally I enjoy the narrator for his intelligent, no subject left untouched, style of narration."
This is the kind of character which suits her perfectly.
"Simon wants to go back and save the people, but therefore he needs his powerful ring which he lost during his escape."
Gulfax is an albino version of Chewbacca and evokes incontrollable chuckles whenever he opens his poodle-snout to yelp something incomprehensible.
"It also throws you off on who the killer is, I had an idea but still woulnd't think the killer was who he was, but his motives combined with the secret was a huge letdown."
"Elsewhere, Mr lecturer finds himself in a hidden town at the North Pole inhabited by midgets and one tyrannical figure who dresses only in red and white."
"Now, Mr nice guy's family find the book and assume he's gone to the North Pole."
"To be fair, my younger child (8 years old) liked the movie but the older one (10 years old) came away thinking it silly (he was too old for the youth humor but too young for any of the adult humor)."
"Jack Black tries to make something about a comedy about disappearing dog crap, and Christopher Walken, perhaps on of the greatest actors of his generation, simply looks embarrassed to be there."
"Stiller is his unfunny self,but now even with someone to bail him out, proves that he is way overrated as a comic."
Characteristics (like the self-absorption) in his novels make for infuriating reading.
Detective Lucy Lutz of LAPD flies to England to bring him back to the US.
"Lutz's part in 9 was not terribly big, but she's one of the main stars in this one."
"Hyde delivers all of his lines in a very flat manner, while Raven overacts to a campy degree."
"Wendy Cooper is very good as Celeste; attractive, certainly, but more importantly she's easily the best actor in the movie (bad fight scenes notwithstanding)."
Seed breaks out and goes after the people who put him in his living coffin.
"But it might be on for a while yet because it gives the average American a personage to which they can truly identify.A regular guy just like you and me.I live in the southern U.S, so to me this show is just the opposite of escapism.Down here, that obnoxious character is everywhere, in some form or another.Seeing him on television is brutal overkill"
"Why the director didn't put a stop to this is beyond me--but maybe he was too busy trying, and somehow failing, to draw good performances from these normally excellent but inappropriately-cast actors."
"So does Angelina, so how can we determine her newly acclaimed stardom?"
"Especially bad: William H. Macy, whose character and storyline could easily have been eliminated altogether; Julianne Moore, for her unconvincing angst."
"Tom Cruise comes off well by comparison his misogynist, foul-mouthed Holy Roller was rather amusing."
"Her extended rendition of One, a maudlin number to begin with, drove me to distraction at the start of the film."
The director clearly has talent but like his character Robert Carmichael he throws it all away.
"Miranda Wilson plays Monica, the attractive wife of celeb chef Jonathon (Michael Howe); how she was able to subject herself to such an ordeal is beyond belief."
"This is Michael Madsen's first movie, and it shows, he isn't that good in it."
Some people might find the story laughable; an alcoholic realizes his life and family are falling apart so he calls a preacher as a last resort for help.
"Although the character is scripted to be someone who should be pitied, he is not."
Wolvie gets enough and leave his brother.
"Too bad so many of his films, like this one, pretty much stink."
"I was surprised at how bad Ingrid Pitt's English is, I guess she must have been dubbed in some of the other films I've seen her in."
Rent it it's really good) is the worst of the bunch (Pretty stiff competition but he is amazingly god-awful.)
"Bogayevicz is not afraid to play with the camera, to use wooden frames to allow Kirkland to stand out, and he is not afraid to lessen the surrounding characters so that when you walk away from the film, it is Kirkland you remember."
"Bogayevicz tries to do more with the story, but fails either because Kirkland will not allow him or he just realizes that there isn't enough to support a full story."
"Kirkland wasn't Anna, she was an actress playing her a bit overdone and crusty on the sides."
Could the Lt's personal involvement finally cloud his judgement?
"Cassie becomes very emotionally upset and has nightmares which cause her to have hallucinations about her boyfriend coming back to life and encounters men trying to murder her and she is struggling to find out who her real friends are, who wants her dead and will she survive this entire horror ordeal."
"Even the women who saw this bomb had to appreciate the outfits that she obviously spent some time getting into, each day of filming!"
"How the bloody hell did Sammy know where this guy was, or that he'd watched the murder."
"Good guy must get to LA, evil guy would rather he didn't, Hero Sam stands between the two."
"Parents, whatever you do, if your child still believes in Santa, don't let him/her see this movie."
Ram Gopal Varma has tried his best but the cast could never live up to the cast of the original Sholay i mean what was he thinking doing a remake.
It's difficult to explain the plots of Guy Ritchie films but if you watch any of his films I'm sure we can all agree that they all posses one no matter how complicated they may seem on first viewing .
Sadie Frost has appeared in some of the worst British films made in the last 15 years and she's doing nothing to become inconsistent .
A servant of Satan and whose goal is to get the key that will unlock the door where his master is trapped.
Dolph Lundgren sure looks like he wish he were somewhere else.
Still this cruelty of nature doesn't prevent him from being smug throughout the movie and he has a hard time not looking into the camera.
"Being a maverick within his circle, he begins to pay people to find bodies for him to study and test on."
Francis sure didn't help out his actors much.
"The director, Uli Edel has a skill level like that of a TV director, but he is far below the cut for real movies."
"Co-writer, co-producer Tom Fontana and his pals pack the goings-on with friends and favorites from other shows, as well as real Baltimore personages."
"The former heart of Baltimore's homicide unit, Yaphet Kotto as Lt. Al Giardello, is now a Kurt Schmoke-like candidate for mayor, and Schmoke himself makes a cameo appearance."
Dina Napoli of WBAL TV turns up as herself.
"Ed Begley Jr. actually advances the story in his brief appearance, playing Dr. Victor Ehrlich from Fontana's St."
"The only really memorable character is Blakey, which British people 25 years old will recognise immediately since he was a favourite with impressionists for a long time."
Christopher Plummer gives out a grizzled turn as Van Helsing and Omar Epps has fun with his role
The rich yet cruel and abusive father played by Carradine (the one standing feature of this) has died and left his inheritance to his children and servants who he still hates.
"Carradine gives a good enough performance as always, but he's left mainly in a voice recording and flashback sequences leaving us to sit through the mediocre/terrible performances."
Murphy's next project could be PATTON if he's not careful
Steve Guttenburg looks like he's trying to flesh out his role with the charm that everyone's told him he has.
"Professor Schultz, a leading bio-researcher, has just determined that the addition of a new enzyme now enables his hunt and destroy formulation to regenerate for the length of time necessary to neutralize deadly cancer tumors."
"About the DVD: The transfer sucks, the audio is passable and there's a commentary track on the disk by the director and two of his friends, who say they had absolutely nothing to do with making the film but were there to ask questions and make comments."
"This movie just gets all to crazy with Savage rapping and dancing with a midget with a tattooed spider on his head, also one of the rare."
"Even the photography stinks, in and out blurs with the camera switching this way and that trying to make it look like the vampires move to fast for the camera to keep up and then the camera turns all to bright in the scene of Savage chasing the son of Corri around till he blinds himself."
"This starts off bad, what with the three women acting like simpering junior high school wussies sitting around giggling with their gin, endless cigarettes and a caramel chocolate treat for the one who tells the best 'man' story, and then it gets worse -=- spoiler alert =-= what with Andie's character falling for the young organ player who used to be her student when he was 14 (she's the headmistress of an English school, believe it or not), only to have him destroyed thanks to her bitch-from-hell 'girlfriend' ."
"Because the faithful dog sleeps on her master's grave, she must be put to death, according to law."
Raquel Welch plays the beauty up to her neck in intrigue.
Martin Gabel is a retired hoodlum whose son is trying to outdo him.
"Maddy is a new worker at a conspicuously-unnamed office, where she meets and starts a relationship with her co-worker Chris."
The King learns some things because of her presence and then the movie fades away as he does.
"The story is set among the upper classes of rural Scotland, and details the strange triangular relationship between Sir Charles Ferguson, an eccentric aristocratic landowner, his sister Hilary, and Hilary's estranged husband Douglas, who is hoping for a reconciliation with her."
"Peter O'Toole was, when he was at his best as in 'Lawrence of Arabia', one of Britain's leading actors, but the quality of his work was very uneven, and 'Country Dance' is not one of his better films."
"In this story, Cortes is on a brief surveying mission, trying to find something of value to prove he deserves financing to further explore America."
"Tsai Ming-liang is the king of this subgenre, and Vive L'Amour is his masterpiece."
"Fans of cinema may thank Tsai Ming-liang for directing this film, as he has provided irrefutable evidence that art-house cinema can be just as poorly made as B-grade, made-for-television horror flicks."
"Somebody called Howard Koch a schlockmeister but he did write the screenplay for Casablanca, didn't he?"
Or didn't he.
"He's actually literally doing everything the narrator is saying, such as hair standing on end, icy chills race down her spine, her heart beats in her throat, etc."
"If the cat asks for trouble, that's one thing, but when he's minding own business and Jerry is physically (and in this case, mentally) abusing him, I have a hard time rooting for the little guy."
"Well, let's put it this way -- for a 47-year-old, she's pretty hot."
Sue Ellen runs into a barn to hide behind some hay bales and in a shockingly realistic moment a large snake is hiding in the hay with her.
"And in the strangest scene, Sheriff Dean makes like he's about to rape Patty (Carol Cadby) and tells her to take off her clothes."
Dean has turned the radio up to drown out the noise of what he's about to do.
The preacher on the radio needs to go back and read his Bible.
Ewan Bremner is arguably one of the worst actors in the world at this time (witness his performance in the god awful Life of Stuff) & his Cockney accent is almost as bad as his Edinburgh accent.
"I stayed only with the hope of it getting better, but instead I just got more and more annoyed at Mr Fox and his son Ash for making stupid decisions."
Richard Lester directed and wrote the music for his first film in 1959.
"Bourne is so perfect at doing everything he does, I don't think he has anything to worry about."
Many people have also said that Matt Damon's performance in this movie is one of the best (if not the best) of his career.
I certainly didn't expect the insipid directing and I most notably did not foresee myself laughing so hard at Tobias Schneebaum and all of his off-putting glory.
It's like calling a movie The Life Of A True Don Juan only to see that the only the time the protagonist of said film did something sexual happened during college when he once played just the tip.
One minute Schneebaum is talking about cruise ships and tourism and the next he's going on and on about how he can't drive and then jumps to talking about some dead relative or some failed and miserable saga in his life.
"Schneebaum is both arrogant and bitchy, striking a sour combination when mixed with the fact that his story is remarkably un-riveting."
"It's obvious Barry Levinson's dream fell flat on its face, but he should have warned the rest of the world about this slop"
"Lee J.Cobb tries mightily to fashion Barton Keyes,but even his performance is just gruff, without style."
"Rob Schneider is a famous comedian cause of his movements, facials and performances of not humans."
"Of course, we got our female that our main character is trying to reach but his tryings, are useless."
"Can you imagine anyone who DOESN'T subscribe to the whole apocalypse thing watching this, slapping his forehead and saying, HOLY HOOVER DAM!"
"For starters, the script was definitely written to be made into a B-film, but somehow Duchovny (looking for a star vehicle to elevate himself out of television) and Hutton (looking for the two of a one-two punch he had hoped would define his career after Ordinary People) became attached to the picture."
I must admit feeling Duchovny's pain as he read the lines that are the voice-over.
"Maria Schrader's acting is dreadful, never seeming to mean what she says, or even knowing what she says until she says it."
"The supposed parallel between Hannah's mixed romance and her mother's relationship with her father was as cliche as they come, and failed miserably anyway."
"Verhoeven is a puzzle: it's difficult to tell whether he takes his sordid impulses seriously, with sardonic intent or operates in complete oblivion."
Kevin Bacon plays a corrupt scientist who has discovered invisibility and uses it to drive himself into moral bankruptcy.
Ariell Kebbel often written into b*ch roles does not disappoint when her character gets her due.
"You might also recognize Bruce Spence playing Leonard, though his role is ancillary."
"But, if there is a pre-teen girl in your life, rent this movie for her... and be prepared NOT to hate it (you might even enjoy it)"
A black Jewish angel is sent to help a struggling tailor and his critically ill wife.
Kaminska is reduced in the film to mostly bed scenes and her kindness in her speech really doesn't convey the desperate situation that she faces.
Freddy is at his cartoon character worst.
I applaud the writer/director/producer/editor/star/caterer/cast dentist/composer (and whatever else he did on this move) for actually getting a movie like this distributed.
Normally a person in his situation would have several options.
Somehow he does not have those options.
"The once brilliant actor is adequate,but if you watch closely you will see that he is not serious at all."
Randolph Scott's narrow range is well suited to his role of earnest commander and he is supported by a solid group of professionals who do their best with thin gruel.
"If, after being shot by the detective, the killer would have fallen down in the same position he got shot in."
"here, let me wave my hands over the keyboard, i'll tell you what salad she's going to order."
"During an experiment before noted Dutch scientist Lembach (Gordon Heinz), his machine fails due to sabotage, so he has himself projected by his secretary, Sheila (Tracey Crisp) to seek revenge."
"Then there's the unoriginal plot with the mad scientist, the monster he has created, the isolated location, the stranded human cast & the obligatory final showdown between hero & monster."
"That would be like the Simpsons episode where they try to brainwash Homer with a religious propaganda movie, and he starts talking about who killed who or whatever."
"It is intimated that the baby has sex with his foster mother behind her husbands,Darryl's, back .Oh, yea that is just hilarious ."
He stashes a stolen rock that is just huge in a woman's purse and then has to pursue her .
"They take Ted, a homeless man in Pasadena, and give him $100,000 to see if he will turn his life around."
"Or how about, Lift a man up - it's more fun to watch him fall from a greater altitude."
The new guy gets an adrenaline rush from his work.
"Mr. Sneedeker should be banned from filmdom, but then he's no different than the countless other hacks working in Hollyweed"
"Bette Davis was attractive for about five years of her life, but that period didn't occur here."
A few years later the geeky guy returns and starts killing the people who hurt him.
"Not to mention, the geeky guy is almost too geeky and I think that even stereotypical geeks themselves would be rudely maddened and just downright antagonized by how geeky he his, so when he gets mauled, does anyone really care?"
"Munro's lack of acting talent is quite apparent, which puts her down at the same level as the rest of the awful cast."
its really really super creepy that this guy worked at ADT while he killed people!
One of the party discovers the secrets on his own and sets about building his zombie army.
When it came to using firearms to save his friend and sidekick Paco a girlfriend Juanita and his priest Father Mattia lives from Tony and his gang guns were a no-no with David; he was more of a knife and spear man then anything else.
Alice Krige looks lovely apart from the scenes where she has the cat face or is in full alien make-up.
"When Carol (Vanessa Hidalgo) starts looking into her brother's death, she begins to suspect something more sinister than natural causes."
"Unless of course, you are interested in home movies of a Jewish wedding, or Schneerbaum introducing his former male lovers."
Also starring Gareth Gates as a clone of himself.
"Hot-or-cold director Sidney Lumet can't get a consistent rhythm going, and Bancroft's constant overacting isn't scaled back at all by the filmmaker--he keeps her right upfront: cute, teary-eyed and ranting."
"Silver and co-stars Carrie Fisher and Catherine Hicks end up with very little to do but support the star, and everyone is trampled by her hamming."
"Nice tits, but she just can't act."
"Giada Colagrande is either paralyzed from the mouth up or Botoxed to the gills, and nary an expression touches her face."
"It was actually kind of fun it was so bad, I got to play like I was in my own Mystery Science Theater 3000, noting things like the fact that Dafoe's skin is too big for his face."
"For instance, when Anderson and Dyer are planning revenge on their attackers, they learn that one of the rapists has a fourteen-year-old daughter who is an object of lust for the two men he hangs around with."
"In fairness, Ms Anderson acts her guts out throughout the film."
"Dyer, on the other hand, does what he's done in virtually every film he's made to date - that is, plays a gor blimey guv cockney type chappie with a roguish grin, a cheeky line of patter and a face that most people would never get tired of punching."
Mehki Pfifer is great in E.R and Ving Rhames probably didn't know what he was doing.
Pamela Anderson is still relying on her body to detract from the fact that her acting is just as plastic!
"He seems to have absolutely no connection to anything he says, the only internal monologue I can detect is gosh I bet they think I am cute."
"Linda Hamilton's German accent, while quite good, is painfully distracting - as is her face, for some reason."
The fight scenes aren't too bad either - I love the way Deathstalker lets his sword 'drink' the blood of his victims - and there's plenty of nudity and sex to temper the general level of machismo throughout.
"Let's face it, either the guy can't play anything but a nerd or he is never offered any other parts."
The story is totally uninteresting and the fact that the background voice is Bohlen himself guarantees that the whole film has nothing satirical at all.
"This was not a good role for Monroe, even though I didn't need to see this character to know she could act."
The lead bad guy looks like that punk from the 70s show that ended up marrying his grandmother dummee moore.
"The Columbo character himself also feels quite different, perhaps because of the reason that he gets placed in a totally different environment and situation, when he helps out his nephew after his bride disappeared right after the wedding."
"The movie has no core, it's colored with a kind of redneck, anti-authoritarian tweeness that in all honesty taints most of Penn's work, his latest work even more so than the earlier."
"Sellers goes through the motions in a way one would not think possible when remembering the magnificence of his shifty, iconoclastic performance in Lolita."
"Jack's performance, he was very good I can tip my hat for him."
"Danny's performance, he was good."
"It's pleasant enough, and watchable, but it's also rather staid and dull, distinguished only by Fry's sincere performance as the new principal determined to sweep away some of the school's most dubious 'traditions', and by the introduction of a possible new star in 14 year old Pettyfer, a talented kid with the kind of effortless charm and vivid good looks that should take him all the way to Hollywood and beyond."
I don't know what the writer was thinking missing a valuable piece of the movie which I'm sure his mother played a huge role in his life.
"Well, one has to give the director credit for how gutsy he was."
"I'm supposed to imagine a rich white guy singing rap and completely upending things, playing like he's a bastion of hip-hop culture, and people just *accept* him?"
"Second, for what was supposed to be a compilation of JD's fantasies, one was Turk's dream, another also wasn't his fantasy, although I forget which."
"The Asian girl without confidence who has to play someone else to get ahead, the white guy infatuated with Asian culture and chooses to leave his white world behind for the land of yellow and the keeping it real black cab driver."
"Sure, there are some funny moments like when a guy gets beheaded by a bulldozer, or when the main character leaves his friend to die in order to save a girl he's known for a couple of days, but overall, it ends up just not having you rolling on the floor with laughter, and I consider that a major disappointment."
"Connery is clearly slowing down in his old age, barely bothering with his attempt at a US accent and besides seems too old to be the husband of Hope Lange and the father of those gosh - darn kids of his."
Laurence Fishburne barely gets the chance to inhabit his role and you're confused from the outset as to whether he's a bad guy or a good guy.
"It's doubtful that anyone so repressed would have belonged to a church, but if she had, she probably would have made friends there."
Just one more thing: Are we supposed to suspect Kyle of murder because he had once had a few panic attacks?
"I know some of this must have been Fellini's intention, but many viewers will be left completely bored by this sterile performance--especially since Sutherland's lines are all poorly dubbed into Italian and so he neither looks nor sounds like himself!"
I encourage all of you people to go out and find about the real Artemisia and see what she is really about.
"I encourage you to do some research, Artemisia really does have interesting story behind her and some amazing art work."
Buck's role as The Kahn brings to mind Bob Barker (of The Price is right) running a country the same way he runs his show.
Chad Allen pops up as Brad and he's TERRIBLE.
"For example, Gene Stapelton's (Ding-Bat from All in the Family) character telling Marilu Henner's character that she swings both ways sexually, was a cheap attempt at humor indicative of the general lameness of the movie... You want good, cheeky humor?"
The brat decides to constantly annoy him and demand attention.
Maybe she didn't want to hear the truth are you kidding me She's up in heaven and so unbelievably hurt about what she now knows about me right Is Dan's life over if he has HIV?
"Kevin Spacey is very talented, but unfortunately directing is not his forte."
"Gary Sinise has done much better, especially since he is conscious in most of his other films."
"Skeet Ulrich was disappointing, but this was one of his first films (I did get a kick out of how young and chubby this Scream star looked)."
"Christopher Lee is good but he is hardly in it, the only the good part is the opening scene."
"From her classic SCTV Days to Christopher Guest's mockumentaries, O'Hara is always a comic gem no matter the vehicle, and unsurprisingly she earns the best laughs as Tom's wife Christine, whether dryly delivering a one-liner or posing in an inch of make-up for a dominatrix photo shoot."
This movie starts out with an execution of a practitioner of witchcraft and his mistress.
"The Swedish Chef is great in any scene he inhabits, so thank the spirit of small mercies that he appears in one sequence where his eccentricity is exploited to the fullest."
"The saying is that a hero is only as good as his antagonist, and these two are at least half responsible for the greatness of the previous two films."
"Grodin's big solo during The Great Muppet Caper, while not having the same resonation, he lifts the tone of the film eight steps on his own."
Maddox himself pointed out that transition and cohesion make a film feel like a coherent whole rather than a mess of thrown-together pieces.
"Animal shouts singular words at times, but they have nothing to do with the plot, or the conversation going on around him."
"Say what you will about set pieces designed to show off characters, but think of Animal's moment after eating the instant growth pills, or his sowwy after the incident when he pulled the window down on top of his fellow Muppets."
This was mainly due to the gratuitous holes cut in that lady's shirt where her breasts are.
"Oliver Stone could have shown his serial killers as vicious, inhuman murderers of innocent people and contrasted this with a morbid media fascination."
"Even though she lives there, when she drives away from the baddies, she goes to the most remote and godforsaken place possible instead of the nearest police station or at least a crowded place ??"
Leo is gay and has just announced at breakfast to his family that he is HIV positive.
"The youngest brother, Marcel, has not yet come down to breakfast, and the first thing the family does is decide that at 12 years of age he is too young to be told."
How many families do you know where the parents/brothers wouldn't have at least SOME reaction to one of the members announcing that he is gay?
"Leo goes to find his lover, Aymeric, at his work in a Paris bar."
But why would Leo want to see him at work?
"Well, not here I guess Every man for himself is still the French way of doing things Another aspect of the film which was totally unbelievable was the touchy-feely aspect."
"Rose Hobart was absolutely horrid and lifeless as Julie (as she likewise was in 1932's Dr Jekyll and Mr Hyde, an otherwise excellent flick)."
"He marries Julie but doesn't support her, instead lying in bed all day or hanging out with his low-life criminal pal (Lee Tracy)."
"Julie loves him nonetheless and continually makes excuses for him, which only seems to make him more abusive."
The last 1/3 of this movie takes place after Liliom has killed himself (a robbery plot goes awry and Liliom plunges a knife into himself rather than being taken in by the police).
"After 10 years, Liliom is allowed one day on earth to see his now 10-yr-old daughter."
Takashi Shimizu had a great opportunity with a remake of his original film Ju-On The Grudge.
"the 180 degree rule is broken many times over and not in a forgivable or intriguing way), and the performances are wooden even when looking frightened or shocked (Gellar especially is disappointing, but Pullman, who shows up later after his first scene, is sorely miscast)."
"I'm not totally sure where this project went wrong - was it Shimizu having to retool it for the studios, or him not giving enough leeway with his revamp of his vision?"
You have an incredibly corny villain that enjoys screaming awful puns as he kills his victims(actually worse than the one contained in this sentence).
"So, like any kid who gets murdered under a scarecrow, he comes back as a killer scarecrow with a vengeance."
"Streep glows and you wonder if she really has the depth of feeling on display or if it's just that---a display, switched on and off like a light."
Alec Baldwin should go to film school if he plans to direct again.
I would imagine that Vera-Ellen took this role thinking that it might finally propel her to the status of a major musical star.
"The choreography is boring, but Ms. Ellen gives it her all."
(Since he's into fixing cars I guess you can call him Lube Skywalker).
Edith looks and sounds like she is reading the lines off a cue card and has never seen the script prior to filming.
"Okay, the movie just doesn't move with Vaughn's con-man dialogue, his character is just a creepy guy that you just can't get past."
"I mean OK, the conductor had creepy help(lol), but if Leon was so brave he would have gone all the way..."
Scully just wandered off into the desert to look into a brutal murder on her own without him.
Robert Lowery was a pretty good actor in the 40s-- but he's phoning it in here.
Duncan himself looks more like a motorcycle hood than a boy wonder-- in fact he's more like a guy in his thirties waiting for Lowery to kick off so he can wear the big cape.
"The main character is so inept and indecisive, it makes you wonder whether his father might have been alive if he made up his mind sooner."
"Well, at least it was better than watching Geronimo try to dumb his way out of something."
"William Smith does another turn as a Russian soldier, the same character he played in Red Dawn a few years earlier."
Sean was not at all appealing--since his face is so covered in freckles you could play connect the dots.
"Jill goes to the hotel where she meets the owner & manager, Richard Grant (Nick Mancuso), a very nice, older, divorced man, who is sympathetic to her."
"In fact, she doesn't even say anything to Sean when he arrives home."
"Jill has given Richard her business card, and so he calls her and she is apparently in real estate."
I find it incredibly hard to comprehend how Lewis Collins (the hero here) was almost chosen as Roger Moore's successor in the Bond films.... this guy is so expressionless he'd struggle to get a job in a waxwork museum (as a waxwork!!!)
"Frankie's idea to bring about peace by instigating a nuclear blast is ridiculous anyway, so she becomes a laughable figure just when the audience is on the verge of viewing her as an interesting villain."
"I had to laugh in the beginning trying to remember if Melissa Sue Anderson played the character that went blind on Little House on the Prairie (later, research proved my suspicions correct) because all the way through this movie, she genuinely looked blind."
"Not that he was good at all mind you, but every time he opened his mouth I kept thinking how truly awful he was."
Couldn't his message about acceptance of a person's gender-confusion be handled better than showing him get slapped around or watching cows being gruesomely slaughtered?
"INSPECTOR GADGET (1999) ** Starring: Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Joely Fisher, Andy Dick, Dabney Coleman Director: David Kellogg 80 minutes Rated PG By Blake French: Disney's new film, Inspector Gadget is about a cop named John who survives a major accident and is saved by a state of the art experimental operation that turns him into a robotic machine-like agent who has tools and contraptions of all sorts built into his body at his use when he says Go Go, only to be called Inspector Gadget!"
The actual movie's structure is much like the body formation of Inspector Gadget himself.
"Also a major character is the Gadget Mobil, a life like automobile that is devised for Inspector Gadget himself."
"I know, I am not exactly a target audience of the filmmakers, but even my ten year old relative found the film to his disliking."
"A character that I found being left out a lot is Gadgets daughter, who by the end of the movie, I still has not clue of what her name was."
Bridget Moynahan was very weak and her performance ringed false on every level.
"Also, it seemed like she was reading her lines."
"Finally, Alan Cumming just had an embarrassing character and his performance wasn't very good."
"Kirstie Alley (as the hostage) was underused, and almost entirely ignored when she was on screen."
"What saves this film from the junk heap is the beautiful crutch of Bakshi's work, the rotoscoping, and the fact that Frank Frazetta taught the animators how to draw like him."
"This is Dror Shaul's second feature film, and I have to admit that his first and the TV drama he made before this picture are much better."
"Unfortunately, director Christian Viel did not show much promise and I am not likely to watch his later efforts"
ellen pompeo's lack of charisma is a black hole that seems to suck the energy out of every scene she is in.
"the director cast his own daughter as the precocious brat probably because no respectable agent would have permitted a client to ruin a career by being in such a lame, contrived and uninteresting movie."
"Now, when I think of bad editing, I usually think of maybe a scene where someone's talking on the phone and then, in the middle of the scene, the phone jumps down to his shoulder, or something to that effect."
Two things his wife could do with learning.
"Ernie is a loser, but at least I've chuckled at him a few times, but mainly at how pathetic he is."
Who is Julia to her?
Richard Cardella is terrible as the sheriff and was quite laughable plus his character is annoying.
"Surely, we think, the youngster's spunky attitude will rub off on the cynic and change him for the better."
"Wooden acting, poor special effects, the only comedic highlight was whilst our alien hero was in female form and this is over as soon as she has done her obligatory b-movie nude sex scene within 30 mins into the movie."
Nick Mancuso phones in a performance as the cop on his trail and Nancy Allen manages to put in the only sympathetic role in the entire film.
"In the poem, he rips off Grendel's arm with his bare hands!"
My English teacher would go insane if she saw this abomination.
On a positive note-I like Asin character dancing Bharatnatyam when she changes to the Western style dancing when the teacher is not looking
"It never ceases to amaze me how you can take an excellent actor, and put him to waste in a film such as this."
"De Niro plays the obsessed fan, but his role in this film is less than entertaining."
"However, because De Niro is IN this film, that makes it a draw if you are a fan (no pun intended) who sees everything he does no matter how bad."
"Not really much I can say about it, a basketball scout gets too attached to the person he's recruiting, who happens to belong to a tribe that happens to be on the verge of war which happens to be decided by (spoiler) a basketball game."
She uses a glitchy orange computer interface with an operating interface that is so visually annoying and I can only suspect a Microsoft future release.
"Golly, this main character sucks as a human being as well and has no redeeming qualities aside from her physical beauty (which she could barter for some manner to escape her crushing poverty)."
"Finally the sucky boring bland orange-tinted movie is no longer a tedious chore to watch, but has the potential to say something along the lines the main character is trapped in imaginary computer-generated poverty and she is actually in the real world now."
"Well, she kills the guy and he vanishes in a digital effect."
Here the director had an iota of a chance to redeem himself slightly by burying this lousy lame moronic cruddy movie with a philosophical twist.
Stephen Sachs is the best of the lot as he does a pretty nice turn in character.
"Almost everyone because by some amazing coincidence the only other person to survive happens to be her sister Samantha (Kelli Maroney), they desperately search for more survivors & meet up with a long distance trucker named Hector Gomez (Robert Beltran)."
"Judy Holliday struck gold in 1950 withe George Cukor's film version of Born Yesterday, and from that point forward, her career consisted of trying to find material good enough to allow her to strike gold again."
"Even Jack Lemmon, in what I believe was his first film role, can't muster up enough energy to enliven this recycled comedy."
Director Bellocchio seems to be infatuated with the pretty face and figure of his actress Detmers - and who can blame him?
Reb takes care of Lou because he saved his life in 'Nam.
When he was running to the zoo with a dog pack and leaving them at the front of the zoo gate the saying If you can't run with the big dogs don't leave the porch kept running through my bored mind.
He personally introduced the film at the screening I saw in Chicago.
"In this film Lt Columbo is smartly dressed, drives a normal car, has a partner, doesn't talk about his alleged relatives and comes across as quite aggressive."
"Chris Rock's performance was not nearly as good as his past performances, and the movie was just very badly directed as a whole."
"Even when he's talking to one other character, he seems to think he's trying to make a roomful of people laugh."
Just by describing her a tattooed biker-type of a guy.
"Either way, given that her last role was in something called The All New Adventures of Chastity Blade, I doubt she really had anything else going for her."
A scientist and his girl friend are out driving when his speeding causes a car crash.
"I couldn't even tell what nationality the killer was, and the fact that his accent indicated some multiple nations didn't help either."
"Upon coming home I realized that this film did not live up to Saxon's other work even his acting, which may have been muddled by the added pressures of directing."
I'm sure Mr Director modelled Luc's reporter girlfriend on April O'Neil from the cartoon Teenage Mutant Hero Turtles - she refuses to go because she '...needs her story'.
"It's a dreadful bore with no action scenes of any interest, Seagal isn't really trying in this - he's fat and his voice is dubbed once more."
"Velma represents rational thought, she applies logic but as we see time and again on the show she requires clues that for the most part are collected in pieces by the other members of the show."
Left on her own would Velma solve a mystery?
"Finally Scooby himself represents us, the participant."
"What was even more irritating was that this movie was advertised as Robin William's first movie, capitalizing on his new found fame in the Mork and Mindy television series."
I was geared up at the beginning when the stranger (martin sheen) started to tell his story.
I have to admit i did enjoy the confrontation between Hopalong and Tex where Hopalong shot Tex's finger off and told him to practise for 40 years to reach his league.
Chris Kattan's comedic talents are unmatched as he leads his character Corky Romano through a maze of totally unpredictable situations.
"Also, I would have taken the concept more seriously if the crazed protagonist would focus himself on lethally punishing the naughty children!"
"On a technical level The Nostril Picker is awful, point & hope photography, bland & inappropriate music, forgettable locations, poorly edited (Brenda is killed in the kitchen yet her blood splashes on the T.V."
"Apart from not looking minimally Sicilian, he sports no accent of any kind other than his familiar drawl."
I went from hating the woman's rapist to almost feeling bad for him.
"And if the title is anything to go by, his last case is wrapped up in no way whatsoever."
"As an actor he is usually funny, though he generally plays the same role in all of his movies, namely that of a working-class slob who's down on his luck, partly because he's a slob but mostly because of society, and who redeems himself by doing something good for his community."
"After that, the character tells her best friend that she suddenly felt the urge to throw herself off a bridge."
"Thus, at one point, you have a character talking out loud to a purportedly catatonic person about the way he feels, because the script wouldn't allow him to act out his feelings; and later on, voice-over is abruptly introduced, quite possibly as an afterthought, to convey feelings that would otherwise remain unknown to the audience due to the director's ineptitude."
"If my father, who raised me, and who I love dearly, treated me like Big B did Akshay, I'd shoot him myself."
"Iron Man sounded like he was wearing an iron mask, Captain America sounded authoritative not like some teenage kid."
Another badly written scene is in The Wedding where Harry Osborne unmasks himself to spoil Peter's wedding.
"Lukas has several speeches in the third-act which undoubtedly won him the Academy Award, yet for the much of the picture he seems to do little but enter and exit, enter and exit."
"As his spouse, Bette Davis enunciates like nobody else and works her wide eyes to good advantage, but the role doesn't allow her much color."
"The intent here was to tastefully, tactfully show us just because a (WWII-era) man may be German, that doesn't make him a Nazi sympathizer."
"Director Fred Schepisi(Roxanne) directs this well intentioned, but inferior comedy about Albert Einstein(Matthau) trying to hook his scientific niece(Ryan) up with ordinary guy Tim Robbins in order to get her to relax and enjoy life in the 1950's."
"And we (against many of us's will) watched 700's Club, and of course that jerk Pat was on ranting and raving about the bible, and he said Simon along the lines of God says Homosexuality is a sin and I actually heard a kid go Hmm I guess he's right."
Akshay Kumar is the only one who carries off the madness to some extent but even he become intolerable after a while.
The portrayal of his friendship with Frodo is strangely childlike and unsatisfying.
One of the hobbits procures a lute at least twice as large as he is from behind his back--which was not visible before--and begins strumming in typical fantasy bard fashion as they all break into la-la-las. AWFUL.
The scene was probably intended to illustrate Frodo's hallucinatory decline as he succumbs to his wound.
"Even the commentary is awful, I turned it off after Ng talks about how she was weirded out playing a lesbian"
Admirer impales his foot (whoops!).
Then you get a good laugh when the blonde is in the house and announces she can out think them.
Mark (the man who warned them to leave) has a remarkable change of character when he reveals the cannibals are his family.
The blonde or her admirer shoots him because he did not help them.
"There's more killing, the admirer professes his love for the blonde."
"Amidst it all, either in bar-room brawl or in observing the latest sea-side bloody demolition by the relentlessly hungry shark, the mate of the hero looks on through his glasses of little concern, as if he too was bored in his relentless role amidst a lack of much evidence of plot or anyone's character development!"
"At least the hero indicates a fleeting concern belatedly, for his ex-wife!"
"Bassinger's character is so dumb, that she actually stops to scream to God Where are you!"
Even Mrs. Bowden is a completely different character - she's crazier than Max Cady is!
"However, Scorsese is unable to do any of this in his Cape Fear, giving the film a cookie-cutter early 1990s look, no sense of danger, no suspenseful scenes, and little style (unless you count animating fire and the skyline style)."
"Later, there's this gem: Dolph (regarding the villain): I would like to cut off certain parts of his anatomy."
You're the one who decided that his last words should be about my privates!
"My least favorite character is the guy who ends up being the killer...I think he's supposed to be funny and amusing, but he just ends up coming off as a tool."
Huppert is not an animated actor--she registers emotion with the smallest lift of an eyebrow or flicker of a smile.
"Other than the enjoyment of watching an experienced actor excel in her profession, there is nothing in this movie that makes me want to recommend it."
"Renown writer Mark Redfield (as Edgar Allen Poe) tries to conquer old addictions and start a new life for himself, as a Baltimore, Maryland magazine publisher."
Jenny Gabrielle is spectacularly unconvincing in justifying her own presence in the frame
"Up till that point, it was a good piece of visual detective work by Brunel and his English sidekick."
Ariauna Albright is a really good actress but why she participated in this lame written travesty is a mystery.
However Ariauna does what she can under the circumstances & to a extent salvages her reputation.
"In this movie, Ariel and Eric celebrate the birth of their daughter, Melody, and go to show her to everyone in the ocean...BROADWAY STYLE!"
The viewer gets no opportunity to make up his or her mind on whether Ned Kelly is a good guy or a ruthless villain.
Summer Phoenix is very effective as an inarticulate young woman imprisoned within herself but never convincing as the stage actress of growing fame who both overcomes and profits from this detachment.
"After suffering through Esther's (largely self-inflicted) pain in excruciating detail, we are given no persuasive sense of her triumph."
"It also appeared that the production budget couldn't stretch to a hairdresser - from the outset, the hair on the Princess Margaret character had a permanent birds nest in disarray look and looked as if she had been dragged through a bush."
The actor playing the Duke of Edinburgh appeared to have prepared for his role by watching Rory Bremner imitate Prince Charles and was farcical.
Sir Alec wouldn't have chosen her when he was young and very obviously isn't too happy about it now.
Donald aspires to be a French Heathcliffe and I waited in vain for the source of his mystery.
Why did he jerk Suzanne's hair when she plotted to bring the disparate parts of this turkey together on the country estate?
"This incredibly overrated anime television series (26 episodes, 25 minutes each) is about a 14-year-old boy (and two of his girl classmates) who pilots a giant robot to defend Japan against invading beings called Angels."
"None of his distinctive trademarks here at all, an uninteresting plot and completely terrible acting make this his worst film (in my opinion)."
"It's a stand-out scene not necessarily because it's good but because it's so funny and pointless: the movie playing on the big screen shows a rock video-like moment with a guy in red leather pants getting his obviously fake long hair cut, all of this edited with scenes of a girl who is being attacked in the movie theater's washroom by the incubus."
"I tuned out after what I would say is my nomination for the most wretched attempt at sexual suggestion award: a scene in which Pia Zadora, at a picnic, stands between two boys who want her."
The film shows clearly why Director Joseph Green's career as such and also as a writer never materialized; he was really bad at both.
"As a character that's supposed to be a hip, Village writer into the martial arts and proud of being mysterious, why is he so hyper, over-dramatic, and plain horrible?"
Within the first 10 minutes he's given a proposition by Andre 3000 and Big Pussy (of Soprano's fame) which makes NO SENSE AT ALL!
"God comes off as an all powerful bully who was leading Herschel around for his own amusement, speaking through him only to give him the Ten Commandments."
Robbie Wheeling has had problems in the past playing this game at other colleges and is advised by his parents to leave the game alone and get good grades.
Poor Joan Bennett; she is the only one in the movie who is not an embarrassment.
"Imamura has at least been coherent in this: the supposed cause effect linking is entirely nonsensical, which plays well with his episode including a man who believes himself to be a snake."
"The key moments of the story seem implausible; for example, when Hurst accidentally shoots the producer, believing him to be Chaplin."
"The day later, a rebel teen gets into enough trouble that he is sent for a psychiatric analysis."
"The allusions, half joking, half sincerely felt, to Jane as a fairy sprite from olde England come to rescue Rochester in his despair...eliminated."
"Jim Carey was cast because he is a brilliant physical comedian, and fearlessly commits to over the top, outrageous characters."
Mike Myers fell back on his old bag of tricks.
"Cesar Romero gives his usual professional performance, chewing up the scenery since no one else was doing his part, in the type of producer role essayed frequently by Walter Abel and Adolph Menjou."
Do we really want to know how the Joker got his scars
"No story of interest, its one of those fast forward jobs Please look up Big Bad Ralph at brothels around Melbourne hes famous in them."
Then the camera zooms out on the face of the guy and we notice how he's simply sitting behind a desk whilst his secretary waiting for him to sign some papers.
"Well actually, this is more than just a variation on the 1932 classic, as writer/director/actor Michel Lemoine had the pretension to directly link his protagonist to Leslie Banks' legendary villain in The Most Dangerous Game."
Count Zaroff supposedly is the original Count Zaroff's son but he exchanged his private island for the remote French countryside.
Zaroff is a genuine weirdo who hallucinates about dancing with deceased woman but actually runs his car over the live ones.
I have the impression that it was Michel Lemoine's intention to imitate his pal Jean Rollin and make a deliriously kinky sex-thriller.
"Lemoine himself surely has the looks of a crazy killer, but not the talent to depict one"
Kevin Spacey wasn't good or bad he was just there.
"Backula shows more brilliant coaching strategy in the end of the film, (SPOILER), he tells his star player downtown to hit a home run, clearly downtown viewed this as a good move."
Its the first time she was begging me to push the stop button.
"From the errors regarding the script to the errors regarding the casting: Now I am by no means one of those who insist on physical resemblance between an actor and the literary figure he portrays, but by no stretch of imagination is it possible to picture lovely, blonde, blue-eyed and full-mouthed Susannah York as the novel's plain heroine."
"But good though Bannen is, his St. John is just as far from the novel as York's Jane and Scott's Rochester."
"And ten out of ten for the divine Emmanuelle Beart, two years before she made 'Manon des sources'."
Watch out for the scene where she tells her friend about the three first times for a girl.
A woman as talented and classy as Loy deserved better than Ants as one of her final movies
"Rae Dawn Chong is appealing, despite the lack of a believable story and direction consistent with her talent"
Why would the caretaker feel like it's his house?
Since Walken is so good at playing heavies (we all remember Frank White from King of New York) he is still enjoyable but the supporting cast is an unmitigated and unconvincing mess of mortals and angels alike who couldn't buy a clue for 50 cents.
"There are no compelling reasons to follow these characters that was in the first - the priest who lost his faith, the little girl who kept the big secret, the teacher who protected her children - even Lucifer himself was more interesting BY himself in the first film than all the other characters in the sequel put together."
"Take my hand, lets stroll: The most glaring problem with this show is the bachelor himself."
"Aside from his rather average physical appearance, James is about as interesting and exciting as a piece of chalk."
"Even as such, he has this arrogant, smugly condescending aura about him."
"In fact, one of the mates flat out advised him he wasn't feeling a connection."
"So, I'll give some of the good points first: - the dragon was quite convincing, especially as she prowled through the tunnels looking for lunch (hint: she likes humans)."
"Amanda Michalka had her moments, when she wasn't that terrible."
"If you have seen either Training Day or King Arthur, you will be impressed with the birth of this director in his second film Bait."
The likable hero down on his luck that suddenly finds his life turned around by some unknown force is a classic structure that just needs to die in Hollywood.
"Adding second long quips and culture statements just to keep his audience understanding that he was a comedian first, an actor second."
"Foxx's jokes destroyed his character, which in turn left me with nothing solid to grasp ahold of."
"It goes something like this: characters abuse the crap out of each other, and then without so much as an apology, all is forgiven (an especially obnoxious example of this is in the movie The Breakfast Club, in which one character spends most of the film verbally bullying everybody within earshot; as a resultthey love him."
Why is tracking down this old doctor in the US is a journey of his lifetime?
There are so many things we might be interested in Ami's life: how can he make those animations with the movement of only one finger?
"Instead, the filmmaker got a van and set up a trip to let Ami to show up at his old doctor's door in order to show him that he is still alive."
"Kirk, naturally, figured out what a total twit she was and shamed her into fixing Spock up with her superior telepathic powers."
"The blame for this I place on either Joan Crawford or the director or both, as her performance is just awful."
"The fat kid in the movie made us want to kill ourselves, bless him for trying scene in and scene out but he was like a puppy begging for love."
Kadeem Hardison plays his role wonderfully and performs his jokes so that none are missed or under-appreciated.
"The premise is silly, even for a B horror flick (Also, it's too bad Dr Eisner was unaware of Project Paperclip - he could've saved himself a lot of trouble!)."
"The first victim is forced to eat his own crap, before being axed to death."
"In fact, the only reward that I got from this mess was spotting the startling squint faced Roxann Biggs-Dawson (B'Elanna from Star Trek: Voyager) without her Klingon bumpy head makeup on."
"Why does Dolly Rose appear at all, since her story's never explained?"
Why does the film end with Marcel's beating at the hands of his father?
We learn nothing of Aglae beyond that she's a bitch who hates her husband; why no backstory explaining this hatred?
IMDb doesn't even list it in her filmography.
"Just for her casting and acting ability, I give this movie a 3 out of 10"
Things aren't much livelier down on Earth where the movie spends most of it's running time with Matheson's son/Chuck's grandson Corin Nemec trying to hitch a ride to the spaceport across an arid landscape with Palance's insane desert artist looking for that note out there while the chicks still dig me while waylaid by rejects from a Mad Max ripoff and evil corporate suits who track him down so they can release him on a nice beach.
Richard C. Sarafian's slightly longer original cut that played in Japan offers an additional six minutes but cries out to be cut down to a more manageable 17 minutes: the director of Vanishing Point must have thanked his lucky stars when the re-edit gave him an excuse to take his name off the film.
The film follows a young girl around the city as she looks for a man who she had anonymous phone sex with.
"Bart Sibrel might be able to produce a flashy looking DVD, but he is sadly lacking at looking at the science behind his claims."
"Unfortunately, she is put to bad use here."
"These guys, Ron's friends, were more obnoxious than likable, except for Seth, he was kinda funny."
"Berkhoff goes to a town named Castleville, gets stranded on a dirt road, staggers on until he finds a dilapidated house and is rather un-welcomed by an old crone."
"As one reviewer correctly noted, this is not a pro-American play and movie, as Lillian went to her grave an American-loathing communist."
A good man comes into possession of an evil object that will grant him any wish but which will ultimately doom him to hell.
The hero thinks he has discovered a way out of his dilemma but tries to solve the problem in a somewhat different way in an attempt to save an innocent person.
"Trinity died and Neo's love brought her back, where have I seen this before ?"
"And oh yeah, while the actress who portrayed Holly (I'm not sure whether that was really her singing or not) had a reasonably good voice, it wasn't as amazing as they were making it out to be - especially when she was belting."
The main character is in a white collar writing job yet he dresses like he works with oil and grease in a garage.
"His use of flashy stylistics in a good number of his movies seems to scream Look at me, aren't I an imaginative director?."
"His best film that I have seen is the one with the least added flourishes, the superlative Raging Bull."
Hyperactive director Charles Band did come to the right company for his film.
"Robin Williams has a couple of bits, but he's interchangeable with the other players"
"One thing I didn't like was that it suggested Sebastian and his father had married into the wealth, which isn't typically looked good upon in this area of new york, and sine Katharyn's mother was just an adult version of her, it didn't seem like something a woman in her position would do, marry a man not of her social class."
"Honestly I can't understand why this movie rates so well here, nor why Bakshi himself thought it was his finest film."
"The film's feminist-leaning conclusion also goes against the austere conclusion of the novel, Washington Square, whose author, Henry James, savagely parodied feminism in some of his other novels."
Television deadens the genius of Dickens as manifested in his ingenious plots and unforgettable characters
Batman finds dead giveaway of where he is.
"If batman needs think, he'll use technology, then do some kung-fu."
The one that gave Mr Freeze motives for his crimes?
"Well this series says F#ck that and makes Mr Freeze a jewelry robber before his accident, with only wealth in his mind, then gets frozen and gives him the power to make things cold."
Cruella deVil (Glenn Close) is released from prison after being cured of her obsession with fur by a psychologist named Dr. Pavlov (ugh!).
Turn down the volume whenever he speaks.
To realize that bag means that the butcher came back is too hard for her tiny tiny brain.
Stephen King is simply illiterate in general he has the aptitude for storytelling of Bart Simpson.
One can almost imagine this pathetic dolt sitting as his desk trying to come up with something SCARY.
"And he's shouting well, they can't actually hear him, you know he's saying that he's going to sue the hospital, but he's not such a big shot anymore, you see, lying there (or is it laying, I can never remember) and all."
"And he's thinking: Oh no please, please don't cut me and this is terrible, lying (or laying) like that now, wouldn't that be a great story?"
"Our hero, you see, is a rubber fetishist, and can only get a boner if someone touches him you know down there with you know rubber gloves (giggle)."
I have a teenager and she thinks the previews are ridiculous and would rather watch the original.
"The plot rambles and ultimately goes nowhere, the dialogue is clunky and trite and the director has little concept of how to get the best from his actors."
But when the end of the movie comes and Molly and the other guy are in the cabin you see Ally so Angela must have gone in to get her.
"Phillips is quite believable in his role as a torn-apart son of a well-off family who's searching for himself (though his family is...er...well, a little too white...), but the rest of the cast is grasping at straws."
"The Serbs, under General Draza Milhalovitch and his Chetniks, saved over 500 shot-down US fliers from the Germans in World War II."
"There is also a Killer Card and if the contestant picks the girl who has that vile scroll, but he has answered properly, nothing happens."
"Davies's protagonist ignores his beautiful girlfriend, one of the few people in his life who cares about him."
"'SherryBaby' is quite a painful and sordid melodrama set in Jersey, the story of a young mother who is out of jail on probe after a drugs-related conviction and fights to stay clean, to find a place for herself in life and especially to win back the love of her kid daughter who is being taken care by her brother's family."
I cant even say AJ looked good in it because well she didn't.
Sarandon does what he can as the rapist.
"Then the scene came that let me know that as much as I enjoy learning from the chubby, frumpish but very charming Charles Epps and his sexy sidekick/love interest Amita, my Friday nights will be better spent otherwise engaged."
"This early role for Barbara Shelley(in fact,her first in Britain after working in Italy),was made when she was 24 years old,and it's certainly safe to say that she made a stunning debut in 1957's Cat Girl."
Why didn't the alien eat her?
The freeze-frame ending shot of Heather Graham's jumping in the air to celebrate her happiness at finding herself underlines the banality of the last part of the film.
"An old woman in bad makeup and a black cloak keeps appearing to the boy and chants something in German sometimes, which he eventually records on his Sesame Street tape recorder."
"Instead, it only reanimates the sculptor's corpse, allowing him to escape his crypt so he can run around town draining pretty girls of all their blood."
The sculptor doesn't drink his victims' blood -- he collects it.
"Strathairn's character is not only thoroughly disgusting and slimy, but he is shown to be a religious believer who (typical for Hollywood) reflects the vile nature of Christians."
"Ricky Lake was just another show to entertain the obese trailer park mother with a Marlboro cigarette hanging out of her mouth while breast feeding one of her dozens of toothless, illiterate children."
"If at last the door bursts open and a bug ten feet tall lurches through, the reader may be a little scared, but he'll also think, Well, I can deal with that."
"THE HAUNTING is so completely misconceived that director Jan De Bont more or less starts off his movie by metaphorically throwing open that door himself and yelling: Look, everybody, look!"
"By the end of the movie, the director is, so to speak, jumping up and down, banging his CGI pots and pans madly, and hoarsely screaming: Look, everyone, look!"
"By the next scene, the good doctor has apparently dried himself off and, ho hum, forgotten all about the annoying incident."
"Shirley Jackson's novel seems to have been dumbed-down into this ridiculous screenplay by a committee of low-IQ teenage stoners who thought the way to frighten people was to make every effect bigger and louder: Okay, next, let's, uh, make the ceiling, you know, look like a creepy face, and, uh, come down on her ... and all these spiky things, like, trap her in the bed."
"The child does, in fact, turn herself around."
They begin to discuss what they'll find down there and one of them (a girl) says she bets they'll find a blue monkey.
"But then things deteriorate as daughter lets OBVIOUSLY deranged dad into the home, and ultimately dies at his hands."
"Still, the worst thing about this is the fact that the protagonists each harbor an obsession all through the film which are not only silly in themselves but irritating in their relentlessness Hooten wants to turn the remote fishing community into a modernized sea-side resort and keeps expecting a cruise-liner to appear into view (which, of course, it does at the finale); Derek's is even nuttier she craves possession of a large antique bath-tub!!"
"Like the punk from FREE WILLY, this kid is somehow 'misunderstood' (in other words, a total brat) and you know that no matter how selfish and horrible he is, by the end of the film he'll have learned something and grown."
"But, the kid doesn't believe him AND the genie's magic seems a tad rusty."
"Mike Meyers brings his brand of irreverent Austin Powers humor to the Cat, Saying things like You dirty ho and imagining himself as a woman for the rest of his life after a whack in the testicles while posing as a pinata."
Theodore's already turning over in his grave.
"Arquette is a golden boy, scoring a big sale on his first call- to widow Kate Capshaw and her dopey son Ryan Reynolds."
"Then, someone breaks into Capshaw's home and murders her and her son."
"They are also out of line with the character Capshaw is playing, as she gets drunk and tells sexually explicit stories to Arquette's mom Michael Learned."
"Ryan Reynolds is too old to play a dumb teenager, but he is funny, especially telling his own explicit sexual story to Arquette."
"Arquette, who has proven he is a good actor, is awful here."
"The character is so extremely disturbed and irrational that I have my doubts whether any actor could have made him likable, but old reliables like John Cusack or Adam Sandler might have been able to give it a shot."
"But of course the plot mechanics won't allow that to be the end of it (an end which actually might have made a statement out of this mess), and instead we get to see the rational career girl throwing it all away to chase after this childish idiot and encourage his delusions."
"Unable to find any nefarious plots or schemes in Hinckley's assassination attempt, he invents one with Al Haig."
It's odd that we see more of them having sex than we did of the President and his mistress.
All or even some of the questions about his past that we wondered about in the original could've been answered.
No way can I take that cat seriously as a gangsta after watching him dance in all his artists videos.
Mario Van Peeples surprised me with his role.
Jay Hernandez did his best but doesn't have the skills right now in his career to take on this role.
He clearly decided it wasn't worth trying to speak with an East End accent and instead opted for a Dick Van Dyke style mock-ney which made my ears bleed.
The captain (Mr Squinty) looks like he is about to burst into laughter anytime.
"In the Fiji islands, the greedy and unscrupulous owner of the Valalola Resort Primal Park invites investors and guests for an opening party of his compound composed of hotel and zoo aiming to find partners for his discoveries."
"The female who catches the affections of our main character is pretty and doesn't annoy the viewer, like previous girls have done in the series, but not once did I ever believe this character would ever do what she does."
Even at the beginning with the Dad showing his son the list of people he has had sex with.
"Reynolds, a starstruck Jean Harlow wannabe, opens a dance studio for children and Winters is her piano player."
The Mighty Deathstalker just made his appearance.
Check out this mutant cat/worm-like creature Munkar has as a pet and which he feeds eyeballs and fingers.
"See a guy being dragged behind a horse over a dirt road, and the next point-of-view shot shows him being dragged over grass (no road)."
Chiba makes speeches; Chiba poses; Chiba sneers; Chiba glares at the camera; Chiba punches and kicks the living sushi out of a whole bunch of bad guys; Chiba sits around on couches and chairs and looks thoughtful/pensive; Chiba drives his car...
"The screenplay depends on his making mistakes and oversights that repeatedly place him (and his client) in perilous situations so he can fight his way out of them, and after 30 minutes, it strains even the most credulous judgment to think that this guy is supposed to be any good."
"(Also, If his character was really out to destroy the Japanese drug trade, he'd have taken his client by her neck 10 minutes into the screenplay and shaken her until her teeth chattered like a castanet until she spilled her little secrets...and a whole lot of pointless death and conflict would have been avoided.)"
"But unfortunately we can't sympathize with our hero (how he is called by the story-teller), because he is unnecessarily and incomprehensibly tired of company and himself."
"Too dull, too kind, too - passive (not to mention Tisserand's complex; he has an inhibition, but he couldn't be, of course, a murderer of women!)."
The bank employee gone bad just acts too poorly to convincingly decide to hire killers to off his employers.
I laughed out loud when a coach quoted scripture to explain to the kicker why he was missing field goals.
This would be smart IF she didn't have the back door of the house next to her!
"When a photographer and his model are taking snapshots, the guy grabs his assistant and yanks off her top."
"During the course of their misadventures the two opposites are inevitably and predictably attracted to each other and eventually end up getting it on while Gant has a freshly- treated bullet wound that went clean through his leg, no less in what was surely the only conveniently located cave for at least a twelve mile radius that wasn't filled with rattlesnakes, mountain lions, or who knows what, to say nothing of the Cheyenne, who could have done something really spiffy with such a primo apartment (there I go, thinking in NYC real estate terms again)."
"It is said that this was director Barry Levinson's pet project, one that he had been striving to get made for ten years."
"It's as if director Brian Flemming only recently discovered both atheism and sarcasm, and feels with these tools he can easily bludgeon his opposition."
"In the best scene, the Superintendent of Fleming's childhood Christian school rather insightfully confronts the director on his motivations."
If you're a Ron Perlman fan this is absolutely worth getting just for his performance.
"Bizarrely, this being is in fact his son, who he has turned into this monster to prevent him dying from cancer."
"Movies like this happen because the director is a stupid, money grabbing idiot who simply doesn't care about his audience."
Oliver Reed tops off his grand career by playing a drunk - go figure.
But wait I forgot there is one reason to watch this movie - Claudia Udy showing her chest!
"Stevens leads her girl gang of three, and they find out that they must act much quicker than had been anticipated."
"Stella and her girls(both very mediocre yet pretty talents, get in a sauna and a bath."
"Stella wears these nice open blouses accentuating her real talents, but I wish she would have been a bit more open with her performance."
"Inadvertently, this makes Her Cardboard Lover a bizarre monument to an aging woman's vanity"
"Jimmy Cliff is probably the most implausible of all, because he goes from zero to hero, executing moves that would shame Rambo, in absolutely no time, which is quite out of character."
"Every character has a backstory created, and I thought Akshay Kumar's Bachchan Pandey was probably the best, the most touching and the most fun of the lot, even though his character seemed a lot like a non-green Incredible Hulk with his gravity-defying leaps and power packing punches."
"And the best part is his theme song, which is damn alpha-male and played in ra-ra mode each time he takes on adversaries."
The positive reviews of this a$$crap were obviously made by the filmmaker (and I use the term VERY loosely) himself and/or his family and friends because no normal person with the intelligence of a squirrel would honestly like this waste of life.
"The one drawn out shot of following a female jogger could have been redeeming, if we could see her butt or boobs bouncing."
"Oh, and there's also Bo's breasts, although her acting is so wooden that the nudity is unerotic and doesn't rate much more than a Playboy pictorial."
The dramatic tension in this film is between Bo's terrible acting and her husband's horrible direction.
"Alan King himself is fairly likable, as is the subplot about being an extra in the movies."
And a woman in Kate's situation would be repulsed and frightened - she would probably call the police.
Poor Hallam's mother has died and his father married a woman with whom he's been having an affair.
"Focusing on Fitzgerald's Hollywood writing era, late in his life, the much-honored author was, in fact, living a quiet life and effectively fighting his alcoholism at a time when AA was not yet well known."
Living in a small apartment and driving a second hand Chevrolet his life was 180 degrees different than as portrayed in this movie.
"The hotel where most of the actors were lodged appears good too.A word about the actors Jack Nicholson looks like a lost,lazy soul who is never really sure of what he is supposed to do.There is not much to be said of a bald,colored actor who for the most of times is busy pampering a kid actor.No need to blame the bad weather for the tragedy.It cannot be avoided as the film has been made and poor Kubrick is not alive to make any changes"
"Unfortunately, her ability to do so is the high point of the film."
The subject this latest adman-turned-movieman tries to tackle in his debut (ad)venture is quite an age-old topic of discussion by almost any cultural standard -- timeless romance (pun intended).
The director lacks any sense of realism getting all caught up in his new-fangled discovery of a hot new idea.
"Pere is an idiot, but he is aware about it and acts in consequence."
"I like Ventura Pons, but I have to admit that this is not one of his best films (maybe his worst!"
"Haig makes missteps, his press room performance is historically regrettable and he is difficult."
HELLO how did they get his work number?
"Despite being a ghost of some sort she seems very human having to open doors herself & using weapons to kill people, there is no attempt to make any use of the supernatural elements except the ghostly children who are played for maximum sentiment."
Nick Millard (under his pseudonym Nick Phillips) decided to return to the world of Crazy Fat Ethel over ten years later and with a budget that probably covered the cost of a blank tape and a video camera rental for the weekend.
Oliver stone does his worst directing ever.
There's a bit of subtext that might be about France's colonial past but it's mostly just Danielle doing the sorts of things (like deliberately abandoning a small child in a park) that would soon have a man picking up his teeth with broken fingers.
Then the movie picks up a bit as she has a confrontation with 4 punks who took up 2 parking spaces on this busy xmas eve.
I know its only a movie and you've gotta go with the flow but she's got about a 5 min.
"It is the morning of their wedding and Kate is in a frenzy, giving the caterers an earful about her demands for food presentation."
"In an ensuing fight with the sculptor, the heavy ice maiden falls on Kate and sends her to the hereafter."
"Now, one year later, Henry's sister arranges for a psychic to tell the young vet that Kate would have wanted him to starting dating other ladies and move forward."
"Yet, the lovely medium, Ashley (Lake Bell) becomes interested in Henry herself, much to the chagrin of her catering partner (Jason Biggs)."
"More importantly, Kate returns from the other side to create havoc for Ashley, as she has no intentions of letting another woman get her hands on Henry."
"So, I'm wondering while watching this film, did the producers of this movie get to save money on Sandra Bullock's wardrobe by dragging out her before clothes from Miss Congeniality?"
As has the good guy partner trying to protect his partner despite the evidence character been seen before.
In fact there is only one white guy in the entire movie and he is the leader of the bad guys.
"When she starts laughing at his jokes in the perfume shop, it's about as believable as Milo's interest in his paintings."
"And Leslie Caron, who despite her inexperience is rather charming, and really does look like she just stepped out of a painting."
This Metro short does have at least two real laughs - Buster's cleverly turning around his lack of dinner by using the calendar on the wall and the basic ignorance of his adopted family to literally bring the meat to his plate.
Like practically every other woman in the film Line periodically gets her kit off.
It's also pretty gory in places - notably a Herschell Gordon Lewis-esquire moment where Line plunges her hands into a man's chest to remove his heart.
When a labourer falls under the hypnotic spell of Naschy's head there's a big close up of his face that seems to last forever and serves no purpose whatsoever.
quality that is aggravated by the fact that each actor seems to have been allowed to use his or her own personal version of an Irish accent.
But it's not one of the classics that hold up --- more just fair warning about the kind of over-simplified malarkey to which Ford was going to devote his career
"However, Joe Don himself is wearing his ridiculous cowboy-slash-sheriff outfit, complete with shiny badge!"
"There's a mastermind serial killer too, but he's not what's creepy either."
"The scene where she discovers ice cream is particularly cringe-making, and the coyly knowing look she gives him when he gloatingly says he'll have to clean her up again causes a particular shudder of horror."
"at the end, ann shoots ethan while he's trying to kill her best friend."
This new show instead features Shaggy and Scooby battling a James Bond type super-villain and his henchmen while living in a mansion.
"Walken is one of the greatest actors around, in my opinion, and he is once again outstanding in the role of the fallen Archangel Gabriel, whom he plays for the second time here."
"Unfortunately, I think that the real quality of Ben's plan is revealed by the original title: it'a a cold machination, aimed at donating parts of his body, but lacking any authentic human empathy, at least the audience is not given the chance to see or perceive any pure relation of souls within the whole movie."
"He wouldn't have saved their lives miraculously, of course: this would have probably caused more suffering, but I think it could have been more constructive from a human, and moral point of view."
"Celina is just another pretty face with no lack of talent what so ever, she can't act at all, and there was no point of her being in this film, as for the other girl Radha she was okay i guess but could have done better."
"George Burns and Gracie Allen are along for the ride, as Jerry's publicist and his ditzy secretary."
" A Foggy Day in London Town -- Fred wanders around the foggy manor estate at night, crooning about the foggy day when he first met Joan in London."
Kay Kyser and his band offered great entertainment for the people living in the 1940's who were trying to forget about the horror's of World War II
Seagal gets a chance to shoot Afghans when he isn't slicing their throats with knives.
"Seagal isn't as active a hero as he once was and his action scenes are tightly edited where we have a hard time seeing him taking out his foes, unlike the good old days."
"One of Seagal's poorest efforts, and he's as understated as ever(..not a compliment)."
"When I watch Vera-Ellen's sexy apache dance with Gene Kelly in 'Words and Music', I can't help noticing that her blouse (yellow with narrow red horizontal stripes) seems to be made out of the South Vietnam flag."
"Val Guest has a story credit, but this movie doesn't come up to the quality of his brilliant comedies."
"Meyers does his best to capture Rubell, but he's given so little to work with here it's surprising his performance is effective; but he's good, and he helps to anchor the film."
One of the character's even volunteers to sacrifice himself to save the others.
"but that guy relies on comedy for his life to continue, funny or not."
"Alan Rickman is great, a bit old perhaps, but he plays the role beautifully."
"The role just doesn't fit him, even if its mend to be a comedy."
The youngest kid ends up stabbing the old lady accidentally with his Rambo-replica hunting knife.
Ultimately he is a bit annoyed if their activities attract police attention.
Robert slumps with his back to us in the foreground.
"Sadly, his ability at the moment only extends to making high-sounding excuses for a publicity-seeking film"
"Ron Ely's TV version is something of a compromise: Like Burroughs' character, he speaks good English and is adept and suave in both cultures in a sort of JamesBondish way, but he's no Lord Greystoke and there's no Jane."
"Jane, played by legendarily bad actress Bo Derek is in Africa looking for her dad the absent-minded professor who is combing the jungle looking for something which is never specified."
"Beatty wanders around this landscape jumping around and talking to his watch, himself, and occasional at the other actors, hoping someone will tell him what time the sequel will begin shooting."
Jan-Michael Vincent mostly sits outside a house in his car making goo-goo eyes as Brinke enters and exits the home.
"Brinke does a decent job making her character somewhat sympathetic, but the biggest surprise of all is how good former Penthouse Pet Delia Sheppard is in her role."
"For an example, there is a point in the movie where the guy pushes the nos button and his Lamborghini takes off in the air and flies over a SLR McLaren to win."
"While you can see that Tracy cares about her by his actions, he is verbally abusive and a total jerk---and Young comes running back for more like some sort of dog."
"In conclusion, the director/writer of this movie better hope i ever recognize him on the street"
"Decent idea, but why couldn't he execute it very well?"
"Even for those that comment that this was his directorial debut and that he was learning from this film, I would have to disagree."
In AMOR IDIOTA we are forced to follow the meanderings of a truly subnormal intelligence as he stalks a severely depressed and detached woman.
"He seemed quite angry, but I have yet to figure out why."
After about 30 minutes of boobless trash we are privileged with a flashback of the clown's history in which we see some of his previous victims.
"The last annoying element of the movie is Christopher Walken's role as 'The J Man', which is about as typical and two dimensional as characters come, and naturally he becomes monotonous and frustrating very quickly."
"The main character thus chooses to, it seems, to be a Muslim and his child becomes a Muslim."
"Audrey, I know you truly cherish your husband Ted's memory but PLEASE do his legacy justice and heed his wishes."
Dr. Seuss refused to license his characters during his lifetime for a very good reason.
"Jane Fonda's character is a caricature of herself, and not a funny one."
She and Fumiko (another childhood friend) then learn that Sayori's mother is trying to bring her back to life with black magic.
"Which they mention to the store employee and she casually says there is no one but me that works here, so you think okay creepy ghost scenario, but then she just barters for the amount on the idol and we forget about the little kid seeing this guy."
Leila tells him They say I am perverse and I'm going to prove it is true!
"Some cheap time-lapse slashes appear on her arms, legs and face, she gets scabby lips and her eyes take on the appearance of blue and white marbles."
"She begins reeking of rotted flesh, spits up some clear gunk, starts speaking in her dead dad's voice, sneaks into her mom's bedroom, slaps her around a bit and calls her a filthy bitch of a whore."
The demon dog then turns on Adrian and chews him up a little before he impales it on a fire poker.
But then there's ANOTHER time-lapse effect that sort of seems to suggest that the demon has possibly reentered her body.
Dustin Hoffman and his new British bride move to a small English town and encounter endless harassment from the local drunks who do nothing but hang at the pub all day and make trouble.
Furthermore there was actually some hint of character development when it came to the bad guy's family and Darkman himself.
"Christopher Durang must have been taught by a memorably awful nun, because he just can't let go of the concept."
The director shouldn't use light as an emotion until he learns how to light a basic scene properly.
Iowa could be the film that he made.
"Well, thank god for us, because otherwise I might not have seen a topless woman get her nipple bitten by a snake."
It's like the writer had never seen a horror movie before and didn't realize every single thing he wrote was cliched and hackneyed and has been parodied to perfection in movies like Scream and Scary Movie.
Guy is obsessed with her?
The serial killer just swans about murdering everyone he wants without the least bit of problem.
Sunny's new job is just a ruse to ensure that the Emir has further opportunities to meet her.
The film is not so much a satire as a vehicle for Goldie Hawn to show off her brand of cuteness and charm.
"Goldie tries her best to save this one, but never succeeds."
"Bette Davis did a perfect job, though, and she made me hate her and pity her all the while."
It's such a sad thing when one finds him/herself in love with a bad seed.
"Annette Bening was really herself, half in and half out, was she faking or being natural?"
"Sinatra is a sad sack, returned from the war to find disappointing family relationships, a disappointing floozy hanging on him, living in disappointing digs as a gal persuades him to finish his disappointing writing project."
"The editing was cut and paste and the plot (screenplay) was just that as well (even though the author had been involved himself, irony?)."
(he forgets to add: ...with my BB gun!)
Bert suddenly pops up from behind a furniture and scares her (and me at first).
Jodie Foster in her first grown-up role turns in her usual professional performance but that is no excuse for this boring mess.
"I think the transvestite poodles did it for me, or better yet, her talking tongue...or perhaps the guy getting the virgin mother statue mounted to a jeep windshield caught in his throat."
And it strains credulity that the Lupe Velez character could fall for him.
This quality in Melody's character is clearly brought out toward the end when she fights Morgana without an inch of fear on her face.
The biggest mystery of Veronica Mars is not one that she had to tackle on screen.
Poor Mr.Carroll.I'm so sorry somebody did that to his wonderful tales
"And the stupid, The bullet will take his memory away."
Mamet can't create characters; all he can do is foist his voice on us relentlessly through different actors.
Where's Bing Crosby when you really need him
The only reason why Skye Bennet's performance could be so good is that her character as an autistic girl didn't allow giving her these tragically horrible dialogue lines the other actors had to deal with.
Albert Rogell directs in the workmanlike way that befits his career.
A world where an electronics store employee can tell his boss to f*** off and broadcast videos of his naked ass throughout the store and not get reprimanded.
"Michelle Yeoh occasionally gets to project a glimmer of her assured performance in Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon (Wo hu cang long)."
"Had Melissa Gilbert never put her son IN that place, he wouldn't have been molested, is what the movie says."
"The worst by far was the child typing at the end to Patty Duke, and we hear the mechanical voice read back what he typed, ."
She said because I'm bore-phobic.
Neil is a geek who runs his own very small video rental shop.
It had the best Sharon Stone's performance in her career.
"Peter Lorre was clearly weary of trying to pump some sort of human interest and entertainment value into the wispy character of Moto, and the dreadful idea of pairing him with a funny British sidekick utterly defeats all his efforts here"
"The story exists, but that is all, and fails to show any basic start, middle and end and the viewer is left shrugging his shoulders feeling as though nothing in the past hour and three quarters has really happened."
Whether Fred can re-create this when working with a higher calibre of cast remains to be seen but I'l be watching out for him in future
"Murder by numbers does not take place in a single room,like the rope ,mind you.And ,what a supreme originality,it pits two cops against the evil youngsters;and ,you would never guess it,these two cops are very different:actually,Bullock plays the part of woman living like a man ,and her partner (Chaplin) is as shy as a clueless girlie.The two boys' performances are not really mind-boggling ,not as good ,as ,say ,that of Edward Norton in primal fear ."
Pros: Nothing Cons: Everything Plot summary: A female reporter runs into a hitchhiker that tells her stories about the deaths of people that were killed by zombies.
"This is an uncharacteristically weak performance from Dalton, although he quietly nails the climactic scene where Dr. Rock finally realizes what he's done."
"Freddie Francis may have been a great cinematographer, but he was a lousy director"
"As to the story, it is very hard to believe that this bitty crazy schemer could actually do what she did."
The Studio was trying to give her some class by acting with Grant--but the character had no substance at all
The pious but naive preacher Stephen Kumalo (James Earl Jones) receives a letter from Johannesburg saying that he must come immediately; he later finds that his son has killed a man.
They were told of the killer by his psychologist who seems a bit odd himself.
"Despite guilt-ridden Ben's real intention to save 7 lives to redeem his past, I find it disturbing that the film seems encourage this type of suicidal action."
Why the doctors allow Ben's organs being donated despite the jellyfish venom he used to kill himself?
An actress making a movie in Africa is kidnapped and taken into the jungle where she is held for ransom.
"Mark Wahlberg is not acting, he is just in the movie, looking stupid."
"The central story is basically how he loves this woman, but can't have her."
"Unfortunately, that also applies to Charlie; in trying to make him an anti-hero, the script (composed by more than ten writers) only succeeds in rendering the character TOO unlovable."
"As mentioned, Burt Reynolds' stiff and lifeless Charlie detracts from his already unlikeable character even further (the only exception is a fiery confession to Itchy about his true intentions toward the end)."
"Ken Page, as mentioned, is awesome in anything he does, but his character has such a small part that his overall contribution is unremarkable at best."
"The protagonist, Marie played by Anastasia Hille wasn't a pleasant character and I had a hard time identifying with her."
Also too much time was spent in bringing her to the main location of the film.
"But rather than explore the child's murder, which would have been interesting, they just let us know that she was dead & her parents had a hard time reconciling her death with the community & each other."
"Even in the dark, you could see Dutch actress Marishcka Detmers performing all sex on this guy - and, yes, you could see his penis in her mouth."
Basically Alice from number 4 is pregnant and her baby is haunted by Freddy which gives him an outlet to haunt her friends.
"She offers the chief bank robber a deal to buy back the documents he now has in hand, but he ain't interested."
"(Isn't it romantic...) Of course, he's spared by a quirk of metaphysical chance, and washes up on the beach, just as this same air traffic controller is riding by on her bicycle."
"I have read Stephen King's Skeleton Crew, a collection of his short stories that was published way back."
The writer begins to see changes in the picture as he is driving homeward.
"Also, the portrait of an individual in that picture is killing people and is out to kill him."
At the end of the movie Kate said she would eventually find out the truth.
"Pacino delivers his usual tour de force as Eli Wurman, a past-his-prime publicity agent hollowed out by a lifetime of moral corruption."
"Tea Leoni brings her customary star power to this supporting role, although again, the script doesn't give her much to work with."
All the actors were tone deaf and the director didn't have the slightest idea what he was doing.
"POSSIBLE SPOILER - The worst is the scene where the guy opens the refrigerator door and sees the severed zombie head, which then opens its eyes and somehow FLIES OUT OF THE FRIDGE (obviously pulled out ineptly with a bit of string), latching onto the guys neck, killing him."
"Alone and pitiful, she decides to marry the boring guy."
Jude Law gives an okay performance though you would expect a lot more from him.
The only funny character were Delores (the one who sold her soul to the devil).
"This movie is extremely boring, it tells a story of a female gas station owner and her life."
The director has really kept it real and it feels just like a camera following a woman around as she lives her life.
The main character expresses a desire to go straight yet he still insists on hanging around with dead beats who carry guns and fight with gang members over nothing.
"It reminds me when you see a commercial with a famous athlete in it, trying to be funny, but he is not."
Then Jarvis's buddy Troubador is playing some stupid song on his guitar.
The handsome & eloquent Dr. Houseman is on the verge of a scientific breakthrough with his research on human DNA codes when suddenly the university he works for threatens to cancel his funds.
So Dr. Houseman does what any intelligent scientist would do and injects the untested serum into his own veins.
"The rapid-ageing-syndrome aspect also reminded me of Ruggero Deodato's sadly underrated giallo Phantom of Death, only the protagonist in that film inherited the disease and didn't inflict it on himself."
Sergio Leone spins in his grave...
"To not spoil anything, I will say no more than the promo material already did: Neo is still trying to figure out the Matrix, and he is looking for answers while trying to save the humans, and Zion, all while baddies are going after him and his cohorts."
"Keanu is good at acting confused, and that's about all he does in this film."
Joan Rivers at this time in her career was getting laughs making cruel jokes about singer Karen Carpenter's lack of weight!
"With help from a male friend Crystal gets set up with a hooker to finally lose his virginity but because she was on top instead of him,he gets pregnant!"
"Crystal's stomach grows,he goes through all the female emotions and related feelings."
What he said shocked me: He said that all those theories where lies.
"In one scene, a character is yelling Take your hands off of me and NO ONE is touching him!"
Even a totally idiot would know he is dead!
"Another funny detail, is that you see a central character--the little girl's mother--at the end of the scene and in the next scene, that occurs 20+ years later, she looks exactly the same!"
The director obviously tried to emulate his French colleague Tran Anh Hung by recreating an ambiance which is suppose to portray Viet Nam...
"An old poet with leprosy...very doubtful (not a disease for people of his condition), a peasant girl who can read and write elaborate Vietnamese poetry,... even more doubtful... <br /"
"The bigwig hears of his brothers' deaths, and rides back to town in time to get his chains rankled as well."
"The first brother killed gets a shotgun blast midtorso, and falls without a scratch on him."
"Rajni is one actor who acts, i think, from his heart not from his mind."
I was raised to respect (and even fear) my mother but I'd put her up fast in the nearest hotel if she proved that annoying in MY house.
"Lee is just right in the lead, and Stiles is a lot of fun in a light-hearted comedic role different from the very serious roles she usually plays."
"It could have been another 28 days later or even a Blair Witch Project The first 20 or so minutes of the movie I was really excited, directer did a decent job with cinematography and suspense, although I don't think He managed to capture true eeriness of an empty London Underground."
"The Communist-sympathizer nitwits in Hollywood, most of whom are as dumb as a box of rocks, love taking the lone nutcase Eugene McCarthy and picturing him as the leader of a vast movement."
"Seberg's character is at the center of the story and, pretty though she is, convincing though she may be physically as a 17 year old, she can't meet the emotional demands of the role."
"On Steve Irwin's show, he's hillarious."
And then when the guy falls off the car wouldn't you expect him to be dead?
"Michael Fitz Wong should be glad he can get acting jobs in HK, because he couldn't act his way out of a wet paper bag in English."
"Shannon Lee looks good and is a fantastic fighter (even better with the leg fighting than her dad), but her acting skills are also sub-par."
"Meg Ryan doesn't even look her usual pert lovable self in this, which normally makes me forgive her shallow ticky acting schtick."
Plus Kevin Kline: what kind of suicide trip has his career been on?
"Haliday caught a lot of good natured ribbing from the MST3K crew for his part in this movie and in Devil Doll, but he is actually the best thing in TPM."
"Then when poor Haliday gets mutilated by his machine, he has to spend the last part of the film wearing a diaper over half his face and rubber cement over the rest while he electrocutes various Londoners who chance across his path."
"The corrupt project administrator frets and fumes and hisses into the phone to his blackmailers, all the while failing to notice that he looks like a werewolf outfitted in a tweed suit and a Tattersall vest."
His secretary is forced to parade around in her smalls.
Lynch is hilarious with her dry wit analogies.
"Dragon Lord is worth renting for the final fight alone, but the rest of the movie is only for Jackie collectors, and even then only for those who've already seen at least 15 of his other movies."
"In Man Behind the Gun, she is just as beautiful, and you can tell she's a good actress, but she was forced to say some pretty dumb lines, and the blocking she was given by the director was truly awful."
"Some of your contributers say 'Steve Martin puts his own stamp on the character', to that I would say 'balderdash' , his portrayals will be long forgotten when those of Silvers and Sellars will be treasured for generations to com"
"And whoever that person is, should have his or her head examined for actual brain activity."
The principal doesn't agree with her teaching but she is pretty.
I loved the part where the skinny introspective gal beats the inbreed freak to death with the cast iron skillet she finds on the floor of the cave.
Seems ironic that after the freaky guy had bested martial arts expert porn queens and a couple out doors type jocks he falls so easily to the frying pan of a skinny defenseless girl next door.
I can't quite figure why the nice hero girl wanted to kill the funny lady who was making her some tea.
"Ian Tracey is a superb actor - the only one with a vague redeeming moment, but his talent is wasted here."
Karl is so galling that you find the circumstances of his death gratifying.
Roger Herren in the role of Rusty shines (too bad he didn't make more films).
"The figure realises it has been seen, so it reaches in through the window and scoops Sophie from her bed, placing her into its enormous pocket before fleeing into the night."
"Sophie soon discovers that she has been kidnapped by a giant from Giant Country, and fears that he will eat her."
"The BFG refuses to eat people, instead restricting himself to foul-tasting vegetables known as snozzcumbers."
Would someone tell shaq to stick to what he is good at basketball.
Umeki's appearance on the screen was short and without much of anything being depicted on her part.
"Patricia Owens, as Brando's first love, showed depth and conviction in her performance"
"Add to that his binge drinking, and it's no wonder things fell apart."
"Lay me seven-to-five, I'll take the little guy, he wisecracks just before a climatic samurai duel between two ninja warriors - from China, which we all know is the land of the Ninja."
"Caan refuses to stay down, and his recovery scenes, though momentum-killing for the movie, feature fine acting from him and Amy Heflin, Van's daughter, as a supportive nurse."
He lasted for ages but I was pleased when he finally got his head got chewed off - I was having nightmares he was going to survive.
And the specky Doctor looked and acted like she was out of a porno.
"Coltrane could have carried the show on his own broad and still suitably flabby shoulders, but the writer was apparently thinking of other things, and missed the chance, and by a wide margin."
(Charles Dance) is awful as the evil guy and he is much better in (Last Action Hero).
"Apart from the above, the drama went from what could have been an interesting little story into a pantomime,the priest was a paedophile and there are gays running about every where,oh yes just to be totally PC one of the gay couple was black.i am surprised at c ecclestone for even contemplating this when he read the script"
It is unfortunate that so talented an actor is stuffed into a role which not befitting his talents.
"The soldiers, presumably because they're 'military', all seem to just rather unconvincingly explode, like the soldier on crutches and his unfortunate comrades carrying the stretcher just beyond him."
"The jokes are horrible and unimaginative, such as two of the gamers getting beat up by a black midget because one of them had a KKK looking hood on (it was his wizard costume) and the other guy had on a John Rocker warm up (oh how funny, he's a nerd so he doesn't know about sports)."
"Producer-director Dan Curtis presents the same basic story as his preceding Night, with understandably less success."
"Someone has decided to updated Penny as well to bring her two decades up to speed, she now has some quasi-punk rebellious clothing style and doesn't play half the role that she did in the TV series."
I'm not sure Boll would get work if this were his reel.
"Spacek has been in her share of Leftist movies which brings me to the obvious, inescapable conclusion that the redhead hick is one of those Hollywood liberal morons."
Mickey Rooney on the other hand would continue his character as if there was no learning curve.
ANDY gets himself into several unbelievable situations that with a simple explanation would have been resolved.
"Matlin has a real job as a photographer, unlike the New Age hippie that crashes on her couch."
Every time he was on the screen I wanted someone to rush in and throw a pie in his face.
"If only someone had walked onto the screen and kept punching him in the stomach, screaming I'm not touching you!"
Marlee Matlin gets drunk at the wedding she's supposed to photograph and the next day decides to love herself and take a bath because she's a beautiful and unique snowflake.
"The naive Mr. Cromwell is taken to the city, and installed as President of his father's Acme Protection Agency, a front for gangsters."
"While Cromwell sells innocently sells insurance, his employees run an extortion racket."
"It's one redeeming quality is the beautiful tango dancing, but that cannot make up for Sally Potter's disgustingly obvious tribute to herself."
"Dukakis does not show up until the last 15 minutes, but when she does, the screen glows."
"Della gives all the attention to the twins, neglecting their house and her appearance and upsetting Kenneth."
"When the mall closes, Della's car is hold by the driver of the old car and she is threatened by four punks Chuckie (Lukas Haas), the Afro-American Huey (Jamie Starr), the Chinese-American Vingh (Leonard Wu) and the Latin Tomas (Luis Chavez)."
"A couple of days ago, I saw the trailer of While She Was Out and I was anxious to watch the DVD."
Della Myers is presented as an insecure and neglectful housewife and inexistent as wife; the motherhood is her only interest in her concept of family.
"Poe and Lord Blackwood, owner of a haunted castle, bet American writer Alan Foster (George Riviere) that he cannot spend All Souls Night in said castle and survive."
"Of course, the king doesn't want anybody to take his place, an therefore he has planned to kill the winner (instead of just not arranging the tournament in the first place)."
Some of my favorite scenes include: - Deathstalker beheads a bad guy with his sword.
"The girl who plays Jennifer is OK, but I think she acts bitchy through the movie, not because she is having her organs ripped out by a raven at night, but because she is thinking of firing her agent for putting her in this piece of crap."
"Movie would've been over that way....besides, they ended up killing him anyway."
Fast forward some years and the baby is now an adult named Sam; but naturally he's not a normal person and soon finds when it's discovered that he has the ability to set things on fire at will.
Adrift in this Sargasso Sea of sap is a hapless Billy Crystal in his film debut role as the film's hapless protagonist Lionel.
Watching Crystal in this pic is much like watching a blind person take a stroll in a minefield; eventually the cringe reflex becomes a semi-permanent condition as cheap joke after cheap joke blows up in his face.
"Even when I saw this movie at a teenager, I wondered just how ironic it was that Pia Zadora starred in a movie about an artist who slept her way to the top."
"As beautiful and sexy as Ms. Zadora is, even she couldn't keep this sorry-ass excuse of a movie from tanking."
"William Friendkin was the perfect person to direct a film about drug traffic in decaying new York city, because of his documentary-like approach to the action and story, Frankenhimer on the other hand is one of the most stylish directors ever, i.e."
It's yet another filmic faux pas from Ritchie and might even outdo his wretched remake of SWEPT AWAY as his worst film yet
"For an example of how bad this is, one of the crucial clues that helps them zero in on just the right suspect is this: at one point in his life, the suspect went to a pet shop...That's right...I'm being totally serious here."
The question of why the Jew keeps his wealth away from the officer is never asked.
"Even Harvey Keitel appears to be out of his element, and lacks his usual impeccable clarity, direction and intensity."
"To make matters worse, his character's name is 'Che', and we are only told (directly, by the narrator) well into the film that he is not 'that' Che, just a guy named Che."
This is Lauren Bacall's least engaging role and one of her poorest performances.
"Dorothy Maguire and Robert Stack deliver more inspired performances, but her character is vile, and his is pathetic."
"Ciaran Hinds had more substance and was able to convey so much more with a look, than P-J was able to do with his poses."
There is one moment involving the main character and his mentor being saved by Wolves from a Viking attack that is very nicely put together.
"Beat the hell out of the stalker in broad daylight and in front of dozens of witnesses, thereby allowing him to press charges of assault."
"Fagin performs his traditional routine adequately, though the tunes he's obliged to sing have little basis in period manner."
"While the novel is considered a classic, I must confess I have trouble with Mr. Dickens' consciousness, in that his works tend to emit a negative vibration."
"Not only that, it ignores some interesting details which other versions have included such as the public relations fiasco in upstate N.Y. and his religious conversion."
"The exploding plate scene which represents Luciano carrying out the execution of Bo Weinberg in his own home, assisted by his own mother is rediculous."
"Also, there is the scene in which Dutch approaches his own mother to pay protection to Legs Diamond."
The scene in which he wipes out the brewery is absurd.
"Jack Black proves once again that he is absolutely hilarious and that he can make even the most idiotic, worthless lines in ever put on paper comical."
"Unfortunately, this movie just wasn't enough for him."
"Darius Rose, who plays an orphan named Chancho, didn't have many lines, but, what can I say, I just enjoyed him."
This is Jared Hess's surprisingly disappointing follow-up to his hysterical Napoleon Dynamite.
"Thankfully, this one is only a phony priest and he gets caught."
"There was a scene where I almost vomited, it showed Macarthur in a bunker in Corregidor island talking to the troops like a seasoned politician when he comes across a wounded, one legged Filipino soldier."
The scene ends with the soldier being invigorated by Macarthur's words and gives him a smart salute.
"The young hero comes back from a 3-year absence, and suddenly he's Superman on horseback; in the original, good film, he was real and believable, but sadly reduced to a caricature in the sequel."
"Besides the great performances, guaranteed Oscar nods and Shanley's director/writers fee and royalties he will get, this movie seems to come from nowhere."
"Because of his oaths taken as a cop, the lead character adamantly refuses to perform one relatively small action that would harm no one and could possibly save lives, and yet performs another action which is very violent and VERY illegal, but then still refuses the minor action."
"In addition, a highly unbelievable subplot involving a man who has killed his family is introduced just for the sake of a plot point that was all but advertised with skywriting, and the cop's reaction to that occurrence stretch credulity way beyond all reasonable limits."
Explanation : it's no use trying to get back the jewelry Jacquouille has stolen ; don't you remember this nice red shiny and expensive car he bought at the end of the 1st episode ?
"King Triton's character is probably the best, he still retains the intimidation and love for his daughter, Melody."
Santa can bring people back from the dead (if you send him a nice letter).
"Future astrologist Joyce Jillson does bring some vacuous charm to her role as Tara, and the film looks handsome enough to please."
"Brenda Song is talented in comedy, but with this kind of movie, in some of the more serious scenes, her acting was laughable."
"When she made some of her fighting poses, I started laughing out loud."
"It also was filmed not long before Rodney Dangerfield's death, so its one redeeming value is that it probably provided at lease a few hundred thousand more dollars for his heirs."
"Even if Rodney's earlier work (as well as some of his fellow cast-members') fell short of Citizen Kane or Casablanca, there were many moments of humor and a story providing at least a modicum of interest."
"Most annoying of all is the ending of this film, which uses the single most hackneyed and implausible cliche in all of comedy: the one in which an utterly incompetent dimwit becomes a star comedian through his own ineptitude."
"This sadly makes the film not only difficult to watch but also sends the watcher certain feelings of hopelessness, as if he or she is wasting valuable time of their short life."
The problem is that because the main character in a movie is bored does not necessarily mean that the movie about him has to be boring also!
"Heino Ferch tries to impersonate John Wayne or so, but he fails miserably."
Why would Bettina Zimmermann's character fall in love with him?
It has a feel of a play written by an untalented high-school student for his class assignment.
Their friend Alex Curtis (Doug McClure) who works at the American Consulate helps them find a house to live in and he finds one that is haunted.
"Meanwhile, Ted starts behaving more strict and after he pours soup down the throat of Amy he goes to ask a Monk for help."
I've always been a fan of hers even though she has appeared in mostly schlock but her performances are always top notch.
"The most childish scene is the one where the devil dances his way into a bar, slips a tonic to an unsuspecting hero, who then finds his way onto the dance floor to mouth the words to Young song to the heroine, who is unaware of what's taken place."
Her I'm serious about graduate school!
"Posey's shtick is always amusing, but there are projects that are beneath her."
"Films like this are why the Ben Stillers (excusing 'there's something about Mary') and the Vince Vaughns (however you spell his last name, i couldn't be bothered checking)have jobs."
"Not as creepy to this New Yorker, however, as the recurring theme of the massive cockroach, Wellington, which Crawford cheerfully catches (and which is shown gamboling over her hands--I had to turn away!)"
"Tone, despite his inability to express himself through realistic dialogue, has a nice moment, dashing away his own furtive tears over his buddy Young's fate."
"Robert Carlyle is a wonderful actor, but to cast him as Hitler is just plain wrong."
My mother is German and she sat fuming at the sound of the voices which kept switching from American/English/German all in the same sentence.
"Too bad he wasn't more effective, he was overpowered rather easily before the whole thing went kablooey."
"You may want to catch this flick if you're a die hard Gerald McRaney fan, could he have ever been that young?"
"It is as if the director was so in love with his work that instead of cutting the movie down to a pace that kept your attention, he added all of the footage he had shot together."
Mencken on the wall; did I see his eyes roll at one point?
"This movie has a number of things going for it at first, including an Estevez-knockoff lead playing a rebellious genius (we're told that his enormous intellect is misdirected into his elaborate pranks and school stunts, which include putting krazy glue on someone's chair)."
"They are set up to make a hit on a guy, and they think they're just going to show him a good time, but the real assassin is ticked and wants the case and to kill the girls."
"How can a mother treat her own son that way, okay if it was the daughter in law, but this was her own son."
Pumpkin Jack (the old guy from down the street) brings the college co-eds a book full of witch's spells that he leaves at their annual haunted house (where the movie takes place).
"Francoise Robinson was cast as a Native American, even though she does not even closely resemble someone of Native American heritage."
"I liked jean hugues anglade, but I think that he needed to eat, as us, and thus he accepted to play in this movie."
Ellen Pompeo's acting talent is very questionable I hope she can improve it over time.
"Demi Moore however, shows none a surprise by participating in this film, if one looks at her tracklist."
"It's just a quickie throwaway effort, helmed by Norman Bates himself, Anthony Perkins."
"Having now seen several of his landmark films such as 1949's Late Spring and 1953's Tokyo Story, I am convinced that Ozu had a particularly idiosyncratic gift of conveying the range of feelings arising from intergenerational conflict through elliptical narratives and subtle imagery."
It is Taiwanese director Hou Hsiao-hsien's keen aspiration to pay homage to Ozu on his centenary with this generally enervating 2003 film.
Cinematographer Lee Ping-Bing provides expert work though he violates a cardinal rule of Ozu films by not keeping the camera stable during shots.
"Hitoto speak-sings the fetching pop song used over he ending credits, Hito-Shian."
"Kuriyama has minimal screen time as the resurrected Sayori, and her character is given little to work with"
"Don Ameche has a great singing voice but with the wretched writing material, he comes off so terribly corny."
Some silly nonsense about the baron having to clear up business and being away allows him to play both parts.
Sakal is given little to do here and so his comedic gifts are not given the opportunity to shine.
Ditto for J. Carrol Naish who actually appears uncomfortable in his role.
Laugh awkwardly as we are supposed to believe that a teenager would go alone with burying a dead woman in his front yard.
Maybe it was casting himself as the virginity-taking westerner that planted the seeds of doubt in my head.
The ending monologue(s) of the killer made him/her pretty uncool.
This film is another of director Tim Burton's attempts to capitalize on a familiar title to bring his `vision' to the screen.
POTA was an extremely intelligent film that broached difficult questions and elegantly held the oppressions of American society up to scrutiny by making the white guy justify his intelligence to a species he considered inferior.
The makeup is fantastic and Burton's camerawork is outstanding (though I continue to dislike his dark look).
Helena Bonham Carter is a brilliant actor whose character is so far beneath her ability that the disconnect is laughable.
He creates one of the most villainous and despicable bad guys I can remember in some time.
"Also, this surgeon had 4 malpractice suits against him and he didn't think people would ask questions if a patient died on his table?"
"Nicgolas Cage was biking down hills, swimming in murky water and rolling down hills while being attacked by bees but yet his suit was still perfectly pressed and shirt crisp white until the very last scene."
Matt Farnsworth has no clue what he is doing.
"Priyadarshan- whenever a person heard his name, his first thought would be 'comedy'."
"If your mother-in-law has arrived to your house and starts mocking you at everything, then send her for this movie and have fun."
A famous show master enters the elevator with his girlfriend.
"There's a few decent gore effects here too, there's a cut out heart, a guy's leg is bitten off, there's some blood splatter, a cool shot of a guy left holding his own intestines after he has been attacked by the dinosaur, there's a few dead bodies seen & someone is stabbed with a spear."
Pollan acts as if she is reading the script as she speaks.
To even suggest that this giant of a man and seasoned fighter would allow himself to be taken alive is ridiculous.
"Another reviewer on this site has said that the fleeting nude shots are nice, and he's right."
"And sometimes they just don't seem believable (yes I know their fictitious creatures but still), I am of course referring to the zombie that runs his hand on the wall as though he were walking through a dark living room, and I still don't like the zombie who is lying on the ground, gets shot, then jerks like he was just shot."
"(And wouldn't MJH a the prosecuting attorney, have had access to that evidence--taking it out and putting the wrong evidence back--anyway, so she wouldn't have needed the cop's help?)."
But the cop's crime seemed minor in comparison since he didn't know exactly what he was doing.
"The filmmakers could have taken it a step further and had him be the one that encouraged MJH to plant the evidence, which would have made him more culpable."
And MJH's yelling that he (the cop) got her in that mess doesn't make any sense at all.
It would been more intriguing if each person died in a way that offered the others a clue to why he/she was there and deserved to die.
"Del Tenney(The Curse of the Living Corpse;I Eat Your Skin), of all people, executive produced, co-wrote, and stars as a priest in a pivotal role whose relationship to the killer I guess means something to why he's psychotic."
"The protracted finale, where the killer goes on and on with the actor desperately trying to make his villain as diabolical and demented as possible, is embarrassing and tense-less."
"Lyon is excellent at playing the young girl he loves and then the more worldly wife, though her 3-pack a day voice does threaten to give her away at any given moment."
although the part where the guy gets that thing shoved in his head was a little too violent for my taste.
oh well i guess i was disappointed cause Carrie fisher is like so awesome and this movie did nothing for her
It's crap like this that make old Bobby McKee and his wandering band of Structuralists sound like geniuses...Sundance??Berlin??Toronto??
"I have a home video of my cat farting that evokes more interest than Arquette's negatively-dimensional portrayal of anguished loss...and, talk about deux ex machina for Mr. Stanley T.; thank god, just in the nick o time he thought to have Dave call the cops!"
Kurt Thomas in one of the series of gymnast olympic stars turned movie stars movies that mercifully only includes one other..Mitch Gaylord in American Anthem...at least that one had Janet Jones..this one has...um... a gymnast using his martial arts and his gymnastic skills to save a european country from dictatorship..sure it could happen.. on a scale of one to ten.. a
"In any event, the script leaves the camera dwelling all too often on Artemisia's body, and all too seldom on her paintings."
"Boyle seems to be taking his cue from Gene Hackman as Lex Luthor in Superman, apparently he's the only one in the cast who realizes he's in a turkey and overacts accordingly."
"After going down on some of this fruit (which appears to be plastic bananas on stalks) Chastity is endowed with some mystical magical powers that makes her a super-hero, specifically, The Double D Avenger."
They never really explained WHY it had to be brides or why it must be women or even what disease his wife had--so you can see that the plot was never really hashed out at all.
"On top of that, I'm a fan of Max Fleischer's work, and this started out with the look and feel of his 30s cartoon."
"The result is arguably the worst film in Scorsese's filmography, and, ironically, his most illuminating."
"Watch how Scorsese's camera desperately whips back and forth, how he zooms frantically onto doorknobs and windows in an attempt to force tension and how his characters are all loud and screaming for attention."
"The reason for this is that Scorsese's camera always has to be bound, or intimately tethered, to his central character."
"For the world around the character to make sense, his camera has to be focused on the character."
"Scorsese tried to rectify this problem with Gangs of New York, where the space and the sets become the central character, but even this self consciously spatial experiment gets sabotaged by the magnetism of Daniel Day Lewis, the actor drawing Scorsese's camera inexorably toward him like a moth to a bulb."
"Okay, plot in a nutshell (fitting vessel, that...): a doctor (Moss) gets bitten by a bat while checking out a cave with his wife (McAndrew) and subsequently turns into a bat - well, not exactly a bat but a bat-like creature that looks more like a werewolf who kills his victims in a first-person camera viewpoint...."
Add to that the fact that his dad was killed by a crooked cop who just so happens to be in on the current crime being investigated by the hapless duo.
); hartnett confronting his dad's killer) and you've got one hell of a mess.
5) When Ford chases the bad guy into the building and he gets in the elevator how the hell does he know which floor the bad guy got off at??
Any Dick shouldn't ever get work because he plays the same lame character.
I saw this movie recently because a friend brought it with him from NYC.
"After 30 minutes, I said to him, You've got to be kidding."
"Einstein and his buddies are a good relief from Tim Robbins' boring, almost tense quest to steal Meg Ryan's heart."
French film-noir actress she is not and they lack chemistry together.
"The leading man in this film certainly has the look, but I seriously thinks he needs to consider more training before he is ready to carry a film."
"I liked Chiba in Street Fighter, and I figured hey, no matter how stupid this movie will be, I'll at least get to see him kick some ass, right?"
"Dolph Lundgren is very good in this movie, in fact on the basis of his performance here, one would forget Lundgren's rise to fame involved action roles."
"However the movie is lackluster, the action is non-existent, the plot not given enough exploration (Too much boring B.S around Lundgren's investigation of his brother's employer) and the film is needlessly gory and ridiculous."
"Somehow, everyone knows him, and every single chick in the movie wants him."
They were not relevant to Strummer's life and their opinions add nothing to his story.
"Almost as tedious to watch as it was to read, Evening is a gorgeously produced failure...until Meryl Streep walks in and quietly shows her other cast members how to act this kind of stuff."
Vanessa Redgrave is shockingly off in her role as the dying Ann and Claire Danes is a cipher.
Their should be a warning that some sadistic nasty writer is attempting to make a name for herself before being held hostage for an hour and a half watching garbage.
I think the devil now knows who the writer of this movie is; congratulations you won his attention
Walter Matthau sleepwalks through his role as Nat while this commentator almost slept through the whole movi
"Just as they finish Grace walks in and sis says to her, `Oh, great to see you, gotta run to pick up Timmy' and mum's the word about Sammy's indiscretions."
"Rosanna Arquette is the closest thing to an actor in this film, giving a bearable performance and looking genuinely hurt when she finally discovers that her perfect husband is a lecherous animal."
"And I absolutely hated Serbedzija's character (a wonman organizer), he is not charming in anyway in the movie."
"Gina Gershon is so underrated, and she deserves better chance than this, I wish her to make better choice in the future"
"Once the writer/Umney's family tragedy began to reveal though, I thought the show developed an emotional connection that made the viewer (me, at least), feel sympathy for the real-life Macy's attempt to escape his sorrows by usurping his fictional creation's exciting life."
"--a cheap video shot of a reporter starting to forget what she's reporting on, and brief radio broadcasts announcing the day of judgement is at hand."
"The man, Tobias Schneebaum is New York Jewish as they come and somehow, this is intertwined with the documentary as he appears in his yamika in several scenes."
There are no real cannibals here: only stories relayed by some of the natives and by Tobias himself.
Sheedy's 'is she crazy or does she just need a hug?'
I nearly laughed to death when I saw the humanoid beavers with their giant stiff suits and buck teeth; I nearly cried when I heard the wolf's howl-- a man in a grey fuzzy suit basically shrieking as loudly and as girlishly as he possibly could.
"When setting out this film, director Mary Harron seemingly had the goal of clearly documenting the progress of Bettie Page's career, from early modelling days to leaving modelling to go back home after the Senate Hearings on Juvenile Delinquency and her religious rediscovery in the 50s, and so intent is she to get all of these facts on screen in the time allowed she seems to have missed out on taking any time to explain anything in depth."
"It seems to me that Harron is trying to make a point about how tame all this is by today's standards (Page never took any photos of explicit sexual actions) and how the reaction some gave this kind of thing was really overzealous And although this is true, she never actually makes it seem sordid in the eyes of others."
"They come across as two lifelong fans of Miss Page and are desperate to make sure that nothing, absolutely nothing, could possibly put a bad light on their heroine, and have therefore avoided any in depth probing into who she really was."
But the worst part of it is Shearer herself.
"The cop partner thinks maybe something is not right, that his partner might be a bad cop who is murdering these women, but he isn't sure if that is what's happening because - he's a moron!"
I'm not angry at Rob Schneider because he has the intelligence of a dead cat.
"In fact, the script reserves most of its venom for Tyson's ex-wife Robin Givens, characterising her as an ungrateful gold-digger who took advantage of his naivety."
"To give director Ken Russell his due, he makes this filmed version about as entertaining as it's possible to make this essentially unfilmable novel."
"Glenda Jackson won an Oscar for her performance as Gudrun, the more dominant of the two sisters at the story's focus, and she certainly tries her hardest to do something with this material; anyone would deserve an Oscar simply for having to bear Russell's decision to give her a scene where she has to dance wildly in front of a herd of mystified-looking cattle."
"He doesn't really say anything about them other than that they killed his parents, and unless i missed something the didn't say how he managed to escape either... Not to mention the fact that it gives no clue or reason why the only survivor stays and essentially feeds the creatures after her own near death experience."
"Kevin Bacon can act superbly given the chance, so no doubt had an IRS bill to settle when he agreed to this dire screenplay."
Guy Ritchie does his stylish editing which is laughable here.
Maybe Madonna's ego is so big that she insists on continuing to prove herself as a competent actress.
"As it was already said, the author lost the faculty to coalesce his content factors and artistic intentions in a coherent form."
"Maniacally concerned with the mechanic trick of picking at random news subjects and join them together without any legitimacy, he only gathers a disordered pile of events, unable to follow the least story-line."
"SPOILERS Tara Fitzgerald's characterisation of Helen Graham made her appear cold and harsh, letting no emotion pass through."
"Czekh director is excused, since he is not nomadic origin, he cannot know true spirit and history of nomads"
"One pointless subplot shows a hick go into a liquor store to purchase a $4.75 pint of Ripple; instead of simply buying the bottle, the idiot shoots the cashier and another bystander, shoots at a cop, gets chased towards the lake, all so that he can eaten by the monster."
"There's a fake magician struggling with a phony British accent (to make him seem more legit), two overly-bumbling redneck boat renters, some cheesy pre-historic cave art done in crayon, and annoying banjo-pickin' background moosic."
"In one painful scene, the fake magician and his dopey wife/girlfriend/accomplice manage to pad the movie an extra 4 minutes by cowmenting on how may stars they can see in the night sky, even though it is clearly day time still."
Dreck like this certainly does nothing to enhance his reputation as a funny man.
The director suffers from the same issues he had with There Will Be Blood (though he wasn't quite as bad in that film.
It's like he sits in his little director's chair and thinks how would a great filmmaker handle this scene?
"Also Alison Doody lacks the grace of Deborah Kerr in the role of the leading lady, and last but not least the impressive Siriaque in the role of Umbopa makes it very hard for anyone to fill his (shoes)!!!"
"I am a big Peter Bogdanovich fan and I enjoyed his last movie, Cat's Meow and all his early ones from Targets to Nickleodeon."
No editing at all - seems like J.P. Dutta fell in love with his project too much .
"Even though he gets minor celebrity such as Christian Slater, Tara Reid and Stephen Dorff his movie lacks the necessary fundamentals that a movie needs to be good such as a story line, and some basic relativity of what's going on in the dark and the light."
"The director, Gautham, should realize that he also has some obligation to the society and his audience.Certainly i am never going to the movies looking like Gautham's name on the production list"
"Also, there is an appearance by co-director Jeff as he is in all his films."
A good playwright is better than a good screenwriter because he or she knows the ways of words better.
"Bartram seems to think that scowling and stubbornly shaking his head is acting, it's not, it's quite the opposite."
The best shots are a shot of Superman catching a car in his hands.
"Gasp in shock as Theo Robertson puts the boot into the latest Hollywood blockbusters , weep in sympathy as he gets yet another rejection letter from a film company , fall in lust as he takes a bath and rubs soap over his well toned body ."
"The film's star, Andy Samberg, contributed an effort to the screen that observably exerted every last drip-drop of his comedic capabilities."
"Unfortunately rather, realistically his humorous talents are no more admirable than a five-year-old retelling his own exhausted joke that somewhere includes the innocently crude poop and pee-pee gags."
"To rescue them of their mortification, I'll willingly omit the ghastliness of Samberg's co-stars' roles and leave the second third of The Lonely Island team, director Akiva Schaffer, to his non-existent talent as a director or a comedian."
Morgan Please Like Me Spurlock unleashed this wet fart of a film and it's no surprise since Spurlock as One Hit Wonder prince of the documentary world seems to throw his weight behind any silly sounding concept to stay relevant in a world that really has no need of him.
"If any one of the cast members wanted to, they could have just taken her out in a heartbeat."
"The story exists, but that is all, and fails to show any basic start, middle and end and the viewer is left shrugging his shoulders feeling as though nothing in the past hour and three quarters has really happened."
Whether Fred can re-create this when working with a higher calibre of cast remains to be seen but I'l be watching out for him in future
"Detective Tony Rome (Frank Sinatra) returns to the screen after his self titled debut, this time it's a film that's played for ermlaughs."
"While on a diving trip, Rome finds the body of a blonde beauty at the bottom of the sea, her feet as you might expect, encased in cement."
"Rome finds himself immediately at risk as he has to investigate some mafia types, who turn the tables on him and he is himself found to be the main suspect, he must now go on the run and hope to solve the case alone."
"The portly Sinatra tries hard to sell us the lame jokes and make us believe he is a good detective, oh and not to mention being sexually attractive to the foxy Raquel Welch, but he fails miserably, in this ham fisted vanity project."
"But then came Seed, and the counter was reset to Zero, keeping his bid for legitimacy and respect that much further out of reach."
"Paresh Rawal had a few of his expected classic moments, but overall, because his role and character wasn't given much room to grow, he didn't make much of an impact in this film."
"He does this all on a chalkboard, or maybe with a stick in the dirt (I cant remember)."
"Laurie plays another sister who goes off to Wellington to tramp around there, despite the fact that she is married."
Mickey Rourke has two good minutes when his character talks about his f**ked up career in a scene where reality and fiction meet.
Robert Klein certainly think it's the former and his self-centered performance in a minor role underscores the total lack of balance and chemistry between the players in the film.
"Needless to say, this made it difficult to feel empathy for any of the characters, especially the fiance; He looked and acted more like a cartoon."
"This film had no huge stars in it, but did have a very good cast filled with excellent supporting actors AND Gene Tierney before she became a big star."
"For not only has Rohmer attempted (with success) to make us see the world through the genre art of 18th century France but, as ali has pointed out, has shown (at the cost of alienating his audience) the effects of both class consciousness and the revolution it inspired through the eyes of a dislikably elitist woman of her times."
"The director has accomplished something undeniably difficult, but I question whether it was worth the effort it took for him to do so -- or for us to watch the dull results of his labor"
Yet Greenaway's biggest failing is that he cannot write.
The name Tom Savini has a long history in the horror genre: He's the king of low-budget special effects and lower-budget acting.
"But the clueless pacing; the way the director treats plot and characterization as a nuisance he thinks no one cares about anyway; and the excruciatingly long and boring driving, walking, and nature sequences (no doubt added to increase the running time to make the film qualify for distribution) show a complete lack of aptitude for film and storytelling in general."
"Arthur's brother Victor, the bible toting Jesus freak, is so horribly over-the-top evil/effeminately gay that you have to wonder how he was cast in this role."
"In his card reading, Dr. Meso turns up four straight Death cards for the four remaining band members."
"When another band-mate goes in to check on her, Dora is standing in the dark, requesting his sunglasses."
"One scene we see Cassidy standing at a desk, when a character enters in the next, she's nowhere to be found."
"single cute girl needs handsome boy to impress ex, pays him and then (guess what?)"
Moore seems to haggardly move through this mess definitely not one of his better efforts.
"This is Ryan Nicholson's first feature length, and for the most part he failed."
"Van Damne proceeds to pick up a pistol from a fallen soldier and shoots him,...while he is still about 75 to 80 yards away."
Eva Longoria is a non-entity; she looks like she's reading her lines off a teleprompter.
Superman is the original super hero and deserves to be treated with respect even though he wears tights.
"Brandon Routh was the worst superman I've ever seen, from the start of the movie u just wanna shove a chunk of kryptonite down his throat."
"But enough about him, Kate Bosworth was a bad choise for lois lane, she is supposed to be a hard ass reporter, but in this movie she looks more like a schoolgirl."
"The plot was weak and predictable (WOW, He is actually supermans son, who would have ever thought....) and the acting was horrible."
"Oh, and then there's the Poliwhirl who thinks he's a Poliwrath."
Jirarudan's speech to them saying his collection `started with a Mew card?'
Much different from whining about him thinking Pokemon are things to be collected like stamps.
"The bad guy stops, gets out, shoots at him so Joe has to blast him dead."
There was no explanation what drove this man to do such a desperate violent thing and the dead man's parents do some redneck freak out at the police station while Joe feels real sad and guilty that he had to kill someone.
"So we know that Joe, the farmer forced off his land into a cop job, is a good basic sort of guy."
"Then his brother Frank shows up, he is a sadistic, amoral bully, fresh out of the Army and Nam where the war got his blood lust up."
So Viggo - Frank whigs out for no particular reason and beats his pal Ceasar to death after good Joe the Cop leaves.
Mayeda must battle all odds to survive and the secure the fate of his beloved Japan.
"Like 'First Blood', this attempts to make a point about the treatment of Vietnam vets, but there really isn't much time for that in between the monotonous gunfire, burnings, stabbings, torture and explosions as an impossibly indestructible Rambo takes out half of Asia, a ton of Vietnamese soldiers, most of the Russian army, various vehicles and anything else he can point a rocket launcher at."
Stallone has a brain in his head; this empty nonsense is beneath him
Ms Albright does excellent looking sexy & her acting is first rate.
"After they learn what, they get the help of a grizzly middle aged fisherman, who wants to kill the animal to avenge the eating of his family."
"Since the real star, Dolph Lundgren, would not be able to reprise his role from the original, there is already scant reason to indulge oneself in this obvious tax write-off."
"Bill Goldberg looks like he is having the time of his life on this film, and he makes a fair stab at filling the requisite comedic villain role."
"Here, one of the villains is shot with a gun that leaves massive holes in his uniform (and presumably his body), getting up every time without stopping for breath."
Let's hope this Mr. Unterwaldt (the Jr. being a good indication for his obvious inexperience and intellectual infancy) dies a slow/painful death and NEVER makes a film again.
Harriet is supposed to be blonde and blooming - not to look as if she's going to be carried off by consumption in the next scene.
"The storyline jumps back and forth from Slater's childhood at an orphanage where he gets flashbacks of something terrible that happened, he has amnesia, of course."
"How a regular person is able to transcend death and possess another human being through his rosary is never explained, nor even talked about."
One of the main characters says he became a priest to explain away holes in science.
"He says, Take me as your messenger!"
"This was director von Stroheim's third effort - it is quite crude and shows none of the exceptional flair for the camera and editing mastery he would display a few years later with his masterworks, GREED and THE WEDDING MARCH."
There was no real internal dilemma within Anakin; it just seemed like a switch was flipped and he was evil all of a sudden.
This film looked like like it was directed by a film student for his Intro.
"While Coppola, Jr. did take the same idea, a film about film, he tried too hard to make himself seem European, artsy, and witty, when it's all really just kitsch."
Schwartzman somehow manages to pull off his role as a flamboyant director.
"There was a lot of character development which made the film better to watch, then after the kid came back to life as the scarecrow, there was a mindless hour and ten minutes of him killing people."
"Jaq's transformation into a human is a prime example: Where he was walking around eating an apple and adding a few little quips in here and there, he should have been dancing around and singing about how great it was to be tall!"
"And, while I do not doubt the evident talent this director possesses, I do know that he fumbled the ball big time on an idea that could very well have redefined the horror genre."
the best is when the awkward teenage neighbor tries to bike away from the babysitter and in the background looks like he's never been anywhere near a bike in his life as he attempts not to fall off.
"As with another reviewer, I loved the scene where Lisa (Cynthia Bain) and Dourif are declaring their love for each other - in between dodging the jets of flame shooting out of his arm in the car."
"After Ms. Grandin is abducted by dealers in the buying and selling of women as prostituted slaves, Ms. Gail and her policeman boyfriend Matt Moore (as Larry Burke) must rescue the virtue-threatened young woman."
"Even the blood & gore isn't up to much, there's a gory hand severing at the start, a scene when something rips out of a pregnant woman's stomach, a legless woman (what actually took her legs off in the pool by the way & why didn't it take the legs off the guy who jumped in to save her?)"
Was convincing the world that he didn't exist...
General Duval heads the expedition along with his daughter Claire (Dorothy Stone) who is engaged to Louque who also comes along.
"The mother, who is he main character, is everything but motherly."
The guy is charming and who can blame her?
"What outraged me in this movie, is the utter lack of self-respect the mother has for herself."
She tells Craig something like I am just a shapeless lump the first time they sleep together.
"Throughout the rest of the film, there is a love triangle as the woman's boyfriend is back in town visiting her for the season."
"However, the soldier feels bad about what he's done and doesn't want to make things worse."
Joe Don Baker is an alright to good actor in small roles here and there...he was alright in Goldeneye and made a pretty good Bond villan in The Living Daylights and has appeared in various other movies.
You will be amazed at how many times Joe Don the hero gets taken out by one punch and how incompetent he proves to be.
"Jerry Springer gets millions for his shows, his movie, his book and videos."
"Jeez, with all his fine work, you'd think he'd have earned our respect already."
"Right from the opening message already, mocking Alfred Hitchcock's The Birds, this is clearly intended as a zero-budgeted parody and I can't escape the impression that writer/director John De Bello never expected for his film to become such a hit."
I thought the chick was hot and was disappointed in the brevity of her bath scene.
A bit of T and A from her would have raised the score from nothing to maybe a 3 or 4.
"Anyway, by 2003, the film was sold to distributors ( at a net loss, I understand ) who inexplicably had no photos of Eva on the box ( by then she was a rising, working name ) but who did manage to obtain a clear photo of what appears to be an authentic Latino gangster to lend credibility to SNITCH'D."
"Jack Warden is pleasantly genial as usual, but the script is so awful that even he comes off badly."
"Kate tells Jed she could get fired because she's supposed to be a pillar of the community, but puts out for him!"
"Janine should have been kicked off the force for her inexcusable abuse of power, but nothing happens!"
A stupid rich guy circa about 1800 wants to visit a nearby mental asylum to see how a famous doctor cares for his patients.
"And, as the doctor shows him about, he talks and talks and talks!!!"
"You know, the one with Lord Garth--Master of the Universe and Kirk and Spock are held prisoner by this madman and his crazed followers."
"Director Jamie Blanks (who, with all due respect, looks like he had some trouble with the girls himself in the sixth grade) mentions being influenced by Halloween."
The only difference between the killer in Valentine and Michael Meyer's is that Michael's mask was so much more effective and he didn't have a problem with nosebleeds.
"At the end, there is a brief attempt to mislead us one more time as to who the killer is (complete with slow and drawn out `and-the-killer-is' mask removal), but then we see Adam's nose start to bleed as he holds Kate, his often reluctant girlfriend, and we know that he's been the killer all along."
If only Ed Wood could bring his subtle sense of flair and dignity to these remarkable scripts.
"I was disappointed the crock didn't get to try out its sotto voce tenor with a soliloquy on environmentalism...or crocky appreciation, but the quasi-Captain Ahab of the story does get his tour de force speach."
"The producer, Sam Katzman, was known as King of the Quickies and, like his director, Spencer Bennett, seemed more concerned with speed and efficiency than with generating excitement."
"And, if the room was evil, why make our main character come to terms with his daughter's death, if it was going to keep him trapped there forever anyway?"
"Ajay Devgn suddenly decides to go to India and ask forgiveness to his diaper buddy, thanks to his uncle Om Puri."
"Ajay is equally good, but Salman has over-shadowed him completely."
"You've got to admire director Todd Sheets for his dedication, drive and enthusiasm when it comes to movie-making: between 1985 and 2000, he made a whopping 34 films."
"A naive park ranger (Colin Firth) marries a pretty, mysterious woman (Lisa Zane) he's only known for a short time."
We see another chick's boobs but she's nowhere near Lola.
"Lola Gaudini is great as the vixen in a cheap, slutty way but not even she saves Consequence from being trash and not funny trash, just plain old stinking trash"
"4. when one of the people is firing an ordinary gun, he shoots almost 30 times without reloading!"
"Now the family he's working for are not against blacks, but he thinks they are."
"The blind mother (yes) hears this, so Bigger tries to silence her, but instead smothers her."
"For reasons not fully explained until the end of the film, he is sent to Earth to help a single mother and her son."
"The mom's problem (her main problem at least) is that she has a balloon payment due on her mortgage in two weeks...to the not-so-tiny tune of $20,000."
"You'll be truly moved by the scene where Leslie-Anne Down, playing the mother, kicks a dog which is yapping at her."
"This is the real reason why NBC refused to air it, rather than a failure to comprehend Mr. Mike's vision (unless, of course, his vision was to drive the film's backers into bankruptcy)."
At the beginning of the story abusive husband Kenneth comes home to his family in an upscale gated community.
"One White boy (Lukas Hass watching his career go down the toilet), one Black, one Asian, and one Hispanic."
"A mall cop comes to investigate the ruckus and they shoot him in the head, firing more than once."
Comedy isn't his strong suit.
"As most of them have given their comments I thought of watching this movie because it seemed to have some decent actors(though having read worst critics against this movie) I thought of experimenting it assuming it to be some comedy flick., Well it all started well with some ahem., comedies.... then it all started going pathetic... man you can believe your self, you wud feel like going and banging your head each and every time the pathetic looking woman called the heroine of the movie is made helpless...Huh~~ Well how much can a person digest a sick all POSSESSIVE witch kinda ghost trying to do all she can to irritate you and stop you from what you are doing."
"The big twist, however, is very predictable and sends the film delving into the conspiracy and his memories of the little signs which were there but he, like us, initially missed."
Gene York about re-elect for congressman and he presides the financing committee.
"Then scenes such as, Corleone being invested with all the trappings of the Catholic Church with full choir, the assassin on horseback riding away into the sunset, the unseen helicopter machine gunning of the meeting (where the 'goodies' get away and everyone else is shot),daughter and 1st cousin rolling bits of pasta across a board, the pathetic shooting on the steps ..... Corleone stuffing sweets down him with orange juice for diabetes (a man of his intelligence and guile isn't ready for an emergency?)..."
Mira Sorvino is so out of her element here that as a viewer one simply can't get over the fact that she is even in such a piece.
"Repressed Erika has a liking for hardcore pornography, shown briefly but graphically for a few seconds while she sniffs a tissue taken from the waste basket in the private booth where she watches."
Erika retains control over her lovesick swain.
"The next big scene (by-passing the genital self-mutilation, etc) has Walter turning up at the apartment Erika shares with her mother."
Erika tracks down Walter to the skating rink where he does his ice hockey practice.
Lusty Wally is unable to resist the hands tugging at his trousers.
"Before going to the final scene, where she's due to perform as a substitute for the underwear-soiling student with the lacerated hands, Erika packs a knife in her handbag."
One of the female students has a crush on her teacher.
Someone should've told him you're supposed to write dialog that sounds like something someone actually might say.
"Someone might have wanted to let him know that you can, in fact, shoot a scene in a cab in New York, and it will look real, and you won't have to fake it with a blue screen for no reason."
"OH wait, it was produced by her father."
For example Jane & Mr Rochester have hardly spoken & suddenly he is proposing marriage!!!
"Rainie's acting is sub par as she 'over-act', trying to be perky and cute."
I'm a big Sinatra fan including some of his acting roles but maybe the only person who could have played this part would have been Don Knotts.
"There is a 'love interest' in the story and if I followed it right, she was upset when the main character refused to admit who he was so some other bad guy wouldn't kill him."
"Either she sucks or her character sucks, I can't figure out which."
"Something's up with her, obviously."
"When an old school friend of Andy's named Jed Hill (Alec Baldwin) turns up as the resident surgeon, trouble is not far behind him."
It was as if the composer was in his own world scoring his own movies.
"In the 2008 movie, all Ed Norton's Bruce Banner has to do is to keep his pulse rate under 200, as monitored by a device strapped onto his wrist."
"But the Hulk never kills intentionally, even his attackers."
"Azumi is now a fully fledged assassin, meaning she can wave her sword around in slow motion; unfortunately, now the character is instilled with a sort of Man With No Name style mysteriousness, Ueto's model looks become even more inappropriate."
"This leads to the worst possible result in a slasher film: The audience, intended to care about the leads, instead not only cheers on the anonymous killer, but wishes that he had arrived to start picking off the vacuous brats far earlier."
William Boyd must be spinning in his grave.
"If the producers were going to resurrect the Hopalong Cassidy character, they might have given some thought to portraying him as he was originally written - a grizzled foul-mouthed ranch hand with a chip on his shoulder, the kind of part Lee Marvin would have excelled in."
They meet a complete stranger at a park and Heather Graham character walks up to her and asks the most intimate questions that even half sane person would be running the other way or at least scream for a police officer.
Jack Frost is about a killer who is being transported via truck to jail so he could fry in the chair at midnight.
Sadly his appearance is only reduced to three minutes and all we ever see of him is his new snow man form and his wise cracking voice.
"Mankiewicz doesn't seem to know how to present Loesser's challenging but tuneful melodies for maximum effect: for example, one of the best numbers, the showstopping `Adelaide's Lament', concludes by having Adelaide (Vivian Blaine) belt out the finale while sitting on a chaise lounge; and Stubby Kaye's faux-spiritual `Sit Down, You're Rockin' The Boat' has his backing choir sitting in folding chairs while he simply stands there."
"Henry Silva has presence as a screen villain, but he's totally miscast here as an Arab leader (in a red beret!)"
"We know a killer stalks the perimeters of the school but his body count is pitiful and sparse and in the absence of the visceral horrors one expects to find in the giallo, we get no sense of sinister mysteries/unspeakable secrets festering behind a facade of order and piety and rightness which is the kind of movie La Residencia wants to be but doesn't quite know how to do it."
"I mean they both get in the mood and start kissing and stuff, but when the rapist tries to have sex with her, she doesn't allow it so the rapist rapes her."
"Airport '77 starts as a brand new luxury 747 plane is loaded up with valuable paintings & such belonging to rich businessman Philip Stevens (James Stewart) who is flying them & a bunch of VIP's to his estate in preparation of it being opened to the public as a museum, also on board is Stevens daughter Julie (Kathleen Quinlan) & her son."
Another reviewer suggested that it was Falk's only directorial outing because it interfered with his acting role.
"Far from following such a person and electing him to the highest office in the land, sane people would cross the street to avoid him, and he would have died in a ditch, nameless and unknown."
"Anyone who reads the accounts of Hitler's close companions - the autobiography of his secretary Traudl Junge for instance - will be struck by the fact that people found him a kindly, intelligent, generous man."
"You won't believe your eyes - either what he turned into, or the absolutely crappy costume the actor is wearing to depict what he's turned into."
Val's story is that she is a great dancer but a 3 in the looks department.
Corey incites a lynch mob (despite the sheriff arresting him) to hang the hospitalised Mole-Man.
Superman stops them entering the hospital and takes the injured chappie to the shaft to return him to his fellows.
The only reason I could see for seeing this film is if you are a die-hard Sean Connery fan and simply want to see everything he's done.
"Finally give the editing job to your brother-in-law, because the meat packing plant just laid him off."
"Portraying Rose Hood (Beverly Garland) becoming sheriff in an Old West town after her sheriff husband gets murdered and having to fight off baddies, the movie is pretty predictable."
"It also seems like Donald Trump's massive ego becomes bigger and bigger for every season that pass by and to be honest, I can't see why anyone with a common sense would want to work for him."
"Smith is likable, as he is in most of his films, but honestly, the story isn't that good."
"He is telling them about Eastern philosophy and how it is all right to die, which I imagine the writers thought was funny or even witty."
"For some reason, even though Ford is uncovered as a cheat and a fraud when acting as a realtor, (he makes up the prices when he is trying to sell the producer's house to jack up his own commission), they keep coming back to him anyway!"
"Complete waste of time, Ford's worst movie since 6 Days 7 Nights, which was without a doubt, the lowest point of his distinguished career"
Oliver Hardy awakens with a hangover and soon learns that his uncle is coming to see Ollie's new wife and baby.
Alan Shore's flamboyant and gratuitous public service announcements where he spouts off his opinions do not impress.
"Oh, that's right... except for the one guy who has been stabbed several times, is obviously stumbling along the curb with knife wounds, and an approaching car apparently didn't notice him there."
"And yet here's another clean rip-off, a Spanish one this time, that shamelessly repeats the story of a young girl that gets possessed by pure evil and turns against her own family."
Why does the narrator unsuccessfully mock the people he interviews (it is so obvious that he edited out the really informative parts of his interviews to achieve mockery).
"Swayzee does quite well as the sad father, returned to London, who is unable to obtain the custody of his son."
"JUST CAUSE showcases Sean Connery as a Harvard law prof, Kate Capshaw (does she still get work?)"
He is approached by the convicted man's grandmother to defend him and re-open the trial.
It turns out that Blair IS a psychotic psycho and that he used white guilt to enlist Connery.
One has to question his grasp on reality.
The actor who played Ricky (I forgot his name) did a VERY good job.
"At one point (I've forgotten exactly when because now it's all just a blur), our hero, Luke Wilson starts running through traffic; I think he was looking for a cab."
"Disappointing and undeniably dull true-crime movie that has poorly cast character actor Jeremy Renner languidly mumbling his way through the title role of Jeffrey Dahmer, who was easily one of the last century's most recognizable degenerates/serial killers."
Job #2 requires him to put on a protective suit and go into a dark room...at least that's the best I can figure.
"Apparently the plant is not exactly top-secret, as the scientist brings his wife there."
"In these dark times, one of the few people on Earth still able to live in comfort, we will call him the All Knowing Big Boss, has a great quest to prevent some secret spore seeds from being released into the air."
"As the unremarkable macho action team members drop off with mechanically paced predictable timing, engaging Vivian Wu's charm makes acceptable the plot idea of her old employer wanting her so much."
Fans of Vivian Wu may want to check out an outstanding B-movie she is in from a couple years back called DINNER RUSH.
"Isn't there one that hides a bowling ball under his hate, and the other uses a chain, for god sake, what kind of school is he going to."
I've seen most of Ryuhei Kitamura's work and I've come to the conclusion that he has a knack for action.
"They're just not interesting or fun, Kitamura's creativity from Versus is gone, the small set even limits his often very impressive camera-work and it all boils down into generic and expectable fights, a shame really."
"The hero is a whiney security guard, his girlfriend is always complaining, they have a tramp friend who has a jerk military boyfriend, and another friend who is a spaz."
Please tell me director is getting medication he so desperately needs.
"The dialogue, along with sets, costumes, and the script's general themes are painted in pastel blues and pinks so much that all shades of humanity are lost in the director's incessant need to make his movie feel like a neutered fantasy; these aren't characters and that isn't our world in any way so why should I care?"
"An actor asks, What's my motivation?, to understand his or her character."
Why did the boy's mother testify in her behalf?
"Why wasn't the viewer informed that the victim's mother sold interview rights to print and television tabloids, parading her adolescent son on The Today Show?"
"That Mary Kay's lawyer cashed in, she herself appealing a Son of Sam statute so she could benefit from her crime by selling her story to the highest bidder?"
"First, a woman commits suicide by slashing her wrists whilst bathing."
"Second, the young daughter of a technical writer is found with her throat slashed."
"There was one other person in the audience when I saw it, and she left about an hour into it."
"**end spoiler* Well, well all that possibly would be fine with me if the director would have kept his view to himself."
"From this point on, the film really drags as the two quickly fall for each other, especially after Vincent wards off the locals and informs Shepherd that he was the little boy that saw the ship with her twenty-five years earlier."
"While this boring mess is happening, Vincent Schiavelli, with his killer dog at his side, is walking around killing the cattle and any people he runs into with an unusual item."
"Schiavelli explains why he is killing cattle and people and why he wants Shepherd dead, but even that doesn't make much sense when you really think about it."
"And the aliens won't need him if Shepherd is dead anyhow, so why try to kill her?"
Syberberg is to be admired for his penchant for tearing back the covers on the uglier aspects of German history.
"No doubt I can credit Karin Krick, who plays Parsifal 2, with acting of strength and dignity (she also happens to be the best lip-syncher of the whole cast)."
One of the things he misses entirely is Ozu's attention to character - we are not even introduced by Hou to his lead character (a perfect blank page).
Ever wanted to watch a documentary about a megalomaniacal jerk ruining his own life and alienating everyone around him?
"So instead we watch Anton, the genius, the socio-maniacal loser, be a jerk for the two hours and are just told to understand that he made really great music."
"Look at the guy, look at how he dresses, look at how he acts, look at how he tries to create controversy because he can't afford marketing."
The minister should have retired from the pulpit the time his son Paul strayed from the teachings he proclaimed.
"When the main character's sister is pushed down the stairs, the killer breaks a glass of vodka next to her, to make it appear that she's been drinking."
"I mean, I realized this when that dinosaur costume showed up and by the time the lead singer made his appearance I was humming Hard Rock Hallelujah to myself... even though I hate that song."
"Dark Floors is about a young autistic girl who is in the process of being sneaked out of the hospital by her over protective father when they, and the rest of the people in that particular elevator, become momentarily trapped..."
"After watching it I was originally going to say that the director shows promise but seems kind of amateurish, then I looked at the other stuff he's done to see if this was his first or second movie, but no, he did House on Haunted Hill and Fear Dot Com."
He seemed to like it a lot more than my wife and I did.
"These are puppets plunked down in a plot he openly confesses needed a dramatic element, the mother's affair with her daughter's lover."
Life is far more complex than it seems and people are alike all over and he should know this.
Higher Learning is proof that he did not understand this at all.
Will Peter save her before the cannibals have a meal?
"(4) The man the mother is cheating with doesn't have black hair, he has blonde."
Now for the unrealistic parts of the movie: (1) A thirteen year old can't punch his fist through a window in one punch.
Chris Kattan is so nervous on screen that it made me nervous to watch him.
"Obi-wan Kenobi was the wise and kind anchor for the entire series, but in the climax, he hacks off Annakin's legs, lets him burn in the lava, and leaves him to suffer."
"Richard Burton's Ashleigh lacked the charm, the charisma and the complexity to attract even women of his own age, let alone a fifteen year old."
"Freeze is some undead thing with an iceberg on his head, and the Riddler is a Gothic Marilyn Manson look-alike (which is funny because I don't expect people who are obsessed with riddles and puzzles to be Gothic)."
"The Joker is supposed to be Batman's deadliest enemy, but in this show he hardly poses a threat because his crimes are so stupid and pointless."
"Batman is a fascinating and complex character because he is haunted by the deaths of his parents, which is why he fights crime."
Even that crappy movie Batman & Robin used it as his origin.
"Because they are so good, I've seen at least 15 of his films and recently bought some more (which I am in the process of watching)."
This makes no sense at all and throughout much of the film it looks as if they just shot the film without a script--such as when they went into the bars and brothels and had Chiba walking about as if he was drunk.
"Men running up hill and shooting, usually the first getting shot in the head then 3 other men rescuing him."
"If the Cheryl character was a real person, she would have left him years ago, and not stay with the deadbeat for 8 years."
The horrors start from the first minutes of the film - having Gadget as a security guard called John Brown doesn't help identifying him as the classic Inspector Gadget.
He's a fine actor but Mr. Rochester he definitely isn't!
"I still am wondering how the character Mark wasn't able to run away from the Clown...he's 300 pounds, he's gotta get tired eventually."
The last thing that was stupidly funny was one second the main character was slapping the hitch-hiker and calling her a c*nt and then 5 minutes later saying violence isn't helping anything....did the writer of the script give the line to the wrong guy?
A friend told me to start w/ Chungking Express because it is his most accessible movies.
Govinda and the Blonde who playes his love interest also help saving this Disastrous movie.
Akshay does his role well but it seemed too over the top!!!!!
"With the story moving on, one of the two watchers begins to develop serious doubts about what he is doing."
"An amiable rancher (Norton) wanders into town and charms a young girl (Evan Rachel Wood), seemingly rescuing her from a dead-end existence with her bad-tempered father with a whirlwind romance, but it gradually becomes apparent that there is more to this cowboy than meets the eye."
Evan Rachel Wood is likable without ever really having a great deal to do other than bat her eyelids at Norton.
"The poor kid suffers daily humiliation, bullying, teasing & general esteem destroying abuse at the hands of his peers."
"We've seen it all before, we've seen killer scarecrows before, we've seen faceless teens being killed off one-by-one before, we've seen one of life's losers get his revenge before, we've seen wise cracking villains who make jokes as they kill before & we've seen incompetent small town Sheriff's make matters even worse before."
"The film has terrible character's, awful dialogue, an inconsistent & predictable story, it has some cheesy one-liners like when the scarecrow kills someone with a shovel he ask's 'can you dig it?'"
"Peter Sellers (one of my favorite actors) is mildly amusing in this 1970 turkey, but the script is so lame and insulting that even Goldie Hawn's youth (just after her Oscar win) cannot begin to pull this one out of the mud."
I never considered myself an Uwe Boll Hater since I think I never even saw one of his movies but after seeing this cheap excuse for a movie named Seed (which is the name of the serial killer this movie is about) I am close to joining the hate club.
Seed is a super killer that is everywhere at once and all cops act stupid enough to be killed... except for one who busts him.
"Seed comes out of his grave, kills everyone off in another slashing part and then seeks the main cop to take revenge on."
"Seed captures the cops family, lures him to his house, threatens to kill his wife and daughter."
After killing his wife with a nail gun the cop shoots himself in the head considering thats whats Seed wants (its hard to get into that guys head since he not just wears his mask even in prison but also never utters a word ... the movie has barely any dialog anyway so don't mind).
The main participant in this show would be a woman who was dying of something terrible and she would be donating her kidneys to one lucky person with progressive kidney failure.
As if I'm gonna believe the ridiculous ending where this woman pulled it off and has conscience issues because some guy shot himself on air.
"Hooper has made such classic films like Texas Chainsaw Massacre, then he made this god awful film, what happened?"
Not to be missed is Christopher Walkin's eyeglasses and his automotive explanation of the afterlife (paraphrased): The ancient Egyptianas - they wee materialists.
John figured that putting Bo in a movie wherein she was nude for much of the running time would make people flock to the theaters after the 10 hype.
The performance even of the stellar Jerzy Stuhr is here wooden and strangely bad - he just pulls unfunny faces and repeats on saying phrases like I am in the elevator with a nude chick and I haven't done anything to her!.
"A good 10 minutes or more are spent watching Glenn Ford's French wife thinking about leaving him, and then wondering where he is ."
"But when the husband investigates, he can't find anything."
"A rich and young guy undergoes a heart transplant the day after his marriage, and he is somehow witnessing his own surgery and the plot of his surgeons to kill him."
... maybe and real life where the dedicated mother will do everything to save the life of her son.
It's clear that Rod's not going to earn Frank's respect till he can beat him.
"heart transplant and Rod is determined to raise the money just so he 'can beat his ass' once he's healed, and prove himself a man."
"Granted, Ms. Bacall was a beautiful woman, but in this film her character comes off more mousy than attractive."
I would think men like Mitch Wayne and Kyle Hadley would more likely ignore Lucy than fall into an instant infatuation with her.
"In Bacall's defense, this film was made at the time of Humphrey Bogart's last illness and the weight of his deteriorating health may have affected her performance."
"It was really creepy how the killer was pretending to be the little boys friend, so he could kill."
Next the guy has to exercise in his wedding suit.
"In the end of the brainless flick, the mafia hit men are about the take revenge on the poor guy trying to shoot him!"
"Richard Burton sleepwalks through his role, and Sophia Loren's closed (in this movie) face doesn't display much passion, either."
"Peter Sellers plays Dick Scratcher (ha,ha), a cook for a pirate ship who takes over as captain after he murders the previous one."
"Ethan Hawke's Hank is a 30-something whining, immature, irresponsible man-child divorced from a marriage with a wife that hates him and a daughter who thinks he's a loser, which he very much is."
"For someone who's been an actor as long as Mr. Finney, you think he'd be more apt at emoting."
"Even though he doesn't show it much, his character is supposedly grief stricken and anger-filled."
Marisa Tomei isn't given much to do with her character.
"Hoffman's character ends up being the film's chief villain, but it's hard to root against him given the alternatives are an emotionally castrated little brother and a father who's self-admitted poor early parenting led to his son's eventual psychosis and indirect, unintentional murder of his mother."
"Especially as his make up mainly consisted of oatmeal on his face--an old trick.The hedgehog monster was pretty funny, as was climbing up the side of a castle on a ladder of arrows--as if."
"Even Kimble Rendall, who directed this film, shows more talent than she does."
But I'll say this for Carruthers: she's cute.
Why is Carruthers so phenomenally bad at getting her crew to even take notice of her?
If Rendall's set was half as much of an under-staffed shambles it's a wonder he completed his film at all.
also it had a couple funny parts and kills like when the care taker gets his organs riped out of his ass and then gets choked with it.
"It's official, folks -- Hou Hsiao-Hsien doesn't have a thought in his pretty little head."
"The good news is that, though Hou is in his 50s, it frankly feels to me as if he hasn't even begun."
Irene Dunne finished her illustrious career with this so-so movie.
Even her high-pitched voice got a bit annoying in here.
Director Ivan Reitman has lost his touch.
Uma Thurman was great as G-Girl and she had many funny lines.
"Second, I'm not against neither 2pac or Biggie I love them both but 2pac and Lil Kim DID get embarrassed in this movie for sure... Next, for all of ya that are saying that the movie is awesome and cant see the truth, either u are too blind too see it because u think u know something about BIG or you don't know anything about him at all and u love this Hollywood teenage movies."
"When drunk he would start fights and cause other problems in Virginia City, Montana."
"Because the oldest male lead tells his son that, in a more or less off-the-cuff fashion, like reminiscing about 'how you won the big game' over a cup of joe or an ice-cold bottle of refreshing Coca-Cola."
In fact the more charming Nisha tries to be the more irritating she becomes.
"Raj is in fact not bad as compared to the others, he is a guy to watch in the future."
"Delia does not make me think that she could be a devil child, rather she is a child with issues."
"Rather, she looks sulky and moody."
The closest thing to a sex scene in the movie has Sayuri wrinkling up her nose and grimacing with distaste for five seconds as if the man trying to mount her had dropped a handful of cockroaches on her crotch.
One character is said to be promiscuous but all we see is her pushing away her lover because it looks like she doesn't want to get caught doing something dirty.
Did Sayuri enjoy her first ravishing by some old codger after her cherry was auctioned off?
"Behind Mameha the Chairman was Sayuri's secret patron, and as such he was behind the auction of her virginity."
"So why did the Chairman let that old codger win her and, reeking of old-man stink, get his fingers all over her naked body?"
So the basis of the movie is some kid is obsessed with the Zodiac Killer and starts imitating him.
The great computer hacker was able to get this kid's address when someone gave him the kid's name and phone number.
"The other id when the guy gets his intestines, yet again, ripped out through his asshole."
"No, the killer continues to strangle the guy with his own intestines."
"Along with Halloween, when the female character is in a closet screaming for her life with the killer trying desperately;y to get in."
"When the teacher wakes up from her bed and walks down the stairs, her footsteps are so loud and hard that it seems like she was wearing boots."
To me it seems like they hired one of the animators to do his voice.
If only the director had worried a little more about fleshing out his main character instead of worrying about getting that perfect hand-held shot.
"But Raising Victor Vargas is only Sollett's second film, and his most well known, a solid effort in filmmaking that will hopefully get better as he continues to make films."
"Give it a rest not every kid likes him, once again, annoying and doesn't teach my child ANYTHING."
"Viggo Mortenson is a top-notch actor, but some of his selections of roles and projects leaves something to be desired."
It is an old Orwellian mind-f**k that the master himself described so well in his superb essay Politics and the English Language.
"Knight, who often speaks in her Ramtha voice."
The whole film is then a series of events and miss-fires consisting of Alan trying to prove himself whilst his father and other brothers are trapped in space aboard Thunderbird five.
"Sophia Myles plays Penelope and I think it's no coincidence she's a little older than the rest of the kids at 24 years old, it's almost too good to be true."
"The actual plot of The Hood doing all that he does just to rob a few banks is very bizarre, the characters that are his bodyguards: a geeky looking woman and hard bodied black man who gets agitated a lot."
"Ron Silver is flat as can be, and his attempted love triangle is as telegraphed as anything else in the film: He is dating affluent Lisa Rolfe (Carrie Fisher), but becomes smitten with oddball co-worker Jane Mortimer (Catherine Hicks), and I called every scene three scenes before they happen."
(Henderson's death is no spoiler; his name isn't revealed until his death scene.)
Someone's expression of sympathy shows more feeling than she does.
"Alabama's Ghost comes as close as any of his films to having a coherent plot, and it only involves hippies, rock concerts, voodoo, ghosts, vampires, robots, magicians, corrupt multinational corporations, elephants and Mystery Gas."
No one wants to take witness to watch Ethan urinating in the shower while singing to himself.
"Director Dewey Nicks was a former fashion photographer, and after reviewing this film, you can only wish he'll go back to the profession."
"Coincidentally Cameron Diaz makes a cameo in this film, just as she did in another bad film such as The Sweetest Thing where the story treats gross humor like another plot, instead of a device much like this disaster.."
Carl Panzram lived an amazing life and scribbled down his memoirs on scraps of paper for possibly the only person who ever did anything selfless for him.
The film neither elaborates on anything else particularly of note about this world traveler and career prisoner (like robbing former President Taft or being released from the Oregon prison as long as he gave his word to return).
"It felt like being in a stand up comedy club where the guy is dying on his feet and your sitting there, not enjoying it, just feeling really bad for him coz hes of trying."
The director would be nowhere today if all he did was churn out meaningless garbage.
"The movie never really gets through to the person, his thoughts and feelings."
"It seems that the director could not even wait until the body was cold before he jumped in to sell his version of the greatest punk rocker and hippie at heart that ever lived, sanctifying the person without really knowing enough about him."
It's just so unbelievably how the bewitched Mallory Doss manages to pull Kenneth Branagh's character around by his nose.
"Jake tries to make his true intentions known from the very beginning, at least to the audience."
"If you watch this movie, you would have noticed Evers shouting almost every line, that is until he is smoking and blowing the smoke coolly out his nose."
"It was up to Ross and Simon to tone down the character, to nuance his temperament to give The Sunshine Boys some sunniness, yet Walter continues to project as if we'd all gone deaf."
"Kyd makes one big mistake when he stops Morgan Fairchild,(Laura Cassidy/Eva Bomberg),Arizona Summer,'73 from getting beaten up and raped."
"Kyd takes Laura home to his pad and when he wakes up, she is out on his patio eating his eggs and orange juice and making herself right at home."
"Bitten by a bat while he's in the cave, he begins to transform into what I guess was supposed to be a human-bat hybrid (although when we finally see him in makeup he looks a lot more like an ape-man of some sort) and a killing spree starts."
"It seems to me that Stephen King's Bachman pen-name was a way for him to put out some of the grimmer, rawer, more mean-spirited stuff that he wanted to write without 'contaminating' his 'brand name'."
And The Dark Half seems to be at least partially about his Bachman persona.)
It's truly stupid how the news anchor expresses her sadness towards the plane crash.
"Alex English does as well as he could have with his character however, and I wish he would try to act in more films."
"They find the infected thief and burn his body, only to have the smoke infect a flock of birds that are flying over the chimney stack(!)."
"We never get to see them come back as zombies, in fact the only ones we do see 'zombified' are the ones pecked by the birds and the one girl who gets her legs bitten off."
A radio DJ who narrates throughout the whole movie turns out to be a zombie himself and warns his listeners about the 'beginning of the end' while the two survivors take off in a helicopter.
In the movie the hero of the movie (Ganesh) sacrifices his love for the leading lady (Pooja Gandhi) even though the two loved each other!
While in Chimayo Bill must contend with an annoying reporter who apparently broadcasts all of her stories in perfect English directly back to America.
James Mitchum along with his brother Chris are proof that nepotism in the acting industry needs to be curtailed.
"Actually, observing the hammy script and John Hough's 'baroque' art direction, one can hardly blame him."
"And Chris, shame on you for breaking down and proposing to her anyway!"
"You've been through two failed marriages, how could you rush into another one just because she pitched a fit?"
Seeing a giant fanged turtle retract his head and limbs and begin spinning through the air like a missile is hilarious.
"Plus an odd Japanese monster movie cliche is included that will frankly annoy most non-Japanese audience members, and that is the adorable and precocious little boy who loves the monster and believes in him."
Out strolled Vince McMahon himself and demanded they lift the chamber.
and Big Vis tasted defeat against the wasted Shelton Benjamin with a little help from his Mama.
Godzilla also does his share of demolition as the movie winds down.
"This Godzilla suit design owes much to the Sumo - his thighs are flabby enough to double for Rush Limbaugh's, and his belly and chest are thick and ponderous."
"After which, and thanks to poor acting by Haim (I loved this kid, too, but it's not exactly sacrilegious to admit the times when he obviously couldn't act well) and the lack of real immediacy and emergency between Bernie and the villain that makes much of the events unconvincing and as a result, inappreciable."
"However, others understanding that Haim's career probably peaked when he was 14 or 15 and never recovered, might expect mediocrity, as will viewers just looking for early 90s b-comedy fluff to pass the time"
Writer/Director Bart Sibrel bases his work here around a can of film that he says was mistakenly sent to him by NASA.
Sibrel thinks he's the only one who's seen it.
Pete tells the story of his life and the abuse he suffered at the hands of his parents.
"I deliberately say well-mannered dinosaurs, because at a certain point one of the prehistoric monsters politely knocks on the front door before menacing his targets."
Although a more talented director would have made better use of the facilities he had.
"First of all, you find out that the shooter has no bank account and no history since leaving the army in 1993 and pays his rent in cash."
"Also, the head of security for the POTHUS would not be so emotional that he would start drinking into a haze if the president was shot."
Nastassja's role is very restrictive and she is the only principal adult character who does not take off her clothes.
"It sounds weird, but I like the position Dean Cain was in at the end and the choice he made."
"Following this, we learn of Domino's relationship with her father who died in the film when when she was ten or something; here is the first use of the 'sort of' cop out as in real life she was just four."
But if the film had gone by reality's dates then her entire drive would've been born out of the death of........her goldfish.
"During the scene, an American mother is pinned down via gunfire in her own caravan in the back end of nowhere as she pleads for her son's life to be spared."
Mariesa Tomei probably wishes this role had never come her way.
"I have always found Ms. Ryan to be a charming and winsome actress in nearly all her roles, and Kevin Kline is almost always worth watching."
Greengrass must be laughing his head off at the gullibility of his film disciples.
"Perkins plays an aged Norman well again and the scene at the end was excellent, he swang that spade awfully hard"
Way too many flashbacks to her childhood.
"There's also this irritating Janis Ian clone (Phil) and this alcoholic den mother Mrs. Mac, seen taking nips from the various bottles of booze she has stashed all over the house."
"So it seems that the house has been receiving obscene phone calls, but this was before email, so they couldn't ask him to send a photo."
"Then the cops realize that the killer is in the house, and call Jess and tell her don't ask questions, just do as I say walk to the front door and get out."
Madsen drops to his knees and begs Christ's forgiveness.
End the movie as Madsen walks by the bar and gives a soliloquy about how happy he is with Christ and without alcohol.
"Denver Pyle is an actor all his own, and that made him perfect for the role."
The American bloke whose name escapes me is just as rubbiush as he was in flash gordon.
Maud Adams tries as a villianess but she is a bit long in the tooth for this type of thing.
"They bring back only one actor, Guzman, and hes playing a totally different guy."
He knows I am serious!
"The opening states that, although guilty of conduct unbecoming, the lad's mother is living - but, she never re-enters the picture."
Eddie Murphy's James Brownesque performance rescues the movie just when it hits its multiple lulls and Jennifer Hudson's performance compels you to pay attention each time she's on screen.
"It's not often Mr Hoberman leads me astray, and perhaps you'd rather listen to him, but don't say you weren't warned."
"Hey, don't kill him!"
"I mean it would be a reasonable excuse if this were some junior high schooler's production for his first cinema class, but the referenced artist behind this dreck was twenty-six at the time of this miscarriage."
"Department store clerk Betsy Drake is in love with the idea of babies and marriage, pinning her hopes on women's magazines until she spies super-bait in the form of sleek bachelor Cary Grant."
The rest of the film plods from one ploy to the next as the relentless Drake pursues her quarry.
Grant's role is basically secondary and minus his usual flair.
Drake queries the hapless Grant following his lecture to a roomful of respectable ladies.
"The supporting players also look tired and run down, and Sid Caeser's presence is offensive even without his constant references to Chinks!"
I loved Segal's early films and feel like the only one who is still faithful to him.
Slipstream is a movie that is so strange that even David Lynch would probably look at the person next to him and say 'What's going on?'.
"However, Slipstream isn't as satisfying as any of the movies of Lynch despite imitating many of his techniques (although I was surprised to discover that nobody talks backwards in Slipstream)."
"Chaplin appears bemused by what cannot possibly be understood as Leigh's shyness and lack of grace, but rather her orthopedic unsteadiness."
Obsessed teacher (3 years prior) kills teenager's family because he wants her.
"Obsessed teacher sneaks out of hotel---again it is stupid, ever cop would know his face--but he walks right by them."
"Only: this teacher wasn't selfish,- just someone in several roles, caring for his pupils, and worried about his script."
"An unruly neighborhood catches up to him and just as they're about to torch him, he drives his van off a cliff.....into the moon."
"It got a boring cast, although A.Bynes is okej in her perky way, the rest is just stereotypical crap....as always."
"And look, her missing daughter looks kinda like the girl with the doll I accidentally was sort of responsible for getting killed, in a way."
(Courageously kicks her in the face.
Voluptuous wench: Snore (At the Nicolas Cage roast) Ellen Burstyn: And who can forget the part where Basket's cell phone rings in the middle of his bear suit scene and then the call gets dropped.
(Six months later) Voluptuous wench in modern-day slutty attire: I told that eponymous Basket Case to take me with him.
He says for it's written the inhabitants of the Earth have been made drunk with her blood.
But together with one of Karen's friends and colleagues Jenny (Annie McEnroe) he visits Stefan at his home.
Hunt) and that she is an extremely vicious and dangerous Werewolf who wants Karen.
But Stirba knows of Stefan's arrival and has plans for him Ben and Jenny.
"Stirba and her servant's costumes are very over-the-top, Stirba wears an outfit that looks like it belongs in a S/M video and to be fair to her she looks pretty sexy, and her minions wear skimpy leather clothing too."
"The special make-up effects range from good to poor, a dwarf's eyes explode, someone has their hand ripped off and a priest has some creature emerge from his mouth but this isn't a film loaded with gore, although there are plenty of effect sequences with Werewolf transformations and attacks."
There is plenty of nudity as well as Stirba and her minions are a real randy bunch of Werewolves!
The lighting here is horrible and Uwe has the old 'I'm not using a steady cam' fiasco that he did with BloodRayne 2.
The cop actually tells Seed he could have shot him.
"For some un-be-known reason, the cop doesn't shoot him."
The script is terrible because a guy gets his head chopped off and Elanor (the one who dies saving the kids) says oh no.
"He spoke like there was something important about his work, but after a viewing of this, I see nothing of any import whatsoever."
"In addition , a security agent (Stacy Haiduk) and her mate (Brian Wimmer) fight hardly against the carnivorous Smilodons."
What I am saying is that Flemming's documentary is an incredibly biased and self-serving piece of work that hodge podges different arguments and evidence to serve his anti-Christian view.
"Whether or not she succeeds, you'll have to watch to find out."
"Afterthought: The director of the movie, obviously, is a species of his own."
Judd Nelson was very good in the first film and put a whole lot more into his character than in this.
"Yeah, out of nowhere the crew is just going to let this stranger come into the picture and finish the film not knowing anything about him."
This vampire tries to seduce his prey by imitating a lost puppy.
Too much time and effort was spent in the movie on Dahmer's homosexual tendencies and his alcohol consumption.
"Gandalf can be funny talking Korean, the basilisk looking snake hilarious if you compare it to a kitten and the evil henchman can provide a lot of fun switching back and forth between Sauron and Jaja-bing, or whatever his name was."
Dara Tomanovich is better and during her scenes with Sheedy the level rises a little.
"Sheedy's meticulous, understated performance (though she often seems to be on automatic pilot) is admirable in itself but out of context with the rest."
"We are somehow led to believe that DeNiro has found his way onto the field in an umpire's uniform, and that the game is even being played in a torrential downpour....one of the worst ever scenes in a sports movie."
"Mr. Chandler) must kill a person at random before he is trusted with the life- or, rather, the death- of a witness who will testify against someone in the family."
Sheryl Lee made Angel seem as believable as she could get.
"Apparently, he alleged that somehow Scientologists destroyed his reputation and sank this film."
The guy who plays William Randolph Hearst overacts to the point where you want to reach into the screen and slap him.
Corrupt partner who caused the whole thing gets fried alive together with his payoff money.
"Jerry Lewis knew how to pull off this type of physical comedy, not to mention he worked with much better writing."
"Peter Falk is also wasted, though he has a few funny lines that I'm pretty sure he improvised."
"I didn't like Falk's last movie Made all that much either, but at least he had a decent role."
"For example, when Kattan is about to fart in his two brothers' faces."
"Leaving that behind, the film makers completely manipulated their interviews with at least one of the participants to make it appear that he supported their beliefs when, in fact, he completely opposed them."
Sharon Stone stars in her first role where she is most of the time a turn-off.
"Sharon Stone has some highlights, but here, she gets extremely obnoxious."
The bomber himself is a complete mystery.
"Obviously Holly's performance would knock Angela down a few pegs, but nothing is shown to indicate how she reacts."
"Or rather, as third banana to Bo Derek's left breast and her right breast."
"Angela Bassett, the one shining grace in this film, plays his over protective, religious mother."
"When a man who doesn't have Alzheimer's can't remember how many films he's made, he probably is the world's most prolific director after all."
"Anyway, the adventure begins properly when a studly guy and his freaked out Vietnam vet pal are sent to the island to recover the white girl from the kidnappers."
"by acres of 360 degree nudity from the natives and the two female leads, and even from the monster himself."
"The only story involving a superficial seduction is told just so the audience ends up being surprised that the guy (Ethan Hawke) gets outwitted by the girl he's hitting on, who unexpectedly turns out to be a hooker."
Makavejev is trying to say that he is pi$$ed off at the world.
"Italian-born Eleonora has inherited from her deceased lover Karl, an ultra-modern and isolated house in the middle of the woods."
"After the act, he lays in the bed with her not touching her."
"Pam's character in Coffy, degrades herself way too much to get the bad guys."
"Pam's characters in her other Blaxploitation films, don't stoop as low to get revenge, as Coffy did."
"I still love AH, and I'll always give him another chance, but if you aren't made of time to watch bad ideas on screen, skip this"
"This Spurlock should eat more McDonalds while filming himself, and quit producing."
"I thought it interesting that in a lengthy interview with producer Michael Hausman included on the DVD, he disclosed that the two stars had very different ideas about the script, that the director was nearly impossible to work with, that the director of photography had impossible demands made of him, that the crew was constantly angry about being made to sit around waiting, and so on."
Hughes even goes as far as to have her comment about missing him right as she observes a giant bratwurst.
"If Hughes intended for us to find one of the film's only non- American actors as the only funny part, then another tip of the hat to him for ripping open the underbelly of Hollywood comedy in the '80s."
"Lee Bowman is his usual self, meaning that he is merely adequate."
Not to take away from Bergman's talent... but in my opinion he should of had a little more class.
"Bob Fosse's Star 80 about Dorothy Stratten, of whom Bogdanovich was obsessed enough to have married her SISTER after her murder at the hands of her low-life husband, is a zillion times more interesting than Dorothy herself on the silver screen."
"But all in all, the movie is incredibly stupid, with a detective trying to track down a suspected serial killer, only to find out he may have committed one of the crimes."
"Not only is the plot completely stupid, the lady ghost is more funny than anything, especially when she suddenly flies across the city, like Wonder Woman."
(now THAT was original) The doctor had financed a mansion for her before she killed him and buried the sucker in the backyard.
"The sight of the assistant with his arm ripped off, pirouetting around the house without leaving much blood anywhere is just too precious"
"There are obvious problems; for example, after taking what seems to be weeks and weeks to get from fat to normal size, the main character seems to go from normal size to deathly thin in days... and once he's deathly thin he stays pretty much equally deathly thin for what seems to be a long time."
Nor did I really understand why the melty-faced main guy decided to slaughter everyone he met.
"Also, she is all gums."
Lancome must put her makeup on with a putty knife because she looks glamorous in the commericals
Acosta has his head chopped off refrigerated and then served on a platter to a shocked group of guests.
"The real killer ends up not only getting all the loot, 140 million dollars, but then ends up not having to split it with his accomplice by doing him, or her, in by giving him a poisonous cookie that kills him on the spot."
Even the big surprise at the end isn't really that much of a surprise since the killer's identity is divulged with the film-maker having forgotten to keep his face in the shadows so you actual see who he is even before he reveals himself!
Thought it got off to a cute start with Eddy as the playboy and MacDonald as the secretary he doesn't know exists.
"Whatever happens from there on doesn't really matter, because he's just dreaming."
"Had Eddy woken a sooner and the original story continued, or had he really married an angel, I think it would have been a lot more interesting."
"Another thing is that the orphanage were they first got the child burned to the ground just a few months after he was adopted, just like in The Omen."
However luckily one priest survived the blaze and escaped with sever burns all over his body....yet another coincidence??????
"She's babbling about her sex-life without leaving anything to your imagination,I don't care for my part,but I can't help wondering how she feels about it now when she's divorced.And yes,for her sake I'm embarrassed.But I shouldn't be.She seem to live a pretty empty,shallow life though.I don't want to swap lives with her even if I could."
"Mr Fraser is a tremendously skillful writer, but I am not a fan of his film screenplay work with Richard Lester."
"Jessica Simpson is not a great actress by any means, but she is pretty much beautiful and never truly annoying."
"At the beginning of the movie, the son's girl friend shows up at a window outside his room and they engage in an odd conversation."
"Yentl/Anschel and Avigdor go away for a few days, and Yentl/Anschel reveals her secret to him."
It is obvious that most of the others were deliberately placed so Streisand could simply have a reason to show off her vocal abilities every five to ten minutes.
"While she has excellent vocal and acting abilities, I am not a fan of her style of singing."
"Alice's smoking, drinking and uncanny way of showing up when her name is called is strange and interesting."
Any teacher not in a Spears-induced fantasy would have failed her on the spot.
"Duke resists, and determines that he will rescue the city from the corrupt police."
Duke is merely a murderous thug and Aretha his enabling misogynist accomplice.
"This film was nothing like The Burning Bed, which had power and Farrah played the part of a woman you truly felt for, and felt her pain and her need to survive."
Legendary Tommy Lee Jones is always great but this is not movie for him; far below his level.
"The story lines are both poorly written and executed and the jokes are really bad...I mean it is just a sh++ty rip-off of Dexter's Laboratory and Johnny Quest, 'bout an obnoxious boy with flamed blond hair with his twin genius sisters and talking dog; a stay-at-home dad and a smart, super-busy mom...Like oh-my-flippin'-God!"
There is basically no plot beyond some vague stuff about a cult that follows the work of De Sade who for some unclear reason feel the need to seduce the daughter of a local Christian archaeologist and kill her.
"The movie was awful, and it seemed like Washington didn't even turn in a performance, all he proved was, he knows how to use four letter words!"
Take away the language and I bet he was almost playing himself!
"Cage slips a little with his obnoxious voice stylings in the movie and occasionally sounds like a real person, and those scenes are more watchable than others."
"But if I had to watch the movie through in its entirety, I would find myself wanting to pay someone in L.A. to pour a bucket of water over his head during some of his more affected (put-on) scenes."
"Kathleen Turner is getting a lot of flak from critics regarding her Cage comments, which proves that she's strong enough to be honest, and to hell with other people's comments."
Doris Day never lets a bad script get her down.
Unable to socially interact with girls he bumps into a tramp who teaches him a special Vietnamese chant.
Especially the hooker's inability at saying dildo and his demand for satisfaction.
One girl's non-reaction to her fingers being chopped off is laughable.
Chris Kattan reveals his alarming limitations as and actor here as his one note slapstick routine falls flat about 10 minutes into the film.
"Yet another forgettable Warners foreign intrigue thriller, this is rendered even less enjoyable by the irritating presence of Lauren Bacall, who, without Humphrey Bogart's tender attentions to humanize her, comes off as her usual shrill, shallow self."
Even master gigolo Charles Boyer cannot feign romantic interest in her
"If you enjoy the former SNL comedian and his antics (in this case, Schneider), then you should go."
"Ben Gazarra as an attractive and very seductive man, with the women falling for him as if her were a Brad Pitt, Antonio Banderas or George Clooney, is quite ridiculous."
The film is about one of his training cycles and the men of the platoon he has to train.
But I will say that a recruit like Russ Tamblyn would have been cured of his smart mouth from day one.
Unfortunately later years has seen a steady decline in the quality of his work with Million Dollar Hotel and Land of Plenty hitting a terrible low point.
Seriously - Amenabar might know his stuff about ghost stories but he's clearly never read a detective book in his life.
"In Tesis, *POTENTIAL SPOILER AHEAD* the killer's identity is guessed correctly by the amateur 'detectives' almost instantly and then we get 100 minutes of the writer trying feebly to throw us off the scent until he runs out of ideas, throws his hands up and says OK, ya got me, it was him after all!"
"The final scenes, in which the point of the movie is supposedly hammered home, are so utterly absurd and puerile, one can't help but wonder if Amenabar feels embarrassed now when he watches this."
The three main characters lose their tempers constantly and make risque remarks (Did he make love to you?
"The breakdown scene alone will have you giggling, and after seeing the climatic I'm not the only one who had to **** her way to the top scene at the Awards (all done in the usual bargain-basement acting level we expect from such quality thespians as Pia), I sincerely hope that our dear Pia actually reused that speech when she won her Golden Globe."
"On the plus side, this helps not to overglamorize a character who is nothing more than an egotistical thug, but it's at odds with a script that seems to be expecting us to love him and his antics."
In this case you wish the taxi would run him over and be done with it.
A friend of mine is now in a hospital were a team of doctors are trying to surgically remove a DVD casing from his ***.
Maybe Rawson Marshall Thurber just got word his grandmother exploded or something.
"I am not usually this critical about any movie, cause every person has his/her style."
"The movie has a rather incoherent storyline, but who cares about story when all you want to see is a big fat woman running around killing people because she isn't being fed."
"The main problem manifests itself most visibly with the character Ayacoatl (not a commentary on Dichen Lachman's performance, but simply how her character was written, although, I'll say she has some work to do before she receives any Emmy nods)."
In A Christmas Story Ralphie's obsession with the BB gun seems cute but his obsession in this movie is boring.
"The next story, an OCD guy dies from not being careful and talks to a dead friend of his."
Milo's search for Atlantis continues that of his grandfather who raised him.
"The opening scene shows a much younger Milo giddily perched on a knee, as his grandfather places his pith helmet on his head."
Kida can be excused for not knowing how to read or operate the machinery if she was so young when the Cataclysm of Stupidity set in--But ANY OF IT **HARDLY** qualifies her father for Deification!!
Kashakim's foolishness almost single-handedly wiped his people from existence.
also the university professor wasting his time studying esp cases.
i found it interesting how her second lover also burned his face.
At the adoption agency they meet a mouse (Stuart) and they decide to adopt him.
"Stuart arrives to his new home, where he is treated like a human child."
"There is one or two decent performances, including the guys who played Jacob and Fenner but it's like the director had no clue on how to work or use his thespians."
It's like the director/writer watched a lot of sci-fi films and threw all the parts he liked into a blender and came up with this.
"My only hope is that he used other people's money on this, because if he used his own, he's a total sucker"
I question the Father since his future is left open ended.
It has to be one of the worst movies I have ever seen the director has no influence no perspective the same shots were used again and again he did not build up suspense the cast probably were simply told scream cry run fall.
"hmmm The acting was what you expect in a Australian soap opera hopeless, that main character the Blondie god dam she annoyed me."
"Immeasurably superior, Hornblower's main trouble in this movie series seems to be tolerating the many error ridden characters above and below him in the chain of command."
"Dane tries to hard and is to extreme with all of his yelling and going crazy, spilling water on himself and rolling on the floor."
I'm sure Rodney Dangerfield was really into that when he was alive.
"Apparently, the previous night, the night of the world premiere the director/writer/producer had been in the audience and had gotten to witness people laugh at and walk out on his movie."
"I'd have to say that this was a little embarrassing for the 'King of the Cowboys'; made in 1948, the picture came out a decade after Roy Rogers' earliest pictures in which he had a starring role."
And then you have Foy Willing and his Riders of the Purple Sage replacing Bob Nolan and the Sons of the Pioneers for your musical interlude.
"Jane Frazee does the honors as the female lead in this picture, as she would in four other films opposite Roy in the 1947/1948 time frame."
The likelihood of a flight attendant immediately finding and successfully engaging the autopilot is only slightly greater than the likelihood of her actually landing the jet safely.
"This is a well-worn story about a man who marries to escape the hangman's noose, then sets about taming his reluctant bride."
"We never find out, for example, why a woman who won the respect of an Indian warrior is completely unable to fight back against her erstwhile husband."
"Never mind that the first time probably would have lost him an eye, which would make it pretty hard to grab that whip!"
Never mind that he has zero diplomatic skills and she's been negotiating with them for years.
"Fleming flips her hair and scowls a lot, but is totally unconvincing as a fiery tomboy."
"McCoy gets to utter his famous phrase He's Dead, Jim."
"for all the subtle charms this student film may contain, was anyone else bored to death waiting WENDINGO to show his paper macho face??"
This is the only place the title character can purchase the bomb he plants in the mall in the dull finale.
The villainous mall owner hires the arsonist responsible for the fire as a security guard after his first security guard ends up dead.
"In real life, the brilliant Levant spent much of his life in and out of mental institutions"
"The story is very similar to other movies, in which a teenage girl from the family of immigrants needs to overcome many common personal problems of her age, and also to struggle against the pressure of ethnic traditions in her family."
For example a photographer takes his ( Barely legal ) model for a photo shoot .
"Everything else though is spot on, even a DeeDee character Johnny himself."
"The leading actor if you can call him that is a clumsy buffoon of a man, with chubby features, a receding, untamed hairline, and a series of facial expressions that range from cringe-making to plain disturbing."
My frustration was further confounded by his incessant to-camera monologues in between scenes.
Who does this guy think he is?
"Patricia Scanlon puts in a very funny appearance as Helen the ex-secretary, who has been driven insane by her old boss, and makes harassing phone calls from her basement, while holding a flashlight under her face."
Different background is appreciative but the way he presented it is not worthy.
I seriously dunno this guy Varma considers about lighting or not or may be he has no other lighting technique other than like gordon willis GODFATHER.
Narsimha:- The first best thing about this character is not to put audience in suspense about his hands.
Varma couldn't use a great actor like mohanlal to his mark.
"RAMGOPALVARMA:- His quality is degrading, diminishing."
"The killer is always going to come back dressed as someone else, be welcomed into the house by the stupid kid and go on a killing spree again because no one suspects him in that costume!"
"I know you all want to hear Samuel L. say his infamous line, but let's be honest, it's a whole lot of hype for very little pay off."
The brother of the anchorwoman werewolf from part one wants to find out what happened to his sis'.
"Sybil Danning and her two biggest assets appear as Stirba, the head werewolf of the Romania."
The low opinion of Carlton-Browne by his boss and the obscurity of Gaillardia (which no one can find on a map) is milked to death.
Sellers never quite takes center stage even when we're on his character's island.
"Amphibulos works his mangled-English vibe for all its worth (This man is like, how do you say, the bull in the Chinese ship) while Carlton-Browne is generally ragged on by his superior far more than he seems to deserve."
"Score one point for her being played by ravishing Luciana Paluzzi, dock one for the fact that they are apparently cousins is never addressed."
"Director Denys Arcand has really done everything he could to bring back Jesus to a mere historic figure, social worker, son of two humans, instead of the Son of God the Holy Spirit and Mary, Who opened Heaven again for us."
The depicted priest who runs the sanctuary where the Passion Play is performed in Montreal has a sexual relation with one of the female players of the Passion Play instead of showing his love for God through celibacy.
Done long before he started drinking heavily he is his classic self in this (and Larry's not bad either).
"However, if his mini-series rots, he has shamed all the excellent actors that performed on-screen, not to mention the myriad off-screen personnel."
I think the director got carried away with his artistic vision over the look of the film instead o badly needed attention to content.
"While filming an 80's horror movie called 'Hot Blooded', the director is brutally murdered and the leading lady is scarred as she survives the attack and manages to kill murderer."
"Zeta-Jones does a good job with what she's given, but she's given practically nothing."
Towards the end he sounded more like a Little Italy street thug.
Favourite line: When the queen says to her lover (after barfing on the floor) I'm going to have a baby.
(which is quite right since he's her mind control slave) But this stupid spin-off is not worth the time or the effort
"The animation is just terrible, looks like a 2 year old threw it together in his sleep."
Neighbor Andrews can see this and he declares his undying passion for her.
"But, through the course of the film Finch treats Liz more and more like an object and finally she is ready to leave...when out of the blue, Cholera strikes the plantation."
"The same character is also seen carrying on a deep, meaningful rapport with his towels, soap, stuffed animals, dirty laundry, etc."
"After the murderers get off scot-free thanks to a corrupt judge and he himself is jailed for 30 days for contempt of court, he decides to take matters into his own hands by joining a group of vigilantes led by a grizzled looking Fred Williamson."
The clown himself looks nothing like the one on the video cover.
If your friend goes missing why would you go out into the woods to have sex rather than look for her?
"Director Chang has no sense of style, and he is unable to hide the glaring imperfections found in the narrative."
"I had a hard time believing that anyone would even attempt to work with this person in any capacity: he's nothing but rude and abusive to everyone, including his girlfriend and his buddy."
Possibly the blond who would fit in on a recent fashion show with her make-up and streaked hair?
Could it possibly be that Jessica alba isn't as poor of an actress as most give her credit for and is is possibly that her acting abilities are being weight down by a poor script.
"When a successful young young man (Christenson) goes under the knife and realizes that the anaesthesia hasn't quite done its job, the horror quickly sets in as his worried wife (Alba) waits anxiously and a terrifying drama unfolds in the operating room."
"Sean Pertwee has a few comical moments, but mostly his acting was mundane."
Irving Klaw(Dukey Flyswatter)at his Movie Star News instructed Betty on what to do in front of the camera.
Betty Page would disappear and devote her last years to religion.
Miss Richards is stunning in her own right.
Spike Lee has been in a decline since his early successes and this mess does nothing to help.
It seems to be such fun that each character of the story gets to have his or her turn being dumped in feces at a point or another.
"And try to find young Michel Serrault, the future great actor of French cinema, in a bit part as a musician, in his very first movie."
All seriousness aside the best part was when the Wendigo finally showed up which was at the end and you couldn't really even see him that good.
"Near the end of the movie, he shoots a bodyguard in the back through a window and then assassinates a man by shooting him in the face through a faucet drain."
You know what a true Samurai does when he learns his master is proven bad or dishonorable?
First of all the movie is starring Lizzy McGuire's brother as the annoying little kid that goes looking for his lost 3 legged dog.
"Seagal himself in particular was exactly the stone-faced, no-nonsense man's man that we've come to expect, and the rest of the cast backed him up pretty well, without ever up-staging him."
Dr. Seuss would sure be mad right now if he was alive.
Myers proves he can't act in this film.
"But as a parent who recently watched my five year-old lose his best canine friend, it was a horror flick."
Do not underestimate the willpower of a young heart- no amount of persuasion will convince him that it was only a movie and that his dog is NOT coming back for Christmas.
"Mabel Normand is there with her friend also, and Chaplin manages to rid himself of both his and Mabel's friends."
"Philippa Boyens said as much in an interview, when she said they deliberately didn't re-read the books before writing the script."
"In two cases the Scott character mouths one, once at the beginning when he drops his bomb off target during the bomb-off (dammit) and once when he is trying to sway a bombardier into being a pilot (s*%t)."
"I remember McNamara's quoting of LeMay in The Fog of War, something to the effect that if the US did not win the conflict he would be tried as a war criminal."
They failed to understand that God is the author of beauty and He is the Creator of passion and sexual gratification in the proper context of marriage bonds.
"Even if you want to ignore the New Testament, the writers & characters completely ignore that there are passages such as the Song of Solomon in the Old Testament, and the even the book of Proverbs which says, Rejoice in the wife of thy youth, let her breasts satisfy you always!"
It actually pains me to write this review because I am such a huge fan and have loved his movies since I was a child
"Eva Longoria proves that she can't carry a film in this terrible romantic comedy, and further, that she doesn't really even have any comedic timing."
"I felt most sorry for Bell, as she appears to have some comic abilities and was working overtime in an effort to make the material work."
"If, in the first 10 minutes of this film, you don't realize that the main character, who writes a life advice column, is going to have the tables-oh-so-cleverly-turned and learn some valuable life lessons himself, then there is probably something wrong with you."
It's hard to believe Binoche's character would have any interest in him.
"If one forgets the (failed) frightening dimension and looks at other sides of the movie, he is again disappointed."
Ben Kingsley should have been stripped of his knighthood for even considering this film as one of his projects.
Jay Rodan was almost good as Agis; too bad he had such a bad script to work with.
Rachael Stirling gives her best effort as the almost gullible lady in waiting.
"If at a given time you're capable of replacing a total eye, no responsible medical scientist would start his very first human attempt with both eyes at the same time, that's totally unprofessional."
"but as the operation fails on account of the apparent nervous breakdown of the patient, it's beyond me why they're out to kill him."
And that the recipient of these eye-balls also adopts the wolf's craving for red (life-) meat and can jump off of a 30 feet high balcony and land unharmed on his all-fours like a cat (can a wolf even DO that??!).
"The Mother is the embodiment of the physical Universe as well, she is Nature."
"When the ego drops away she becomes a form that is enchanting, beautiful, and young, a beauty that is so enchanting to behold that she enchants the entire Universe with it."
"Kali Maa is an ancient Mother, not to be trifled with for the sake of entertainment, let's just hope that in her endless compassion and mercy that she does not take on wrathful form to those involved with this movie."
"Largo is supposed to be Serbian in the comic, now suddenly he becomes croatian, pfff!"
A recently divorced wannabe film maker(Myles Berkowitz)sees a chance to liven up his love life and step into the movie biz at the same time.
This film concerns the story of Eddy as mentioned in the title and his homecoming to old friends in a seaside community.
Also whenever the writer feels at a loss to where to go to next he cuts to a music montage of the protagonist walking through fields to some indie mood music.
My friends still laugh at me for listening to his CDs.
Flaw number 3...the director though long pauses and tight camera shots equaled suspense (especially with the typical suspense music dubbed in)...he was sadly mistaken.
It was painful to watch a terrific actress like Amber Benson waste time trying to bring this back to life....my only hope is the money she made here was put toward producing her own film
"The End of Violence and certainly the Million Dollar hotel hinted at the idea the Wenders has lost his vision, his ability to tell compelling stories through a map of the moving picture."
"Completely lacking in humility, he offered us the following: I hope...no, wait...I KNOW you're going to enjoy the next two hours."
"Alright, it seems that the screenwriter has never experienced actual human beings in real life, but instead has gained all his knowledge from bad movies."
The main character Lance Barton gets killed and to heaven before his time.
When heaven learns about the mistake he is given the body of just deceased rich old and white Mr. Wellington.
"If it was to just show a typical mundane portion of a person's life, I guess he succeeded."
main character's mother's uncle's fishing partner kicked his friend's father's dog).
And to have to listen to the unfunny Will Ferrell do his Woody Allen imitation makes me loathe the second-rate (though mysteriously popular) Ferrell even more.
Dwight Frye steals all his manic scenes in 'Dracula' (1931).
"Unfortunately, she was not presented much into the script."
Wes Bentley is a good actor but he is so dry and plain in this that it's sad.
Amelia has a long-time lover in the hospital and Michael hires a prostitute that doesn't satisfy him.
It sure seems self-serving for a filmmaker to make a documentary that only reflects his preconceptions on issues.
Jay O. Sanders hit the right notes for his character especially with his scenes with Josh Brolin.
Gretchen Moll was lovely but she seemed a little too wise for the character she played.
"The production value is fair, and Wong Li-lin tries her best, but she's not helped by the script."
"Joan Chen has a 15-minute bit-part in the movie as the older Wong and is perhaps the best actress of the lot, but, hey, her role is just cameo."
"Nightclubs have terrible, revoltingly dressed garage bands, Peter Gallagher's uninteresting version of Burt Lancaster's anti-hero is left by his femme fatale girlfriend for compulsively buying cinematically lifeless modern appliances like stereos, TVs, and other up to date pieces of equipment that suck the reaction out of the film."
"Soderbergh, a fine director, does not utilize his dry detachment to the benefit of his film this time."
"Our killer uses a trusty hunting knife throughout the entire film, except during a flashback when he implements a handsaw, pitchfork and rusty saw blade to dispatch his cheating wife's lover."
Dieter Bohlen is a rather untalented composer parvenu whose lack of talent is only surpassed by the size of his ego.
"The rest of this movie is dismally bad, The camera work often looks like they've just put the camera man on roller skates and pushed him along."
"In the midst of this, one of the sons (David) brings home his new wife (Susan Hayward)."
"Miss Hayward's character is as black and white as the others, though while they are all good and swell, she's obviously a horny she-devil."
"Steve Hanson, the heroic but not exactly sharp Sheriff is on the case, but only if he's not too busy chasing big city thugs traveling through the area."
"Interwoven with our lessons we follow the fictitious life of Amanda, a photographer who pops anti-depressants and hates her thighs."
"As the main demon, classy actor Charles Dance looks terribly embarrassed to be in the film, but hey, I'm sure he was well paid for sacrificing his talents."
"- When the local sheriff is killed, his wife takes over until and is determined to clean-up the town."
"Filmmaker Nicolas Roeg served as executive producer and, though not directed by him, the film does have his chilly, detached signature style all over it."
Kay Francis throughout looks fat-faced and far less attractive than she normally does.
The homicide investigation If you add in Casey's concerns you fond out he wants to be an actor and avenge his father's death.
Nisha is just plain annoying from the time her lips first open.
"Ajay Devgan was average, at least his expressions changed which is more than i can say for his mistake of a companion."
"Another actress with the fake British accent was pretty, yes, but good lord was her accent terrible."
Mix that with her (lack of) acting and you have a disaster.
Did Hitler himself go around boasting about it?
Little Max is trying to pull her in.
"Suddenly, we get a major close up on Max's face as he shouts (in slow motion) Whaaaaatttt'ssss happpeniiiinngggg?!?!?"
"The premise remains the same: Lance Barton, (Rock) is taken before his life time is up and works a deal with God's representative, Mr King, to come back to earth as someone else."
"Unfortunately, just when things would start to show promise, Ms. Lustig would dig into her bag of film school tricks and jumble things up again."
"With a director who barely seems interested in what's happening in front of the camera, how could Barbara Stanwyck herself have come off well"
Hyung-Rae Shim is lucky that bad film-making isn't a capital crime or he'd be put to death twice for writing and directing this disaster.
"Lorenzo Lamas is awesome here, and while he isn't required to act, he is quite fun to watch, and has a really cool character, and had a lot of charisma, however even he can't save this one,and he had no chemistry with the cast either!"
"Cheryl Jeans is hot, but does not have much to do but scream and scared, she did okay at that.Robert Scott is INCREDIBLY annoying as the main villain, and wasn't menacing at all, he was laughable as were the other 2."
"This film turns Hammer into a boob by surrounding him with bad guys who are ... well, too dumb to get away with anything."
One is so poorly drawn that he succumbs to a popcorn attack.
"Velda's dance at the barre, for instance, or the bad guy who accidentally stabs his boss in the back."
"Unfunny script (we should go home and write better), ridiculous lines in order to understand the strong Christmanish message (our only aspiration in life is to find love, respect and a good friendship) and a very long trial scene at the end where the agent Hopkins beat the devil (Jennifer Love Hewitt is no sexy or evil at all) for all the bad things she made to this unlikable character."
"Beyonce Knowles is lovely and sings her songs perfectly well, but is stuck with a character who is basically all surface glitz."
"Eddie Murphy acquits himself well as a singer obviously based on James Brown, but the role is not especially meaty and ultimately has little impact."
"Even though the film tries to soften some of Effie's harder edges to make her more likable, the charges still stand."
"Effie is supposed to expressing her rage and desperation at her predicament, but Hudson comes off as a cabaret performer belting out a hot number."
"Foxx's criminal offenses in the film are undoubtedly par for the course of many struggling record producers, but the film's seeming implication that he has it coming because he helped usher in the disco era is rather ridiculous, not to mention pretentious and condescending, particularly coming from a film with all of the depth of a puddle."
"Mr. Shepherd prefers to ignore this basic fact, and therefore, his plot does not work."
This picks off with Karen White's funeral (she was killed at the end of the first film).
There's also a werewolf orgy which is particularly stupid and Danning takes off her top at least EIGHT TIMES during the closing credits!
Supposedly Danning was horrified when she saw the movie--I can understand why!
"After the inspector says this, the hero takes his bulldozer and wrecks the huge ant colony."
"Maybe it was the Musical score or the Director himself, but one thing is for sure the Make-up artist needs to get another job !"
"Before watching this film, I could already tell it was a complete copy of Saw (complete with the shack-like place they were in and the black guy wanting someone to break his hand to get out of the cuffs)."
"Leigh is a controversial actress most either love her or hate her and she always has a particular edginess and tenseness to her style, like she's acting through gritted teeth."
"While the character garners a lot of sympathy, she's not particularly likable."
"I have to admit I had never heard the man's name before watching this, but the very instant he appeared I was just plain annoyed."
"The voice is crap, the face is a bad rip-off of Legolas, the posture is horrible, and he cannot even properly coordinate all three of them."
"), a meek but devoted stage manager (forever chided by one and all for his unmanly behavior!"
"Beverley Garland is okay but is undermined by the direction, which has her gawking in a night club when she should be furtive."
"I only know one word, she says, Si."
Keith visits a witness in her flat over a night club.
All the artist did was limit himself to dime a dozen landscapes.
"Instead, the drawn out scene (which FAR exceeds the brutality of the initial rape both in the degree to which it was graphic and to which it was ritualized) is crowned with a shot of Dawson's face in an expression of either regret or This didn't fix anything while the rape of her rapist is heard continuing in the background."
"Gamera is a GOOD turtle, he pleads, then sulks, and puts on a face like someone's pooped in his coco pops."
"Unless, of course, you're an Elvira die-hard and can't help yourself to hear her luscious commentary; personally, I'd rather get Joel or Mike Nelson with the robots from Mystery Science Theater on this roast turkey"
"I did however enjoy watching a great Canadian actress Sheila McCarthy again, she's always a treat and a natural at everything she does, too bad her daughter in the show doesn't have the same acting abilities"
"I seriously expected more from the former leader of Dire Straits, but his job in this movie is seriously lacking."
"Shortly, Confederate soldier Henry B. Walthall, separated from his regimen, wanders onto the enemy's property, desperate for water; he finds a supply where the Unionist's young daughter Gladys Egan sits."
"Later, when he returns to kill her father, the little girl's kindness is remembered."
Mickey Rourke is a brilliant actor and he's stands miles ahead all the rest.
The director needs to watch more films before attempting to direct his own.
"Boy this guy is right , someone does hate cats and with a deduction like that he should be a policeman ."
"This movie portrays Earp as an honest man, and also his brothers."
The plot is really weak and unbelievable - the avalanche expert guy gets hit by a 20 foot wave of bone breaking avalanche (using actual footage) and all he has to do is get up and shake himself down.
"Besides, it doesn't deliver much in the scares department a giant crab attack is merely silly as, generally, the ghosts inhabit a specific character and cause him or her to act in a totally uncharacteristic way, such as Susan George seducing diplomat/friend-of-the-family Doug McClure and Edward Albert force-feeding his daughter a bowl of soup!"
"At one point, an old monk turns up at the house to warn Albert of the danger if they remain there eventually, he's called upon to exorcise the premises."
"When an expedition is sent to Cambodia to discover the trick to making zombies after World War I, one of the members decides to use the knowledge for his own evil ambitions."
"Smith is mediocre, but we already knew that (he seems to be Hollywood's latest unsuccessful attempt to create a black Bruce Willis)."
Every actor seems to be bored out of his head and unable to grasp what he are actually supposed to be doing on location.
I was initially all fired up at reading one poster's comment that Andrew Stevens in this movie gave the performance of his career.
This is what happens when director comes to work just because someone is paying him to.
"Pertwee is actually the film's star, and his character is something of a surfing legend to a small group of surfing devotees, the requisite oddball group of free spirits that inevitably inhabit films like this."
"This tear-teaser, written by Steve Martin himself, is so unbelievably bad, it makes you sick to your stomach!"
"For instance, when someone suddenly shows up, gutted and filled with money and straw (yep, straw) in his huge open wound, the others ask What drug is he on?"
I wished one of the scarecrows had killed her quickly because she was a pain in the butt.
And you have Ironhead fighting against everyone because he's just the biggest and most greedy asshole anyway.
"This movie starts out promisingly, with an early scene in which Frank Morgan advises against Gary Cooper's marriage to his daughter, Anita Louise."
"Frank Morgan, playing an unabashed gold-digger, loudly complains to Cooper about his perceived penury at the hands of his family - including his daughter, Anita Louise."
Nobody lets himself undergo a complete medical examination without his being advised of its purpose or giving his consent!
"Finally, the scenes of Cooper's overly fastidious, neurotic attention to his baby's feeding and weight may have struck a nerve with a few people who have experienced anxiety over their own newborn babies."
Sniper missing and not killing Hurt (just wounding him) but the second kill shot is dead on ?
Oh and by the end of the movie they decide to start wearing gloves on their hands except for the evil agent and Hurt decides to kill him by giving him the virus handshake.
"first of all, the casting could have been better; Katelyn the main character looked nothing like her TV mom."
"Syrupy, sugary, and most of all, sappy story about a battle of the 'classes' when rich-kid Ryan O'Neal brings home a waif of a librarian for his snobbish parents to ridicule."
"I found certain parts of this film exceedingly offensive, Zemeckis dumbs down this movie almost to the level of Gump himself ."
After an initial very strange doubt from her mother (which is not believable when the mother proves to be so supportive and loving later in the movie) the rape victim is not alone.
"Colt, who is usually over-the-top, wigs out in a couple of scenes, but he's too well behaved for my money."
"Second-tier American leading man Guy Madison plays a character whose notoriety precedes him in this Spaghetti Western which, having very modest credentials emerges as essentially routine (though featuring a nice enough score)."
"Once is in the sight of Geraldo Rivera playing an obnoxious, arrogant and amoral TV tabloid journalist -- which is funny only because he apparently doesn't realize he is playing himself."
One guy even responds to himself ...using the same name!
"One could argue that he doesn't answer, because it's none of their business."
"The direction is pathetically dilettante - the so-called director is unable to build up at least a mediocre mise-en-scene, his shots are annoyingly awkward, and any sense of storytelling shines by total absence."
"at the top of his lungs while going into Jackie Chan moves I've never seen before, and even further biting the guy who has the virus?"
"Why does the father of the kid proceed to get angry with the virus-infected guy, and go on a redneck hunting spree to find him?"
"Even now, in despite of his announcement, he is the Ministro de Interior y Justicia."
"SALLY remains her finest film, with this trailing as second and the rather poor SUNNY a vastly inferior runner up."
But after seeing his acting performance I have come to the conclusion that he should stay playing dumb country hicks who bartend.
"But now in White Men Can't Jump she was made a central character with many lines, thus meaning that the audience has to put up with her incredibly annoying and whining voice."
It would have been much better without Seagal who has become a cartoon of himself.
"Her next signature, for me, would be 55 Days at Peking."
Or did Guy Richie himself sign up 788 times under different names?
Guy is cleverly tipping his hat to Brecht!
Will Ferrell wastes his time in this movie which fails to showcase his usually funny delivery.
All of the victims are blind and he dismembers them.
"The killer chooses to walk after his running victim, opting instead to frolick I guess."
Mark Strong was not the gentleman he was supposed to be.
Marshall provides a commentary track that has plenty of his trademark laconic humor.
Joe Wright is largely at fault but even he can't save a Lifetime story.
The film doesn't incorporate this characteristic fully into his persona.
"This is only Joe Wright's third film, and his first that isn't a romance staring Keira Knightley."
Let's hope this film isn't an indication of how limited his abilities are.
"Beginning on Halloween night 1968, 6 year old Michael commits the brutal murder of his 18 year old sister."
Michael is committed to a mental institution and 15 years later escapes and returns to his home town to murder again.
"However, it is clear that the star, in Jamie-Lee Curtis, is in the infancy stages of her acting career and thus fails to provide a truly frightened central victim."
"First they turned the protagonist into a freak who had the crazy idea of showing off his amazing knowledge in front of an audience, in a public area."
I was also slightly disappointed by Dominic Purcell's performance because I found he didn't make a believable John Doe.
"In some way I have the impression that it missed its target, developing characters to help the protagonist find his own identity."
"It doesn't take Sherlock Holmes to solve the mystery of the killer's identity, as it is revealed to be none other than a scarred Marty who has seemingly been using his nerd rage and high intellect to bend the laws of physics and engineering in order to rig the school for his revenge scenario."
Lonnie has been sleeping with Candy (Charlize Theron) who is the wife of his best friend Roy Kirkendall (Patrick Swayze).
Roy and Candy have been trying to have a baby and finally Candy discovers that she is pregnant.
And Swayze's character is called stupid and dumb by everyone throughout the film and one of the rare good moments comes when he asks everyone to lay off of him for at least one day.
"Mind you, considering she used to be in The Word, any viewers' expectations of her acting ability had to be pretty low to begin with."
Gamera lost his iconic roar.
"Akshay Kumar is great actor, in fact he's the sole saving grace."
Saif Ali Khan doesn't get his due in here.
wow if this is all that wes craven can produce his time is long up.
"Meyer replaces his usual bevy of buxom babes with throng of hunks with massive pecs, in the form of anonymous black actors playing the slaves and the big David (Darth Vader) Prowse."
"Under any circumstance, had her character been a real person, Anouska would have whipped the slave driver senseless and kicked his butt off the island."
Frankie wants to be a ballerina and a baseball player (yuk) while best-friend Hazel runs for mayor---she's 13!
Milo's search for Atlantis continues that of his grandfather who raised him.
"The opening scene shows a much younger Milo giddily perched on a knee, as his grandfather places his pith helmet on his head."
Kida can be excused for not knowing how to read or operate the machinery if she was so young when the Cataclysm of Stupidity set in--But ANY OF IT **HARDLY** qualifies her father for Deification!!
Kashakim's foolishness almost single-handedly wiped his people from existence.
Poor Rupert was left spitting out sea water in order to deliver his line.
"For entertainment, the great opera singer should stick to singing.....not that he's a terrible actor."
"It wasn't Michael Keaton's fault; it was a pleasure to see him return as the star of a brand new movie once again, looking a bit wrinkled perhaps, but still managing to give a strong and sincere performance."
"The director's commentary was a one-shot, sit the guy down and let him talk, no cuts type of commentary."
"While this isn't necessarily bad, the director ends up rambling a lot and often spends minutes at a time complaining about his college, filming conditions, co producers, bad film, and a dozen other things."
"Too bad, because I really like Parker Posey, reduced here to working with an absurd part that asked her to morph from indifferent, estranged wife and indifferent, clueless mother to tough, shrewd international player capable of psychological mano a mano with terrorists."
"Jeff Goldblum can be very good, but he's not capable of overcoming miscasting as a CIA operative."
"Compare to the original, in which Chuck Heston's nakedness metaphorically captured his utter helplessness and astonishment at his turn of events."
"The uniformed Wahlberg preserves his modesty, but also his apparent sense of management and control in an inherently wacky situation, and we never really wonder about his well being."
This is basically a Cheech and Chong movie made credible by its stodgy English setting and Brenda Blethyn's overwhelming power to inflict emotion on an audience using her voice alone.
Brenda attempts to peddle her illicit wares on the street of London in a blaring white dress-suit.
